
\f 



c,/ 



'i/ 



m 

for the Analysis of the Oyi 



iS^/i 



•.L V 



\\ ^ 


v-% 


3rft^~^\/ 




Jtfv^J^ 




\r\ \N 


h^jLv A 


7 /~V-/i.\ 'Jf^" \ - 1 >'M' ^^TT.**^ 








lK| 




iwi 






^ 

^ 

1 

i 


P 


^oi^^^^ 


m 


I 



\ 



m 





HE SOCIAL SYSTEM 



/" 



7alcott Parsons 



THE 

SOCIAL 
SYSTEM 



THE FREE PRESS OF GLENCOE 

COLLIER-MACMILLAN LIMITED, LondoH 



Copyright © 1951 by Talcott Parsons 

Printed in the United States of America 

All rights reserved. No part of this hook may be reproduced or utihzed in 
any form or by an\' means, electronic or mechanical, including photocopying, 
recording or by any information, storage and retrieval system, without per- 
mission in writing from the Publisher. 

FIRST FREE PRESS I'AI'ERUACK EDITION 1964 

For information, address: 

The Free Press of Glencoe 

A Division of The Macmillan Company 

The Crowell-Collier Publishing Company 

60 Fifth Avenue, New York, N.Y., lOOIl 

ColHer-Macmillan Canada, Ltd., Toronto, Ontario 

DESIGNED BY SIDNEY SOLOMON 



bio 
To Helen fl5^ 

WHOSE HEALTHY AND PRACTICAL 
EMPIRICISM HAS LONG BEEN AN 
INDISPENSABLE BALANCE-WHEEL 
FOR AN INCURABLE THEORIST 




REFACE 



THE present volume is an attempt to bring together, in 
systematic and generalized form, the main outlines of a conceptual 
scheme for the analysis of the structure and processes of social 
systems. In the nature of the case, within the frame of reference 
of action, such a conceptual scheme must focus on the delineation 
of the system of institutionalized roles and the motivational proc- 
esses organized about them. Because of this focus and the very 
elementary treatment of processes of economic exchange and of 
the organization of political power, the book should be regarded 
as a statement of general sociological theory, since this is here 
interpreted to be that part of the theory of the social system which 
is centered on the phenomena of the institutionalization of patterns 
of value-orientation in roles. 

The title, The Social System, goes back, more than to any 
other source, to the insistence of the late Professor L. J. Henderson 
on the extreme importance of the concept of system in scientific 
theory, and his clear realization that the attempt to delineate the 
social system as a system was the most important contribution of 
Pareto's great work.^ This book therefore is an attempt to carry out 
Pareto's intention, using an approach, the "structural-functional" 
level of analysis, which is quite different from that of Pareto, and, 
of course, taking advantage of the very considerable advances in 
our knowledge at many points, which have accumulated in the 
generation since Pareto wrote. 

For the reader's orientation it is important to relate the present 

^ Cf . L. J. Henderson, Pareto's General Sociology. 

vii 



[ viii ] Preface 

book both to the author's previously pubhshed work and to his 
nearly simultaneously appearing contribution to the volume Toward 
a General Theory of Action by members of the Harvard University 
Department of Social Relations and their collaborators. 

The author's Structure of Social Action was not a study in 
sociological theory in a strict sense, but an analysis, in relation to 
the work of a group of authors, of the nature and implications of 
the action frame of reference. Since its publication in 1937 there 
has been gradually taking shape a formulation of a systematic 
approach to the narrower tasks of sociological theory as such, stimu- 
lated by empirical work in a variety of fields and by the writings 
of other authors, particularly Merton.- Various steps in this develop- 
ment are documented in the papers published in the collection 
Essays in Sociological Theory. 

For some years I have intended, when opportunity offered and 
the time seemed ripe, to attempt to pull these strands of thought 
together in a general book. In the fall of 1947 I held at Harvard a 
seminar on the Theory of Social Systems. The clarification of 
thought achieved there was documented in exceedingly condensed 
form in the paper The Position of Sociological Theory QEssays, 
Chapter I). Then an invitation to deliver the University Lectures 
in Sociology at the University of London in January-February 
1949 provided an occasion for further systematic consideration of 
the problem. In a rather rough sense those lectures, which were 
not published as such, constituted the outline of the present book. 
Then in connection with a collaborative attempt to clarify some 
of the theoretical fundamentals of the whole field involved in 
sociology, social anthropology and social psychology, I was given 
leave of absence from Harvard teaching for the fall term of 1949-50. 
Starting in the summer of 1949, and continuing in the fall while 
group discussions were proceeding, I made it my principal contribu- 
tion to the early phase of this project to work on the first draft 
of the long projected book. 

The work of this broader project, particularly since it proceeded 
in such a stimulating atmosphere of group discussion, entailed re- 
appraisal of many of the fundamentals of the action frame of 
reference as they underlay, not only sociological theory, but the 

^ See esp. Social Theory and Social Structure. 



Preface [ ix ] 

other disciplines of the social relations field. Late in November 
of 1949 this rethinking of the underlying frame of reference 
reached a culmination out of which the volume to be published as 
the most direct result of the broader theoretical project mentioned 
above took shape. My principal personal contribution to that, the 
monograph written together with Edward Shils under the title 
Values, Motives and Systems of Action constitutes essentially a 
new and extended statement of the theoretical subject matter of 
the Structure of Social Action. Indeed, if that title had not already 
been preempted it might have been the most appropriate for the 
monograph. 

The work which has resulted in the v\n:iting of the general 
monograph on systems of action thus bears a critically important 
relation to the present volume. In the first place it has necessitated 
far more extensive revision of the first draft of the present book 
(more than three fourths of what had been projected stood in first 
draft) than would ordinarily have been the case. As a result this 
is a greatly different and I think a far better book than it would 
have been. The monograph also provides, in readily accessible form, 
a careful and systematic analysis of many of the methodological 
problems, and general problems of the theory of action and of its 
personality and cultural phases, which underlie or are intimately 
related to, the subject of this book at many points. It thus relieves 
this volume of a serious burden and frees it for concentration on 
its central problems. In a sense this book should, therefore, be 
treated as a second volume of a systematic treatise on the theory 
of action of which the monograph would serve as the first. 

The body of the monograph consists of four long chapters. The 
first outlines the fundamentals of the general conceptual scheme of 
action, the other three spelling it out for each of the three modes 
of systematization of action. Personality, Cultural Systems with 
special reference to systems of Value-orientation, and Social Sys- 
tems. Thus in a sense the present volume is to be regarded as an 
expansion of the chapter on the Social System in the monograph.^ 
though it also impinges on other important parts of the latter. 

When an author is involved in two such closely related and 
nearly simultaneous publications, each of which is designed to be 
read independently, it would seem that a certain amount of over- 



[ X ] Preface 

lapping is inevitable. An attempt, however, has been made to 
minimize this. The first chapter of the present book contains a con- 
densed statement of the essentials of the structure of action and of 
action systems, and of the basic interrelations of personality, culture 
and social systems. The reader who finds this statement overly 
condensed will find the problems much more extensively discussed 
in the monograph. Obviously, further, much of the content of the 
chapter in the monograph on the Social System finds its place in 
this volume also, but this time in greatly expanded form, and with 
much more illustrative material. Finally, a special attempt has been 
made in this volume to deal systematically with the interrelations 
of the social system both with personality and with culture. Here 
the main difference from the monograph lies in the consistent 
maintenance of the perspective of relevance to the structure and 
functioning of social systems wherever personality and culture are 
discussed. A complete treatment of the theory of basic social science 
as here conceived would require two further volumes parallel to 
the present one. 

Another difference between the two publications lies in the fact 
that most of the material of the present book was, in its final form, 
written somewhat later than the text of the monograph. The 
development of theoretical ideas has been proceeding so rapidly 
that a difference of a few months or even weeks in time may lead 
to important changes, so there are some differences in the positions 
taken in the two publications. Indeed this process of development 
is such that it inevitably affects even the internal consistency of the 
present book. It is not possible to work intensively on one part 
without implications of the changes introduced arising for other 
points; the process of revision thus never fully catches up with 
itself. In general the reader may expect to find some of this less 
than perfect consistency. I have thought it better to run this risk 
and get the book published, rather than to work it over and over 
for too long. It can then get the benefit of critical discussion, and 
then, within a relatively short time, a revision may be attempted. 
It is fully expected that such a revision in, say, about five years, will 
lead to substantial changes. The field is in a process of such rapid 
development as to make this inevitable. 

A volume produced under the circumstances just oudined owes 



Preface [ xi ] 

more than the usual debt to others. My heaviest direct oUigation 
is to Edward Shils, co-author of the monograph on Values, Motives 
and Systems of Action. It is quite impossible to disentangle our 
individual contributions to the monograph and much of this joint 
thinking has spilled over into the present volume. Also very im- 
portant is the debt to Edward Tolman in the many long discussions 
we had during the collaborative project, and to Richard Sheldon 
who participated in many of them. 

In the background of course lies the immense influence of the 
great founders of modem social science, of whom the three major 
figures of my previous studies, Pareto, Durkheim and Max Weber, 
stand out, and in addition to them especially Freud. Over the years 
there has been an outstandingly important influence of association 
with colleagues, especially with Clyde and Florence Kluckhohn, in 
the problems of culture and its relation to society and of Henry A. 
Murray and Gordon W. Allport in relation to personality and 
social psychology. In the more centrally sociological field many 
discussions with Samuel A. Stouff^er, Robert K. Merton, Florence 
Kluckhohn, and Robert Freed Bales and Francis X. Sutton in par- 
ticular have been most fruitful. 

Not least important have been many discussions with a suc- 
cession of able students— these are too numerous for more than a 
few to be mentioned, but a sub-committee of a seminar on Social 
Structure which included Frangois Bourricaud, Renee Fox, Miriam 
Massey,*Rev. John V. Martin, Robert N. Wilson and Dr. Lyman 
Wynne may be especially singled out, since as a group we canvassed 
together many of the problems of motivational process in the 
social system. 

A considerable part of the work of this volume was done as 
part of the general project on the theoretical foundations of the 
field of Social Relations in connection with which Professors 
Tolman and Shils were brought to Harvard. It therefore shared 
the benefits of the financial support given to that project by the 
Carnegie Corporation of New York and the Harvard Laboratory 
of Social Relations. This help is hereby gratefully acknowledged. 

Finally, the secretary of the Department of Social Relations, 
Miss Weymouth Yelle, competendy supervised the clerical work 
involved in processing of the manuscript, the actual processing 



[ xii ] Preface 

being done by Mr. Seymour Katz and Mrs. Norman F. Geer. The 
index was prepared by Mr. Stuart Cleveland. The author's 
gratitude for eflFective perfoirmance of these indispensable services 

is hereby recorded. 

Talcott Parsons. 

Cambridge, Mass. 
February, 1951 




ONTENTS 



PAGE 

Preface vii 

CHAPTER 

I. The Action Frame of Reference and the General 
Theory of Action Systems: Culture, Personality and 
the Place of Social Systems 3 

II. The Major Points of Reference and Structural Com- 
ponents of the Social System 24 

THE FUNCTIONAL PREREQUISITES OF SOCIAL 

SYSTEMS 26 

THE INSTITUTIONAL INTEGRATION OF ACTION ELE- 
MENTS 36 

THE POINTS OF REFERENCE FOR THE CLASSIFICA- 
TION OF INSTITUTIONAL PATTERNS 4$ 

TYPES OF INSTITUTIONALIZATION RELATIVE TO THE 

SOCIAL SYSTEM 5 1 

OUTLINE OF MODES AND TYPES OF ACTION-ORIEN- 
TATION, CULTURE PATTERNS AND INSTITUTIONS $y 

THE PATTERN-ALTERNATIVES OF VALUEORIENTA- 
TION AS DEFINITIONS OF RELATIONAL ROLE- 
EXPECTATION PATTERNS 58 

xiii 



[ xiv ] Contents 

CHAPTER PAGE 

III. The Structure of the Social System, I: The Organiza- 
tion of the Components into Sub-Systems 6S 

THE STRUCTURE OF THE RELATIONAL CONTEXT OF 

EVALUATIVE ACTION-ORIENTATIONS 6g 

THE MODALITIES OF OBJECTS AS FOCI OF ROLE- 
EXPECTATIONS 88 
THE SOLIDARITY OF THE COLLECTIVITY 96 
TYPES OF SOCIAL VALUE-ORIENTATION IO4 

IV. The Structure of the Social System, II: Invariant 
Points of Reference for the Structural Differentiation 

and Variation of Societies 113 

THE FOCI OF CRYSTALLIZATION FOR SOCIAL STRUC- 
TURE 114 
THE INTERNAL DIFFERENTIATIONS OF SOCIAL 

SYSTEMS 137 

I. Categorization of actor-units in object roles 1^2 

II. Classification of orientation-role types l^^ 

III. The "Economy" of Instrumental Orientations 1^^ 

IV. The "Economy" of Expressive Orientations i^y 
V. The Cultural Orientation System. 148 

VI. Integrative Structures 14P 

V. The Structure of the Social System, III: Empirical 
Differentiation and Variation in the Structure of 
Societies 151 

SOME EMPIRICAL CLUSTERINGS OF THE STRUC- 
TURAL COMPONENTS OF SOCIAL SYSTEMS 153 

1. KINSHIP SYSTEMS 153 

2. INSTRUMENTAL ACHIEVEMENT STRUC- 

TURES AND STRATIFICATION 1 57 



Contents [ xv ] 



CHAPTER PAGE 

3. TERRITORIALITY, FORCE AND THE INTE- 

GRATION OF THE POWER SYSTEM 16 1 

4. RELIGION AND VALUE-INTEGRATION 1 63 
THE CONSTITUTION OF EMPIRICAL SOCIETIES l6y 
THE STRUCTURAL IMPERATIVES OF A GIVEN SOCIAL 

SYSTEM 177 

PRINCIPAL TYPES OF SOCIAL STRUCTURE 180 

1 . THE UNIVERSALISTIC-ACHIEVEMENT PATTERN 1 82 

2. THE UNIVERSALISTIC-ASCRIPTION PATTERN ipi 

3. THE PARTICULARISTIC-ACHIEVEMENT PAT- 

TERN ip5 

4. THE PARTICULARISTIC-ASCRIPTIVE PATTERN 1^8 

VI. The Learning of Social Role-Expectations and the 

Mechanisms of Socialization of Motivation 201 

THE SOCIALIZATION OF THE CHILD AND THE INTER- 
NALIZATION OF SOCIAL VALUE-ORIENTATIONS 207 

BASIC PERSONALITY STRUCTURE: MODAL CLUSTER- 
ING AND DIVERSITY 226 

THE SITUATIONAL ROLE-SPECIFICATION OF ORIENTA- 
TIONS 236 

AN EXAMPLE : THE "pROFIT MOTIVe" 243 

VII. Deviant Behavior and the Mechanisms of Social 

Control 249 

INTERACTION AND THE GENESIS OF DEVIANT 

MOTIVATION 251 

THE DIRECTIONS OF DEVIANT ORIENTATION 256 

SOME FURTHER SITUATIONAL ASPECTS OF THE 

GENESIS AND STRUCTURING OF DEVIANCE 267 



[ xvi ] Contents 



CHAPTER PAGE 

ROLE CONFLICT AND THE GENESIS OF DEVIANCE zSo 

THE SOCIAL STRUCTURE OF DEVIANT BEHAVIOR 

TENDENCIES 283 

THE MECHANISMS OF SOCIAL CONTROL 297 

APPENDIX 321 

VIII. Belief Systems and the Social System: TTie Problem 

of the "Role of Ideas" 326 

EXISTENTIAL EMPIRICAL BELIEFS AND THE SOCIAL 

SYSTEM 332 

1 . THE INSTITUTIONALIZATION OF SCIENTIFIC 

INVESTIGATION 335 

2. THE INSTITUTIONALIZATION OF APPLIED 

SCIENCE 345 

3. THE INSTITUTIONALIZATION OF IDEOLOGIES 348 

THE RELATION OF NON-EMPIRICAL BELIEFS TO THE 

SOCIAL SYSTEM 359 

RELIGIOUS BELIEF SYSTEMS 367 
THE INDEPENDENCE AND INTERDEPENDENCE OF 

BELIEF SYSTEMS AND VALUE-ORIENTATIONS 379 

IX. Expressive Symbols and the Social System: The 

Communication of Affect 384 

EXPRESSIVE SYMBOLISM AND COLLECTIVITIES 394 

ROLE DIFFERENTIATION WITH RESPECT TO EXPRES- 
SIVE SYMBOLISM 399 

THE ROLE OF THE ARTIST 408 

EXPRESSIVE SYMBOLISM AND THE REWARD SYSTEM . 414 



429 
433 
439 



Contents [ xvii ] 

CHAPTER PAGE 

X. Social Structure and Dynamic Process: The Case of 

Modem Medical Practice ^28 

THE FUNCTIONAL SETTING OF MEDICAL PRACTICE 

AND THE CULTURAL TRADITION 
THE SOCIAL STRUCTURE 
THE SITUATION OF MEDICAL PRACTICE 

A. THE SITUATION OF THE PATIENT 439 

B. THE SITUATION OF THE PHYSICIAN ^^y 
THE FUNCTIONAL SIGNIFICANCE OF THE INSTITU- 
TIONAL PATTERN OF MEDICAL PRACTICE ^^^ 

SOME SPECIAL PROBLEMS /f.66 

SOME THEORETICAL CONCLUSIONS 473 

XL The Processes of Change of Social Systems 480 

THE PROBLEM OF THE THEORY OF CHANGE 48 1 
THE GENERAL NATURE OF CHANGE IN SOCIAL 

SYSTEMS 4go 

THE DIRECTION OF CHANGE IN SOCIAL SYSTEMS 4^6 
SOME SPECIFIC EXAMPLES OF PROCESSES OF SOCIAL 

CHANGE 503 

i. institutionalized rationalization and 

"cultural lag" ^O^ 

2. THE ASCENDANCY OF THE CHARISMATIC 

REVOLUTIONARY MOVEMENT 52O 

3. THE ADAPTIVE TRANSFORMATION OF A 

REVOLUTIONARY MOVEMENT 525 

XII. Conclusion: The Place of Sociological Theory Among 

the Analytical Sciences of Action 536 

THE PLACE OF SOCIAL SYSTEMS IN THE GENERAL 

THEORY OF ACTION 537 



[ xviii ] Contents 

PAGE 
THE THEORY OF ACTION AND THE NATURAL 

SCIENCES 541 

THE CLASSIFICATION OF THE SCIENCES OF ACTION ^/f.§ 

Index S5^ 



THE ACTION FRAME OF REFERENCE 
AND THE GENERAL THEORY OF ACTION SYS- 
TEMS: CULTURE, PERSONALITY AND THE PLACE 
OF SOCIAL SYSTEMS 



THE subject of this volume is the exposition and illus- 
tration of a conceptual scheme for the analysis of social systems in 
terms of the action frame of reference. It is intended as a theoretical 
work in a strict sense. Its direct concern will be neither with em- 
pirical generalization as such nor with methodology, though of 
course it will contain a considerable amount of both. Naturally the 
value of the conceptual scheme here put forward is ultimately to be 
tested in terms of its usefulness in empirical research. But this is not 
an attempt to set forth a systematic account of our empirical knowl- 
edge, as would be necessary in a work on general sociology. The 
focus is on a theoretical scheme. The systematic treatment of its 
empirical uses will have to be undertaken separately. 

The fundamental starting point is the concept of social systems 
of action. The interaction of individual actors, that is, takes place 
under such conditions that it is possible to treat such a process of 
interaction as a system in the scientific sense and subject it to the 
same order of theoretical analysis which has been successfully ap- 
plied to other types of systems in other sciences. 

The fundamentals of the action frame of reference have been 
extensively dealt with elsewhere and need only to be briefly sum- 

3 



[ 4 ] The Action Frame of Reference 

marized here.^ The frame of reference concerns the "orientation" 
of one or more actors— in the fundamental individual case biological 
organisms— to a situation, which includes other actors. The scheme, 
that is, relative to the units of action and interaction, is a relational 
scheme. It analyzes the structure and processes of the systems built 
up by the relations of such units to their situations, including other 
units. It is not as such concerned with the internal structure of the 
units except so far as this directly bears on the relational system. 

The situation is defined as consisting of objects of orientation, 
so that the orientation of a given actor is differentiated relative to 
the different objects and classes of them of which his situation is 
composed. It is convenient in action terms to classify the object 
world as composed of the three classes of "social," "physical," and 
"cultural" objects. A social object is an actor, which may in turn be 
any given other individual actor (alter), the actor who is taken as 
a point of reference himself (ego), or a collectivity which is treated 
as a unit for purposes of the analysis of orientation. Physical objects 
are empirical entities which do not "interact" with or "respond" to 
ego. They are means and conditions of his action. Cultural objects 
are symbolic elements of the cultural tradition, ideas or beliefs, 
expressive symbols or value patterns so far as they are treated as 
situational objects by ego and are not "internalized" as constitutive 
elements of the structure of his personality. 

"Action" is a process in the actor-situation system which has 
motivational significance to the individual actor, or, in the case of 
a collectivity, its component individuals. This means that the orien- 
tation of the corresponding action processes has a bearing on the 
attainment of gratifications or the avoidance of deprivations of the 
relevant actor, whatever concretely in the light of the relevant 
personality structures these may be. Only in so far as his relation 
to the situation is in this sense motivationally relevant will it Ibe 
treated in this work as action in a technical sense. It is presumed 
that the ultimate source of the energy or "effort" factor of action 
processes is derived from the organism, and correspondingly that in 

^ Cf . especially Parsons and Shils, Values, Motives and Systems of Action 
in Toward a General Theory of Action. Also Parsons, Structure of Social Action, 
and Essays in Sociological Theory, and, of course, Weber, Theory of Social and 
Economic Organization. 



The General Theory of Action Systems [ 5 ] 

some sense all gratification and deprivation have an organic signifi- 
cance. But though it is rooted in them the concrete organization of 
motivation canriof for purposes of action theory be analyzed in terms "■ 
of the organic needs of the organism. This organization of action 
elements is, for purposes of the theory of action, above all a function 
of the relation of the actor to his situation and the history of that 
relation, in this sense of "experience." 

/ It is a fundamental property of action thus defined that it does 
not consist only of ad hoc "responses" to particular situational 
stimuli" but that the actor develops a system of "expectations" 
elative to the various objects of the situation. These may be struc- 
tured only relative to his own need-dispositions and the probabilities 
of gratification or deprivation contingent on the various alternatives 
of action which he may undertake. But in the case of interaction 
with social objects a further dimension is added. Part of ego's expec- 
tation, in many cases the most crucial part, consists in the probable 
reaction of alter to ego's possible action, a reaction which comes to 
be anticipated in advance and thus to affect ego's own choices. 

On both levels, however, various elements of the situation come 
to have special "meanings" for ego as "signs" or "symbols" which 
become relevant to the organization of his expectation system. Es- 
pecially where there is social interaction, signs and symbols acquire 
common meanings and serve as media of communication between 
actors. When symbolic systems which can mediate communication 
have Emerged we may speak of the beginnings of a "culture" which 
becomes part of the action systems of the relevant actors. 

It is only with systems of interaction which have become differ- 
entiated to a"cultural level that we are here concerned. Though the 
temTsocTal system may be used in a more elementary sense, for 
present purposes this possibility can be ignored and attention con- 
fined to s ystem s of interaction of a plurality of individual actors 
oriented to a situation and where the system includes a commonly 
understood system of cultural symbols. 

Reduced to the simplest possible terms, then, a social system 
consists in a plurality of individual actors interacting with each 
other in a situation which has at least a physical or environmental 
aspect, actors who are motivated in terms of a tendency to the 
"optimization of gratification" and whose relation to their situations, 



[ 6 ] The Action Frame of Reference 

including each other, is defined and mediated in terms of a system 

. of culturally structured and shared symbols. 

/ r Thus conceived, a social system is only one of three aspects of 
the structuring of a completely concrete system of social action. The 
other two are the personality systems of the individual actors and 

^jthe cultural system which is built into their action. Each of the 
three must be considered to be an independent focus of the organi- 
zation of the elements of the action system in the sense that no one 
of them is theoretically reducible to terms of one or a combination 
of the other two. Each is indispensable to the other two in the sense 
that without personalities and culture there would be no social 
system and so on around the roster of logical possibilities. But this 
interdependence and interpenetration is a very different matter 
from reducibility, which would mean that the important properties 
and processes of one class of system could be theoretically derived 
from our theoretical knowledge of one or both of the other two. 
The action frame of reference is common to all three and this fact 
makes certain "transformations" between them possible. But on the 
level of theory here attempted they do not constitute a single sys- 
tem, however this might turn out to be on some other theoretical 
level. 

Almost another way of making this point is to say that on the 
present level of theoretical systematization our dynamic knowledge 
of action-processes is fragmentary. Because of this we are forced 
to use these types of empirical system, descriptively presented in 
terms of a frame of reference, as an indispensable point of reference. 
In relation to this point of reference we conceive dynamic processes 
as "mechanisms"^ which influence the "functioning" of the system. 
The descriptive presentation of the empirical system must be made 
in terms of a set of "structural" categories, into which the appro- 
priate "motivational" constructs necessary to constitute a usable 
knowledge of mechanisms are fitted. 

Before going further into some of these broad methodological 
problems of the analysis of systems of action with special reference 
to the social system, it is advisable to say something more about the 

^ A mechanism as the term will here be used is an empirical generalization 
about motivational processes stated in terms of its relevance to the functional 
problems of an action system. See below, Chapter VI. 



The General Theory of Action Systems [ 7 ] 

more elementary components of action in general. In the most gen- 
eral sense the "need-disposition" system of the individual actor 
seems to have two most primary or elementary aspects which may 
be Called the "gratificational" aspect and the "orientational" aspect. 
The first concerns the "content" of his interchange with the object 
world, "what" he gets out of his interaction with it, and what its 
"costs" to him are. The second concerns the "how" of his relation 
to the object world, the patterns or ways in which his relations to 
it are organized. 

Emphasizing the relational aspect we may refer to the former as 
"cathectic" orientation which means the significance of ego's rela- 
tion to the object or objects in question for the gratification- 
deprivation balance of his personality. The most elementary and 
fundamental "orientational" category on the other hand, seems to 
be the "cognitive" which in its most general sense may be treated 
as the "definition" of the relevant aspects of the situation in their 
relevance to the actor's "interests." This is then the cognitive orien- 
tation aspect, or cognitive mapping in Tolman's sense. ^ Both these 
aspects must be present in anything which could be considered a 
unit of an action system, a "unit act." 

But acts do not occur singly and discretely, they are organized 
i |i system s. The moment even the most elementary system-level is 
brought under consideration a component of "system integration" 
must enter in. In terms of the action frame of reference again this 
integration is a selective ordering among the possibilities of orienta- 
tion. Gratification needs have alternatively possible objects presented 
in the situation. Cognitive mapping has alternatives of judgment 
or interpretation as to what objects are or what they "mean." There 
must be ordered selection among such alternatives. The term "evalu- 
ation" will be given to this process of ordered selection. There is, 
therefore, an evaluative aspect of all concrete action orientation. 
The most elementary components of any action system then may 
be reduced to the actor and his situation. With regard to the actor 
our interest is organized about the cognitive, cathectic and evaluative 
modes of his orientation; with regard to the situation, to its differen- 
tiation into objects and classes of them. 

The three basic modes of motivational orientation along with 

* Cf. E. C. Tolman, Purposive Behavior in Animals and Men. 



[ 8 ] The Action Frame of Reference 

the conception of an object system categorize the elements of action 
on the broadest level. They are all three implicated in the structure 
of what has been called "expectation." [Besides cathectic interests, 
cognitive definition of the situation arid evaluative selection, an 
expectation has, as the term suggests, a time aspect in the orienta- 
tion to future development of the actor-situation system and to the 
memory of past actions./Orientation to the situation is structured, 
that is, with reference" to its developmental patterns. The actor 
acquires an "investment" in certain possibilities of that development. 
It matters to him how it occurs, that some possibilities should be 
realized rather than others. 

This temporal dimension of the actor's concern with the develop- 
ment of the situation may be differentiated along an activity- 
passivity coordinate. The actor may at one extreme simply "await 
developments" and not actively attempt to "do anything about it," 
or he may actively attempt to control the situation in conformity 
with his wishes or interests. A future state of the actor-situation 
system in which the actor takes merely a passive interest, may be 
called an "anticipation," while a future state which he attempts 
actively to bring about (including the prevention of events he does 
not want to happen) may be called a "goal." The goal-directedness 
of action is, as we shall see, particularly when the'bases of normative 
orientation have been discussed, a fundamental property of all 
action-systems. Analytically, however, it seems to stand on the next 
level "down" from the concept of expectations because of the logical 
possibility of passively anticipatory orientation. Both types must be 
clearly distinguished from "stimulus-response" in that the latter 
does not make the orientation to the future development of the 
situation explicit. The stimulus may be conceived that is, as coming 
completely "out of the blue" without affecting the theoretical 
analysis. 

The fundamental concept of the "instrumental" aspects of action 
is applicable only to cases where the action is positively goal-oriented. 
It formulates those considerations about the situation and the actor's 
relations to it, the alternatives open to him and their probable con- 
sequences, which are relevant to the attainment of a goal.^ 

* In The Structure of Social Action, the exposition of the action frame of 
reference was made largely on the level of goal-direction and thus an "end" as it 



The General Theory of Action Systems [ 9 ] 

A word may be said about the problem of the ultimate structur- 
ing of "gratification-needs." A general theory of action will, of 
course, eventually have to come to decisions about the unity or the 
qualitative plurality of the ultimate genetically given needs and 
their classification and organization. Particularly, however, for a 
work concerned with the social system level of action theory it is 
highly advisable scrupulously to observe the rule of parsimony in 
such controversial areas. It is, however, necessary to assume an 
ultimate polarity of this need structure which is incorporated in the 
concept of the gratification-deprivation balance, and has its deriva- 
tives in such antitheses as attraction-aversion. Beyond this, how- 
ever, and certain general statements about the relations of need- 
gratification and the other aspects of action it does not, for our 
purposes, seem necessary to go in highly general terms. 

The major reason for this is that in their sociologically relevant 
forms, "motivations" come to us as organized on the personality 
level. We deal, that is, with more concrete structures which are 
conceived as products of the interaction of genetically given need- 
components with social experience. It is the uniformities on this 
level which are empirically significant for sociological problems. 
To make use of knowledge of such uniformities it is generally 
not necessary to unravel the genetic and the experiential com- 
ponents underlying them. The principal exception to this statement 
arises in connection with problems of the limits of social variability 
in the structure of social systems which may be imposed by the 
biological constitution of the relevant population. Of course when 
such problems arise it is necessary to mobilize all the available evi- 
dence to form a judgment about more specific gratification needs. 

A related problem is that of the relevance not only of gratifica- 
tion needs, but of capacities or abilities. Every empirical analysis of 
action presumes biologically given capacities. We know that these 

was there called, was made an essential component of the "unit act." It seems 
that it is necessary to push the analysis to a still more elementary level especially 
in order to clarify the place in which many of the problems of motivation as 
analyzed in terms of modern psychologv must be fitted in. However, no funda- 
mental change has been made. The analysis has simplv been carried to a more 
generalized level. The unit act of The StnicUtre of Social Action is a special case 
of the unit of action as portrayed here and in Values, Motives, and Systems of 
Action. 



[ I o ] The Action Frame of Reference 

are highly differentiated as between individuals. But for the most 
general theoretical purposes the same rule of parsimony may be 
applied. The soundness of this procedure is confirmed by the 
knowledge that individual variations are by and large more im- 
portant than those between large populations so that it is relatively 
unlikely that the most important differences of large-scale social 
systems are primarily determined by biological differences in the 
capacities of their populations. For most sociological purposes the 
resultant of the genes and life experience is adequate without 
attempting to segregate out the factors. 

It was pointed out that even the most elementary orientation of 
action on animal levels involves signs which are at least the begin- 
ning of symbolization. This is inherent in the concept of expectation 
which involves some sort of "generalization" from the particularities 
of an immediately current stimulus-situation. Without signs the 
whole "orientational" aspect of action would be meaningless, in- 
cluding the conceptions of "selection" and underlying it, of "alter- 
natives." On the human level certainly the step is taken from 
sign -orientation to true symbolization. This is the necessary condi- 
tion for the emergence of culture. 

In the basic scheme of action, symbolization is clearly involved 
both in cognitive orientation and in the concept of evaluation. 
Further elaboration of the role and structure of symbol systems in 
action involves considerations of differentiation in relation to the 
various aspects of the action system, and the aspect of sharing and 
its relation to communication and to culture. The latter may be 
dealt with first. 

Whatever the importance of neurological prerequisites may be, 
it seems probable that true symbolization as distinguished from the 
use of signs, cannot arise or function without the interaction of 
actors, and that the individual actor can acquire symbolic systems 
only through interaction with social objects. It is at least suggestive 
that this fact may well be connected with the element of "double 
contingency" involved in the interaction process. In the classical 
animal learning situations the animal has alternatives between 
which he makes a selection and develops expectations which can 
be "triggered" by certain signs or "cues." But the sign is part of a 
situation which is stable independendy of what the animal does; 



The General Theory of Action Systems [ 1 1 ] 

the only "problem" presented to him is whether he can "interpret" 
it correctly, e.g., that the black panel means food, the white one no 
food. But in social interaction alters possible "reactions" may cover 
a considerable range, selection within which is contingent on ego's 
actions. Thus for the interaction process to become structured, the 
meaning of a sign must be further abstracted from the particularity 
of the situation. Its meaning, that is, must be stable through a much 
wider range of "ifs," which covers the contingent alternatives not 
only of ego's action, but of alter's and the possible permutations 
and combinations of the relation between them. 

! Whatever may be the origins and processes of development of 
symbol systems it is quite clear that the high elaboration of human 
action systems is not possible without relatively stable symbolic 
/ systems where meaning is not predominantly contingent on highly 
[^particularized situations. The most important single implication of 
this generalization is perhaps the possibility of communication, 
because the situations of two actors are never identical and without 
the capacity to abstract meaning from the most particular situations 
communication would be impossible. But in turn this stability of a 
symbol system, a stability which must extend between individuals 
and over time, could probably not be maintained unless it func- 
tioned in a communication process in the interaction of a plurality 
Nof actors. It is such a shared symbolic system which functions in 
interaction which will here be called a cultural tradition. 

Tliere is a fundamental relation between this aspect and the 
"normative orientation" of action as it is often called. A symbolic 
system of meanings is an element of order "imposed" as it were on 
the realistic situation. Even the most elementary communication is 
not possible without some degree of conformity to the "conventions" 
of the symbolic system. Put a little differently, the mutuality of 
expectations is oriented to the shared order of symbolic meanings. 
In so far as ego's gratifications become dependent on the reactions 
of alter, a conditional standard comes to be set up of what conditions 
will and what will not call forth the "gratifying" reactions, and the 
relation between these conditions and the reactions becomes as such 
part of the meaning system of ego's orientation to the situation. The 
orientation to a normative order, and die mutual interlocking of 
expectations and sanctions which will be fundamental to our anal- 



[ 1 2 ] The Action Frame of Reference 

ysis of social systems is rooted, therefore, in the deepest fundamen- 
tals of the action frame of reference. 

This fundamental relationship is also common to all types and 
modes of interactional orientation. But nevertheless it is important 
to work out certain differentiations in terms of the relative primacies 
of the three modal elements, the cathectic, the cognitive and the 
evaluative, which have been outlined above. An element of a shared 
symbolic system which serves as a criterion or standard for selection 
among the alternatives of orientation which are intrinsically open 
in a situation may be called a value. 

In one sense "motivation" consists in orientation to improve- 
ment of the gratification-deprivation balance of the actor. But since 
action without cognitive and evaluative components in its orienta- 
tion is inconceivable within the action frame of reference, the term 
motivation will here be used to include all three aspects, not only 
the cathectic. But from this motivational orientation aspect of the 
totality of action it is, in view of the role of symbolic systems, neces- 
sary to distinguish a "value-orientation" aspect. This aspect con- 
cerns, not the meaning of the expected state of affairs to the actor 
in terms of his gratification-deprivation balance but the content of 
the selective standards themselves.7The concept of value-orienta- 
tions in this sense is thus the logical device for formulating one 
central aspect of the articulation of cultural traditions into the 
action system. 

It follows from the derivation of normative orientation and the 
role of values in action as stated above, that all values involve what 
may be called a social reference. In so far as they are cultural rather 
than purely personal they are in fact shared. Even if idiosyncratic 
to the individual they are still by virtue of the circumstances oT 
their genesis, defined in relation to a shared cultural tradition; their 
idiosyncrasies consist in specifiable departures from tlie shared tra- 
dition and are defined in this way. 

However, along with this social reference, value standards may 
also be differentiated in terms of their functional relations to the 
action of the individual. The social reference implies, from the 
motivational side, an evaluative significance for all value standards. 
yBut still the "primary relevance of a standard may be to cognitive 
definitions of the situation, to cathectic "expressions" or to the inte- 



The General Theory of Action Systems [ 13 ] 

gration of the action system as a system or of some part of it. Hence 
on the value-orientation side we may repeat the three-fold cla'ssifi- 
c atTon of 'modes" oForientation as cognitive standards, appreciative 
standards and moral standards of value-orientation. 

■ A word of explanation of these terms is in order. The classifica- 
tion, as noted, corresponds to that of the modes of motivational 
orientation. In the cognitive case there is not much difficulty. On 
the motivational side the concern is with the cognitive interest in 
the situation and its objects, the motivation to define the situation 
cognitively. On the value-orientation side, on the other hand, con- 
cern is with the standards by which the validity of cognitive judg- 
ments is assessed. Some of these, like the most elementary standards 
of logic or correctness of observation may be cultural universals, 
while other elements are culturally variable^ In any case it is a 
matter of selective evaluation, of standards of preference between 
alternative solutions of cognitive problems, or alternative interpre- 
tations of phenomena and objects. 

The normative aspect of cognitive orientation is readily taken 
for granted. In the case of cathexes this is not so obvious. There is 
of course a sense in which the actor's relation to an object just is 
or is not gratifying in a given way. But it must not be forgotten 
that gratification takes place as part of an action system where actors 
arFTrTgcneral normatively oriented. It is out of the question that 
this one aspect should be exempted from the relevance of normative 
standards of valuation. There is always a question of the rightness 
and the propriety of the orientation in this respect, in terms of 
choice of object, and of attitude toward the object. This, therefore, 
also involves standards by which selections among the possibilities 
of cathectic significance can be made. ' 

Finally the evaluative aspect of motivational orientation also 
has its value orientation counterpart. Evaluation is concerned with 
the probleiii of integrating the elements of an action system, funda- 
mentally the "you can't eat your cake and have it" problem. Both 
cognitive and appreciative value standards are of course relevant 
to this. But every act has both cognitive and cathectic aspects. A 
primacy of cognitive interests, therefore, still leaves the problem 
of integrating the concrete action in terms of the relevance of 
cathectic interests and vice versa. There must, therefore, in an 



[14] The Action Frame of Reference 

action system, be a paramount focus of evaluative standards which 
are neither cognitive as such nor appreciative as such, but involve 
a synthesis of both aspects. It has seemed appropriate to call these 
moral standards. In a sense they constitute the standards in terms of 
which more particular evaluations are themselves evaluated. 

It should also be clear from the general character of action 
systems that moral standards in this sense have peculiarly a social 
relevance. This is because every action system, concretely is in one 
aspect a social system, even though the focus on personality is very 
important for certain purposes. The moral reference is by no means 
exclusively social, but without the social reference it is impossible 
to conceive a concrete action system as integrated in an overall 
sense. In particular from the point of view of any given actor, the 
definition of the patterns of mutual rights and obligations, and of 
the standards governing them in his interaction with others, is a 
crucial aspect of his general orientation to his situation.' Because of 
this special relevance to the social system, moral standards become 
that aspect of value-orientation which is of greatest direct impor- 
tance to the sociologist, 'We shall have much to say about them in 
the chapters which follow. 

" Though there is a direct parallel between this classification of 
value-orientation patterns and the classification of motivational 
orientations it is very important to be clear that these two basic 
aspects, or components of the action system are logically inde- 
pendent, not in the sense that both are not essential, but in the 
sense that the content under the two classifications may be inde- 
pendently variable. From the fact of a given "psychological" cathectic 
significance of an object one cannot infer the specific appreciative 
standards according to which the object is evaluated or vice versa. 
Tlie classification of the modes of motivational orientation provides 
essentially a framework for analyzing the "problems" in which the 
actor has an "interest." Value-orientation, on the other hand, pro- 
vides the standards of what constitute satisfactory "solutions" of 
these problems. The clear recognition of the independent variability 
of these two basic modes or levels cf orientation is at the very basis 
of a satisfactory theory in the field of "culture and personality." 
Indeed it can be said that failure to recognize this independent 
variability has underlain much of the difficultv in this field, par- 



The General Theory of Action Systems [15] 

ticularly the unstable tendency of much social science to oscillate 
between "psychological determinism" and "cultural determinism." 
Indeed, it may be said that this independent variability is the logical 
foundation of the independent significance of the theory of the 
social system vis-a-vis that of personality on the one hand and of 
culture on the other. 

Perhaps the point may first be discussed briefly in relation to 
the problem of culture. In anthropological theory there is not what 
could be called close agreement on the definition of the concept of 
culture. But for present purposes three prominent keynotes of the 
discussion may be picked out: first, that culture is transmitted, it 
constitutes a heritage or a social tradition; secondly, that it is learned, 
it is not a manifestation, in particular content, of man's genetic 
constitution; and third, that it is shared. Culture, that is, is on the 
one hand the product of, on the other hand a determinant of, 
systems of human social interaction. 

The first point, transmissibility, serves as a most important cri- 
terion for distinguishing culture from the social system, because 
culture can be diffused from one social system to another. Relative 
to the particular social system it is a "pattern" element which is both 
analytically and empirically abstractable from that particular social 
system. There is crucially important interdependence between cul- 
tural patterns and the other elements of the social system, but these 
other elements are not completely "pattern-integrated" with culture 
or with each other. 

On the basis of the approach to culture taken above, the broad 
reasons for this complication are not far to seek. A symbolic system 
has modes of integration of its own, which may be called "pattern 
consistency." The most familiar example is the logical consistency 
of a cognitive system, but art styles and systems of value-orientation 
are subject to the same kind of criteria of integration as a system in 
pattern terms. Examples of such symbolic systems are, of course, 
empirically familiar as in a philosophical treatise or a work of art. 

But as an integral part of a concrete system of social interaction 
this norm of pattern-consistent integration of a cultural system can 
only be approximately realized, because of strains arising out of the 
imperatives of interdependence with the situational and motiva- 
tional elements of concrete action. This problem may be approached 



[ 1 6 ] The Action Frame of Reference 

through certain considerations having to do with the "learning" of 
a cukure pattern. 

This very common expression in anthropological literature 
seems to derive originally from the model of the learning of intel- 
lectual content. But it has been extended to become the common 
term for the process by which the requisite integration of an ele- 
ment of culture in the concrete action of an individual comes to be 
motivated. One can in these terms learn to read a language, to solve 
mathematical problems by use of the difFerential calculus. But one 
also learns to conform with a norm of behavior or to value an art 
style. Learning in this broad sense, then, means the incorporation 
of cultural pattern elements into the action-systems of individual 
actors. 

The analysis of capacity to learn then comes up against the 
problem of the place the cultural item in question can assume in 
the personality system. One aspect of this problem is its compati- 
bility with the other elements of culture which the same individual 
has already learned or is expected to learn. But there are others. 
Each individual actor is a biological organism acting in an environ- 
ment. Both the genetic constitution of the organism and the non- 
socio-cultural environment set limits to this learning, though these 
limits are very difficult to specify. And finally each individual actor 
is subject to the exigencies of interaction in a social system. This 
last consideration is peculiarly important to the problem of culture 
because of the shared aspect of a cultural tradition. Such a tradition 
must be "borne" by one or more concrete social systems and can 
only be said to "function" when it is part of their actual action 
systems. 

In action terms this problem may be summed up as that of 
whether a completely pattern-consistent cultural system can be 
related to the exigencies both of personalities and of the social 
system in such a way that complete "conformity" with its standards 
can be adequately motivated among all the individual actors in the 
social system. Here it may be merely asserted without any attempt 
to demonstrate, that such a limiting case is incompatible with the 
fundamental functional imperatives both of personalities and of 
social systems. The integration of the total action system, partial 
and incomplete as it is, is a kind of "compromise" between the 



The General Theory of Action Systems [17] 

"strains to consistency" of its personality, social and cultural com- 
ponents respectively, in such a way that no one of them closely 
approaches "perfect" integration. With respect to the relation be- 
tween culture and the social system this problem will have to be 
discussed in some detail below. The crucial point for the present is 
that the "learning" and the "living" of a system of cultural patterns 
by the actors in a social system, cannot be understood without the 
analysis of motivation in relation to concrete situations, not only on 
the level of personality theory, but on the level of the mechanisms of 
the social system. 

^There is a certain element of logical symmetry in the relations 
of the social system to culture on the one hand and to personalit)' 
on the other, but its implications must not be pressed too far. The 
deeper symmetry lies in the fact that both personalities and social 
systems are types of empirical action system in which both motiva- 
tional and cultural elements or components are combined, and are 
thus in a sense parallel to each other. The basis of integration of 
the cultural system is, as has been noted, pattern-consistency. But 
that of personality is its structural pattern-consistency fins func- 
tional adequacy of motivational balance in a concrete situation. A 
cultural system does not "function" except as part of a concrete 
action system, it just "is." 

It should be made quite clear that the relevance of interaction 
is not what distinguishes the social system from that of personality. 
Most emphatically interaction is just as much constitutive of per- 
sonality as it is of a social system. It is rather the functional focus 
of organization and integration which is the basis of the difference 
between personalities and social systems. Personality is the rela- 
tional system of a living organism interacting with a situation. Its 
integrative focus is the organism-personality unit as an empirical 
eiiHtyT The mechanisms of the personality must be understood and 
formulated relative to the functional problems of this unit. The 
system of social relationships in which the actor is involved is not 
merely of situational significance, but is direcdy constitutive of the 
personality itself. But even where these relationships are socially 
structured^ in a uniform way for a group of individuals, it does not 
follow that the ways in which these uniform "roles" are structured 
are constitutive of each of the different personalities in the same 



[ 1 8 ] The Action Frame of Reference 

way. Each is integrated into a different personality system, and 
therefore does not in a precise sense "mean the same thing" to any 
two of them. The relation of personality to a uniform role structure 
is one of interdependence and interpenetration but not one of 
"inclusion" where the properties of the personality system are con- 
stituted by the roles of which it is allegedly "made up^ 
'"^ There are, as we shall see, important homologies between the 
personality and the social system. But these are homologies, not a 
macrocosm-microcosm relationship—the distinction is fundamental. 
Indeed, failure to take account of these considerations has lain at 
the basis of much of the theoretical difficulty of social psychology, 
especially where it has attempted to "extrapolate" from the psychol- 
' ogy of the individual to the motivational interpretation of mass 
[^ phenomena, or conversely has postulated a "group mind." 

It follows from these considerations that both the structure of 
social systems and the motivational mechanisms of their function- 
ing must be categorized on a level independent both of personality 
and of culture. Roughly stated, tempting though such a procedure 
is, trouble arises from the attempt either to treat social structure as 
a part of culture or to treat "social motivation" as applied psychology 
in the sense that it is a direct application of personality theory. 

The correct formula is different. It is that the funda^mental 
building stones of the theory of social systems, like those of person- 
ality and culture theory, are common to all the sciences of action. 
This is true not of some of them hut of all of them. But the ways 
in which these conceptual materials are to be built into theoretical 
structures is not the same in the cases of the three major foci of 
action theory. Psychology, as the science of personality, is thus not 
the "foundation" of the theory of social systems, but owe main 
branch of the great tree of action theory of which the theory of 
social systems is another. The common foundation is not the theory 
of the individual as the unit of society, but of action as the "stuff" 
out of which both personality systems and social systems are built 
up. It Mali be the task of later chapters to document this statement 
from the special point of view of analyzing certain aspects of the 
interdependence of social systems both with personalities and with 
cultural systems. 

The focus of this work, then, is, vdthin the action frame of 



The General Theory of Action Systems [19] 

reference as just outlined, on the theory of social systems. It is con- 
cerned both with personality and with culture, but not for their 
own sakes, rather in their bearing on the structure and functioning 
of social systems. |Wi thin systems of action the social system is, as 
has been noted, an independent focus both of realistic empirical 
organization of action and of theoretical analysis, i' 

Because empirical organization of the system is a fundamental 
focus, the norm, as it were, must be the conception of an empirically 
self-subsistent social system. If we add the consideration of duration 
sufficiendy long to transcend the life span of the normal human 
individual, recruitment by biological reproduction and socialization 
of the oncoming generation become essential aspects of such a social 
system.^A social system of this type, which meets all the essential 
functional prerequisites of long term persistence from within its 
own resources, will be called a society. ^ It is not essential to the 
concept of a society that it should not be in any way empirically 
interdependent with other societies, but only that it should contain 
all the structural and functional fundamentals of an independently 
subsisting system. 

Any other social system will be called a "partial" social system. 
Obviously most empirical sociological studies are concerned with 
partial social systems rather than with societies as wholes. This is 
entirely legitimate. But using the society as a "norm" in the theory 
of social systems ensures that a conceptual scheme will be developed 
for explicitly and systematically placing the partial social system in 
question in the setting of the society of which it is a part. It thereby 
becomes much more unlikely that the investigator will overlook 
essential features of the society outside the partial social system 
which are prerequisites of the properties of the latter. It goes almost 
without saying that it is always of the greatest importance to specify 
what the system is which is being used as the object for a sociological 
analysis, whether or not it is a society, and if not, just how this 
particular partial social system is located in the society of which it 
is a part. 

It has been remarked several times above that we are not in a 
position to develop a complete dynamic theory in the action field 
and that, therefore, the systematization of theory in the present state 
of knowledge must be in "structural-functional" terms. A brief 



[ 20 ] The Action Frame of Reference 

elucidation of the meaning and implications of this proposition is 
advisable before turning to the substantive analysis. 

It may be taken for granted that all scientific theory is concerned 
with the analysis of elements of uniformity in empirical processes. 
This is what is ordinarily meant by the "dynamic" interest of theory, 
j The essential question is how far the state of theory is developed to 
[the point of permitting deductive transitions from one aspect or 
state of a system to another, so that it is possible to say that if the 
facts in A sector are W and X, those in B sector must be Y and Z. 
In some parts of physics and chemistry it is possible to extend the 
empirical coverage of such a deductive system quite widely. But in 
the sciences of action dynamic knowledge of this character is tiighly 
fragmentary, though by no means absent. 

In this situation there is danger of losing all the advantages of 
systematic theory. But it is possible to retain some of them and at 
the same time provide a framework for the orderly growth of dy- 
namic knowledge. It is as such a second best type of theory that the 
structural-functional level of theoretical systematization is here con- 
ceived and employed. 

In the first place completely raw empiricism is overcome by 
describing phenomena as parts of or processes within systematically 
conceived empirical systemsTihe set of descriptive categories em- 
ployed is neither ad hoc nor sTieer common sense but is a carefully 
and critically worked out system of concepts which are capable of 
application to all relevant parts or aspects of a concrete system in a 
coherent wa^This makes comparability and transition from one 
part and/or state of the system to another, and from system to sys- 
tem, possible. It is of the greatest importance that this set of de- 
scriptive categories should be such that the dynamic generalizations 
which will explain processes are directly a part of the theoretical 
system. This essentially is what the "motivational" aspect of the 
action frame of reference accomplishes.^ By conceiving the processes 
of the social system as action processes in the technical sense of the 
above discussion, it becomes possible to articulate with the estab- 
lished knowledge of motivation which has been developed in mod- 
em psychology and thereby, as it were, to tap an enormous reservoir 
of knowledge;^ 

A particularly important aspect of our system of categories is the 



The General Theory of Action Systems [ 21 ] 

"structural" aspect. We simply are not in a position to "catch" the 
uniformities of dynamic process in the social system except here 
and there. But in order to give those we can catch a setting and to 
heln the most advantageous position to extend our dynamic knowl- 
edge we must have a "picture" of the system within which they fit, 
of^e given relationships of its parts in a given state of the system, 
an^7\vhere changes take place, of what changes into what through 
vi^hat order of intermediate stages. VThe system of structural cate- 
gories is the conceptual scheme whicF gives this setting for dynamic 
analysis. As dynamic knowledge is extended the indefendent ex- 
planatory significance of structural categories evaporates. But their 
scientific function is nonetheless crucial, / 

Therefore, one primary concern of this work must be with the 
categorization of the structure of social systems, the modes of struc- 
tiiral ditferentiation within such systems, and the ranges of varia- 
bihty with reference to each structural category between systems^. 
Precisely because of the fragmentary character of our dynamic 
knowledge, careful and systematic attention to these problems is of 
the highest urgency to sociology. But at the same time it should be 
made quite clear that this morphological interest is not an end in 
itself, but its products constitute an indispensable tool for other 
purposes. 

If we have a sufficiently generalized system of categories for the 
systematic description and comparison of the structure of systems, 
then we have a setting within which we can mobilize our dynamic 
knowledge of motivational processes to maximum effect. But pre- 
cisely relative to the problems which are of significance in social 
system terms, the knowledge we possess is both fragmentary and of 
very uneven and unequal analytical status. The most effective way 
of organizing it for our purposes is to bring it into relation to a 
scheme of points of reference relative to the social system. This is 
where the much-discussed concept of "function" comes in. We 
must, of course, "place" a dynamic process structurally in the social 
system. But beyond that we must have a test of the significance of 
generalizations relative to it. That test of significance takes the 
form of the "functional" relevance of the process. The test is to 
ask the question, what would be the differential consequences for 
the system of two or more alternative outcomes of a dynamic 



[ 22 ] The Action Frame of Reference 

process? Such consequences will be found to fit into the terms of 
maintenance of stability or production of change, of integration or 
disruption of the system in some sense. 

It is placing dynamic motivational processes in this context of 
functional significance for the system which provides the basis for 
the formulation of the concept mechanism as introduced above. 
Motivational dynamics in sociological theory, then, must take the 
form in the first instance of the formulation of mechanisms which 
"account for" the functioning of social systems, for the maintenance 
or breakdown of given structural patterns, for a typical process of 
transition from one structural pattern to another. 

Such a mechanism is always an empirical generalization about 
the operation of motivational "forces" under the conditions stated. 
The analytical basis of such generalizations may, however, be ex- 
tremely variable. Sometimes we may just know empirically that it 
goes this way, in other cases there may be deeper foundations for 
the generalization as in application of established laws of learning 
or operation of the mechanisms of defense on the personality level. 
But the formulation of the motivational problem in mechanism 
terms is essential to establish the relevance of whatever level of 
motivational knowledge may be available to the problems of func- 
tioning of a social system. For the scientific fruitfulness of a gener- 
alization this problem of relevance is just as important as is that of 
the soundness of the generalization itself. 

We may now outline the organization of the volume. Follov^dng 
the very brief presentation in the present chapter of the fundamen- 
tals of the frame of reference of action, the next chapter will take 
up the most essential components and points of reference for anal- 
ysis of social systems as such, and will show the most general way 
in which these components come to be organized through the insti- 
tutionalization of roles. There will then follow three chapters on 
the structure of social systems. The first of these will be concerned 
with the principal types of subsystem which enter into more com- 
plex social systems while the second and third will attempt to 
analyze the modes of differentiation and the ranges of structural 
variation of societies. 

When this framework for the analysis of social process in rela- 
tion to the structure of social systems and their variability has been 



The General Theory of Action Systems [ 23 ] 

laid down, attention will be turned to the analysis of process itself. 
This analysis will occupy two chapters, of which the first will be on 
the mechanisms of socialization, that is, the learning of patterns of 
orientation in social roles. The second of the two will then turn to 
the analysis of tendencies to deviant behavior, and of the mechan- 
isms of social control which tend to counteract them. 

Chapters VI and VII will thus be concerned with the motiva- 
tional aspects of social behavior. The two chapters which follow 
these will turn to the cultural aspects. Patterns of value-orientation 
are so fundamental to the social system that they will have been 
dealt with throughout the general analysis of social structure. But 
to complete the analysis of the relations of culture to the social 
system it is necessary to discuss explicitly the place of the other two 
principal components of a cultural tradition, systems of beliefs or 
ideas, and systems of expressive symbols. These wall be the subject- 
matter of Chapters VIII and IX respectively. There is a certain 
arbitrariness in the decision of whether the motivational or the cul- 
tural aspect should be treated first. The choice taken here is pri- 
marily dictated by the fact that in dealing with social structure 
value-orientation patterns had already been extensively analyzed. 
Before carrying the analysis of the relations of culture to the social 
system farther, it seemed advisable to give explicit attention to 
motivational process in order to make the significance of these other 
two classes of culture pattern for action clearer. 

At this point a pause will be taken in the high level of sustained 
abstract analysis, to illustrate what has gone before in terms of a 
kind of case study, the analysis of certain highlights of modem 
medical practice considered as a partial social system. After this the 
last major theoretical task will be undertaken, the analysis of the 
problem of social change, with some illustrations of types of proc- 
esses of such change. 

The book will close with a very brief methodological stock-taking 
which will be concerned primarily with consideration of a definition 
of the scope of sociological theory and its relations to other concep- 
tual schemes among the sciences of the action field. 



II 



THE MAJOR POINTS OF REFER- 
ENCE AND STRUCTURAL COMPONENTS OF THE 
SOCIAL SYSTEM 



AS WE have seen in the preceding chapter, a social 
system is a mode of organization of action elements relative to the 
persistence or ordered processes of change of the interactive pat- 
terns of a plurality of individual actors. Regardless of the enormous 
variability in degrees of stability and structural integration of these 
interaction patterns, of their static character or involvement in 
processes of structural development or change, it is necessary for 
the present type of theoretical analysis to develop a scheme for the 
explicit analysis of the structure of such systems. This scheme must 
provide a fundamental set of points of reference for the analysis of 
motivational processes. 

In the preceding chapter we outlined the general character of 
systems of action and their major components. Now we must under- 
take the specific spelling out of the theory of action in relation to 
social systems as such. The present chapter will focus on the general 
problems of the constitution of social systems and the bases of their 
structure, while those which follow it will deal with the problems 
of structural differentiation and variability. 

First a word should be said about the units of social systems. In 
the most elementary sense the unit is the act. This is of course true, 
as was shown in the last chapter, of any system of action. The act 
then becomes a unit in a social system so far as it is part of a process 
of interaction between its author and other actors. 

24 



Points of Reference and Structural Components [ 25 ] 

I Secondly, for most purposes of the more macroscopic analysis of 
social systems, however, it is convenient to make use of a higher 
order unit than the act, namely the status-role as it will here be 
called. Since a social system is a system of processes of interaction be- 
tween actors, it is the structure of the relations between the actors as 
involved in the interactive process which is essentially the structure 
of^e social system. The system is a network of such relationships. 

Each individual actor is involved in a plurality of such inter- 
active relationships each with one or more partners in the comple- ' 
mentary role. Hence it is the particifation of an actor in a pat- 
terned interactive relationship which is for many purposes the most 
significant unit of the social system. 

This participation in turn has two principal aspects. On the one 
hand there is the positional aspect— that of where the actor in ques- 
tion is ^'located" in the social system relative to other actors. This is 
what we will call his status, which is his place in the relationship 
system considered as a structure, that is a patterned system of farts. 
On the other hand there is the processual aspect, that of what the 
a ctor does in h is relations with others seen in the context of its 
functional significance for the social system. It is this which we shall 
call his role. 

The "distinction between status and role is at the root very 
closely related to that between the two reciprocal perspectives in- 
herent in interaction. On the one hand each actor is an object of 
orientation for other actors~(and for himself). In so far as this 
object-significance derives from his position in the social relationship 
system, it is a status significance. On the other hand each actor is 
oriented to other actors. In this capacity he is acting, not serving as 
an object— this is what we mean by his playing a role. 

It should be made quite clear that statuses and roles, or the 
status-role bundle, are not in general attributes of the actor, but are 
units of the social system, though having a given status may some- 
times be treated as an attribute. But the status-role is analogous to 
the particle of mechanics, not to mass or velocity. 

Third, a word should be said about the sense in which the actor 
himself is a unit of the social system. As a point of reference, as he 
who holds a status or performs a role, the individual actor is always 



[ 26 ] Points of Reference and Structural Components 

a significant unit which, however, for purposes of the analysis of 
social systems is to be treated as a higher order unit than the status- 
role. The actor in this sense is a composite hundle of statuses and 
roles. But this social actor must be distinguished from the personal- 
ity as itself a system of action. This distinction derives from the 
mutual irreducibility of personality and social systems as discussed 
in the last chapter. 

We have, then, three different units of social systems referable 
to the individual actor ranging from the most elementary to the 
most composite. The first is the social act, performed by an actor 
and oriented to one or more actors as objects. The second is the 
status-role as the organized sub-system of acts of the actor or actors 
occupying given reciprocal statuses and acting toward each other 
in terms of given reciprocal orientations. The third is the actor him- 
self as a social unit, the organized system of all the statuses and 
roles referable to him as a social object and as the "author" of a 
system of role-activities. 

Finally, cutting across the individual actor as a composite unit 
is the collectivity as actor and as object. Here the particular sectors 
of the action-systems of the relevant individual actors are abstracted 
from their other status-roles and treated together. Part of the sig- 
nificance of the status-role as a unit derives from the fact that it is 
the unit which is a unit both for the action system of the individual 
and for that of the collectivity. It thus serves to articulate the two 
cross-cutting modes of organization of social systems. 

It is naturally extremely important to be clear which of these 
four units is meant when a social structure is broken down into 
units. 

§ THE FUNCTIONAL PREREQUISITES OF 
SOCIAL SYSTEMS^ 

INTERACTIVE relationships analyzed in terms of statuses 
and roles occur as we have seen in systems. If such a system is to 

^ On the general problem of functional prerequisites of the social system see 
Aberle, Cohen, Davis, Levy, Sutton, "The Functional Prerequisites of a Society," 
Ethics, IX (January, 1950), loo-iii. The present treatment is indebted to their 
paper but departs from it rather radically. 



The Functional Prerequisites of Social Systems [ 27 ] 

constitute a persistent order or to undergo an orderly^ process of 
developmental change, certain functional prerequisites must be 
met. A brief discussion of these functional prerequisites is in order 
because it provides the setting for a more extended analysis of the 
points of reference for analyzing the structure of social systems. 

The problem of functional prerequisites is a protean problem 
because of the variety of different levels on which it may be ap- 
proached. What we propose here is to start on the most general and 
therefore formal level of action theory and proceed to introduce 
specifications step by step. It should be possible to do this in a suffi- 
ciently orderly fashion. 

The broadest framework of such an analysis is directly deducible 
from the considerations about action in general which were put 
forward in the last chapter. The basis of this is the insight that 
action systems are structured about three integrative foci, the indi- 
vidual actor, the interactive system, and a system of cultural pat-, 
terning.^ Each implies the others and therefore the variability of 
any one is limited by its compatibility with the minimum conditions 
of functioning of each of the other two. 

Looked at from the perspective of any one integrate of action 
such as the social system there are in turn two aspects of this recip- 
rocal interrelation with each of the others. First, a social system 
cannot be so structured as to be radically incompatible with the 
conditions of functioning of its component individual actors as bio- 
logical organisms and as personalities, or of the relatively stable 
integration of a cultural system. Secondly, in turn the social system, 
on both fronts, depends on the requisite minimum of "support" 
from each of the other systems. It must, that is, have a sufficient 
proportion of its component actors adequately motivated to act in 
accordance with the requirements of its role system, positively in 
the fulfillment of expectations and negatively in abstention from 
too much disruptive, i.e., deviant, behavior. It must on the other 
hand avoid commitment to cultural patterns which either fail to 

^ An orderly process in this sense is contrasted with the disintegration of a 
system. Disintegration in this sense means disappearance of the boundaries of the 
system relative to its environment. Cf. Values, Motives, and Systems of Action, 
Chapter I. 

^ And also in a different sense about the non-action environment, the physical 
aspects of the situation. 



[ 28 ] Points of Reference and Structural Comfonents 

define a minimum of order or which place impossible demands on 
people and thereby generate deviance and conflict to a degree which 
is incompatible with the minimum conditions of stability or orderly 
development. These problems may be briefly taken up in turn. 

We have tried to make clear that there is no simple relation 
between personalities and social systems. Because of this fact, in 
the present state of knowledge it is not possible to define precisely 
what are the minimum needs of individual actors, so only certain 
rather general things can be said. From the point of view of 
functioning of the social system, it is not the needs of all the par- 
ticipant actors which must be met, nor all the needs of any one, 
but only a sufficient proportion for a sufficient fraction of the 
population?Tlt is indeed a very general phenomenon that social 
forces are directly responsible for injury to or destruction of some 
individuals and some of the wants or needs of all individuals, and 
though this may be reduced it is highly probable that it cannot be 
eliminated under realistic conditions.] To cite a very simple case, a 
war cannot be won without casualties, and acceptance of war is 
sometimes a condition of survival of a social system as a distinctive 
system. 
■ — The elements of this class of functional prerequisites may be 
said to begin with the biological prerequisites of individual life, like 
nutrition and physical safety. They go on to the subtler problems 
of the conditions of minimum stability of personality. It seems to be 
reasonably well established that there are minimum conditions of 
socialization with respect for instance to the relation between affec- 
tional support and security, without which a functioning personal- 
ity cannot be built up. The present task is not to attempt to analyze 
these borderline problems, but only to make clear where they fit in 
relation to the theory of the social system. These minimum needs 
of individual actors constitute a set of condition? to which the social 
system must be adapted. If the variation of the latter goes too far 
in a given direction this will tend to set up repercussions which will 
in turn tend to produce deviant behavior in the actors in question, 
behavior which is either positively disruptive or involves withdrawal 
from functionally important activities. Such a need, as a functional 
prerequisite, may be likened to a spring. The less adequately it is 
met, the more "pressure" it will take to realize certain patterns of 



The Functional Prerequisites of Social Systems [ 29 ] 

social action in the face of it, and hence the less energy will be 
available for other purposes. At certain points for certain individuals 
or classes of them then the pressure may become too great and the 
spring may break— such persons no longer participate in the inter- 
active system of personality and social system.* 

[The obverse of the functional prerequisite of meeting a mini- 
mum proportion of the needs of the individual actors, is the need 
to secure adequate participation of a sufficient proportion of these 
actors in the social system, that is to motivate them adequately to 
the performances which may be necessary if the social system in 
question is to persist or develop. Indeed it is because it is a condi- 
tion of this that the need to satisfy minimum needs of actors is a 
prerequisite at all. 

The prerequisite of adequate motivation in turn subdivides into 
two main aspects, a negative and a positive. The negative is that of 
a minimum of control over potentially disruptive behavior. This 
means action which interferes with the action of others in their 
roles in the social system. It may involve either aggressive action 
towafd^ others or merely action which has deleterious consequences 
for others or for an aspect of the system, without aggressive intent. 

The field is highly complex but perhaps one particular aspect 
of it may be singled out for special mention. This is that in terms of 
functional significance relative to the social system, the significance 
of an action or class of them is to be understood not directly and 
primarily in terms of its motivation but of its actual or probable 
consequences for the system. In this sense the pursuit of "private 
interests" may be highly disruptive under certain circumstances 

* It is, of course, highly important not to invent ad hoc generalizations about 
these prerequisites which allegedly explain certain classes of concrete social 
phenomena. This procedure is especially tempting because such an ad hoc hypothe- 
sis can serve to absolve the investigator from the diflScult analysis of the internal 
balances and processes of the social system itself. In its cruder forms this pro- 
cedure has played a very prominent part in the history of social thought, as in the 
currency of theories that virtually all social phenomena were determined by the 
genetic constitution of populations or their geographical environments. It is an 
index of the increasing maturity of our science that such sweeping formulae are 
no longer considered to merit even serious discussion. Both the positive role of 
such conditioning factors and of internal social processes are in general terms 
fully established. But the general formulae do not solve the specific problems. 
The task is to unravel the complex patterns of interaction between the two classes 
of factors. 



[ 30 ] Points of Reference and Structural Com'ponents 

even though the content of the interests, for example in rehgious 
terms, may be such as to be rather generally ethically approved. 
Similarly conflict as such may be highly disruptive. If it becomes 
sufl&ciently severe the functional problem for the system becomes 
the control of the conflict as such. In such a case the merits of the 
"case" of one or the other of the parties may become of quite 
secondary importance. 

In general terms the functional problem for a social system of 
, minimizing potentially disruptive behavior and the motivation to it, 
/ may be called the "motivational problem of order." Because of cer- 
tain further features of social systems which will be analyzed in the 
follovdng chapters the present discussion should lead up to con- 
sideration of certain relatively specific classes of potential disrup- 
tion, notably the problem of opportunity, the problem of prestige 
allocation, and the problem of power. There is, that is to say, an 
immense variety of particular acts which are disruptive in that they 
interfere with the role-performance of one or more other actors. So 
long, however, as they remain nearly randomly distributed they 
may reduce the efficiency of the system by depressing levels of role 
performance, but still not constitute a threat to its stability. This 
latter may develop when disruptive tendencies become organized 
as a sub-system in such a way as to impinge on strategic points in 
the social system itself. It is as such strategic points that the prob- 
lems of opportunity, prestige and power will be treated below.^ 

The distinction between the negative and the positive aspects 
of the problem of adequate motivation is relative and gradual. Both 
present functional problems in terms of the operation of the social 
system, which focus attention on the mechanisms which fit into the 
relevant context. But in spite of this relativity there is an important 
distinction between action which is positively disruptive of a going 
system of social relationships, and simple withdrawal of the indi- 
vidual from performance of his obligations. The principal criterion 

° It is in this kind of a context that the distinction between manifest and 
latent function becomes significant. In general only within limited ranges and 
to a limited extent are the consequences which the sociologist takes as his standard 
for the analysis of the systemic significance of actions expUcitly intended by the 
actor, individual or coUective. It is these unintended consequences which constitute 
the latent functions or dysfunctions of the actions. Cf. Robert K. Merton, Social 
Theory and Social StTucture, Chapter I. ~" 



The Functional Prerequisites of Social Systems [31] 

would be that in the latter case the only interference with others 
would consist in forcing them to do without the benefits expected 
from a person's actions. The possibility of withdrawal in fact defines 
one of the most important directions of deviant behavior, and enters 
as we shall see in most important ways into the structure of the 
problems and mechanisms of social control. Illness is for example 
one of the most important types of withdrawal behavior in our 
society, which will be extensively discussed below. 

Again in relation to withdrawal as a type of failure to be moti- 
vated to adequate role performance, it must be made clear that the 
negative aspect of withdrawal is not defined in motivational terms 
but in functional terms relative to the social system. Precisely be- 
cause people are dependent on each other's performances, simple 
withdrawal from fulfillment of expectations may, motivationally 
speaking, be a highly aggressive act, and may in fact injure the 
other severely. But in part precisely because it does not correspond 
to the motivational distinction the functional distinction is highly 
significant as will become evident. It provides a point of reference 
for the analysis of the directions of deviant behavior and hence 
places such behavior in relation to problems of the mechanisms of 
operation of the social system. 

The prerequisite of adequate motivation gives us one of the 
primary starting points for building up to the concepts of role and 
of institutionalization. Fundamentally the problem is, will the per- 
sonalities developed within a social system, at whatever stage in the 
life cycIe7^*spontaneousTy" act in such ways as to fulfill the func- 
tional prerequisites of the social systems of which they are parts, or 
is it necessary to look for relatively specific mechanisms, that is, 
modes of organization of the motivational systems of personalities, 
which can be understood in direct relation to the socially struc- 
tured level or role behavior? The older "psychological" view that^ 
s ocieties are resul tants of the independently determined "traits" of 
individuals would take the first alternative. The modem sociological 
view tends to emphasize the second. 

Statement of the problem of adequate motivation not only poses 
in general the problems of the mechanisms of socialization and of 
social control and their relation to the dynamics of the social sys- 
tem, but it provides the setting for an approach to the analysis of 



[ 32, ] Points of Reference and Structural Com^ponents 

the relevant mechanisms. PersonaUty psychology, as we have seen, 
is becoming highly oriented to the actor's relational system, that is, 
his orientation to objects. When this fact is combined with the 
fundamental place of the concept of expectations in the theory of 
action, it becomes clear that one central aspect of the general and 
especially the cathectic orientation of the actor is his set of need- 
dispositions toward the fulfillment of role expectations, in the first 
place those of other significant actors but also his own. There is~ j 
in the personality structure of the individual actor a "conformity-; 
alienation" dimension in the sense of a disposition to conform, 
with the expectations of others or to be alienated from them.l 
When these relevant expectations are those relative to the fulfilF 
ment of role-obligations, this conformity-alienation balance, in 
general or in particular role contexts, becomes a central focus of the 
articulation of the motivational system of the personality with the 
structure of the social system. 

It is furthermore in the present context of the problem of ade- 
quate motivation of role-expectation fulfillment that the basic sig- 
nificance for the social system of two fundamental properties of 
biological "human nature" may best be briefly brought to attention. 
The first of these is the much discussed "plasticity" of the human 
organism, its capacity to learn any one of a large number of alterna- 
tive patterns of behavior instead of being bound by its genetic con- 
stitution to a very limited range of alternatives. It is of course within 
the limits of this plasticity that the independent determinant sig- 
nificance of cultural and social factors in action must be sought. The 
clear demonstration of determination in terms of the genes auto- 
matically narrows the range of relevance of the factors which are of 
theoretical interest in the sciences of action, except for their possible 
bearing on the problems of assortative mating which influence the 
processes of combination and recombination of genetic strains. The 
limits of plasticity are for the most part still unknown.* 

® From the point of view of action theory and specifically that of the social 
system it may be said that the burden of proof rests upon him who would assert 
that what has been considered an action theory problem is adequately solved by 
invoking the role of such sub-action determinants of behavior. This will often 
turn out to be the case, but resort to ad hoc hypotheses on this level which have 
failed to stand up under criticism and further investigation, has been so prominent 
an the history of social science that we must insist on this burden of proof maxim. 



The Functional Prerequisites of Social Systems [ 33 ] 

The second characteristic of human nature in the biological 
sense Is^hat may be called "sensitivity." By this is meant the acces- 
sibility of the human individual to influence by the attitudes of, 
others in the social interaction process, and the resulting dependence 
on receiving relatively particular and specific reactions. What this 
provides essentially is the motivational basis for accessibility to influ- 
ence in the learning process. Thus the attitudes of others are prob- 
ably of first rate importance in all human learning, but are 
particularly crucial in motivating the acceptance of value-orientation 
patterns, with their legitimation of the renunciations which are 
essential to the achievement of a disciplined integration of per- 
sonality. Without this discipline the stability of expectations in rela- 
tion to their fulfillment which is essential for a functioning social 
system would not be possible. It is highly probable that one of the 
principal limitations on the social potentialities of animals on other 
than an instinct basis, lies in the absence or weakness of this lever. 
[The physiological dependency of the human infant is associated 
Iwith its capacity for developing emotional dependency which in 
Vtum is an essential condition of much of social learning. 

It has not been common in discussions of the functional pre- 
requisites of social systems to include explicit treatment of cultural 
prerequisites, but the need to do so seems to follow directly from 
the major premises of action theory as set forth above. Th^ integra- 
tion of cultural patterns as well as their specific content involve 
factors which at any given time are independent of the other ele- 
ments for the action system and yet must be articulated with them. 
Siich integration imposes "imperatives" on the other elements just 
as truly as is the case the other way around. This major functional 
problem area of the social system may be subdivided along the same 
lines as in the case of the motivational problem. 

In the first place there are minimum social conditions necessary 
for the production, maintenance and development of cultural sys- 
j tems in general and of particular types of cultural system. It may be 
presumed that disruption of the communication system of a society 
is ultimately just as dangerous as disruption of its system of order in 
the above sense of motivational integration. This is an aspect of 
"anomie" which deserves much more explicit analysis than it has 
received. Perhaps the most obvious specific example is provided by 



[ 34 ] Points of Reference and Structural Components 

the role of language. We know quite definitely that the individual 
does not develop language spontaneously without undergoing a 
socially structured learning process in relation to others. It is quite 
definite that this process must be part of a system of social relations 
which is orderly within certain limits, however difficult it may be 
to specify the limits in detail. It is altogether probable that many 
protohuman groups failed to make the transition to the human socio- 
cultural level of action because of failure to fulfill the prerequisites 
of the emergence of language or of some other functionally essential 
aspects of culture. 

Thus a social system in the present sense is not possible without 
language, and without certain other minimum patterns of culture, 
such as empirical knowledge necessary to cope with situational 
exigencies, and sufficiently integrated patterns of expressive sym- 
bolism and of value orientation, A social system which leads to too 
drastic disruption of its culture, for example through blocking the 
processes of its acquisition, would be exposed to social as well as 
cultural disintegration. 

We do not accurately know the cultural limits of "human so- 
ciety," so exactly what the above limits may be remains to be deter- 
mined. With respect to certain more specific types of cultural pat- 
tern, however, we have relatively detailed knowledge— we shall, for 
example, discuss modern science from this point of view below. In 
any case the determination of these conditions is an important field 
of sociological research. 

One final remark in orientation to the general problem. Culture 
may of course be "embodied" in physical form independently of par- 
ticular actors, e.g., knowledge in books, but it is a cardinal principle 
of the theory of action thatj culture is not merely "situational" rela- 
tive to action but becomes directly constitutive of personalities as 
such through what personality psychologists now tend to call "in- 
ternalization."! The minimum cultural prerequisites of a social sys- 
tem may thus C)e said to operate at least in part through the functions 
of culture for personality. Without the requisite cultural resources 
to be assimilated through internalization it is not possible for a 
human level of personality to emerge and hence for a human type 
of social system to develop. 

The other aspect of the problem of prerequisites on the cultural 



The Functional Prerequisites of Social Systems [ 35 ] 

side is that of adequate cultural resources and organization for the 
maintenance of the social system. This has already been touched 
upon in the discussions above, but a few additional remarks may be 
made. Perhaps the most obvious type of case is instrumental knowl- 
edge. Without a minimum of technical lore which makes it pos- 
sible to deal with the physical environment and with other human 
beings no human society would be possible. This in turn presup- 
poses language. But similar considerations also apply to the other 
departments of culture, to non-empirical existential ideas, to expres- 
sive symbol systems and above all to patterns of value-orientation 
about which much will have to be said in what follows. 

It was pointed out above that tendencies to deviant behavior on 
the part of the component actors pose functional "problems" for the 
social system in the sense that they must be counteracted by "mech- 
anisms of control" unless dysfunctional consequences are to ensue. 
The parallel on the cultural side is the case where the maintenance 
of certain cultural patterns as integral parts of the going system of 
_ action imposes certain strains. This may be true both on the per- 
sonality and the social system levels. The most obvious cases are 
those of a value-orientation pattern and of cognitive beliefs which 
are motivationally difficult to conform with. Such difficulty might 
be attributable to a conflict with reality. Thus within the area 
covered by well established medical science the maintenance of and 
action upon some beliefs of Christian Science may impose a serious 
strain on the actor especially where he cannot escape knowing the 
medical views. Or it may be a matter of difficulty in attaining con- 
formative motivation, as in the case where certain types of socializa- 
tion tend to generate deeply anti-authoritarian sentiments so that at 
least some kinds of authority cannot be tolerated by some people. 
In particular a Utopian ideal if accepted and institutionalized im- 
Doses strains on the social system. 

Though the limits in this as in the other cases are in general not 
known, it is safe to say not only that the social system must be able 
to keep a minimum of culture going, but vice versa, any given cul- 
ture must be compatible with a social system to a minimum degree 
if its patterns are not to become extinct, and if the latter is to con- 
I tinue functioning unchanged. Analysis of the mediating mech- 
anisms between the cultural patterns and the concrete action systems 



[ 36 ] Points of Reference and Structural Components 

in its motivational aspect constitutes one of the most important 
problem areas of action theory and specifically of the theory of social 
systems. This subject will be further explored in Chapters VIII and 
IX below. 

§ THE INSTITUTIONAL INTEGRATION 
OF ACTION ELEMENTS 

A CONCRETE action system is an integrated^ structure of 
action elements in relation to a situation. This means essentially 
integration of motivational and cultural or symbolic elements, 
brought together in a certain kind of ordered system. 

The analysis of the general features of action in the previous 
chapter, combined with the immediately preceding analysis of the 
functional prerequisites of social systems, yield certain specifications 
which can guide us to strategic features of this ordered structure. 

It is inherent in an action system that action is, to use one 
phrase, "normatively oriented." This follows, as was shown, from 
the concept of expectations and its place in action theory, especially 
in the "active" phase in which the actor pursues goals. Expectations 
then, in combination with the "double contingency" of the process 
of interaction as it has been called, create a crucially imperative 
problem of order. Two aspects of this problem of order may in turn 
be distinguished, order in the symbolic systems which make com- 
munication possible, and order in the mutuality of motivational 
orientation to the normative aspect of expectations, the "Hobbesian" 
problem of order. 

, The problem of order, and thus of the nature of the integration 
of stable systems of social interaction, that is, of social structure, 
thus focuses on the integration of the motivation of actors with the 
normative cultural standards which integrate the action system, in 

^ We are here concerned with what has been called the "boundary-maintain- 
ing" type of system (Values, Motives, and Systems of Action, op. cit.). For this 
type of system, as noted there, the concept integration has a double reference: 
a) to the compatibihty of the components of the system with each other so that 
change is not necessitated before equihbrivun can be reached, and b) to the 
maintenance of the conditions of the distinctiveness of the system within its 
boundaries over against its environment. Integration may be relative to a moving 
equilibrium, i.e., an orderly process of change of the system, as well as to a static 
eauilibrium. 



The Institutional Integration of Action Elements [ 37 ] 

our context interpersonally. These standards are, in the terms used 
in the preceding chapter, patterns of value-orientation, and as such 
are a particularly crucial part of the cultural tradition of the social 
system.® 

The orientation of one actor to the contingent action of another 
inherently involves evaluative orientation, because the element of 
contingency implies the relevance of a system of alternatives. Sta- 
bility of interaction in turn depends on the condition that the par- 
ticular acts of evaluation on both sides should be oriented to com- 
mon standards since only in terms of such standards is "order" in 
either the communication or the motivational contexts possible. 

There is a range of possible modes of orientation in the motiva- 
tional sense to a value-standard. Perhaps the most important dis- 
tinction is between the attitude of "expediency" at one pole, where 
conformity or non-conformity is a function of the instrumental inter- 
ests of the actor, and at the other pole the "introjection" or inter- 
nalization of the standard so that to act in conformity with it be- 
comes a need-disposition in the actor's own personality structure, 
relatively independently of any instrumentally significant conse- 
quences of that conformity. The latter is to be treated as the basic 
type of integration of motivation with a normative pattern-structure 
of values. 

In order to justify this last proposition it is necessary to go some- 
what further into the nature of the interaction process. In the case 
of a given actor, ego, there is soon built up a system of expectations 
relative to a given other, alter. With respect to alter's action this 
implies for ego hopes and anxieties, that is, some of alter's possible 
reactions will be favorable from ego's point of view and others un- 
' favorable. By and large we are on psychological grounds justified in 
saying ego's orientation will on balance tend to be oriented to stimu- 
lating the favorable, gratification-producing reactions and avoiding 
\provocations for the unfavorable, deprivation-producing reactions, 
j Generally, in so far as the normative standards in terms of which 
ego and alter are interacting are shared and clear, favorable reactions 
on the part of alter will tend to be stimulated by ego's action con- 
forming with the standards in question, and the unfavorable, by his 

^ The other components of the cuhural tradition pose somewhat different 
problems which will be taken up in the following section. 



[ 38 ] Points of Reference and Structural Components 

deviating from them (and vice versa of course). *The result of this 
circumstance is the tendency for the conformity-deviation dimension 
and the favorable-unfavorable or the gratification-deprivation dimen- 
sion to coincide. In other words the basic condition on which an 
interaction system can be stabilized is for the interests of the actors 
to be bound to conformity with a shared system of value-orientation 
standards. 

There is in turn a two-fold structure of this "binding in. )In the 
first place, by virtue of internalization of the standard, conformity 
with it tends to be of personal, expressive and/or instrumental sig- 
nificance to ego. In the second place, the structuring of the reactions 
of alter to ego's action as sanctions is a function of his conformity 
with the standard. Therefore conformity as a direct mode of the ful- 
fillment of his own need-dispositions tends to coincide with con- 
formity as a condition of eliciting the favorable and avoiding the 
unfavorable reactions of others. In so far as, relative to the actions 
of a plurality of actors, conformity with a value-orientation standard 
meets both these criteria, that is from the point of view of any giveii 
actor in the system, it is both a mode of the fulfillment of his own 
need-dispositions and a condition of "optimizing" the reactions of 
other significant actors, that standard will be said to be "insti- 
tutionalized." 

A value pattern in this sense is always institutionalized in an 
interaction context. Therefore there is always a double aspect of the 
expectation system which is integrated in relation to it. On the one 
hand there are the expectations which concern and in part set stand- 
ards for the behavior of the actor, ego, who is taken as the point of 
reference; these are his "role-expectations." On the other hand, from 
his point of view there is a set of expectations relative to the con- 
tingently probable reactions of others (alters)— these will be called 
"sanctions," which in turn may be subdivided into positive and 
negative according to whether they are felt by ego to be gratification- 
promoting or depriving. The relation between role-expectations and 
sanctions then is clearly reciprocal. What are sanctions to ego are 
role^xpectations to alter and vice versa. 

J A role then is a sector of the total orientation system of an indi- 
vidual actor which is organized about expectations in relation to a 
particular interaction context, that is integrated with a particular 



The Institutional Integration of Action Elements [ 39 ] 

set of value-standards which govern interaction with one or more 
alters in the appropriate complementary roles. These alters need not 
be a defined group of individuals, but can involve any alter if and 
when he comes into a particular complementary interaction rela- 
tionship with ego which involves a reciprocity of expectations with 
reference to common standards of value-orientation. 

The institutionalization of a set of role-expectations and of the 
corresponding sanctions is clearly a matter of degree. This degree is 
a function of two sets of variables; on the one hand those affecting 
the actual sharedness of the value-orientation patterns, on the other 
those determining the motivational orientation or commitment to 
the fulfillment of the relevant expectations. As we shall see a variety 
of factors can influence this degree of institutionalization through 
each of these channels. The polar antithesis of full institutionaliza- 
tion is, however, anomie, the absence of structured complementarity 
of the interaction process or, what is the same thing, the complete 
breakdown of normative order in both senses.jThis is, however, a 
limiting concept which is never descriptive of a concrete social sys- 
tem. Just as there are degrees of institutionalization so are there also 
degrees of anomie. The one is the obverse of the other. 

An institution will be said to be a complex of institutionalized 
I role integrates® which is of strategic structural significance in the 
social system in question. The institution should be considered to be 
a higher order unit of social structure than the role, and indeed it is 
made up of a plurality of interdependent role-pattems or compo- 
nents of them. Thus when we speak of the "institution of property" 
in a social system we bring together those aspects of the roles of the 
component actors which have to do with the integration of action- 
expectations with the value-patterns governing the definition of 
rights in "possessions" and obligations relative to them. An institu- 
tion in this sense should be clearly distinguished from a collectivity. 
A collectivity is a system of concretely interactive specific roles. An 
institution on the other hand is a complex of patterned elements in 
role-expectations which may apply to an indefinite number of col- 
lectivities. [Conversely, a collectivity may be the focus of a whole 
series of institutions. Thus the institutions of marriage and of par- 

'Or status-relationships. There are no roles without corresponding statuses 
and vice versa. 



[ 40 ] Points of Reference and Structural Components 

enthood are both constitutive of a particular family as a collectivity. 

It is now necessary to go back to certain aspects of the integra- 
tion of action elements in institutionalized roles. The starting point 
is the crucial significance of interaction and the corresponding com- 
plementarity of expectations. What are expectations to ego are sanc- 
tions to alter and vice versa, for among the expectations of any role, 
indeed the central part of them, are definitions of how its incumbent 
should act toward others, and these definitions are structured along 
the conformity-deviance dimension. The question of how far sanc- 
tions are intended by the actor who imposes them to influence the 
behavior of the other, or to "reward" his conformity and to "punish" 
his deviance, may remain an open question for the moment. The 
important point is that such intention is not a criterion of the con- 
cept of sanctions as here used. The criterion is merely that they are 
meaningful reactions of alter to what ego does. 

Certain empirical generalizations seem to be established which 
can carry us somewhat farther in interpreting the dynamic sig- 
nificance of this reciprocal integration of role-expectations. The first 
derives from what was above called the "sensitivity" of the human 
personality to the attitudes of others. From this it follows that only 
in limiting cases will the significance of sanctions be purely instru- 
mental, that is, will the probability of a given reaction be significant 
only as a set of expected conditions of the situation which influence 
the probability of successful attainment of a particular goal or the 
probable cost of its attainment. Conformity with role-expectations 
will always to a greater or less degree involve motivational ele'- 
ments of the character referred to in psychological discussions as 
composing the "ego-ideal" or the superego, elements of "self-respect," 
adequacy or "security" in the psychological sense. Such elements are 
not of course necessarily central for every concrete actor in every 
concrete situation which is connected with a set of institutionalized 
role-expectations. A particular individual or class of them may well 
become involved in an interaction situation in which their own 
"sentiments" are only very peripherally involved. But in a general 
sense in social situations, the circumstances of socialization and other 
factors preclude that this should be the predominant situation in 
permanent social systems which involve the major motivational in- 
terests of the participant actors. The focal case is that where the 



The Institutional Integration of Action Elements [41] 

actor "cares" how others react to him in much more than a purely 
instrumental sense. 

Considering that we are talking about the conditions of rela- 
tively stable interaction in social systems, it follows from this that 
the value-standards which define institutionalized role-expectations 
assume to a greater or less degree a moral significance. Conformity 
with them becomes, that is, to some degree a matter of the fulfill- 
ment of obligations which ego carries relative to the interests of the 
larger action system in which he is involved, that is a social system. 
The sharing of such common value patterns, entailing a sense of 
responsibility for the fulfillment of obligations, then creates a soli- 
darity among those mutually oriented to the common values. The 
actors concerned will be said to constitute, within the area of rele- 
vance of these values, a collectivity:'^ 

For some classes of participants the significance of collectivity 
membership may be predominantly its usefulness in an instrumental 
context to their "private" goals. But such an orientation cannot be 
constitutive of the collectivity itself, and so far as it predominates, 
tends to disrupt the solidarity of the collectivity. This is most em- 
'phatically not to say that participation in a solidary collectivity tends 
in general to interfere with the attainment of the individual's private 
goals, but that without the attachment to the constitutive common 
values the collectivity tends to dissolve. If this attachment is given, 
there is room for much fulfillment of private interests. _ 

Attachment to common values means, motivationally considered, 
that the actors have common "sentiments"^" in support of the value 
patterns, which may be defined as meaning that conformity with 
the relevant expectations is treated as a "good thing" relatively inde- 
pendently of any specific instrumental "advantage" to be gained 
from such conformity, e.g., in the avoidance of negative sanctions. 
Furthermore, this attachment to common values, while it may fit 
the immediate gratificational needs of the actor, always has also a 
"moral" aspect in that to some degree this conformity defines the 
"responsibilities" of the actor in the wider, that is, social action sys- 
tem in which he participates. Obviously the specific focus of re- 

^° The term "sentiments" is here used to denote culturally organized cathectic 
and/or evaluative modes or patterns of orientation toward particular objects or 
classes of objects. A sentiment thus involves the internalization of cultural patterns. 



[ 42 ] Points of Reference and Structural Components 

sponsibility is the collectivity which is constituted by a particular 
common value-orientation. 

Finally, it is quite clear that the "sentiments" which support 
such common values are not ordinarily in their specific structure the 
manifestation of constitutionally given propensities of the organism. 
They are in general learned or acquired. Furthermore, the part they 
play in the orientation of action is not predominantly that of cul- 
tural objects which are cognized and "adapted to" but the culture 
patterns have come to be internalized; they constitute part of the 
structure of the personality system of the actor itself. Such senti- 
ments or "value-attitudes" as they may be called, are therefore 
genuine need-dispositions of the personality. It is only by virtue of 
internalization of institutionalized values that a genuine motiva- 
tional integration of behavior in the social structure takes place, that 
the "deeper" layers of motivation become harnessed to the fulfill- 
ment of role-expectations. It is only when this has taken place to a 
high degree that it is possible to say that a social system is highly 
integrated, and that the interests of the collectivity and the private 
interests of its constituent members can be said to approach" 
coincidence. 

j r-^ This integration of a set of common value patterns with the 
.' internalized need-disposition structure of the constituent person- 

! alities is the core phenomenon of the dynamics of social systems. 
That the stability of any social system except the most evanescent 
interaction process is dependent on a degree of such integration may 

. be said to be the fundamental dynamic theorem of sociology. It is 
the major point of reference for all analysis which may claim to be a 
dynamic analysis of social process. 

It is the significance of institutional integration in this sense 
which lies at the basis of the place of specifically sociological theory 
in the sciences of action and the reasons why economic theory and 
other versions of the conceptual schemes which give predominance 
to rational instrumental goal-orientation cannot provide an adequate 
model for the dynamic analysis of the social system in general terms. 

^^ Exact coincidence should be regarded as a limiting case like the famous 
frictionless machine. Though complete integration of a social system of motiva- 
tion with a fully consistent set of cultural patterns is empirically unknown, the 
conception of such an integrated social system is of high theoretical significance. 



The Institutional Integration of Action Elements [ 43 ] 

It has been repeatedly shown that reduction of motivational dynam- 
ics to rational instrumental terms leads straight to the Hobbesian 
thesis, which is a reduction ad absurdum of the concept of a social 
system. This reductio was carried out in classic form by Durkheim 
in his Division of Labor. But Durkheim's excellent functional 
analysis has since been enormously reinforced by the implications 
of modern psychological knowledge with reference to the conditions 
of socialization and the bases of psychological security and the sta- 
bility of personality, as well as much further empirical and theo- 
retical analysis of social systems as such. 

The theory of institutional behavior, which is essentially socio- 
logical theory, is precisely of the highest significance in social sci- 
ence because by setting the problems of social dynamics in a context 
of institutional structure and drawing the implications of the 
theorem of institutional integration which has just been stated, this 
theory is enabled to exploit and extend the knowledge of modem 
psychology about the non- and inational aspects of motivation in 
order to analyze social processes. It follows also that any conceptual 
scheme which utilizes only the motivational elements of rational 
instrumental goal-orientation can be an adequate theory only of 
certain relatively specialized processes within the framework of an 
institutionally structured social system. 

The basic theorem of institutional integration like all such basic 
theorems, explains very little in detail. It provides rather a point of 
reference in relation to which it is possible in an orderly fashion to 
introduce successively the more detailed distinctions which are nec- 
essary before an adequate analysis of complex behavioral processes 
can be approached. The present exposition has chosen the deduc- 
tive approach. Hence it should be clearly understood that empirical 
applications of the conceptual scheme will be possible only after a 
much more advanced stage of elaboration has been reached. 

There are above all two main directions in which this further 
elaboration must be carried out. In the first place institutionalized 
role behavior has been defined as behavior oriented to a value- 
orientation pattern or system of them. But there are many different 
kinds of such patterns and many different ways in which role-expec- 
tations may be structured relative to them. In place of this extremely 
general formula then it is necessary to put a differentiated account 



[ 44 ] Points of Reference and Structural Comfonents 

of at least some of the most important of these differentiated possi- 
bilities. Secondly, the oversimplified "ideal case" depicts complete 
motivational integration with a given value-pattern in the sense that 
this pattern as internalized is conceived to produce a need-disposition 
for conformity with it which insures adequate motivation for con- 
forming behavior. Thig is obviously a highly simplified model. 
Before approaching realistic levels it is essential to analyze the com- 
plications involved in the possibilities of alienative as well as con- 
formative need-dispositions, of conflicts and ambivalence and the 
like. An introduction to the elaboration of the cultural aspects of this 
problem will constitute the remainder of the present chapter. 

Before embarking on these considerations, however, a brief dis- 
cussion is in order of the implications of this theorem of institutional 
integration for the articulation of social role structure with per- 
sonality structure. The starting point is that stated above, that the 
role expectation is structured around a specific interaction context. 
To whatever extent adequate motivation for the fulfillment of such 
expectations is achieved, where a set of expectations for those play- 
ing the "same" role is uniform there is every reason why in person- 
ality terms the motivational significance of this uniform behavior 
cannot be the same for all the personalities concerned. Three crucial 
reasons for this may be cited. First, the role in question is only one 
of several in which each individual is involved. Though the expec- 
tations for each may be identical with respect to this role, the total 
role systems would only in a limiting case be identical. In each case 
then the particular role must fit into a diff^erent total system of role 

^expectations. Since all the different roles in which an individual is 
involved are interdependent in his motivational system, the combi- 
nation of motivational elements which produces the uniform be- 

*— havior will be different for different personalities. 

Secondly, role-involvements do not exhaust the orientation or 
interest system of any personality. He has internal or "narcissistic" 
and individually creative foci of interest, and orientations to non- 
social aspects of his situation. Again for two different personalities 
only in a limiting case would these non-social aspects of the total 
orientation system be identical. Since this non-social sector of his 
personality is interdependent with the social sector, differences in 
this realm would have repercussions in the field of social motivation. 



The Classification of Institutional Patterns [ 45 ] 

Finally third, there is every reason to beheve that it is strictly im- 
possible for the distribution of constitutional differences in the 
population of a complex social system to correspond directly with 
the distribution of roles. Therefore the relation between the consti- 
tutional basis of role-behavior and the overt behavior will be differ- 
ent with different individuals in the same role. Fulfillment of a given 
set of expectations will impose a greater "strain" on one actor than 
on another. 

For all these reasons and possibly others, it is not possible to infer__ 
directly"bacF and forth from personality structure to role behavior. 
The uniformities of role behavior as well as their differentiations 
are problematical even given the personality constitutions of the par- 
ticipants in the social system. Analysis of the motivational dynamics 
-of role behavior therefore implies the formulation of mechanisms 
//specific to the sociological problem level. It is not possible simply to 
"exlfapolafe;'' from the personality mechanisms of the one to those 
of"the mariy as participants in the social system. This circumstance 
introduces fiTghtful complications into the task of the sociologist, 
but unfortunately its implications cannot be evaded. 

These considerations should not, however, give the impression 
that what are ordinarily called "psychological" concepts have no 
relevance to sociological theory. Just what the scope of the term 
psychological should be is a question discussion of which may be 
deferred to the final chapter. But it is of the greatest importance that 
motivational categories should play a central role in sociological 
theory. Essentially the dynamic elements of personalities and of 
social systems are made up of the same "stuff." This material must, 
however, conceptually be differently organized for the purposes of 
analysis of the two types of system. 

§ THE POINTS OF REFERENCE FOR THE 
CLASSIFICATION OF INSTITUTIONAL 
PATTERNS 

so FAR in this chapter we have accomplished two impor- 
tant things. The first section outlined the basic functional problems 
of an ordered system of social relationships. This defined a set of "im- 
peratives" which are imposed on the variability of social systems if 



[ 46 ] Points of Reference and Structural Components 

the minimum conditions of stability are to be fulfilled. They will be 
of the first importance in setting the stage for analyzing the ranges 
of variation of social structures and the bases of their internal dif- 
ferentiation. Secondly, in the foregoing section we analyzed the 
nature of the most important structural unit of the social system, the 
status-role, and showed the nature of the integration of the ele- 
mentary components of action which was involved in it. 

The next step is to begin to lay the groundwork for dealing sys- 
tematically with the differentiation of roles. This involves careful 
analysis of the points of reference with respect to which they become 
differentiated. For only with a systematic analysis of these points of 
reference is any orderly derivation of the bases and ranges of such 
differentiation possible. The analysis of such points of reference will 
have to proceed through several stages in the development of this 
and the following two chapters. 

It should be evident from the nature of the role as a unit that a 
most crucial structural focus of differentiation of role types is to be 
found in differentiations among the cultural patterns which are 
institutionalized in roles. But the classification of cultural patterns 
in the relevant respects cannot be carried out without relating it to 
the general system of points of reference which is inherent in the 
structure of action. Hence the present section will be concerned 
with that general system of points of reference in its relevance to 
the structuring of roles, that is, of social relationships. When this 
groundwork has been laid the analysis will proceed to consider the 
relevant differentiations between types of culture patterns them- 
selves. Finally, from this will be derived a classification of general 
role- or institutionalization types, general, that is, in that it will dis- 
tinguish components which enter into the role structure of any social 
system, but will not attempt to approach the problem of the de- 
terminants of the specific combinations in which they are put to- 
gether to form a particular system, or type of system. 

First, as we saw in Chapter I, what we have called the primary 
points of reference for the organization of action-orientations, con- 
sist on the one hand of the three modes of motivational orientation, 
cognitive, cathectic and evaluative, and the basic differentiations in 
the structure of the situation. Of the latter the most important for 
present purposes is the distinction between social and non-social 



The Classipcation of Institutional Patterns [ 47 ] 

objects, the social being those with which ego is in mteraction in the 
specifically social sense. In the non-social sphere, the case which is 
at present important is that of physical objects, since the cultural 
will presently be "pulled out" as it were and placed in a special posi- 
tion. The fundamental reason for this special treatment is that cul- 
ture patterns have a dual relation to action, they may be objects of 
the situation or they may be internalized to become components of 
the actor's orientation pattern. This peculiarity of culture is indeed 
the main basis for treating it in a special category, and for dealing 
with actor, situation and culture pattern, not only the first two. 

[Since culture patterns may become internalized as part of the 
actor's orientation system, the first basis of their differentiation 
which is relevant here is that according to their relation to the 
three basic orientation modes. There are those culture patterns 
which function primarily as symbolic forms for the organization of 
the~actor*s cognitive orientation, those which serve a similar func- 
tion in relation to the cathectic aspect of this orientation and finally 
those which mediate or structure his evaluative orientations. It 
should be remembered that these are analytically distinguished 
modes, all three of which are found in all concrete orientations to 
all objects. There is no such thing as a "purely" cognitive or cathectic 
orientation in the sense that in the first case there is no cathexis of 
an object or in the second no cognitive definition of the situation. 

However, there is such a thing as relative frimacy of the dif- 
ferent modes. Indeed in a structural sense the cultural aspect of this 
primacy is crucial because it defines the order of priorities in the 
relevgjice of the selective criteria in each primary type of orienta- 
tion jTliis basis of classification yields three primary tyyes of orien- 
tation, as distinguished from the modal aspects of all orientations. 
In the first type cognitive interests are primary, the salient orienta- 
tion problem is a cognitive problem, and cathexes and evaluations 
are secondary to this cognitive interest. "Gratification" consists in a 
solution of the cognitive problem, in coming to know. In the second 
type cathectic interests are primary, the problem is one of "adjust- 
meht,*' oTattaining the appropriate gratificatory relation to the ob- 
ject. Cognitive and evaluative considerations are secondary and in- 
strumental. Gratification is measured in affective or "emotional" 
terms. Finally in~the third"type evaluative interests have primacy. 



[ 48 ] Points of Reference and Structural Components 

The problem here is the integration of the cognitive and cathectic 
factors involved. Gratification consists in the achievement of an in- 
tegration which resolves or minimizes conflict, actual or anticipated. 

What defines each type is the comhination of the primacy of one 
of the three modes of motivational orientation and the primacy of 
one t)^e of culture pattern. Therefore from the same fundamental 
roots we derive hath a typology of action orientations or interests and 
a typology of culture patterns. The three types on the cultural level 
are: i) systems of cognitive ideas or beliefs; 2) systems of adjustive 
patterns or expressive symbols; and 3) systems of integrative pat- 
terns or value-orientation standards. 

The objects toward which any of the three types of interest is 
oriented, and in relation to which the corresponding types of cul- 
ture pattern "define the situation" may be of any class, including the 
cultural. All three basic classes of objects present cognitive problems 
for solution, constitute basic possibihties for cathexis with selective 
problems of the patterning of the corresponding adjustments, and 
present problems for evaluation. Social objects are, however, par- 
ticularly strategic in this respect because of the complementary char- 
acter of the orientation process and patterning. Perhaps this special 
significance of social objects can be put in terms of the paramount 
significance of evaluation and hence of the evaluative primacy 
which is present in both motivational orientation and culture in the 
context of social relationships. This in turn derives from the double 
contingency of interaction which has been discussed above. Essen- 
tially this double contingency introduces an extra hazard of conflict 
which makes adherence to relatively specific evaluative standards a 
paramount condition of order. 

A further differentiation of the organization of action occurs 
when the time dimension is taken into account. Action may be 
oriented to the achievement of a goal which is an anticipated future 
state of affairs, the attainment of which is felt to promise gratifica- 
tion; a state of affairs which will not come about without the in- 
tervention of the actor in the course of events. Such instrumental or 
goal-orientation introduces an element of discipline, the renuncia- 
tion of certain immediately potential gratifications, including that to 
be derived from passively "letting things slide" and awaiting the 
outcome. Such immediate gratifications are renounced in the inter- 



The Classification of Institutional Patterns [ 49 ] 

est of the prospectively larger gains to be derived from the attain- 
ment of the goal, an attainment which is felt to be contingent on 
fulfillment of certain conditions at intermediate stages of the process. 
In these terms instrumental orientation may be interpreted to be 
a speciaTcase of evaluative primacy and therefore such action be- 
longs to the third type of action-orientation. It involves the given- 
ness of a goal, but given the goal, the evaluative selection gives 
primacy to cognitive considerations; that is, knowledge of the con- 
ditions necessary to attain the goal over immediate cathectic inter- 
ests, defined as interests in taking advantage of the immediately 
available gratification opportunities in the meantime, even though 
they might interfere with the attainment of the goal. But in spite 
of the cognitive primacy of instrumental orientation, this differs 
from the case of the primacy of the cognitive interest as such in that 
in addition to the cognitive interest itself, there is the interest in the 
attainment of the given goal. 
r" There is a corresponding type on the adjustive side which may 
/ be called expressive orientation. Here the primary orientation is 
/ not to the attainment of a goal anticipated for the future, but the 
/ organization of the "flow" of gratifications (and of course the ward- 
ing off of threatened deprivations). This also is a version of evalua- 
tive primacy, but with the relationship of the two elementary compo- 
nents reversed. Given the cognitive definition of the situation the 
primacy is cathectic. The "burden of proof" is on the side of the con- 
tention that a given gratification will upset the expressive order 
whereas in the instrumental case it is the other way around, the 
burden of proof is on the side that a given gratification will not in- 
terfere with attainment of the goal. This secondary type differs from 
the type of primacy of cathectic interests as such in the primary 
classification in that the orientation is not to the specific adjustment 
problem as such, but on a higher level of the organization of action, 
to an evaluative order among gratification-potentialities. 

Hence just as there may be an authentic system of instrumental 
values, so there may in this sense be an authentic system of expres- 
sive values, that is, the definition of an order in which gratification- 
interests have primacy, but nevertheless an order which organizes 
the different components of action-orientation in determinate rela- 
tions to each other. 



[50] Points of Reference and Structural Components 

There is a third logical possibility of the structuring of order, 
namely that in which neither cognitive nor cathectic but evaluative 
interests themselves have primacy. In so far as this is the case, the 
focus is on the system of order itself, not on the goals transcendent 
to it nor on the gratification-interests of the actor. This may be called 
the "moral" aspect of the ordering of action and the cultural values 
which have primacy in relation to it, moral values. This integrative 
focus may be relative to the integrative problems of any system or 
sub-system of action. In general terms, however, it is important to 
distinguish the two principal foci, the integrative aspects of per- 
sonality and those of social systems. The social system focus (includ- 
ing of course any sub-system, i.e., collectivity) may be called the 
"relational" orientation of action while that to the integration of 
personality may be called the "ego-integrative." This is of course of 
paramount significance in relation to the system of social relation- 
ships because of the very special importance of the element of order 
which has several times been mentioned. 

Indeed it is this, in a sense "derivative," element of evaluation 
and of cultural value-patterns which is brought into play with insti- 
tutionalization. Institutionalization contributes a "superadded" ele- 
ment in addition to the primary value-orientations of the actors, 
which is integrative for a specifically social aspect of the ordering of 
action. For, because of the complementarity of expectations, the 
significance of an actor's action can never be evaluated solely in 
terms of his "personal" values independently of the relational system 
in which he is implicated. His action orientations, that is, the selec-""^ 
tions he makes among alternatives, inevitably impinge on the "per- 
sonal" interests of the other actors wdth whom he is in interaction, 
and of the collectivities of which he is a member, so far as these 
interests cannot be distributively discriminated. To the extent to i 
which his "responsibility" for these other and collectivity defined | 
interests is evaluated, the actor is concerned with a "moral" problem. J 
The value-orientation patterns which define his orientation are 
moral values. The type of action where moral considerations have 
primacy in the social context is that where the actor is in a role of 
specific responsibility for the interests of a collectivity. But even 
where this is not the case the moral aspect is a highly important 
aspect or component of the orientation of actors in social roles gen- 



Types of Institutionalization [51] 

erally, because it defines the institutional limits of permissiveness 
for action. 



§ TYPES OF INSTITUTIONALIZATION RELATIVE 
TO THE SOCIAL SYSTEM 

THERE are, as we have seen, certain common features of 
the phenomenon of institutionalization of cultural patterns wher- 
ever it occurs, by virtue of which these patterns become integrated 
with the motivational interests of individual actors. The distinctions 
which have been made in the preceding section, however, give us a 
basis for differentiating three different modes or types of institu- 
tionalization in terms of their different relationships to the structure 
oT the social system itself. " "" 

It has been made clear above that institutionalization itself is 
in the nature of the case an evaluative phenomenon, a mode of 
the organization of the system of action. Therefore the patterns 
which are institutionalized in the nature of the case involve an ele- 
ment of value-orientation on the social system level, that is, they 
involve moral commitments on the part of the actors in the social- 
integrative as distinguished from the ego-integrative sense. But insti- 
tutionalized value-patterns may still be classified in terms of differ- 
ent modes of relation of the commitments in question to the social 
relationship system itself. 

The social system is, as we have seen, essentially a network of 
interactive relationships. The most central institutions therefore are 
those direcdy constitutive of the patterning of these relationships 
themselves through the definition of the statuses and roles of the 
parties to the interactive process^ This first category will hence be 
called relational institutions. Secondly, particular actors, individual 
or collective, act in terms of interests which may to a greater or less 
degree be independent of the moral-integrative patterning of the 
social system, i.e., the overall collectivity itself. Hence in terms of 
collectivity-integration the functional problem in social system terms 
ifregulation of the pursuit of these interests rather than constitutive 
definition of the goals and means. Instrumental, expressive and 
ego-integrative interests may be involved in any combination. But 
there are distinct problems of institutionalization in this area. This 



[ 52 ] Points of Reference and Structural Components 

class of institutions will be called regulative. Finally there is a third 
class, still more peripheral to the social relationship structure as such. 
This is the case where the content of the institutions concerned 
corrsistsl)nly of patterns of cultural orientation as such, not directly 
of commitments to overt action. It is a question of beliefs, ^par- 
ticular systems of expressive symbols, or even oFpattems of moral 
value-orientation when only "acceptance" rather than commitment 
in action is involved. These will be called cultural institutions. Each 
of the three classes will be briefly commented upon. 

The nature and significance of relational institutions must be 
understood in terms of the fundamental paradigm of social inter- 
action, and the way in which the theorem of institutional integration 
has been derived from that. We have seen that such institutional 
integration in terms of the internalization of common value-patterns 
is a condition of the stability of the interaction process. But further 
specification of this condition leads us to see that the content of the 
common patterns of value-orientation must be such that the recip- 
rocal orientations of the interacting actors will mesh with each other, 
''^here is a variety of different patterns according to which such 
meshing is conceivable, but in any given system of interactive rela- 
tionships the patterns must have been selected from among these 
possibilities in such a way as to be compatible with the stability of 
■ the interaction process. 

The content of these value-orientation patterns will be discussed 
in the following section. They center about the fundamental possi- 
bilities of organizing the mutual attitudes of actors to each other, 
which means essentially selection from among the inherent possi- 
bilities of mutual orientation. 

These relational institutions are of course differentiated both for 
different roles within the same social system and for different social 
systems; these differentiations will be analyzed in subsequent chap- 
ters. But essentially they constitute the structural core of the social 
system, and the institutionalization of the value-orientation patterns 
concerned is the primary mechanism of the stabilization of the social 
system itself. 

\By virtue of the internalization of these primary value-orienta- 
tion patterns, certain fundamental components of the need-disposi- 
tion structure and hence of the interests of the actors in a social 



Types of Institutionalization [ 53 ] 

system are determinecf. /But these need-dispositions most directly 
integrated with the relational structure are not exhaustive of the 
needs and interests of individual actors. The latter have interests 
which within limits may vary independently of the relational struc- 
ture as such, with respect to which the basic institutional patterns 
of the social system are conditional rather than constitutive. This 
is, as noted above, true of all the basic types of interests, the in- 
strumental, the expressive and the ego-integrative. 

The obverse of the conditional significance of such patterns for 
the action of the individual (and the sub-collectivity) is their regu- 
lative significance from the point of view of the social system. There 
are two primary aspects of this regulative function of institutions. 
First they concern the definition of the value-standards according to 
which the directions of acceptable activity in pursuit of "private" ^ 
interests are defined. They constitute an element in the definition 
of goal orientations. Secondly, they concern definition of the limits 
to the acceptable choice of means or other action procedures in 
pursuit of the realization of the goals and values in question. 

This may first be illustrated for the instrumental caseMn con- 
temporary American society the pursuit of financial profit is sanc- 
tioned as a type of goal appropriate for either an individual, or a 
certain type of collectivity, for example, a "business firm," to pursue. 
On the other hand according to the values of socialism this is not 
treated as a legitimate direction of pursuit of interests, or at least 
only within much narrower limits. But even within our own "busi- 
ness economy" there is specification in value-terms of the technical 
production goals with which the profit interest may legitimately be 
fused. Many things for which there might well be a market may 
either not be produced at all for profit, for example, certain types of 
morally censorable entertainment, or only under varying degrees of 
strictness of regulation, as in the case of weapons or certain public 
utility services. Thus in the sense of selection of goals within the 
sphere of "private" interest-oriented activity, there is a set of institu- 
tionalized limitations of the pursuit of goals and of the conditions 
under which they may be pursued. Essentially the same type of 
considerations is involved in relation to the selection of means with 
respect to the pursuit of private interests. Most notable are the limi- 
tations placed on the choice of means as they involve the interests 



[ 54 ] Points of Reference and Structural Components 

of others. The most general formula concerns the exclusion or strict 
regulation of attaining a goal by the exercise of force or fraud upon 
others. But in many societies there are still more radical limitations 
on individual "freedom" imposed, for example in our own, the pro- 
hibition that anyone should by contract infringe not only the 
personal freedom of others but his own; no matter how advantageous 
the "bargain" offered, a man may not sell himself into slavery. 

There is a similar set of regulative institutions relative to ex- 
pressive interests. Expressive activities are, as we shall see, not 
cast directly into the means-end form as is the case with the instru- 
mental. Hence the distinction between goals and means is not so 
important. But in part such institutions regulate expressive activi- 
ties by specifying the legitimate relationships and contexts for them. 
Thus with respect to erotic activities, incest and homosexuality are 
drastically tabooed in most societies, and normal heterosexual activ- 
ity is regulated both by selection of partner (e.g., within marriage) 
and by occasion (e.g., the requirement of privacy). Similarly aggres- 
sive feeling toward others may in general be expressed only within 
strictly defined limits, and many types of aggression are almost 
wholly tabooed. Obviously the killing of members of the in-group 
must be forbidden and drastically punished in every society, except 
under very special conditions. 

Essentially the same, finally, is true of ego-integrative orienta- 
tions. One of the most familiar examples is the fact that, in our 
society, the institutions of religious toleration regulate the pursuit 
of religiously founded moral interests so far as they are not com- 
monly shared in the society as a whole. The members of denomina- 
tional groups may act upon their religious convictions only so far as 
they do not infringe the regulative norms in other respects (e.g., 
norms defining standards of decency— hence the difficulty of toler- 
ating the Dokhubors) and so far as they do not infringe on the 
rights of others to their share of religious freedom, for example by 
using the role of teacher in a public school to attempt to indoctrinate 
children with a special religious point of view. 

There is in a social system a gradual transition between its rela- 
tional and its regulative institutions rather than a rigid line. All 
social action involves relationships and mutuality of orientation. 
Furthermore it is a functional requirement of the culturally integra- 
tive aspect of the social system that there should be a degree of 



Tyyes of Institutionaliixition [55^ 

consistency in the value-patterns which have been institutionalized 
in both spheres. The distinction is essentially in terms of the func- 
tional relation to the integration of the social system. The greater 
the degree to which interests acquire independence relative to the 
main institutionalized value system, the greater the importance of 
the regulative functions of the institutional structure. This distinc- 
tion between spheres of permissiveness for private interests and of 
collectivity-obligations is of such fundamental importance that it 
must be conceptualized as part of the fundamental value-pattern 
system itself. The place of the distinction will be brought out in the 
following section. Regulative institutions are of particular signifi- 
cance where private interests become "ecologically" structured in 
market systems and power systems. These will be further analyzed 
in Chapters III, IV and V below. 

The distinction between patterns of value-orientation and the 
other components of the cultural tradition is in part one of degrees 
of commitment to the implications of the pattern for action. Evalu- 
ation is the integration of the components of orientation in a func- 
tioning whole. This functioning whole must include overt action. 
This is an essential part of the significance of what, in the last sec- 
tion, we have called the evaluative level of the organization of the 
components of action orientation, the types of action. Of the requi- 
site levels of such evaluative integration, however, the highest is, as 
we have seen, the moral, because the scope of the evaluative integra- 
tion is the broadest in that case. 

Short of this moral level of integration, however, there may be a 
mode of evaluative interest in cultural patterns which we may call 
that of acceftance as distinguished from commitment. This is per- 
haps most evident in the case of belief systems. We may accept 
a belief as "true" without it becoming integrated in the system 
of action in any other respect. This would be the case for example 
of the popularization of much of scientific knowledge for those 
who are not "professionally" involved with it, either as scien- 
tists, or as having special commitments in fields of its application. 
The same is true with respect to patterns of expressive symbolism 
We may assent to the validity of certain canons of taste without 
making a commitment to make conformity with them part of our 
own way of life. Thus we may "appreciate" works of art in this 
sense. The absence of commitment in this field is signalized by the 



[ 56 ] Points of Reference and Structural Components 

possibility of being appreciative of different kinds of works of art 
which comply with incompatible standards. 

A more special case is that of the uninstitutionalized acceptance 
of moral standards. The essential point would seem to be that these 
standards are thereby put into the sphere of socially sanctioned (in 
the sense of permissible) "personal" morality. The most notable 
case is that of what may be called the "utopian" standards which 
are often current in a society. For example, in countries with a Chris- 
tian tradition the ethic of the Sermon on the Mount is in this sense 
socially accepted. It is rather generally felt to be a higher standard 
than that currently institutionalized and anyone who actually lived 
up to it would be admired, though certainly not unanimously or 
without ambivalence. But clearly it is not institutionalized in the 
sense that literal conformity is expected in everyday affairs, and that 
he who does not "turn the other cheek" but resists aggression against 
him, is not stigmatized by negative sanction, so long as his resistance 
is within certain limits. Indeed, the acceptance of this pattern is in 
conflict with other elements of our value system such as the obliga- 
tion to "stand up for one's rights," so the situation is far from simple. 
But it is important to note the possibility of such acceptance of moral 
value-patterns without full institutionalization. 

The relations between belief systems and expressive symbols 
and the social system will be more fully discussed in Chapters VIII 
and IX below. Here it is sufficient to note that, though by itself 
acceptance of them does not necessarily involve direct commitments 
to action, in certain circumstances through institutionalization such 
a commitment may arise. The most familiar example is the institu- 
tionalization of belief, so that subscription to a system of belief be- 
comes a criterion of loyalty to a collectivity, such as a religious group. 
There is room for wide variations in the extent to which, and the 
ways in which, this occurs. At one pole we may have the enforce- 
ment of detailed doctrinal conformity on pain of expulsion from the 
collectivity as in the case of the Catholic Church. At the other is the 
situation of "liberal" society where no specific beliefs are institu- 
tionalized. But here there are still institutionalized values relative to 
the belief system. There is an obligation to approach as closely as 
possible to rationality of belief, to be open-minded toward evidence 
and the like. It is not acceptable within the national collectivity to 
believe "anything one pleases." For example, the prestige of educa- 



Types of Institutionalization [ 57 ] 

tion would not be understandable without this institutionalized 
attitude toward beliefs. 

The situation is similar with respect to expressive S)rmbols. In 
some social systems, highly specific expressive symbols are posi- 
tively institutionalized only within sub-collectivities, such as specific 
rituals in specific denominational groups, and specific aesthetic com- 
mitments in specific circles of artistic enthusiasts. But in spite of the 
lack of institutionalization on a broad level of specific expressive 
symbols in our society, there are still broadly accepted canons of 
"good taste" which are integrated with the general system of expres- 
sive symbolism, and hence the reward system. 

Hence the cultural institutions of a social system are always 
present, though they are much more specifically defined and rigor- 
ously enforced in some social systems than in others. The distinc- 
tion of these three main functional references of institutionalization 
will be used throughout the subsequent analysis. 

The series of distinctions of levels of commitments and their 
relation to integration and institutionalization which has been re- 
viewed in the last two sections is rather complex. Hence an outline 
of the main categories is presented for convenience of reference. 

Outline of Modes and Types of Action-Orientation, 
Culture Patterns and Institutions 

A. Modes of Motivational Orientation of Action. 

1. Cognitive. 

2. Cathectic. 

3. Evaluative. 

B. Modes of Value-Orientation of Action. 

1. Cognitive. 

2. Appreciative. 

3. Moral (system-integrative). 

a. Ego-integrative (personal). 

b. Collectivity-integrative (social-relational). 

C. Types of Culture Pattern. 

1. Belief Systems (primacy of cognitive significance). 

2. Systems of Expressive Symbolism (Cathectic primacy). 

3. Systems of Value-orientation Standards (Evaluative primacy). 

D. Types of Action-Interests (Primacy of one motivational mode 
combined with the corresponding type of culture pattern). 

I. Cognitive interests (in "knowing"). 



[ 58 ] Points of Reference and Structural Components 

2. Adjustive interests (in securing gratification from objects). 

3. Integrative interests (in minimizing and resolving conflicts). 

E. Types of Evaluative Action-Orientation (Evaluative or integra- 
tive synthesis with primacy of one type of interest). 

1. Instrumental (given cathexis of a goal, cognitive primacy). 

a. Investigative (cognitive problem solution as the goal). 

b. Creative (new expressive symbolic forms as the goal). 

c. Applied (use of knowledge— hence primacy of cognitive in- 
terest, in interest of any goal not defined under a or b). 

2. Expressive ("acting out" of a need-disposition in terms of a 
pattern of expressive symbolism). 

3. Moral. 

a. Ego-integrative. 

b. Collectivity-integrative. 

F. Types of Institution, embodying value-orientation patterns. 

1. Relational institutions (defining reciprocal role-expectations 
as such, independent of interest content). 

2. Regulative institutions (defining limits of the legitimacy of 
"private" interest-pursuit with respect to goals and means). 

a. Instrumental (integration of private goals with common 
values, and definition of legitimate means). 

b. Expressive (regulating permissible expressive actions, sit- 
uations, persons, occasions, and canons of taste). 

c. Moral (defining permissible areas of moral responsibility 
to personal code or sub-collectivity). 

3. Cultural institutions (defining obligations to acceptance of 
culture patterns— converting private acceptance into institu- 
tionalized commitment). 

a. Cognitive beliefs. 

b. Systems of expressive symbols. 

c. Private moral obligations. 

§ THE PATTERN-ALTERNATIVES OF VALUE- 
ORIENTATION AS DEFINITIONS OF 
RELATIONAL ROLE-EXPECTATION PATTERNS 

THE role-partner in a social relationship is a social object. 
To develop a systematic scheme of points of reference for the anal- 
ysis of orientations in roles it is then essential first to analyze those 
basic alternatives of selection which are particularly significant in 
defining the character of relations to such a social object, and which 



The Pattern-Alternatives of Value-Orientation [ 59 ] 

are constitutive of the character of the relationship pattern itself 
rather than of its "content" in interest terms, its cultural or motiva- 
tional aspects in any sense other than as constitutive of relational 
patterns. In other words the analysis of the differentiation of a social 
structure must start with the patterns which enter into its relational 
institutions. The following discussion is posited on the view that 
there is on a given level of generality a strictly limited and defined 
set of such alternatives, and that the relative primacies given to 
choices between them can be treated as constitutive of the pattern- 
ing of relational institutions.^^ 

It should be made as clear as possible exactly what the following 
discussion is attempting to do. We are concerned with the pattern- 
ing of the collectivity-integrative sub-type of the moral type of 
evaluative action-orientation (E-3-b in the outline). Within this we 
are concerned with analyzing the structure of an actor's relations to 
social objects in order to identify the points of reference which 
define the strategically significant limits of variability of this category 
of orientations. We will bring out a limited number of such ranges 
which, in their simplest form, can be defined as polar alternatives 
of possible orientation-selection. These alternatives will be defined 
in terms of relative primacies among the types of orientation possi- 
bilities which have been discussed in previous sections. 

It should again be emphasized that we are here dealing with the 
foci for the patterning of relational institutions. We are therefore 
concerned with primacy relations among the possibilities of evalua- 
tive action-orientations and the correlative modes of value-orienta- 
tion, not with the types of interest or with culture-pattern types as 
such. The first problem then is that of primacy relations as between 
instrumental, expressive and moral orientations (including the 
sub-types of the latter). In motivational terms it may be presumed 
that the "ultimate" interest of any actor is in the optimization of 
gratification. The most direct path to gratification in an organized 
action system is through expressive orientations; hence relative to 
the expressive, both the instrumental and the moral modes of 
orientation impose renunciations or discipline. The social object is 
always actually and potentially to some degree an object of cathexis. 

^^ A more extensive discussion of the foUowing conceptual scheme will be 
found in Values, Motives, and Systems of Action, Chapter I. 



[ 6o ] Points of Reference and Structural Components 

Hence in patterning the orientation to that object it is always a 
problem whether, in certain relevant respects, expressive orienta- 
tion in terms of relatively immediate gratification interests is per- 
missible, or is to be renounced in favor of instrumental or moral, 
that is certain types of evaluative interests. The first alternative may 
be defined as that of "affectivity," the second of "affective neu- 
trality." This basic alternative is grounded in the nature of action 
systems. No actor can subsist without gratifications, while at the 
same time no action system can be organized or integrated without 
the renunciation of some gratifications which are available in the 
given situation. The polarity of affectivity-neutrality formulates the 
patterning out of action with respect to this basic alternative, in 
direct orientations to the social objects with whom an actor interacts 
in a role, and in its relevance to the structure of the expectations of 
his action in that role. 

This first alternative-pair focuses on the permissibility or non- 
permissibility of gratifying the actor's immediate adjustive interests 
by expressive activity. The second concerns the same intrinsic 
problem approached from the other end, as it were, namely the per- 
missibility of his pursuing any interests "private" to himself^^ as dis- 
tinguished from those shared with the other members of the col- 
lectivity in which he plays a role. Thus not only his expressive, 
but his instrumental and ego-integrative orientations and the corre- 
sponding interests are defined as "private" in so far as they do not 
coincide with those recognized as collective by the collectivity. A 
role, tlien, may define certain areas of pursuit of private interests 
as legitimate, and in other areas obligate the actor to pursuit of the 
common interests of the collectivity. The primacy of the former 
alternative may be called "self-orientation," that of the latter, "col- 
lectivity-orientation." 

Both these alternative-pairs raise an important problem of in- 
terpretation. It may righdy be said that just as every actor must both 
have immediate gratifications and accept discipline, so must every 
role both provide for pursuit of private interests and ensure the in- 
terests of the collectivity. This circumstance is not a paradox, be- 
cause, defined as a matter of orientation-primacy in role-expectations 

^' This includes the interests of a sub-collectivity as actor relative to a more 
inclusive collectivity. 



The Pattern-Alternatives of Value-Orientation [ 6i ] 

these alternatives apply to specifically relevant selection-contexts, 
not necessarily to every specific act within the role. Thus where 
effective instrumental pursuit of a certain class of goals is institu- 
tionalized as part of the role, only the gratification of expressive 
interests which might interfere with the attainment of these goals 
must be subordinated; the role is defined in affectively neutral terms 
in this context but not necessarily in all others. In the relevant 
choice-dilemma one alternative is prescribed. But this prescription 
is always relative to a specified context in which the dilemma arises. 
Similarly we would only speak of a role as collectivity-oriented if the 
pursuit of certain private interests which were relevant possibilities 
in the given type of situation was subordinated to the collective 
interest. Thus the public official has an interest in his own financial 
well-being, which for example he may take into account in deciding 
between jobs, but he is expected not to take this into consideration 
in his specific decisions respecting public policy where the two 
potentially conflict. This is the subordination of an instrumental 
(or ego-integrative) personal value. 

The first two alternative pairs have been concerned with the 
expression-discipline problem which confronts all action systems 
on two levels: first, the obligation to acceptance of discipline by the 
individual actor vis-a-vis his expressive interests, the gratification 
of which would, in this role context, be felt to be disruptive; second 
the same dilemma reappears in relation to the pursuit of any sort of 
private interests, no matter how highly disciplined in a personality 
sense vis-a-vis the definition of obligations to the collectivity. Indeed, 
in this context often the most highly disciplined pursuit of private 
interests may be the most dysfunctional in collectivity terms. The 
third alternative pair concerns not subordination to vs. freedom from 
certain value standards whatever their content, but the type of value- 
standard which is defined as relevant to the role-expectation. Here 
recourse must be had to primacy relations among the modes of value- 
orientation themselves, since these define types of standard by which 
action-orientations are evaluated. For this purpose the moral cate- 
gory may be neglected since it is not an "autonomous" type, but 
concerns orientation to the integration of the action system, given 
commitment to the standards involved. Hence the basic alternative 



[ 62 ] Points of Reference and Structural Components 

is between the primacy of cognitive and appreciative standards. 
What does this mean in the present context? 

Cognitive orientation is, it may be said, essentially orientation 
to the element of generalization in the object-world. Cathectic orien- 
tation on the other hand, is inherently particularized, to particular 
objects and ordered combinations of them. If generalization is para- 
mount in cognitive orientation, then the standards characterized by 
cognitive primacy cannot be particular to the specific relational 
system (with non-social as well as social objects) in which the actor 
is involved. It transcends this relational context. Normatively its 
orientation is to universal canons of validity. 

In the case of cathectic orientation and the cognate modes of 
action- and value-orientation, there is an inherently "subjective" 
reference to gratification-significance. But the gratificational sig- 
nificance of an orientation can never transcend the particular re- 
lational system of which it is a part. The standard must be 
couched in terms of significance for this ■particular actor in these 
particular relations with these particular objects. The primacy of 
cognitive values then may be said to imply a universalistic standard 
of role-expectation, while that of appreciative values implies a par- 
ticularistic standard. ^^ In the former case the standard is derived 
from the validity of a set of existential ideas, or the generality of a 
normative rule, in the latter from the particularity of the cathectic 
significance of an object or of the status of the object in a relational 
system. Thus definitions of role-expectations in terms of a uni- 
versally valid moral precept, e.g., the obligation to fulfill contractual 
agreements, an empirical cognitive generalization, or a selection 
for a role in terms of the belief that technical competence in the 
relevant respects will increase the effectiveness of achievement in 
the role, are universalistic definitions of roles. On the other hand 
definitions in such terms as "I must try to help him because he is 
my friend," or of obligations to a kinsman, a neighbor, or the fellow- 
member of any solidary group because of this membership as such 
are particularistic. 

There is one common source of confusion in this field which 
must be cleared up at once. It derives from the fact that a particu- 

" The primacy of appreciative over cognitive standards in particularism means 
that generalization is relativized to the particiilar relational system. 



The Pattern-Alternatives of Value-Orientation [ 63 ] 

laristic role-obligation may be formulated in terms of a general rule 
in the sense that it states in general terms the particularistic obliga- 
tions of all those in the relevant class of roles. Thus "honor thy 
father and thy mother" is stated as a general rule of morality. But 
it is its form that is general. The content of the obligation is par- 
ticularistic, namely for each child, toward his 'particular parents. If 
the rule were, on the other hand, "pay honor to parents because of 
their quality of parenthood as such, regardless of whose parents 
they are," it would be a universalistic norm. All norms are capable 
of generality of statement and application (though varying greatly 
in degree of generality). The question is whether or not a discrim- 
ination is made between those objects with which ego stands in a 
particularistic relationship and other objects possessing the same at- 
tributes. Such a discrimination is incompatible with the conception 
of a universalistic norm. If parenthood is the relevant attribute, then 
the norm, if it is universalistic, applies equally to all objects possess- 
ing that attribute. 

The first three alternative-pairs have been defined in terms of 
relative primacy relations of the orientational components of action, 
that is, vdth reference to ego as actor. In terms of primary func- 
tional significance for the patterning of role-orientations these three 
are exhaustive of the major possibilities, on the same level of gen- 
erality. But they have not taken account of the total frame of refer- 
ence. There remain alternatives with respect to the characteristics 
of social objects themselves, that is, from ego's point of view of the 
alter in the complementary role-orientation structure or to ego him- 
self as an object, and with reference to the scope of relevance of alter 
an an object. These contexts produce two further alternative-pairs. 

In both cases it is essential to strike just the right level of gen- 
erality which is coordinate with that of the relevance of the first 
three pairs. Applying this criterion it seems that there is one 
dilemma which is of the most generalized significance in each con- 
text. With respect to characteristics of the object it is that of the 
focus on its qualities or attributes as distinguished from focus on its 
performances. "Performance" in this sense is a characteristic which, 
by definition, we have confined to the category of social objects. But 
the "alter" who is the complementary member of a reciprocal role- 



[ 64 ] Points of Reference and Structural Components 

orientation system is also by definition a social object, and therefore 
is characterized by performance. 

Orientation to the actor's performance (which may be either 
ego's or alter's or both) means that the focus is on his achievement. 
The expectation is that the actor is committed to the achievement of 
certain goals or expressive performances and that expectations are 
oriented to his "effectiveness" or "success" in achieving them, hence 
that positive sanctions will reward such success and negative sanc- 
tions will ensue in case of failure to achieve. There are of course all 
manner of complications such as the definition of what constitute 
"extenuating circumstances," but this is the major axis of the expec- 
tation structure. 

On the other hand, even though actors can and do perform in 
the above sense, the major focus of a particular role-expectation need 
not be on this performance. All objects have attributes, they not only 
do this or that, but they are such and such. They have attributes of 
sex, age, intelligence, physical characteristics, statuses in relational 
systems, e.g., collectivity memberships. The focus of orientation 
then may be what the object is in this sense, e.g., that he is ego's 
father, that he is a physician, or that he is over six feet tall. Such 
attributes or quality-complexes may be conditions of a variety of per- 
formances, for physical or social reasons, but even so the orientation 
focus may still be the quality as such. This may be the criterion for 
differentiation of treatment and of expectations of his behavior. 

This distinction has become current in the sociological literature 
in Linton's terms of achieved and ascribed status and hence it seems 
advisable to adopt those terms here. Achievement-oriented roles are 
those which place the accent on the performances of the incumbent, 
ascribed roles, on his qualities or attributes independently of specific 
expected performances. 

The incidence of the alternative as between qualities and per- 
formances involves a further set of ramifications beyond the ascrip- 
tion-achievement distinction with reference to role-expectations, 
which because of their general importance in the theorv^ of action 
may be brought to attention here. These concern its application to 
the definition of ideal states of affairs where they differ from a given 
initial state. Where performances are the focus of value-orientation 
the emphasis may be on the goal as the "expression," as it were, of 



The Pattern- Alternatives of Value-Orientation [ 65 ] 

the valued achievement-process. On the other hand the valuation 
of the goal-state as such may emphasize its qualities independently 
of the processes of its achievement. We shall see that this distinc- 
tion is of considerable significance in defining different patterns of 
orientation to "ideal" states of affairs. 

The achievement-ascription alternative-pair concerns character- 
istics of the object which may be selected as the focus of orientation. 
There remains the question of the scope of ego's "interest" in the 
object. It has been noted above how crucially important is the dif- 
ferentiation of modes of orientation of action and the corresponding 
differentiation of types of orientations in terms of primacies. But 
this differentiation has been treated in terms of the orientation of 
an actor taken as a point of reference without regard to the question 
of whether the different modes of orientation were segregated out 
in relation to different objects, or combined in orientation to the 
same object. This question of the relative incidence of "fusions" and 
"segregations" of action-orientation types will be seen to be of the 
greatest importance for the analysis of social structure. 

When many empirical differences are taken into account it will 
prove to be possible to derive very complex permutations and com- 
binations in this respect. But on the present level of generality the 
starting point should again be the evaluative types of action-orienta- 
tion as such. Here a particular instrumental or expressive orien- 
tation or interest has a certain specificity such that is capable of 
clear analytical segregation from the other or from moral orienta- 
tions. Hence one horn of the dilemma will be the definition of the 
role as orienting to the social object in S'pecific terms, that is in terms 
of a specific instrumental or expressive interest. This is, it will be 
noted, a definition of the scope of the object's (alter's) significance 
to ego. Since it is defined in terms of a moral value-pattern it means 
that he is held to be entitled or even obligated to confine the rele- 
vance of this particular object or class of them within these limits. 
Hence the burden of proof rests on him who would suggest that ego 
has obligations vis-a-vis the object in question which transcend this 
specificity of relevance. 

The alternative is to treat the object as significant in an indefi- 
nite plurality of specific orientation contexts. This always implies a 



[ 66 ] Points of Reference and. Structural Comfonents 

moral element because the problem of evaluative integration of the 
different components of the total orientation to the object is by defi- 
nition involved. Conversely the binding together of such a plurality 
of such specific interests in a single object-relation always implies a 
moral component in the orientation (note, this may be only ego- 
integrative, not relational. It does not imply consideration for the 
welfare of the object— a range of variation which is conceptualized 
in terms of self- vs. collectivity-orientation). Hence the clear antith- 
esis of the specific, interest-segregated type of orientation is a 
disuse mode, where the burden of proof is on the side of the 
exclusion of an interest or mode of orientation as outside the range 
of obligations defined by the role-expectation. This proof can be 
furnished by invoking an obligation higher in a scale of evaluative 
priority. 

As in the cases of the other alternative-pairs it is essential here 
to keep in mind the relativity of this conceptualization. Like the 
others it applies at the choice-point to directions of orientation. It is 
a question at such a point of confining relevance and hence obliga- 
tion to a specific interest (definable on various levels of generality) 
or of admitting the 'possible relevance in terms of integrative evalua- 
tion and subject to a priority scale, of any contingency which might 
arise. 

If the derivation of these five alternative pairs from possibilities 
of the combination of the basic components of the action system 
has been correct, if they are in fact all on the same level of generality 
and are exhaustive of the relevant logical possibilities on that level, 
they may be held to constitute a system. Then, on the relevant level 
which, as we shall see is only one which needs to be considered, 
their permutations and combinations should yield a system of types 
of possible role-expectation pattern, on the relational level, namely 
defining the pattern of orientation to the actors in the role relation- 
ship. This system will consist of thirty-two types, which may in 
turn be grouped into a smaller number of more fundamental ones. 
These problems will be taken up in the following chapter. 

For the convenience of the reader these five concept-pairs, which 
will be called the pattern variables of role-definition, may be sche- 
matically oudined as follows: 



The Pattern-Alternatives of Value-Orientation [ 67 ] 

I. The Gratification-Discipline Dilemma 

Affectivity vs. Affective Neutrality 
II. The Private vs. Collective Interest Dilemma 
Self -Orientation vs. Collectivity-Orientation 

III. The Choice Between Types of Value-Orientation Standard 
Universalism vs. Particularism 

IV. The Choice between "Modalities" of the Social Object 
Achievement vs. Ascription 

V. The Definition of Scope of Interest in the Object 
Specificity vs. Diffuseness. 

That these five pattern variables are focused on the relational 
aspect of the role structure of the social system does not mean that 
they are irrelevant to the definition of the patterns of regulative 
and of cultural institutions. They cannot be, if only because of the 
element of consistency of pattern which must run throughout a 
system of value-orientations in a cultural tradition. But for us the 
system of relational institutions is the core of the social structure 
and it will facilitate development of the analysis to start from this 
core and work out from there. 

The main body of the book thus falls into two principal parts. 
After the principal components of the social system have been out- 
hned in Chapter II, the following three chapters, III-V are con- 
cerned with the elaboration of the analysis of social structure, push- 
ing it to the point of considerable refinement of detail. Chapter VI, 
on the Mechanisms of Socialization then returns to the central para- 
digm of interaction. This and the following three chapters are 
mainly concerned with the elements of this paradigm as they are 
Gudined in Chapter II. The refinements of the analysis of social 
structure developed in Chapters III to V are for the most part not 
directly used. 

It is suggested that the reader keep this clearly in mind as he 
proceeds, and keep continually referring back to the fundamental 
conceptual elements of Chapter II. It may well be that if he finds 
the elaborateness of Chapters III to V confusing he would be well 
advised to skim over them and resume his careful reading in Chap- 
ter VI, coming back to Chapters III to V after he has finished 
Chapter X. 



Ill 

X JL JL THE STRUCTURE OF THE SO- 
CIAL SYSTEM, I: THE ORGANIZATION OF THE 
COMPONENTS INTO SUB-SYSTEMS 



THE two foregoing chapters have been designed to pre- 
pare the ground for the task of the present one. The first developed 
an outhne of the general frame of reference of action and showed 
the character of its components and of the types of system into 
which they are organized. The second carried this development 
further with reference to those features of action most directly rele- 
vant to the social system. It analyzed the basic functional problems 
and prerequisites of social systems, the points of reference relative 
to which their principal components must be analyzed, and the 
nature and place in the action scheme of those components them- 
selves, the types of action-orientation of roles, institutions and their 
component value-patterns. We are now in a position to take a first 
major step toward showing how these components become organ- 
ized to constitute a social system. 

We shall begin by analyzing certain features of what may be 
called the "relational context" of types of action-orientation relative 
to which these actions must be institutionalized. We have so far 
dealt with these crucial evaluative action-orientation types only 
in the context of particular roles, not in their combinations in 
differentiated reciprocal interaction systems. It is this step which 
must now be taken. After that we must go into further detail with 
respect to the analysis of the points of reference which differentiate 
objects, that is, the differentiation of their ascriptive quality-com- 

68 



The Relational Context of Role-Orientation [ 69 ] 

plexes which are significant for role-structure, and of their achieve- 
ment pattern-types. 

Then in the following chapter we shall place the results of this 
analysis into the setting of the major functional problem-foci of the 
social system which will be classified as the allocative and the in- 
tegrative problems respectively, and will be further differentiated. 
Finally, then, we will be in a position to raise the question of the 
actual constitution of a systematically differentiated role-structure 
which is adequate to the functional requirements of a society. The 
starting point of this will be the treatment of the combinations of 
the values of the pattern variables which were put forward in the 
last main section of the foregoing chapter. These primary pattern 
elements of role structure will be seen to be of necessity unevenly 
distributed in different parts of the same social system. Finally, the 
primary patterns will be related to further "adaptive" structures 
which bridge the gap, as it were, between the rather abstract for- 
malism of the primary patterns and the more specific adjustment 
problems of action in particular situations within the relevant sector 
of the social system. It will be shown that from these same starting 
points it is possible to carry out the analysis hoth of the bases of 
internal differentiation within the structure of a given social system, 
and of the definition of the ranges of variation between social 
systems. 

§ THE STRUCTURE OF THE RELATIONAL 
CONTEXT OF EVALUATIVE ACTION- 
ORIENTATIONS 

THE types of action-orientation are, it will be remem- 
bered, the instrumental, the expressive and the moral. In the last 
chapter we considered them only in terms of their relevance to the 
structure of a 'particular role, not of systems of roles. We will now 
proceed to this step. It will simplify matters to take the cases of sys- 
tems of each of the first two types in turn by itself before attempting 
to put them together into a composite system. We will start with 
the instrumental. 

Fortunately a long tradition of thought has worked out most of 



[ 70 ] Organization of the Components into Sub-systems 

the problems in this area and all that is necessary is to take over the 
results and place them in the proper setting. The key concept is 
that of the "division of labor" as developed by Adam Smith and 
his successors in utilitarian, especially economic theory. The starting 
point is the conception of a given actor, ego, as instrumentally 
oriented to the attainment of a goal, a goal which may be of any 
desired degree of specificity or generality. The relational problems 
enter in when alter becomes significant not only passively as a 
means or condition of the attainment of ego's goal, but his reactions 
become a constitutive part of the system which includes ego's own 
goal-striving. 

If we conceive a system of such instrumentally oriented inter- 
action, the simplest case is that of reciprocity of goal orientation, 
the classical economic case of exchange, where alter's action is a 
means to the attainment of ego's goal, and vice versa, ego is a 
means to the attainment of alter's. Exchange in this sense may be 
confined to a highly ad hoc particular transaction, but it may be- 
come elaborated into a highly organized and durable system of 
interaction. As this occurs ego may become specialized in the 
process of attaining his own goals by the "production" of means to 
the attainment of the goals of one or a class of alters. Reciprocally 
the attainment of his ovvm goals is enmeshed in expectations of (to 
him) instrumentally significant results of the actions of these alters. 

The attainment of ego's goals then becomes dependent on the 
relational context in a double way. What he gets depends not only 
on what he himself "produces" in the sense in which this is inde- 
pendent of what the alters do, but on the "terms of exchange," that 
is, the patterning of his relationship in certain respects to the rele- 
vant alters. There are, in turn, two aspects of this relational system: 
first, the regulation of structuring (through settlement of terms) of 
the "outflow" process which may be called that of "disposal" of the 
product of his efforts to a class of alters; and second, the regulation 
of the "inflow" process, the settlement of the terms on which he 
receives contributions to his own goals from alters, which may be 
called his "remuneration." Of course in a single ad hoc transaction 
the two will coincide. Even in a complex reciprocal relationship 
between two actors they may continue to coincide. But it is a criti- 
cally important feature of the further differentiation of action sys- 



The Relational Context of Role-Orientation [ 71 ] 

terns that they need not do so; the recipients for the disposal of 
ego's "products" may be entirely distinct from the sources of his 
remuneration. Of course, if this is the case, there must be some 
mechanism by which the two aspects of the total interaction system 
in which ego is involved are adjusted to each other. The most con- 
spicuous such mechanism operates through the ramifications of a 
system of monetary exchange. To account for such a mechanism 
would introduce additional steps into the differentiation of the 
system which need not be considered at this point of our analysis. 

Two centrally significant foci of the problem of order in social 
systems are brought to light immediately by the foregoing consider- 
ations. First, and most obvious, is that of the regulation of the 
setdement of the terms of exchange. Because some of what every 
man does is potentially a means (including hindrance) to the attain- 
ment of every other man's goals, it is vitally important to the con- 
ception of social order that there should be mechanisms through 
which the terms on which ego will or will not make his "services" 
available to alter are setded in such a way as to be compatible with 
the conditions of stability of the system. This is the famous Hob- 
besian aspect of the problem of order. 

Somewhat less obvious is the fact, secondly, that for there to be 
exchange there must be "something" which changes hands in the 
course of a transaction, something which is "disposed of" and "re- 
ceived." This something may be control of a physical object in cer- 
tain respects, including power to destroy it (e.g., food through "con- 
sumption"). It may be an agreement to do certain things in the 
future, positive as contributing to alter's goals, or negative as refrain- 
ing from interfering with alter's goals. This something will be called 
a 'possession. There are cogent reasons why the structure of the 
"rights" defining the conditions under which possessions are "held" 
and may be disposed of cannot in a complex social system be settled 
ad hoc as part of each exchange transaction. A stable system of 
exchange presupposes a ■priori settlement among possible alternative 
ways of defining such rights, that is, an institutionalization of them. 
The institutionalization of rights in such possessions is, in one 
major aspect, what we mean by the institution of property. 

These are the most elementary features of a relational complex 
of instrumental orientations, but two further aspects of differentia- 



[ 72 ] Organization of the Comiponents into Sub-systems 

tion are so important that they need to be brought in at this point. 
First, any elaborated system of continuous and speciaHzed instru- 
mentally oriented activity, especially with the degree of specializa- 
tion which precludes self-consumption and therefore is inevitably 
enmeshed in a relational context, requires "facilities" which extend 
beyond those features of the situation available at any time on a 
purely ad hoc basis. Facilities, i.e., materials, equipment, premises 
and the like are possessions in a special mode of significance to 
action; they are possessions devoted to the "production" of further 
"utilities," that is, destined to be used as means to some future goal 
rather than as objects of immediate gratification. Regulation of 
rights to facilities or of access to them, and of the possibilities of the 
acquisition of these rights through exchange is therefore another of 
the fundamental functional problem foci of a relational system of 
instrumental orientation. 

Finally, the elementary paradigm provides only for that type 
of instrumental activity which ego can, to the point of exchange, 
carry out entirely alone. But very generally, the exchangeable 
entity, the significant "product" or possession, is not the product of 
a single actor's activity, but of the cooperation of a plurality of indi- 
vidual actors. Cooperation is a closer mode of the integration of 
instrumental activities than is exchange. It means the meshing of 
activities or "contributions" in such a way that the outcome is a 
unit which as a unit can enter into the exchange process. (Of course 
the terms on which cooperative relationships are entered into or 
continued may also be settled by an exchange transaction, a "con- 
tract.") According to the nature of the cooperative goal, the "unit 
product," and of other features of the system of cooperative activity 
(e.g., the numbers involved), the imperatives of a functioning 
process of cooperative activity, will differ. But they are always more 
stringent than those imposed on a system of exchange relationships. 
A system of cooperative relationships may be called an organization. 

A given actor, ego, then is within an "instrumental complex" 
as it may be called, confronted with four major types of problems 
of the ordering of his relations to the significant alters. There is, 
first, the problem of "disposal," the settlement of terms on which 
his non-self-consumed product is made available to others. Secondly, 
there is the problem of "remuneration," of settlement of terms on 



The Relational Context of Role-Orientation [ 73 ] 

which he receives the significant products of the activities of other 
actors (individually or collective as organizations). Third there is 
the problem of his access to facilities, and the regulation of his 
relations to competitors, actual and potential, for use of the same 
facilities. Underlying all three problems of exchange is that of the 
definition of rights in possessions and their limits, and of their dif- 
ferentiation according to classes of possessions. Finally there is the 
problem of his relationships of cooperation with others in the same 
"productive" process, which may include assumption of authority 
over some others and/or acceptance of subjection to the authority 
of others. These elements and their relations are diagrammatically 
represented as follows: 



PROBLEM OF EGO'S AND ALTER'S RIGHTS 
IN POSSESSIONS 



Problem of access 
to facilities 
(alter as "supplier" 
of facilities). 



Problem of coopera- 
tion (alters as 
"partners")- 



^^ 



Technical 

instrumental 

goal-orientation 

of ego. 



Disposal problem 
(alter as 'con- 
sumer"). 



Remuneration prob- 
lem (alters as "in- 
come sources"). 



These relational problem-contexts may in any way be fused with 
each other in the same concrete relationships, or segregated, in that 
they involve different relations to different alters with different roles 
of and vis-a-vis ego. The ways in which these differentiations take 
place or fail to do so provide highly important criteria for classifica- 
tion of different types of social structure, and will be analyzed below. 
This paradigm also provides important points of reference for 
analyzing the organization and dynamics of complex social sys- 
tems. The access to "markets" and to facilities are among the most 
important conditions for the pursuit of any type of instrumentally 
oriented activity the more so the more specialized, while the "re- 
muneration" receivable through the relational system is obviously 



[ 74 ] Organization of the Components into Subsystems 

of crucial importance to the motivation of such a type of instrumen- 
tal activity. 

What we have done in the foregoing pages is to describe, from 
the point of view of ego's role taken as point of reference, the main 
outline of the structure of a differentiated system of instrumentally 
oriented activity, involving an indefinite plurality of interacting 
actors. In so far as such a system develops, the institutional patterns 
of the component roles must do more than describe the value- 
orientations of the com.ponent actors. They constitute, rather, a set 
of value-orientation patterns relative to a specifically structured 
interaction situation. They define expectations of ego's action as fol- 
lows: i) in the processes of fulfilling his own technical goals; 2) 
in exchange relations with a series of alters relative to disposal, re- 
muneration and facilities; and 3) in cooperative relations with alters. 
(Each of these can of course be further differentiated.) In such a 
system, concretely, there is necessarily a relational orientation com- 
ponent and, so far as the interests of the actors are not all interests in 
common goals, a regulative component, especially with reference to 
the setdement of terms and to rights in possessions. There may also 
be elements of cultural institutionalization, e.g., with reference to 
common beliefs. 

The specifically sociological problem focus with reference to 
such a sub-system of social action concerns the kinds of value- 
orientations which are institutionalized in it, and the degrees to 
which and ways in which they are institutionalized to define the 
roles of the component actors. It concerns the mechanisms of learn- 
ing of these patterns, and of social control where tendencies to 
deviance from them exist. With special reference to these factors 
thus the concern of sociological analysis with such a system is with 
their bearing on processes within the system, e.g., recruitment and 
status-change of personnel; and with processes of change in the 
institutional structure of the system itself, e.g., further elaboration 
of the division of labor. 

The same paradigm, however, underlies certain problem-areas 
of other social sciences, notably economics and political science. The 
economic problem is two-fold. On the one hand, within a given 
institutional role-structure, it concerns the processes of allocation of 
resources, i.e., "labor power" and facilities within the system. On 



The Relational Context of Role-Orientation [ 75 ] 

the other hand, it concerns in motivational terms the processes of 
balancing advantages and cost with special reference to the settle- 
ment of terms and within a given role-structure and a given set of 
power conditions. Political science, on the other hand, is concerned 
with the power relations within the institutional system and with 
a broader aspect of settlement of terms. These problems will be 
further discussed in the next chapter after a more extensive ground- 
work for them has been laid. 

There is a closely parallel paradigm of the relational context in- 
volved in a differentiated system of expressively oriented actions. In 
this case, it will be remembered, the motivational significance of 
the action is given in the immediate gratification of a need-disposi- 
tion, that is, through the action itself, not through the attainment 
of a goal beyond the particular action-process. Such orientation is, of 
course, organized in terms of a cultural pattern of value-orientation 
as well as of its motivational significance, hence it is expressive, not 
only cathectic. 

The type of case of motivational orientation which is most di- 
recdy relevant here is that where alter is a cathected object and this 
cathectic significance is the primary focus of the orientation on the 
motivational side. Here ego has a problem homologous with that of 
disposal, namely, that of ensuring alter's "acceptance" of his orienta- 
tion, of his willingness to serve as an object of the relevant type of 
expressive interest on ego's part. This may be called the problem of 
alter's "receptiveness" to ego's orientation. It only arises, of course, 
when from ego's point of view alter is an "appropriate" object for 
him.^ Secondly, however, expressive interaction is generally not 
a "one-way street." Alter is not only a passively receptive object 
but the gratification of ego's need-disposition may depend on an 
active "response" from alter. It may not, for example, be enough to 
"love" alter as an object; it may be very important to "be loved" in 
return. Response, thus, would seem to be homologous with the 
remuneration aspect of an instrumental system. 

It is probable that the psychological characteristics of expressive 
interests are such that more generally than in the instrumental case 

^ Of course, some expressive orientations do not require receptiveness, e.g., a 
"hero" may be "worshipped" without even being aware of the identity of many 
of his admirers. 



[ 76 ] Organization of the Components into Subsystems 

receptiveness and response are and must be found in the same social 
object. Nevertheless diflFerentiation in this respect is by no means 
unknown even in an intimately "affective" object relationships. The 
most familiar case perhaps is the case of needing to be loved without 
the capacity for loving in return. But the separation of the two 
elements in relation to two different objects is certainly by no means 
unknoun to clinical experience.^* Furthermore it must not be for- 
gotten that the category of expressive orientation is by no means 
confined to such intimate relationships. It may, for example, be a 
matter of attitudes toward collectivities. 

Expressive action is not oriented to the attainment of a goal out- 
side the immediate action situation and process itself in the same 
sense as is instrumental action. But this does not mean that objects in 
the situation other than the immediate object of focus are indif- 
ferent from the expressive point of view. On the contrary an in- 
definite range of situational objects may be significant to ego as 
objects of cathexis and as expressive symbols which provide an ap- 
propriate context or "occasion" for the expressive activity. This 
includes such matters as the appropriateness of time and place for 
an expressive activity, the significance of surrounding physical ob- 
jects, including the embodiments of cultural symbolism, e.g., works 
of art, the presence and role of third parties and the relation to 
collectivities as social objects. Hence the selection and regulation 
of the components of the occasion in this sense constitutes a third 
major problem area of ego's relational system of expressive orienta- 
tion. The various objects in and aspects of the situation apart from 
the focal object are symbolically integrated with that focal object 
and its significance in ego's orientation patterning, and hence there 
is a need to have them "fit" with the central expressive interest. 
In one important aspect this may be spoken of as the need for an 
integrated "style" patterning for the context of expressive activities. 

It should be quite clear that the same concrete objects of the 
situation may function both as objects of instrumental orientation 
and as cathectic-expressive symbolic objects. In particular, the proc- 
esses of acquisition of objects which are significant in the expres- 
sive context are generally best analyzed in instrumental terms, not 
as themselves processes of expressive activity. 

1* The problem of the interpretation of ambivalent orientations toward the 
same object introduces complications which will be taken up later. Cf. Chapter VII. 



The Relational Context of Role-Orientation [ yy ] 

Finally, there is also a clear expressive homologue of the instru- 
mental category of cooperation in the cathectic-expressive aspect of 
ego's integration with alter; where this integration is institutionalized 
we will call it solidarity,' short of this it will be called loyalty. There 
are two aspects of this loyalty. In the purely cathectic sense alter 
may be an object of attachment. This means that the relation to 
alter is the source, not merely of discrete, unorganized, ad hoc grati- 
fications for ego, but of an organized system of gratifications which 
include expectations of the future continuance and development 
of alter's gratificatory significance. In the normally integrated case, 
as between individual actors, there would, of course, be a mutuality 
of this attachment significance. What the attachment does is to 
organize a plurality of need-dispositions in relation to a particular 
object into an integrated system. 

The second aspect of the loyalty derives from the fact that the 
attachment is organized in terms of a cultural pattern which, in the 
first instance, will be a pattern of expressive symbols, the meanings 
of which are shared between ego and alter. This will involve value- 
orientations at least on the level of appreciative standards; whether 
it will go beyond that to involve a moral level of value-orientation 
is an open question. It will do so if the loyalty between ego and 
alter becomes institutionalized and is thus shifted to solidarity. 
Thus between two lovers a system of shared erotic symbolism will 
be developed which is an inherent aspect of the relationship and a 
condition of its integration.^ When institutionalized in the form of 
marriage, however, this symbolism acquires the further dimension 
of moral sanction and obligation in terms of the common value 
system of the society. A relationship of expressive loyalty then or- 
ganizes a set of need-dispositions in an attachment to the particular 
object and integrates it with a system of commonly shared expres- 
sive symbols which are appropriate to the cathectic interests in 
question. It is this loyalty integrated with a social object which is 
the homologue of cooperation in the instrumental case. 

By extension of this conception of expressive loyalty between 
individual actors we derive the further important concept of the 
loyalty of the individual actor to a collectivity of which he is a 
member. The collectivity may be treated as an object of attach- 

- See below, pp. 96 ff. 

^ See Chapter IX below for a further analysis of this problem. 



[ 78 ] Organization of the Components into Sub-systems 

ment, as when we speak of "love of country" in what is clearly 
more than a metaphorical sense. In such a case it is clearly the 
collectivity, not its members as individuals, which is the signifi- 
cant object. It is quite possible to love one's country and at the 
same time to be highly selective about loving one's fellow-country- 
men as individuals. By essentially the same token, attachment to a 
collectivity is integrated with a system of expressive symbolism 
which in its application to ego signifies membership, status within 
the collectivity and perhaps meritorious services on behalf of the 
collectivity. On the side of the collectivity itself there are symbols 
such as flags, emblems, buildings and leaders in their expressive 
capacity which are foci for the expressive orientation of the mem- 
bers of the collectivity. 

In the nature of the case the relation between an individual 
actor and a collectivity in terms of expressive loyalty cannot be 
symmetrical in the same sense as that between two individual actors. 
A collectivity can act only through the actions of its members, par- 
ticularly those in roles of responsibility. It does not itself have affec- 
tive "feelings" toward its members, it can only symbolize the 
common feelings of its members. It is of the highest importance to 
be clear about these fundamental differences between a collectivity 
and an individual actor. Nevertheless the conception of attachment 
to and loyalty to a collectivity is an exceedingly important tool of 
sociological analysis. It is the focus for the analysis of the cathectic- 
expressive relation of the individual to the group. 

There are, furthermore, homologies with respect to the prob- 
lems both of settlement of the terms of exchange, and of rights to 
possessions, between the instrumental and the expressive cases. 
Possessions in their expressive significance will be called rewards, 
the category of rewards being treated as directly parallel with that 
of facilities. The reward-object is always an object of immediate 
gratification, but its gratificatory significance depends not only on 
its properties as an object as such, but also on its specific relation 
to ego. That specific relation, so far as it is contingent on the organ- 
ization of the interaction between ego and the relevant alters, is the 
focus of the sociological problem of rewards. But just as rewards 
are objects of gratification so in a culturally patterned action system 
they must at the same time be significant as expressive symbols. 



The Relational Context of Role-Orientation [ 79 ] 

Concretely rewards may consist in the possession of physical 
objects or specific relations to cultural objects. But a special signifi- 
cance attaches to one class of rewards, namely, the "possession" of 
contingent relations to other actors. Above all, because of the sig- 
nificance of the mutuality of attitudes involved in attachments and 
of loyalty and solidarity, to be in a position to "count on" the favor- 
able attitudes of alter— of the appropriate type— may be regarded as 
the primary core of the reward system. Alter, that is, may give or 
wathdraw his responsiveness, his love, or his esteem; ego, therefore, 
acquires and retains his place in alter's orientation system only under 
specific conditions. The institutionalization of these conditions is 
an aspect of the ordering of the social system. 

As in the case of the acquisition and use of facilities, the social 
system need not and very generally does not prescribe by institu- 
tionalization precisely what rewards should be allocated to what 
actors. But both wdth regard to the terms on which rights to various 
kinds of rewards are held and exercised, and with regard to the 
settlement of the terms of exchange for the acquisition and disposal 
of reward-possessions there is an inherent problem of order for the 
social system. Institutionalization in this sphere is as much an im- 
perative of social order as it is with respect to facilities. 

Indeed, it is in relation to the differentiation of the relational 
contexts both of instrumental and of expressive activities, that the 
most fundamental regulative problems of the social system arise, 
and that regulative institutions are primarily focused. The impli- 
cations of this situation will be taken up at a variety of points in 
the chapters which follow. 

The paradigm for the analysis of the structure of the relational 
context of an expressive orientation is as follows: 

PROBLEM OF RIGHTS IN RELATIONAL POSSESSIONS 

Problem of appropriate I Problem of social objects 

contextof occasions (in- \^. | ^^ as appropriately receptive. 

o P ^' Orientation to a specific 

gratification within a 
Problem of expressive P^""" ^^ expressive p,^],]^^ of social objects 
loyalty (involving cath- 71 ^^"^ ° '^'"' %V as appropriately respon- 

ectic attachment and 1^ sive. 

loyalty symbolism). 



[ 8o ] Organization of the Components into Sub-systems 

We may now turn to the moral aspect of the structure and 
ordering of ego's relational system. It is quite clear that this raises 
problems on a different plane from the instrumental and expressive 
because moral orientation is directly of integrative significance with 
reference to the components of an action system. We may, therefore, 
say that the problem is that of establishing the patterns of order both 
within the instrumental and the expressive complexes respectively, 
and between them, since every actor must have relationships of 
both types. 

We have here reached a vantage point for making clear the dif- 
ference in one crucial respect between the ego-integrative and the 
relational aspect of the moral orientation problem. Any given indi- 
vidual actor is, in both instrumental and expressive respects, in- 
volved in a complex system, of relationships to other actors. The 
composition of this system is, because no other person occupies 
exactly the same place in the total society, largely idiosyncratic to 
him. Its organization and integrative stabilization as a system with 
his physiological organism and his particular environmental situa- 
tion, presents a distinctive integrative focus not reducible to that of 
any other individual nor to that of the social system. The integra- 
tion of the structures of the relational system of one actor, which 
will in some of the most important cases constitute his roles, repre- 
sents one of the most important foci of the problems of the theory 
of personality. 

But our concern is only indirecdy with this. Directly it is with 
the correlative integrative problem of the relational system itself as 
a system, for as between social objects or actors this is by definition 
a social system. The focus of this problem concerns the conditions 
of order in such a system; in such systems generally and in each 
particular differentiated type of such system. 

At present our interest is in the bases of structural differentia- 
tion, so we may follow up from this point of view. It is to be re- 
membered that we are considering this structure in terms of the 
relational system as a system of roles, and hence we are concerned 
with the relevance of differentiation or role-pattem types. 

In terms of the two paradigms presented above and the relations 
between them there seem to be two ranges of variability to consider. 
The first concerns the differentiations and integrations within each 



The Relational Context of Role-Orientation [ 8 1 ] 

one of the orientation systems. The second concerns the possibiHties 
of segregation and fusion of components of both in the same role. 

Certain of the pattern variables outlined in the last chapter 
provide us with a basis for classifying these possibilities. Three of 
them, namely affectivity-neutrality, specificity-diffuseness and uni- 
versalism-particularism, are all relevant to the problem on the most 
elementary level. The fourth and fifth fit into different contexts 
which will be taken up in due course. 

The definition of a role in terms of affective neutrality excludes 
any expressive interest* from primacy in the orientation structure 
and gives the primacy either to instrumental or to moral considera- 
tions. This does not mean that, concretely, the actor does not receive 
any direct gratifications through the performance of such a role, far 
from it, but that in the definition of the role-expectations, these 
interests, whatever they may he, are in the case of conflict, to be 
subordinated to one or both of the other types of consideration. If 
there is no conflict it is another matter. By itself, this variable does 
not discriminate between instrumental and moral orientations, nor 
between private and collective interests. It serves only to discriminate 
the legitimacy of relative primacies of expressive and non-expressive 
orientations. 

However, there are important respects in which the discrimina- 
tion between instrumental and ego-integrative moral orientation is 
secondary if not indifferent from the point of view of the ordering 
of the social system. The functional problem in these terms is that 
of moral integration on the social level, not that of personality. But 
this brings us into ground not yet worked out. This variable defines 
quite clearly the relative primacy as between expressive and instru- 
mental orientations. 

It will be convenient next to take up the application of the 
specificity-diffuseness variable. Specificity in a role-expectation "seg- 
regates" out one specific element of an instrumental or an expressive 
complex from the rest of its relational context. Thus the content of 

* The extent to which a cathectic interest is or is not integrated with a pattern 
of expressive symboHsm may be neglected for purposes of the following analysis. 
In general we shall assume this integration and deal with the evaluative action- 
orientation level. 



[ 82 ] Organization of the Components into Suh-sy stems 

the role may be confined to the "productive" process itself without 
reference to responsibility for disposal or for the provision of facili- 
ties or regulation of cooperative relationships, or it may be concerned 
with the gratification of a need-disposition without reference to the 
context of occasions or its combination with others in an attachment. 
It would seem that the possibilities of segregation in the expressive 
field were intrinsically more limited than in the instrumental. 

In any case, however, diffuseness refers to such a fusion of rela- 
tional aspects or relevant need-dispositions into a single "bundle." 
The important point to remember is that a pattern variable in the 
present context defines role-expectations, that is, rights and obliga- 
tions vis-a-vis others, and hence the structuring of sanctions. There- 
fore, a "specific" role is one in which obligations are expected to be 
confined to the specifically defined relational content, while in a 
"diffuse" role the expectation is that no claim to obligation arising 
out of a contingency of the situation will be a priori irrelevant; its 
irrelevance must be justified in terms of conflict with a higher obli- 
gation in terms of a priority scale. 

There is a certain relativity in defining what is a segregated 
aspect which is apt to give rise to confusion unless it is clearly recog- 
nized. In the instrumental case it derives from the fact that any 
desired future state of affairs may be conceived as a goal. Therefore, 
when we speak of the productive (or "functional") goal of an 
instrumental orientation, disposal, adequate remuneration, etc., may 
each serve as such a goal. What, therefore, is to be considered 
the "technical" goal at the center of an instrumental system of 
division of labor as indicated in the paradigm, is relative to the posi- 
tion of ego in the system of division of labor. What is from ego's 
point of view the technical goal, may, seen from the perspective of 
the wider system, be the performance of a disposal function (e.g., 
he may be a "salesman") or some other function. This should not 
be a serious source of difficulty if the frame of reference within 
which a statement belongs is always made clear. 

In the expressive case it is somewhat different. The system into 
which a need-disposition gratification is to be fitted, must be taken 
to include other need-dispositions of the same actor as well as his 
relations to objects. Hence a "fusion" may mean either the organi- 
zation of a system of need-dispositions relative to the same object, 



The Relational Context of Role-Orientation [ 83 ] 

or the organization of a system of objects relative to gratification of 
the same need-disposition or both. 

It would seem to be clear that an object-orientation which in- 
cludes both expressive and instrumental elements, defined as posi- 
tively expected rather than only permissively legitimate in the role- 
expectation, should be treated as diffuse. However, this would not 
seem to be possible unless on either the instrumental or the expres- 
sive side diffuseness were already involved. The most obvious type 
of case is that where an instrumentally specific expectation is bound 
up with an expressively diffuse one, in orientation to another person 
or to a collectivity. Solidarity, which will be further discussed below, 
necessarily has a component of this diffuse character. But in the 
absence of the collectivity-orientation involved in solidarity we may 
speak of the obligation of loyalty to alter or to a collectivity, as de- 
fined above, when the instrumental orientation is fitted into the 
context of a diffuse relation of reciprocal expressive significance. 

It is also evident that there are important relations of the variable 
universalism-particularism to this context. The standards governing 
instrumental orientations are, given the goal, as we have seen in- 
herently universalistic. They have to do with the intrinsic, relation- 
ally indifferent criteria of effective goal-attainment. The primacy of 
an instrumental orientation, even a diffuse one, is, therefore, always 
a primacy of universalistic standards. The same may, but need not, 
be true of an expressive orientation. Here it depends on whether 
the orientation is inherently to the sfecific object or to a universalis- 
tically defined class of objects. If any object of the generally defined 
class is appropriate, the standard is universalistic. 

However, the orientation is more likely, in the expressive case, 
to be particularistic. This is especially, indeed overwhelmingly, so 
unless the object is an abstract, cultural object which contains the 
property of universality within itself or a class of other objects in 
their symbolic significance. Perhaps, for instance, universal love in 
the religious sense is an example of a universalistically defined at- 
tachment, to all men without discrimination. It is, however, evident 
that it is extremely difficult of realization. It may be surmised that 
the universalistic orientation is more likely to be to the abstraction 
"humanity," that is, to a symbol, than it is to all concrete human 
beings. 



[ 84 ] Organization of the Corwponents into Subsystems 

Table I presents a cross-classification of the values of these three 
pattern variables, yielding eight types. It can be seen from this that 
there is a considerable, though not a complete correspondence with 
the outcome of the analysis of the instrumental and expressive 
paradigms. The table is formulated in such a way that the neutrality- 
affectivity variable is consistently used to discriminate the primacy 
of instrumental and expressive orientations respectively, and the 
specificity-diffuseness variable to distinguish limitation to a specific 
component of the relational system from the integration of the sys- 
tem in question as a system. These lines of discrimination seem to 
be quite clear. The main difficulty with them is that the classifica- 
tion does not as such take account of the combinations of instru- 
mental and expressive elements in the same role-expectation pat- 
tern. The best way to do this appears to be to conceive such a 
combined pattern as covering two cells in the table, for example, 
both the affective and the neutral cell where the combination of 
the other two variables is still the same. Such a combined type 
could then be further differentiated according to whether the in- 
strumental or the expressive (or possibly a moral) element were 
given primacy. This is highly important in the case of cells 6 and 8 
which define— so far as these variables are concerned— the very 
important cases where a diffuse attachment is integrated with expec- 
tations of reciprocal instrumental performances. A major example 
is that of kinship roles. 

Another complication arises where the primary interest is ex- 
pressive on one side and instrumental on the other. This would, for 
instance, be true in the relation between performer and audience 
in commercial entertainment, where the member of the audience 
is directly gratifying a need-disposition whereas the performer is in 
an occupational role.^ In such an asymmetrical role interaction sys- 
tem it seems necessary to classify one role in one box, the other in 
another. Thus the role of the performer in the above case would 
belong in cell i while that of the spectator would belong in cell 3. 

° To account for the integration of such an interaction pattern it seems neces- 
sary to assume that there is institutionaHzation of a common pattern of expressive 
symbohsm between performer and audience, a pattern which would be internalized 
in the performer's personality. Then the latter's instrumental orientation to 
"getting across" and/or to remuneration would operate within this value-orien- 
tation matrix. This problem will be further analyzed in Chapter IX, pp. 408 ff. 



The Relational Context of Role-Orientation ■[ 85 ] 

It is still significant that the complementary pair belong in two 
adjacent cells out of the eight possibilities. It would not be possible 
to build up complementary pairs of role-patterns by random combi- 
nations of the eight cells. 

Another set of problems arises in connection with the place of 
the variable universalism-particularism. Row i (cells i and 2) which 
defines the primary components of both technical and executive 
roles in the instrumental complex, is clear and unambiguous. With 
respect to all of the others there are problems. Cell 3 is certainly 
important with respect to specific gratifications. But if the object 
is a social object there is a strong pressure to shift the emphasis in 
a particularistic and diffuse direction, the more so the more lasting 
the relation and the more strategic the cathectic interest. There 
seems to be an inherent instability in this combination of orienta- 
tion interests. It never appears as central to the structure of a social 
system (where the object must be a social object) but mainly in 
"safety valve" or deviant phenomena, e.g., prostitution. 

The instability of the orientation defined by cell 4 has also been 
commented upon. Here the difficulty is in maintaining the univer- 
salism of the pattern in the face of the pressures to particularism of 
the affective expressive primacy. Thus religious universalism very 
easily shifts into a denominational particularism where the primary 
loyalty is to the particular religious collectivity, e.g., the church, 
rather than to "all men," especially, of course, where men outside 
the church refuse to recognize the definition of the situation es- 
poused by the denomination in question. 

To take one further example, cell 8 formulates the "ideal type" 
of the romantic love relationship. But it seems to be in the nature 
of a concrete love attachment that if it is intense and durable it 
will come to involve realistic common and reciprocal activities out- 
side the core of expressive symbolism itself. Though also possessing 
symbolic significance many of these activities will possess or acquire 
instrumental significance as well. The actual role pattern, then, will 
tend to "spill over" into cell 6 and to fuse the two. With integration 
in a larger functional system including the presence of offspring 
and responsibility for their care the love relationship shades into 
that of marriage. Kinship roles in all societies involve a fusion of 
the pattern-elements formulated in cells 6 and 8. 



[ 86 ] Organization of the Components into Suh-sy stems 

These cases are not exhaustive of the impHcations of the table 
but will sufl&ce for the present. The fundamental reason why we 
do not find a "perfect fit" between the logically elaborated scheme 
of pattern variable combinations and the results of analyzing the 

TABLE 1 

Universalism 



Neutrality 



Affectivity 



SPECIFICITY 



DIFFUSENESS 



Expectation of specific instru- 
mental performances segregated 
from the relational context and 
subordinating expressive inter- 
ests. 



Pursuit of a segregated specific ex- 
pressive interest segregated both 
from diffuse attachments and from 
instrumental expectations vis-^- 
vis any one of a class of objects. 



Expectation of diffuse instru- 
mental coordinations relative to 
a relational context subordinat- 
ing expressive interests. 



Fusion of a plurality of expres- 
sive interests in a loyalty-attach- 
ment to a class of objects or an 
abstract cultural object, e.g., love 
of all mankind or of God. 



Particularism 



Neutrahty 



Affectivity 



Expectation of specifically delim- 
ited instrumental obligation to 
a person or collectivity, subordi- 
nating expressive interests. 



Expectation of diffuse instru- 
mental obligation to a person or 
collectivity subordinating ego's 
expressive interests. 



Pursuit of a segregated specific 
expressive interest segregated to 
above vis-a-vis a particular ob- 
ject, individual or collective. 



8 

Fusion of a plurality of expressive 
interests in a relation of diffuse 
loyalty to a particular object with- 
out instrumental expectations. 



relational complexes of instrumental and expressive action lies in 
the fact that the former is a cultural pattern element, and the types 
derived in these terms are governed by the rules of pattern con- 
sistency and symmetry. The relational paradigms on the other hand 



The Relational Context of Role-Orientation [ 87 ] 

analyze the structure of social relations on another level. We see 
here some of the beginnings of the sources of tensions between 
cultural patterns and the realistic conditions of functioning of a 
social system. 

It must not be forgotten that in Table i two of the pattern 
variables have been omitted, namely achievement-ascription and 
self-collectivity orientation. Especially the latter variable will be 
found to modify the results of this table considerably. But we are 
not yet ready to introduce these modifications. 

In a very tentative way it will be useful to bring together the 
results of the above analysis of the instrumental and expressive 
orientation systems, by setting up a classification of types of fusion 
and segregation of the components of these paradigms. These will 
not suffice to characterize concrete role types but will provide some 
very important elements in them, and in particular will lay the basis 
for a series of highly important discriminations in the field of social 
structure to be utilized further in Chapter IV below. 

1. The segregation of specific cathectic-expressive interests, 
both from diffuse attachments or loyalties and from instru- 
mental expectations, e.g., the role of spectator at an unpaid 
entertainment (cells 3 and 7 of Table i). 

2. The fusion of a plurality of specific cathectic-expressive in- 
terests in a diffuse object attachment, e.g., the "pure" type 
of romantic love role. (Cell 8.) 

3. The conditioning of the gratification of a specific cathectic- 
expressive interest on a specific instrumental performance 
(asymmetrical) e.g., the role of spectator at a commercial 
entertainment (involves all of left hand— specificity— column 
in Table i). 

4. The fusion of a diffuse attachment and loyalty with a dif- 
fuse complex of expected instrumental performances, e.g., 
kinship roles (cells 6 and 8). 

5. The segregation of specific instrumental performances, both 
from expressive orientations other than the specifically ap- 
propriate rewards and from other components of the instru- 
mental complex, e.g., "technical" roles (cell i). 

6. The fusion of a diffuse plurality of instrumental functions 
with the specifically appropriate rewards in a complex segre- 



[ 88 ] Organization of the Components into Suh-sy stems 

gated from other expressive interests, e.g., "artisan" and 
"executive" roles (cell 2). 
7. The fusion of a pluraHty of expressive interests in a diffuse 
attachment to a class of objects or an abstract cukural object, 
e.g., "universal love" in a religious sense (cell 4). 

§ THE MODALITIES OF OBJECTS AS FOCI 
OF ROLE-EXPECTATIONS 

THE foregoing section was concerned with differentia- 
tions in patterns relevant to the structuring of social relationships 
and hence of roles. The bases of differentiation, that is, were found 
in the motivational structure of the actor's orientation and in the 
cultural value-standards which are built into his action orientation. 
It is now necessary to take up the relevance of differentiation within 
the object itself which may serve as a focus for selective differentia- 
tion of orientation, that is, relative primacies among alternatives. 
We are concerned here, it will be remembered, with role-pattern 
structure and hence the mutual orientations of actors to each other. 
The relevant object is for this purpose always a social object. 

This immediately suggests the usefulness of building the anal- 
ysis around the pattern variable of ascription-achievement as this is 
nothing other than the formulation of the most significant differen- 
tiation running through the constitution of the social object world. 
In orienting to an actor as object, then (including ego's own per- 
sonality) primacy may be given on the one hand to his attributes 
or qualities, independently of specific expected performances, or on 
the other, it may be given to his performances, completed, in process, 
or expected in the future. Tlie relevant context, it will be remem- 
bered, is always the evaluation of the object as a whole in the 
relevant respects. This evaluation may be applied to the selection of 
the object, from among alternative possibilities, or to the structuring 
of expectations relative to the object once a relationship is estab- 
lished, that is, the "treatment" he receives in a role. 

Tlie nature of the general differentiation should be clear. The 
main problem of this section is to bring out its relevance by spelling 
out some of the more empirical considerations that are involved 
under each of the two main alternatives. We may start with the 
analysis of quality-complexes, or ascriptive criteria. 



The Modalities of Ohjects as Foci [ 89 ] 

It seems essential at the start to differentiate between two classes 
of such criteria. For convenience they may be called primary and 
secondary. The former are those which are logically prior to the 
social system, the latter those which derive from the relevant fea- 
tures of social systems. Relative to both classes, for purposes of 
making the relevance to social structure clear, it is useful to make 
a further initial distinction, namely between classificatory and rela- 
tional criteria. By classificatory criteria is meant those which orient 
the actor to the object by virtue of the fact that it belongs to a 
universalistically defined class which as a class has special signifi- 
cance for ego. By relational criteria, on the other hand, is meant 
those by which the object as a particular object is placed in a spe- 
cific significant relation to ego and thus to other significant objects. 
Tlius the sex of the object is a classificatory criterion while a specific 
biological relationship to ego, e.g., as parent, is relational. The 
relevance of this distinction to relating ascriptive criteria to the 
incidence of the universalism-particularism variable seems to be 
obvious. 

The relevant primary ascriptive criteria may be classified as 
attributes of organisms (ego's and alter's) or attributes of personali- 
ties (again both ego's and alter's). Collectivities are excluded as 
belonging only to the secondary class. Physical and cultural objects 
are likewise excluded. Apart from their relations to social objects 
they are by definition irrelevant to our present discussion. Cultural 
objects as internalized are part of personality, as institutionalized 
patterns of the social system, they are secondary. Physical objects 
(other than organisms of actors) are only indirectly relevant. They 
may, that is, be involved in relational criteria, because of the ob- 
ject's relation to his environment, as in the case of spatial location. 

We have, then, the classificatory and the relational attributes of 
the organism. The former are his biological or, as it is sometimes 
expressed, "physical" traits. Two of these, because of their univer- 
sality and their relevance to certain intrinsic functional problems 
of social systems stand out from the others, they are sex, and age, 
or more precisely, stage of the biological life cycle. The fact that all 
human populations are classifiable by sex into two and only two 
categories (with negligible exceptions) forms a crucial focus of 
orientation to human individuals. Similarly with age. Beside these 



[ 90 ] Organization of the Components into Suh-systems 

two we may refer only to a residual category of numerous physical 
or somatic traits which will include stature, body weight and shape, 
skin and eye color and the rest of the familiar catalogue. Traits 
which are manifested only or mainly in behavior and where the 
physiological basis and the socio-culturally acquired element can 
only be distinguished by sophisticated analysis if at all, are best 
treated as traits of personality rather than of the organism, e.g., 
"intelligence." 

Turning to the relational category, there seem to be three pri- 
mary relational attributes of the organism which stand out as of 
primary significance, namely "biological position," spatial or terri- 
torial location and temporal location. By biological position is meant 
the place of alter relative to ego in the concatenations of sexual 
reproduction and descent, what is sometimes called the "biological 
structure of kinship." Descent through bisexual reproduction is the 
essential fact. Alter is always related to ego, if any relationship can 
be traced at all, through specific lines of descent from specific com- 
mon ancestors, with, of course, the possibility of more than one 
line being involved. For reasons which will be discussed in the fol- 
lowing chapters biological position is a fundamental ascriptive cri- 
terion in all knouoi societies, defining the focus of the social struc- 
tures known as kinship. 

Territorial location is equally important. By this is meant, 
given the spatial position of ego as organism at a given time, the 
relation to this of the position in space at which alter is located. 
With ego himself as object, of course, the identity of spatial position 
is itself a crucial fact. He cannot, that is, be spatially separated from 
"himself." Since all individual actors are organisms this focus of 
orientation can never be left out, it is always there by implication 
if not explicitly dealt with. It always creates a "problem" for action. 
If ego and alter are out of sight and hearing there must be specific 
physical mechanisms which enable them to communicate, e.g., mail 
or telephone. Or if communication is not enough to accomplish 
ego's goal, he must somehow be able to "get at" alter in the place 
where he is located, or bring about a change in the location of one 
or both. It should be quite clear that territorial location, in this 
context, is always a relational attribute of the organism of an actor. 
Though obviously influenced by past action and subject to altera- 



The Modalities of Objects as Foci [91] 

tion through a projected course of action, at any given time it simply 
is a given fact. 

Though relative territorial location inherently enters into all 
action it is of particularly crucial significance in two contexts. One 
is that of residential location. The plurality of roles of any indi- 
vidual actor implies a time-allocation between them, and conditions 
are such that the time-segments cannot be long enough to permit 
more than limited spatial mobility in the course of the change-over 
between at least some of them, e.g., family and job. This means that 
the main "bases of operations" of the action of an individual must 
be within a limited territorial area, though "commuting" by me- 
chanical means has considerably extended the range. This base of 
operations requirement is at the basis of the grouping we call a 
"community." A community is that collectivity the members of 
which share a common territorial area as their base of operations 
for daily activities. 

The second crucial context is that of the use of force. Force 
operates on the actor through the organism, by limiting its freedom, 
e.g., of motion or communication, or by inflicting injury on it. In 
order to use force against an actor it is necessary to "get at him" in 
the flace where he is or would like to be. Since the use of force is 
an ultimate means of prevention of action (a dead man does not 
act), and since as a component of power the use of force must be 
controlled in a society, the territorial organization of force and its 
contingent use is always a focus of the structure of the society. 

Time relations may be treated as the third set of relational cri- 
teria relative to the organism. All action is, of course, in one of its 
major aspects, temporal sequence. For interaction the crucial impli- 
cation is that the impact of ego's action on alter is always specifically 
located in that sequence. "Timing" of actions is always possible 
within limits, but when an act has been performed its consequences 
flow into the temporal sequence, as part of the "experience" of alter 
as well as of ego. Ego is, therefore, always related to alter in time in 
the sense that they co-exist in the temporal continuum, and the 
relevant state of either for interaction orientation is the state "at 
the time." 

But action is not only "located" in time, it "ranges" through 
time. The consequences of past actions are situationally given and 



[ 92 ] Organization of the Components into Suh-systems 

thus always of ascriptive significance. Action itself, as involving 
expectation, however, is oriented to the future. The assessment of 
"how long it will take" and "when is the proper time" are inherently 
parts of any action problem. In relation to the structuring of action 
perhaps the most important relevance of these considerations is to 
the proliferation of instrumental orientations in systems. The more 
complex the instrumental system the more are goals, which as goals 
are meaningful in the present, capable of attainment only in a more 
or less distant future. An instrumentally elaborated social system 
is one in which orientations are to a high degree "time-extended." 
Its members cannot simply live "for the moment." In particular the 
significance of alter for ego clearly has a highly important time 
dimension. 

Turning now to personality (ego's own or alter's) as object 
we have the immense field of personality traits. It is perhaps ques- 
tionable how far it is legitimate to treat these as primary ascriptive 
criteria at all, since they are so intimately bound up with the social 
system itself. Hence there is a possible arbitrariness in where they 
should be classified. But provisionally they may be put here. The 
most important distinction within the classificatory category seems 
to be between those traits which are primarily significant to per- 
formances and those which are not. The former may be called 
"performance-capacities." Admittedly the line is difficult to draw 
and is probably relative to context, but it is an important line. Such 
traits as physical strength or agility, as intelligence or responsibility, 
are primarily ways of formulating the kind of performances which 
may be expected under certain conditions. On the other hand such 
traits as cheerfulness or "attractiveness" seem relatively independent 
of specific performances. 

In any case it is important to emphasize that performance ca- 
pacities are attributes which may function as ascriptive criteria. 
Even though, as is frequently the case, past performance serves as 
the empirical criterion, still persons regarded as having the trait in 
question, or having it in the requisite degree, are classified together, 
and belonging to this class may be taken as the criterion of status- 
ascription, independently of any specific expected performances. 
Indeed every performance, once it has been accomplished, becomes 
in its consequences an aspect of a given situation and the person 



The Modalities of Ohjects as Foci [ 93 ] 

who has done it has the attribute of being the one who did. This is 
the basis of certain dynamic relations between achievement and 
ascription. 

It is evident that there are no relational attributes of personaH- 
ties which are "primary," that is, are neither attributes of the organ- 
ism of the sorts just discussed, nor secondary attributes derived from 
the social system. This is merely another way of saying that the 
relational system in which personalities as personalities are involved 
is hy definition the social system. 

Turning then to secondary criteria of ascription, in the classi- 
ficatory category the most important ones are status-classes or cate- 
gories. Though a large proportion of statuses also involve collectivity 
memberships, it is highly important to distinguish the two. High 
School graduates, or married persons, or professional men, for ex- 
ample, constitute status classes. The members of a status class are 
classed together by virtue of a common attribute of their place or 
"location" in the social structure, or of a common attribute which is 
relevant to such status as a determinant or a symbol of status. Thus 
"rich men" or the "indigent" constitute a status class. Such an at- 
tribute is not a personality trait in the usual sense, though again ad- 
mittedly the line is indistinct when personality characteristics are in 
fact made the focus of status ascription. But generally there is room 
for considerable variability in the personality traits of the members 
of a status class. 

To be distinguished from membership in a status-class are the 
two types of secondary relational criteria, participation in an "eco- 
logical" system and membership in a collectivity. By an ecological 
system is meant a state of mutually oriented interdependence of a 
plurality of actors who are not integrated by bonds of solidarity to 
form a collectivity but who are objects to one another. Tlie "cus- 
tomers" of a commercial firm constitute such a category as do in 
general the participants in a market. Another example is the antag- 
onists in a contest. Of course their interaction is oriented to a system 
of "rules of the game" and in their orientation to these rules they 
are members of the collectivity which upholds them. For ecological 
interactors in this capacity the only "sanction" is failure to achieve 
the goal or to avoid injury to self. Only the rules, not the specific 
orientations thus are institutionalized, and the relevant institutions 



[ 94 ] Organization of the Components into Subsystems 

are regulative not relational. As a relational category such partici- 
pants must belong to the same concrete system of interaction. 
Classed as customers in general they constitute a status class. 

Membership in a collectivity is also a secondary relational cri- 
terion. Such a collectivity may, like a kinship group or a commu- 
nity, be constituted by primary relational criteria, but it need not be. 
Even where membership is achieved hy the individual actor, not 
ascribed to him, once he is a member this becomes a basis of further 
ascription. 

We may now turn to achievement criteria of object selection 
or discriminative orientation. Such a criterion does not refer to an 
attribute of a given state of the object as such, but to actual or 
expected specific performance. The significant aspect is the con- 
tingency; being what he is, is not enough, in addition to this the 
critical thing is what the actor does. The evaluation is always relative 
to an ascriptively given base. The actor might have done otherwise, 
worse or better, but the focus is on what he actually does, not on 
the ascriptive base. 

That this possibility is inherent in the theory of action is clear 
from the most elementary analysis of interaction, with its emphasis 
on the contingency element of alter's reactions to what ego does. 
Achievement orientation, then, is related to ascriptive through the 
addition of the second contingency factor which results in double 
contingency. The expectation is not defined "Being what I am, 
alter's treatment of me must take one of the following alternatives" 
but "Depending on which of several alternatives ofen to me I take, 
I will set alter 2l problem to which he will react in terms of the alter- 
native system of his own which is oriented to my action." It is this 
involvement in the fundamental paradigm of interaction which 
makes the pattern variable of ascriptive-achievement so crucial in 
the whole theory of action. 

In approaching the problem of sub-classification the first remark 
to be made is that primary achievement criteria relative to the or- 
ganism drop out; achievements are specifically defined as those of 
an actor. However, it seems best, parallel with the place of personal- 
ity traits, to treat the achievements of the individual actor as primary 
rather than secondary criteria for orientation. This leaves only the 
achievements of collectivities considered as actors as secondary 



The Modalities of Ohjects as Foci [ 95 ] 

achievement foci. Such collective achievements as the record of 
games won by a team or the profits of a business firm would be 
cases in point. 

The next important point is that achievement criteria as such 
are in the nature of the case always classificatory, never relational. 
They are always abstractable from context, to be "measured" 
by a universalistic standard. Achievement primacy is always uni- 
versalistic, so far as the criteria of achievement are directly ap- 
plicable. There are, however, certain difficulties in the interpreta- 
tion of this statement. Performance is always relative to a goal; 
performance criteria are, therefore, limited in their direct applica- 
bility to the relations of means and conditions to a given goal, in 
such terms as effectiveness, efficiency, economy. They are thus 
intrinsically limited to instrumental orientations. But while instru- 
mental orientation may be a com.'ponent of a concrete role-expecta- 
tion system, it need not exhaust it. The value-orientations in terms 
of which the goals themselves are defined need not be universalistic. 
There is, therefore, such a thing as performance in the interest of 
particularistic values. Furthermore other things than performances 
may be involved in the sanction system, and the achievement of 
certain responses on alter's part may be part of the goal. These may 
be expressive orientations on alter's part. There is thus in many 
cases an intricate web to unravel before the significance of the above 
propositions can be properly assessed. 

A particularly important case of this is the secondary type of 
achievement criterion, namely collective achievement, that is, 
achievement imputable to a collectivity as an actor. Membership in 
a collectivity is, we have seen, inherently a relational quality. This 
has certain implications for the structure of a role of "responsibility" 
in relation to a collectivity, notably a leadership role which may be 
defined as a role of diffuse responsibility relative to a collectivity. 
The focus of that responsibility is ahvays in one sense particularistic 
because of the relational involvement. Yet, the leadership role may 
be achievement-oriented and "success" measured in universalistic 
terms, given the goal, which must in some sense include "promotion 
of the welfare of the collectivity." 

It is in the light of considerations such as these that it is neces- 
sary to assess the implications of a value-orientation system which 



[ 96 ] Organization of the Components into Subsystems 

combines achievement values and particularism for the structure of 
the social system in which it is institutionalized. The particularistic 
component of the value-system places stringent limitations on the 
choice of goals to which achievement values may legitimately be 
applied. Above all the emphasis is thrown on collective achieve- 
ments and roles involving responsibility toward collectivities. This, 
for example, underlies the "collectivism" of traditional Chinese 
values as distinguished from our own type of individualism. 

To sum up, we may say that the ascription-achievement variable 
defines the major axis of differentiation of actors in a social system 
in their capacity as objects of orientation, as distinguished from their 
capacity as actors whose own orientations are to be analyzed. Since 
all statuses in the social system have to be entered into by the indi- 
vidual actor, if only by the fact of being bom, in the first place these 
criteria are relevant to classifying the discriminations by which 
actors are distributed among the statuses and roles of the social 
system. They thus define criteria of eligihility, and therefore in 
what roles ego may or may not appear vis-a-vis alter. Furthermore, 
they define patterns of differential treatment within a role, once the 
actor is an incumbent of it. They are foci for the definition of 
expectations for deciding between alternative evaluations. They 
constitute the framework for defining in what respects the actor 
as object (again both ego and alter) is significant, in the sense 
that is relevant to ego's orientation. 

§ THE SOLIDARITY OF THE COLLECTIVITY 

WE have so far dealt with the structure of role complexes, 
first treating the differentiation of the different roles composing such 
a complex in terms of the orientational content of the expectations 
and then in terms of selectivity as between the basic modalities of 
the objects of the orientations, of quality and performance. It re- 
mains to discuss the relevance of the problem of the specific coiw- 
m.onness of the value-orientation patterns of the participants in a 
system of social interaction. This constitutes one primary aspect of 
the integration of such a system. 

In one aspect or sense, of course, any actually existent system is 
"integrated" in that its parts have somehow to "intermesh." This 
is true of a system of roles in the same sense as any other type of 



The Solidarity of the Collectivity [ 97 ] 

system. Going one step further, there is, as we have seen, a norma- 
tive aspect of any system of social interaction. There is an element 
of common value-orientation, therefore, in any system of social inter- 
action. These values may, for example, be cognitive standards 
governing communication, or appreciative standards governing the 
appropriateness of expressive symbols. But the present concern is 
with the next "higher" level of integration, the "moral" in its rela- 
tional or social system relevance. 

On this level, it is not determined by the fact of interaction 
alone, or by the presence of common values in the more general 
sense, whether with respect to a given orientation-alternative choice, 
there is a "moral issue" involved or not. The problem may be purely 
an instrumental one of efficiency, or an expressive one of appropri- 
ate object choice and attitude. There is a moral issue only when the 
alternatives involve a presumption of relevance to the "integrity" or 
the "solidarity" of an interaction system when the preservation of 
that integrity or solidarity is itself a value. The fifth of the pattern 
variables constitutes the conceptualization of this alternative with 
reference to the integration of social systems. The case of self- 
orientation is the case where, in the choice in question, which 
alternative is chosen is felt to be or defined as indifferent as far as 
the integrity of a valued social system of action is concerned. That 
of collectivity-orientation on the other hand is that where such in- 
tegrity is defined as being involved, so that the actor who chooses 
one side is violating his responsihilities, to the system as a unit and 
its participant members. It is only when as action system involves 
solidarity^ in this sense that its members define certain actions as 
required in the interest of the integrity of the system itself, and 
others as incompatible with that integrity— with the result that sanc- 
tions are organized about this definition. Such a system will be called 
a "collectivity." Collectivity-orientation, as it were, involves posing 
the "question of confidence"; "are you one of us or not? your atti- 
tude on this question decides." 

It will be noted that solidarity in this sense involves going a step 
beyond "loyalty" as that concept was defined above. Loyalty is, as it 

^ It will be, evident that the present conception of patterns defining social 
morality and solidarity in this sense is congruent with Sumner's concept of the 
mores and Durkheim's of moral constraint. 



[ 98 ] Organization of the Comfonents into Suh-systems 

were, the uninstitutionalized precursor of solidarity, it is the "spill- 
ing over" of motivation to conform with the interests or expectations 
of alter beyond the boundaries of any institutionalized or agreed 
obligation. Collectivity-orientation on the other hand converts this 
"propensity" into an institutionalized obligation of the role-expecta- 
tion. Then whether the actor "feels like it" or not, he is obligated to 
act in ceetain ways and risks the application of negative sanctions 
if he does not. 

It is exceedingly important to be clear about the relativity of the 
concepts of solidarity and collectivity and hence the applicability of 
the self-collectivity variable. Only in the limiting case would a col- 
lectivity constitute an aggregate of persons as total individuals— that 
of a completely self-subsistent society. The type case is rather the 
aggregate as participants in a particular interactive system organized 
as a system of complementary roles, i.e., a partial social system. 
Therefore, an actor may be a member of as many collectivities as he 
has roles— there is no inherent limitation to that number. With 
regard to personnel of collectivities it follows that while some may 
be completely separate with no overlap, others overlap, with some 
members in common, others not, while still others are related as 
more and less inclusive collectivities. Thus in this country residents 
of a town or city are also residents of a state, and in turn also of the 
United States; they thus have the role of "citizen" in each of these 
three levels of governmental organization, that is, are members of 
all three collectivities. 

Every role, so far as it is institutionalized, involves a pattern of 
solidarity obligations; it entails, that is, membership in at least one 
collectivity. But in the 'particular orientation within the role these 
obligations may or may not be involved. The range of orientation 
alternatives relative to which they are not invoked is defined by the 
concept self-orientation, that where they are invoked by collectivity- 
orientation. Thus, to take a familiar example, the participants in a 
commercial market are members of a collectivity, the state, which 
has "rules of law." In their particular orientations to actual or poten- 
tial exchange partners, within certain limits, they may be "self- 
oriented," for example, with reference to negotiating agreements on 
particular prices. But beyond those limits solidarity obligations come 



The Solidarity of the Collectivity [ 99 ] 

to be invoked in the form of insistence on compliance with certain 
common rules, e.g., with respect to refraining from fraudulent mis- 
representations about the nature of commodities. The obligation to 
observe these rules is a collectivity-orientation element of the total 
role. When we speak of the system of market relations as "governed 
by self-interest" we mean that within a range of permissiveness de- 
fined by such a set of (formal and informal) rules, decisions can 
be made on grounds which are treated as irrelevant or indifferent in 
terms of solidarity obligations. To reiterate the crucial point: All in- 
stitutionalization involves common moral as well as other values. 
Collectivity obligations are, therefore, an aspect of every institu- 
tionalized role. But in certain contexts of orientation-choice these 
obligations may be latent, while in others they are "activated" in the 
sense that the actor faces the choice either of choosing the alterna- 
tives which conform with these values or of accepting the negative 
sanctions which go with violation. 

There is another aspect of latency which is particularly applic- 
able to collectivity-orientations or solidarity obligations but is also 
more widely relevant. Many obligations are contingent on certain 
specific situational conditions. In the absence of such conditions 
they may remain latent— e.g., a professor has an obligation to teach. 
An observer who knew him only in the summer months and did 
not see him teaching would obviously not be entitled to conclude 
that he was violating his obligation to teach or did not "recognize 
it." It is only that the obligation is latent when the university is 
not "in session." The only test, therefore, of the recognition of an 
obligation is the reaction of the actor in the specific situation to 
which it applies. Of course a secondary but not always reliable 
test is the verbal response to a question such as "what would you do 
in such and such a situation?" 

Conformity with expectations of collectivity-orientation may be 
called taking "responsibility" as a member of the collectivity. But it 
is a further step of elaboration to conceive of the collectivity "acting 
as a unit," or "in concert." Such action is, in a latent sense, a con- 
stitutive property of any collectivity— at a minimum a system which 
would in no sense ever "defend itself," that is, mobilize some kind 
of resistance to a threat to its integrity, could not be called a col- 



[ I oo ] Organization of the Com'ponents into Subsystems 

lectivity in the present sense. But only in certain types of situation 
wall this latent property of action in concert be mobilized or 
activated. 

A collectivity in which expressive interests have primacy in its 
orientation to continual action in concert may for lack of a better 
term, be called a Gemeinschaft; one in which instrumental interests 
have primacy is an "organization" in the sense defined above. In 
so far as either type has explicit and formalized rules and differen- 
tiated organs of implementation of collective action (including 
interpretation and enforcement of rules) it is an "association."* 

When the association level of the organization of collectivities 
is reached, and to some degree short of this, it certainly involves an 
internal differentiation of roles with respect to the functions of the 
collectivity as a unit, as well as those of what may be called its 
primary division of labor. This differentiation is about the axis of 
"responsibility" relative to the possibilities of "action in concert." 
Internally this may be called a leadership role. When the special 
concern is with relations of the collectivity and its members outside 
itself, to other persons and collectivities, it may be called a "repre- 
sentative" role. 

In terms of the discussion of the division of labor earlier in this 
chapter it should be clear that, while there is a good deal of room 
for differences of specification, relative to specialized "contributions" 
to a cooperative action system, leadership roles are always diffuse. 
Responsibility in the present sense can never be confined to the 
efficient performance of a specialized function, but involves in some 
sense coordinating a variety of factors and contingencies in the inter- 
est of the collective goals. Like so many of the distinctions involved 
in this discussion, there is an important relativity about this one. But 
the focus on relational context as distinguished from technical goal, 
is the essential criterion of a leadership or executive role. 

At the limiting pole of completely uninstitutionalized fluidity a 
system of social interaction would involve no collectivities in the 
technical sense of the present discussion; it would be only an 
ecological complex. But this is definitely a limiting case. No actual 
society approaches close to it. The only concretely relevant cases 

* This terminology is similar to, but a somewhat modified version of, that of 
Max Weber. Cf. The Theory of Social and Economic Organization, Chapter I. 



Types of Social Value-Orientation [ loi ] 

which do are certain classes of partial social systems within an insti- 
tutionalized society, such as ad hoc small groups set up for purposes 
of observation. Such a group will not yet have attained an institu- 
tionalized structure peculiar to itself, and, therefore, until a certain 
stage of its integration as a group is reached, it does not make sense 
to apply the variable of self-collectivity orientation to it. This case is 
empirically important as calling attention to the fact that the col- 
lectivity-structure of a larger social system is always more or less 
fluid, though societies differ greatly in this respect. But there is a 
continual process of dissolutioii of old collectivities and formation of 
new ones, and this is one of the most important processes of social 
change. It does not, of course, preclude that there should also be 
processes of change within a collectivity which do not destroy its 
identity. 

In one sense a social system, except for the above limiting case, 
may be regarded as a collectivity. But in a much more important 
sense a society or any at all complex partial social system is to be 
regarded as a net-work of collectivities, side by side, overlapping 
and larger-smaller. The concept of collectivity has here been intro- 
duced as one of the most important of the sub-structures of the struc- 
ture of social systems, not as a name for the overall characterization 
of such systems. 

§ TYPES OF SOCIAL VALUE-ORIENTATION 

THE main thread of the organization of material of this 
chapter has been the pattern variables and their context of applica- 
bility to the different modes of organization of the components of 
relational systems. In conclusion we may bring together this material 
by showing how all five of the variables can be used to set forth a 
classification of value-pattern types defining role-orientations. This 
is done in Table 2. The organization of this table of classification 
requires some comment. 

When the pattern variables are seen in the context of the general 
action scheme, they fall into a pattern of mutual interrelations; they 
do not, that is, simply constitute a list, but they have important 
systematic interrelations. There is a certain symmetry in the scheme 
which revolves about an axis which has two primar)' aspects of sig- 
nificance. This axis is that of the polarity between motivational 



[ I02 ] Organization of the Comfonents into Subsystems 

orientation on the one hand, and cultural orientation on the other. 
In the presendy relevant sense, as will be evident from the above 
analysis, it is the value-orientation aspect of culture which is of 
crucial significance here. 

TABLE 2a 

Tyjpes of Combination of Value-Orientation Components' 
Major Social Value-Orientations 



UNIVERSALISM 



PARTICULARISM 



Achieve- 
ment 



A. 
Universalistic Achievement 
Pattern 


B. 
Particularistic Achievement 
Pattern 


Expectation of active achieve- 
ments in accord with universal- 
ized standards and generahzed 
rules relative to other actors. 


Expectation of active achieve- 
ments relative to and/or on be- 
half of the particular relational 
context in which the actor is in- 
volved. 


C. 

Universalistic Ascription 
Pattern 


D. 

Particularistic Ascription 
Pattern 


Expectation of orientation of ac- 
tion to a universalistic norm de- 
fined either as an ideal state or 
as embodied in the status-struc- 
ture of the existing society. 


Expectation of orientation of ac- 
tion to an ascribed status within 
a given relational context. 



Ascription 



This polarity of the reference points of action systems in general 
is reflected on the next level of derivation "down" toward their con- 
crete structure, that is, in the pattern variables, in that two of them 
are of particular relevance to one pole of the reference system, two 
to the other, and the fifth is, as it were, "neutral" between them. 
These relations are diagrammatically represented in Chart I. 

The first section of the present chapter built up certain ele- 

"^ For simplicity the pattern variable of self vs. collectivity orientation is omitted 
from these tables. Because of its symmetrical relation to the whole scheme it can 
be used to subdivide any cell in the tables. 



Types of Social Value-Orientation [ 103 ] 



TABLE 2b 

Types of Value-Orientation Components of Social Role-Expectation 

Universalism 



Universalistic 
Achievement 
Patterns -> 



Specificity 



Achievement 



DifiFuseness 



Specificity 



Ascription 



Diffuseness 

Universalistic 
Ascriptive 
Patterns -^ 



AFFECTIVITY 



NEUTRALITY 



I 

Expectation of specific affec- 
tive expressions toward a class 
of objects designated on basis 
of achievement. 


2 

Expectation of specific disci- 
plined action in relation to a 
class of objects designated on 
basis of achievement. 


3 

Expectation of diffuse affec- 
tive expression toward classes 
of objects on basis of achieve- 
ment. 


4 

Expectation of diffuse disci- 
plined action toward classes of 
objects on basis of achieve- 
ment. 






9 
Expectation of specific affec- 
tive expression toward class of 
objects on basis of qualities. 


10 

Expectation of specific disci- 
plined action toward class of 
objects on basis of qualities. 


II 

Expectation of diffuse affec- 
tive expression toward class of 
objects on basis of quahties. 


12 

Expectation of diffuse disci- 
plined action toward class of 
objects on basis of qualities. 



[ 1 04 ] Organization of the Components into Suh-systems 

TABLE 2b— CContinuei) 

Types of Value-Orientation Components of Social Role-Exfectation 

Particularism 



AFFECnviTY 


NEUTRALITY 


5 

Expectation of specific afiFec- 
tive expression vis-^-vis a par- 
ticiolar object or one in par- 
ticular relationship on basis of 
performance. 


6 

Expectation of specific disci- 
plined action toward an object 
in particularistic relation to 
ego on basis of performances. 


7 

Expectation of diffuse affec- 
tive expression toward object 
in particularistic relation to 
ego on basis of performance. 


8 

Expectation of diffuse disci- 
plined action toward object in 
particularistic relation to ego 
on basis of performance. 






13 
Expectation of specific affec- 
tive expression toward object 
in particularistic relation to 
ego on basis of qualities. 


14 

Expectation of specific disci- 
plined action toward object in 
particularistic relation to ego 
on basis of qualities. 


15 

Expectation of diffuse affec- 
tive expression toward object 
in particularistic relation to 
ego on basis of qualities. 


i6 

Expectation of diffuse disci- 
plined action toward object in 
particularistic relation to ego 
on basis of qualities. 



Particularistic 

Achievement 

«- Patterns 



Specificity 



Achievement 



Diffuseness 



Specificity 



Ascription 



Diffuseness 

Particularistic 
Ascriptive 
<r- Patterns 



Types of Social Value-Orientation [ 105 ] 

mentary types of social sub-system from the organization of types 
of action-orientation in different relational systems. This analysis 
started out from the pole of motivational orientations. It used them, 
not on the most elementary level, but on that of organization with 
cultural elements which was called, in Chapter II, evaluative action 
orientation. The two pattern variables of affectivity-neutrality and 
specificity-diffuseness were the ones most directly relevant to that 

CHART I 

Grouping of Pattern Variables 



Value-Orientation 




\^^ 




G)llective, Self 





Motivational-Orientation 

motivational focus and may be said to be the keynote of value- 
orientation relevance on that level. The universalism-particularism 
variable was then brought in as introducing further specification 
into the structuring of these orientations, above all because of its 
relevance to the primacy of cognitive elements in instrumental 
orientations, once goals are assumed as given. 

This consideration, combined with their relevance to the struc- 
ture of personality which will be discussed in Chapter V below, 
justifies putting this pair of variables together. They may, indeed, 
be considered as the major axes of the organization of action with 
reference to the needs of personality, that is, in the first context of 



[ io6 ] Organization of the Com'ponents into Suh-systems 

the problems of functional prerequisites of social systems discussed 
in Chapter II, the Hobbesian problem of order. They formulate the 
necessity of balances in two fundamental respects. On the one hand 
the actor must have gratifications; without them he can neither sub- 
sist nor be adequately motivated for the performance of social roles. 
On the other hand he must also accept discipline, both in the inter- 
est of his own longer run gratification-deprivation balance, and in 
the social interest, that of his role-performance. Secondly in its 
psychological reference the specificity-diffuseness variable in the 
first place formulates the significance of diffuse loyalties, but at the 
same time conversely the necessity of limitations on such loyalties, 
in the interest of instrumental performances and kinds of gratifica- 
tion which cannot be integrated with attachments. In relation to 
collectivities solidarity with its diffusion of responsibility to the col- 
lectivity, involving diffuseness, is the institutionalized counterpart of 
loyalty between individuals without institutionalization. 

We must keep in mind that we are here dealing with the social 
system context, not with action in general. Hence these two vari- 
ables for us concern the mechanisms which mediate between the 
needs and capacities of the personalities which as actors compose 
social systems, and the structure of the social systems themselves. 

The other pair of variables is universalism-particularism and 
ascription-achievement. These variables have, by contrast with the 
other pair, reference to the social system as such. They are con- 
cerned, as we have seen, respectively with the type of value-norms 
which enter into the structure of the social system, and with the 
ways in which the characteristics of actors as objects of orientation 
are "taken account of" in the selective processes through which 
social structures are built up. Both pairs of variables are constitutive 
of the structure of the relational system, otlierwise they would not 
be relevant to the present analysis. But the second pair is concerned 
more with the social-system pole of functional reference. There is a 
sense in which the motivational adequacy of a social system to the 
needs of individuals can be more nearly accounted for in terms of 
the first pair, ignoring the second. But this is not true of the bases 
of structural differentiation and variability of social systems. In a 
sense, therefore, the second pair will have primacy for analysis of the 
variability of social systems as structural types, the combinations of 



Types of Social Value-Orientation [107] 

the first pair being, as it were, resultants of the fact that a given 
society is structured in a given way with respect to the second pair. 
On the other hand, for analysis of adjustive and personality prob- 
lems, and of the variability of these phenomena within a given social 
structure, the first pair will have primacy. 

Finally the fifth variable, self-collectivity-orientation has been 
placed "in the middle." This is because it does not as such have 
primary structural significance, but rather its significance is integra- 
tive. It is, to be sure, just as the others are, a component of the 
structure of social systems, otherwise it would not belong here. But 
the reference points for this variable are "internal" to the social 
system itself, they are relational as it were, while the reference points 
for the other four variables are "external" in the sense of referring 
to features of the action-components which are logically prior to 
their organization in social systems. 

For these reasons, in Table 2 the fourfold table of possible com- 
binations of the variables, universalism-particularism and ascription- 
achievement are given primacy as yielding a classification of four 
major types of social value-orientation. Each of the cells of this first 
part of the table may, however, be regarded not as a single cell but 
as a summary designation for a "block" of eight cells of the full 
table which details all the thirty-two possibilities of combination 
of polar values of the five variables. However, for most purposes of 
classification of social structure, it seems justified to regard these 
latter as "sub-types" of the four major types. This point should not, 
however, be overemphasized. The most important thing is the 
classification itself, and the possibility of deriving a systematic classi- 
fication of this sort from the most general considerations of the 
structure of action and its elaboration in social systems. It consti- 
tutes the fundamental starting point for a classification of possible 
types of social structure and eventually of societies. It should, how- 
ever, be quite clear that as such it does not constitute such a classi- 
fication because it includes only the value-orientation element and 
does not account for the rest of the components of the social system. 

A very brief comment on each of the four major types is in order 
to give the classification some kind of concrete relevance; fuller dis- 
cussion will be reserved to Chapter V. Cell i, the "Universal- 
istic Achievement Pattern" is best exemplified in the dominant 



[ I o8 ] Organization of the Components into Suh-sy stems 

American ethos. The combination of universalism and achievement- 
orientation puts the primary emphasis on universahstically defined 
goal-achievement and on the dynamic quahty of continuing to 
achieve particular goals. It does not emphasize a "final" goal-state, 

TABLE 2c 
Major Types of Value-Orientation of Personal Attitudes 



AFFBcynvmr 



NEUTRALITY 



Specificity 



A. 

Receptiveness-Responsiveness 
Attitude 


B. 

Approval Attitude 


Disposition to be receptive to 
and respond to alter's attitude of 
expectation of mutual gratifica- 
tions within a specific sphere or 
context. 


Disposition to approve alter's 
action within a specific sphere 
conditional on his performances 
in terms of a standard. 


c. 

Love Attitude 


D. 

Esteem Attitude 


Disposition to be receptive to 
and to reciprocate a diffuse affec- 
tive attachment to alter and ac- 
cept the obligation of loyalty 
accompanying it. 


Disposition to evaluate alter as 
a total personality relative to a 
set of standards. 



DifiFuseness 



which once achieved is to be maintained in perpetuity. The com- 
bination of universalism with achievement values puts the primary 
universalistic accent on process, that is, on means-choice and par- 
ticular goal-choice, leaving the goal-system fluid. In some such 
sense the philosophy of Pragmatism epitomizes this orientation. 

When universalism is combined with an ascriptive emphasis in 
Cell 3 on the other hand, to constitute the "Universalistic Ascriptive 
Pattern" the primary relevance of universalistic standards shifts to 
the validation of the quality-ideal. The focus is on the attainment 
of an ideal state of aff^airs, which once attained is considered to be 
permanently valid. But the universalistic element introduces a factor 
of strain since, in its main lines, it is scarcely possible to maintain 



Types of Social Value-Orientation [109] 

TABLE 2d 

Types of Value-Orientation Comfonents of Need-Dispositions (Attitudes) 

of Personality 



Affectivity 

UNIVERSALISM 



PARTICULARISM 



Receptiveness- 
Responsiveness 
Block -> 

Ascription 
Specificity 

Achievement 


I 

Disposition to receive and give 
specific gratifications vis-^-vis 
any member of a class of qual- 
ity-selected objects. 


2 

Disposition to receive and give 
specific gratifications in recip- 
rocal relation wdth a particular 
object possessing special quali- 
ties. 


3 

Disposition to receive and give 
specific gratifications to any 
object in a class characterized 
by a type of performance. 


4 

Disposition to receive and give 
specific gratifications in inter- 
action with a particular object 
on the basis of mutual per- 
formances. 








Ascription 


9 

Disposition to love and be 
loved by any person belong- 
ing to a class defined by speci- 
fied qualities. 


10 

Disposition to love and be 
loved by a particular object by 
virtue of specific quahties. 


Diffuseness 

Achievement 

Love 
Block -> 


II 

Disposition to love and be 
loved by any object conform- 
ing to standards of perform- 
ance. 


12 

Disposition to love and be 
loved by a particular object by 
virtue of its specific perform- 
ance record or prospects. 



[ 1 1 o ] Organization of the Components into Subsystems 

TABLE 2d— (.Continued') 

Types of Value-Orientation Components of Need-Dispositions (Attitudes) 

of Personality 



UNIVERSALISM 



Neutrality 

PARTICULARISM 



5 

Disposition to approve and be 
approved by object possessing 
or on a basis of specific quali- 
ties. 


6 

Disposition to approve and be 
approved in reciprocal rela- 
tion to particular object on 
basis of specific qualities. 


7 

Disposition to approve and be 
approved by any of class of 
objects vdth specific perform- 
ance records or capacities. 


8 

Disposition to approve and be 
approved in reciprocal rela- 
tionship with particular object 
on basis of mutual specific 
performances. 






13 

Disposition to esteem and 
want to be esteemed by any 
object possessed of certain 
qualities. 


14 
Disposition to esteem and 
want to be esteemed by a 
particular object by virtue of 
possession of specific qualities. 


15 
Disposition to esteem and 
want to be esteemed by any 
object conforming to given 
standards. 


16 

Disposition to esteem and 
want to be esteemed by a 
particular object on basis of 
given performances or pros- 
pects. 



Approval 
«- Block 



Ascription 



Specificity 



Achievement 



Ascription 



Diffuseness 



Achievement 



Esteem 
<- Block 



Types of Social Value-Orientation [ n i ] 

that any status quo of a social system conforms with any sharply 
defined ideal state. Hence a tendency to a dualism of ideal and real. 
Broadly the philosophy of "idealism" and the German cultural ideal 
seem to conform with this pattern. 

When we move to Cell 2, the combination of particularism and 
achievement which is called the "Particularistic Achievement Pat- 
tern" there is a great mitigation of this tension between ideal and 
real, for the focus is no longer on an absolutely ideal state, but on a 
given dynamic relational system. But with the accent on achieve- 
ment the actor's relation to this is "dynamically" conceived. It is 
not something which "comes automatically," but which must be 
achieved, and may, if not enough care is taken, deteriorate and have 
to be re-achieved. An excellent example seems to be the Classical 
Chinese cultural pattern, with its concept of a harmonious order 
for the maintenance or restoration of which men are held to be re- 
sponsible. There is truth in the common saying that the Confucian 
Chinese were above all concerned with morality, namely responsi- 
bility for the maintenance of a given social structure as a going con- 
cern. But, by contrast with both universalistic types of pattern this 
is, as Max Weber said, a doctrine of "adaptation to the world" not 
of "mastery over the world." 

Finally, the combination of ascription and particularism yields 
what may be called the "Particularistic Ascriptive Pattern." Here 
the order is conceived as given in a more radical sense, in that man 
is thought of as adapting his action within an order for which he 
cannot be held responsible. The accent, therefore, is on "making 
the most" of expressive opportunities, using the social order as a 
kind of "stage" for the play. The Spanish-American pattern seems 
to be a close approximation to this type. 

One or two interesting relations between these four types may 
be called to attention. First they involve an order of "tension" which 
may be put roughly as Cells 3, i, 2, 4 from high to low. This order 
is changed, however, when the focus is on responsibility for the 
social system as such, that is, the accent is on collectivity-orientation. 
Here it seems that there are two pairs. Cells 2 and 3 place a strong 
accent on such responsibility because a system as such is in the 
center of attention. Cells i and 4 on the other hand tend to be much 
more "individualistic" but of very different types in the two cases. 



[ 1 1 2 ] Organization of the Components into Subsystems 

In the first case it is a kind of "goal-achievement" individuahsm 
which is not bound into a particularistic nexus as in Cell 2, in that 
the accent on achievement tends to preclude subordinating the 
achieving unit to a system in any sense, and the ascriptive focus on 
an absolute ideal is lacking. In the case of cell 4, on the other hand, 
the individualism has an expressive focus, because it has to take 
place within a framework treated as given. 

Relationships of this character will be further discussed later. 
Next, however, it is essential to place these cultural ideal patterns 
in their ada'ptive context in relation to the functional problems of 
social systems. In a very broad way the differentiations between 
types of social system do correspond to this order of cultural value 
pattern differentiation, but only in a very broad way. Actual social 
structures are not value-pattern types, but resultants of the integra- 
tion of value-patterns with the other components of the social 
system. 



IV 

JL V THE STRUCTURE OF THE SO- 
CIAL SYSTEM, II: INVARIANT POINTS OF REFER- 
ENCE FOR THE STRUCTURAL DIFFERENTIATION 
AND VARIATION OF SOCIETIES 



THE foregoing chapter brought us a step farther toward 
the conception of an operating social system. Instead of deaHng only 
with the more elementary components of such a system, as was done 
in Chapter II, it showed how these elementary components could 
be organized into relational complexes and collectivities, and how 
the structure of these complexes could vary about the fundamental 
foci of crystallization of the social system. The task of the present 
chapter is to show how, in turn, these "sub-systems" are brought 
together to constitute more complex social systems, approaching the 
level of concreteness vdth which the empirical sociologist is con- 
cerned. 

The norm for this discussion will be the society as defined above, 
that is, the social system which is potentially or, "in principle" self- 
subsistent. This is essential because only with reference to this norm 
can the problems of differentiation of a total system be analyzed. 
However, the results of the analysis will be applicable to any partial 
social system once it can be satisfactorily "located" within the society 
of which it is a part, and its boundaries relative to the rest of the 
society determined. 

We shall have to start by analyzing still another set of points of 
reference, the functional foci for the structural differentiation of the 

113 



[114] Invariant Points of Reference for Social Structure 

social system. These points of reference may be regarded as the 
derivatives, on the requisite level of concreteness, of the points of 
reference for the analysis of action-orientations dealt with above, 
and many specific connections with that foregoing analysis will be 
established. 

§ THE FOCI OF CRYSTALLIZATION FOR 
SOCIAL STRUCTURE 

A SOCIAL system is, with respect to its structurally signifi- 
cant components, a differentiated system. For our purposes we can 
assume that what is differentiated is the unit of structure with which 
so much of the foregoing discussion has been concerned, the role in- 
cluding the object-significances of actors as well as their orientation 
patterns. Hence the fundamental focus for the analysis of the system 
as a differentiated system concerns the ways in which roles within 
it are differentiated and, in turn, these differentiated roles are inte- 
grated together, that is "mesh" to form a functioning system. At the 
same time it is not only roles which are differentiated. The indi- 
vidual and collective actors must be distributed between the various 
roles and role-clusters in the social system. Furthermore, so far as the 
roles involve instrumental orientations there must be facilities, and, 
so far as they involve expressive orientations, rewards. 

The differentiation of the social system may then be treated 
under two main headings. First, it is a system of differentiated roles. 
The types of which it is composed, how they are distributed within 
the social system and how integrated with each other must be 
analyzed. This is what we mean by the social structure in the nar- 
rower sense of the term. Secondly, however, given the role struc- 
ture, we must analyze the processes of distribution of "movable" 
elements as between statuses and roles. This process of distribution 
of significant objects within the role-system will be called allocation.^ 
There are three contexts of the problem of allocation which we will 
have to consider: i) the allocation of personnel, i.e., of actors, be- 
tween roles; 2) the allocation of facilities; and 3) the allocation of 
rewards. The last two can, for certain purposes, be treated together 

^ The term is taken from economics and means essentially distribution in the 
perspective of functional significance to the system. 



The Foci of Crystallization [115] 

as constituting the allocation of possessions. Each of these will be 
discussed in turn, but first a few words need to be said about the 
general significance of allocation itself. 

Allocation is, as noted, essentially an economic concept, and as 
here used is concerned with the "economic" aspect of the social sys- 
tem, but this is treated in a somewhat broader sense than is cus- 
tomary in the discipline of economics. The basic concept is the 
dilemma of scarcity which is always relative to demand. This is, in 
turn, a version of the still more general dilemma of "wanting to eat 
your cake and have it," that is of the incompatibilities of two or 
more things which, from some point of view, are both desired. The 
most obvious cases of allocation are those of quantifiable entities, 
which must somehow be divided up between claims and claimants. 
Money is of course a type case since the question "how much?" has 
a completely unambiguous meaning. But even where quantification 
reaches only the level of rank-ordering, essentially the same basic 
problem arises. 

The distribution of role-types within the social system has been 
separated off from the three problems of allocation of "movable" 
elements within the system. There is, however, an allocative aspect 
to this distribution which is in a sense the obverse of the other three 
allocations. Roles are, from the point of view of the functioning of 
the social system, the primary mechanisms through which the essen- 
tial functional prerequisites of the system are met. There is the same 
order of relationship between roles and functions relative to the 
system in social systems, as there is between organs and functions 
in the organism. There is not, with certain exceptions to be noted, an 
inherently limited supply of roles which has to be allocated among 
claimants. However, if the role is to serve the requisite functions in 
the social system, it must be adapted to the capacities and needs of 
the incumbents. The role structure must be adapted to such condi- 
tions as the possibility of the same individual combining a given set 
of roles in his own activity; e.g., with respect to time limitations, to 
requirements of geographical location of the activities, with respect 
to psychological compatibility, as in the case of requiring both de- 
cisive action and reflective thought from the incumbent of the same 
role. 

Subject to such conditions the performance of the various func- 



[ 1 1 6 ] Invariant Points of Reference for Social Structure 

tions essential to the system comes to be allocated among the popu- 
lation of the system through the patterning of their roles, and must, 
as noted, be adapted to the human material. But precisely because 
in the larger scale social systems the role structure itself is the stabler 
element it is for most purposes more convenient to consider a given 
role structure as the major point of reference for the analysis of the 
three allocative processes we have distinguished. 

There is one specific scarcity aspect relative to the distribution 
of role-content between persons. In a given social system, with a 
given type and level of difiFerentiation, if the functions of a role are 
specialized relative to the social system, there will not be "room" for 
an indefinite number of the particular class of roles in the same sys- 
tem. There is a wide variation between types of roles in this respect. 
If, as is always empirically the case, socialization is organized largely 
about kinship, there is necessarily "room" for as many mother roles 
as there are conjugal family units in the society, generally approach- 
ing the number of adult couples in the society; in other words prac- 
tically any adult woman will be "eligible" for a mother role. But at 
the other end of the distribution there may be some types of role 
which in the nature of the case must be extremely limited in num- 
bers in the same society. There seem to be essentially two types of 
these. One is the type of role which is near the "top" in a scale of 
responsibility or prestige or both— e.g., there can be only one Presi- 
dent of the United States at a time— the other is the type of role 
which is extremely specialized in other respects— hence there are 
severe limitations on the "market" for the relevant products or serv- 
ices. An example would be the role of theoretical physicist. 

The existence of different types of roles in the same society dis- 
tributed among the population in different ways is of course also 
limited by their mutual compatibility in the svstem, whether they 
mesh or generate conflict. This, however, is an integrative, not an 
allocative aspect of the problems of social structure. 

We have noted that this distribution of role types is itself the 
basic structure of the social system as a system. This structure is 
described by the answers to such questions as of what types of roles 
is it made up, in what proportions and how distributed in "clusters"? 
But to develop a conception of the social system it is highly im- 



The Foci of Crystallization [117] 

portant to relate this role structure to the three allocative problem- 
foci of the social system. 

The first of these is the allocation of personnel.^ From the point 
of view of the analysis of personality, roles are, as it were, allocated 
to actors. But from the point of view of the social system the primary 
allocative problem is the obverse, the regulation of the "flow" of 
personnel within the role-system. It is of course possible that the 
two processes should coincide as in the development of a new social 
structure. But the larger, stabler social structures obviously transcend 
the life-span of the human individual, or that sector of it which 
is suitable for incumbency of a given role. Social structures, even 
relatively stable ones, change too, but their rhythms and periodici- 
ties of change are not the same as those of the individual life cycle. 
There must from the point of view of the going social system, there- 
fore, be a continual process of "replacement" of the personnel in the 
roles of the social system. It is of course essential to stability in most 
cases that this should not come all at once, and it seldom does but 
nevertheless it is always going on. 

The first allocative "decision" about a given individual of course 
concerns where he is going to start off. This is, in all known societies 
determined by the fact that he is an infant of a given sex, and that 
he is bom as a child into a particular position in a particular kinship 
unit. The initial allocative criteria, therefore, are in the nature of 
the case ascri'ptive, both classificatory, with respect to age and sex, 
which presumably cannot be changed, and relational, with respect 
to kinship unit membership, which conceivably might. Why kin- 
ship ascription should be universal constitutes an empirical problem. 

In some respects in all societies, and overwhelmingly in some, 
status by birth continues as an allocative criterion throughout the life 
cycle. But in some respects which are functionally of the highest 
significance, there is in all societies a series of status changes in the 
course of the life cycle. TTie sequence may be ascriptively pre- 
determined or it may not, that is, there may be selection-points 
where a sorting out process takes place at various stages. 

Besides the automatically ascriptive mechanism of which allo- 

^ Collectivities as actors are within limits also subject to allocation as units. 
The following discussion wUl, however, be confined to individual actors. 



[ 1 1 8 j invariant Points of Reference for Social Structure 

cation of status and role by birth is the type case, there are two other 
principally relevant possibilities, the second of which falls into two 
major sub-types. The first is the allocation by explicit decision of 
other persons, what is usually called the system of appointment. 

The second is allocation as the outcome of an unplanned selec- 
tive process. Such a selective process may be competitive to a greater 
or less degree. In one sub-type those who "happen" to reach a cer- 
tain position are automatically selected. In the other sub-type the 
actor "tries for" a given role-status as a goal of intentional endeavor 
and in order to reach his goal must win out over his competitors. 
The type case of the latter which may be called competitive alloca- 
tion is of course the process of economic competition in the market 
situation. 

All three of these types are continually involved in social systems 
and occur in varying combinations. Allocation by appointment very 
generally is combined with selective processes in that appointment 
is from among those who have qualified for it by some criterion of 
eligibility. Fulfillment of the criteria may or may not be the result 
of a competitive endeavor to meet them. Thus it may be laid down 
that a high Government appointment should go to a prominent 
businessman. But it would be extremely unlikely that any of those 
considered for it became prominent businessmen in order to qualify 
for this type of appointment. On the other hand, certainly most 
graduate students directly seek the Ph.D. degree in part at least 
in order to qualify for a certain class of academic or research 
appointment. 

Analysis of what above has been called the Hobbesian problem 
of order shows conclusively that competitive allocation cannot oper- 
ate without institutionalization of a set of norms defining the limits 
of legitimate action, particularly in this case with regard to legiti- 
macy of means of attaining the goal. Both appointive and selective 
allocation are associated with primacy of achievement-orientation 
over ascriptive. The "power of appointment" may indeed be re- 
garded as a further specification of the regulation of competition in 
terms of rules. The raison d'etre of appointment is often to ensure 
the closest possible approximation to an achievement norm. But 
both types are, in different ways, open to possibilities of "bias" of any 
given selective criteria, the competitive through the "loopholes" of 



The Foci of Crystallization [119] 

the system of regulatory norms and of their enforcement, the ap- 
pointive through biases in the action of the appointing "authorities" 
(often of course a reflection of "pressures"). 

Facihties, it will be remembered from the last chapter, are pos- 
sessions which are significant as means to further goals in complexes 
of instrumental orientation. The criteria of a facility are therefore 
intrinsic transferability between actors, individual or collective, and 
relevance to instrumental orientation. The former distinguishes it 
from the modality of an actor as object; neither his qualities nor his 
performances are intrinsically transferable, they are always and 
indelibly "his." Facilities must also be distinguished from rewards. 
Rewards may or may not be the same concrete possessions in another 
aspect. But in any case analytically the distinction is crucial. Re- 
wards are always to be understood as part of the complex of expres- 
sive symbolism not part of the instrumental means-end complex. 

A possession has been defined as an entity which is transferable 
from one actor to another, which can change hands through the 
process of exchange. This entity, the possession as such, is always a 
right or a bundle of rights. In other words, it is a set of expectations 
relative to social behavior and attitudes. It is never as such a physi- 
cal object, but always consists in rights in or relative to physical, 
social, or cultural objects, rights of use or of control of disposal. At 
the very least ego's right implies the negative obligation of alter to 
refrain from interfering with ego's use or control of the object of his 
rights of possession; on occasion it may go further to require positive 
performances from alter, such as relinquishment of a mode of con- 
trol which "rightfully belongs" to ego. 

It is true that physical objects "change hands," but in terms of 
the social system this is not the essential but a derivative phe- 
nomenon. In innumerable cases of transfer of possessions in a physi- 
cal sense nothing changes hands, or only a symbolic entity, e.g., a 
"piece of paper." This is true even with respect to rights in physical 
objects, where, as in the case of land, the object "stays put" and what 
changes is the relation to it of the previous "owner" on the one hand 
and the new one on the other. But many of the most important 
objects in which there are rights of possession are not physical at 
all, but may be cultural objects, e.g., the "book" an author has 
wnritten. Another exceedingly important class is that of relational 



[ 1 20 ] Invariant Points of Reference for Social Structure 

possessions. By this is meant the incumbency of given positions in 
the social system to which certain advantages attach and which may 
be rehnquished in favor of another. Thus eHgibiHty for a status, 
e.g., a "job," or a claim to the services of another, may be a possession. 

Every social system must have mechanisms for the allocation of 
possessions as facilities, because their possession is desirable and they 
are inherently limited in supply relative to demand. The next ques- 
tion concerns the sources of this scarcity, and the implications of 
these facts for the social system. For present purposes it is sufficient 
to classify these sources as relational and non-relational. 

The non-relational sources are extrinsic to the social system as 
such. They concern for example physical and biological limitations 
on the availability of physical objects or the fact that though they 
can be produced, this is at a cost in the economic sense of the term. 
Thus buildings, machines and the like are limited in supply for cost 
reasons. Tliis whole subject has been so fully treated in the litera- 
ture of economics that it need not detain us further here. 

Similar considerations apply to a certain class of cultural pos- 
sessions which may be important as facilities. Thus specialized tech- 
nical knowledge can be acquired only through labor, and often 
through access to other special facilities as well, such as the services 
of teachers and various types of equipment, e.g., books. When such 
knowledge can only be attained at a cost, or far more effectively by 
utilizing such facilities, the possessor of the specialized knowledge 
may acquire rights in it as a possession, for example the right to use 
an academic degree, which may even as in the case of the M.D. 
degree, be the prerequisite of practicing a given profession. 

An intermediate case is that of physical possessions which are for 
physical reasons intrinsically incapable of increase and cannot there- 
fore be produced at any case. The most familiar example is space on 
the surface of the earth. A particularly desirable location, e.g., an 
urban business site, must therefore be allocated to some user, and 
many competitors for it excluded. The same is essentially true of 
time limitations. Because of the finitude of the human life span it 
is strictly impossible for anyone ever to "find the time" to do every- 
thing he might want to do. These two bases of intrinsic limitation 
alone are sufficient to preclude the notion sometimes put forward 
that we are on the verge of an "economy of abundance" where 



The Foci of Crystallization [121] 

scarcity in the economic sense would come to be in principle 
meaningless. 

The most fundamental limitation, however, is the directly rela- 
tional one, as distinguished from the indirectly relational character 
of space and time limitations on the freedom of action. The rela- 
tional limitation rests upon the fact that it is inherent in the nature 
of social interaction that the gratification of ego's need-dispositions 
is contingent on alter's action and vice versa. The action system of 
each actor is a finite system of limited possibilities. Therefore alter 
in the nature of the case cannot do everything ego might want him 
to do, and vice versa. Relational possessions in the sense of rights of 
any actor to count on certain reciprocal actions (and attitudes) of 
others, must in the nature of the case be organized into a patterned 
system. Every actor must distribute his actions which are significant 
to others in a determinate way, as between the various claimants, as 
between types of action, and as between occasions, and this de- 
terminate organization must be mutual. Ego, for example, cannot, 
in the sense of what we mean by an occupational role, "work for" an 
indefinite number of clients or employers. The fact that he must 
choose is reflected in the fact that not all the alters who might like 
to have his services can do so. 

So far as it concerns the problem of the allocation of facilities 
this basically relational problem of order we shall, following Hobbes, 
call the problem of "power. With one qualification Hobbes' own 
famous definition of power "a man's present means to any future 
good" fits the case. We would add the qualification, that such means 
constitute his power, so far as these means are dependent on his 
relations to other actors; the correlative is the obligation of alter to 
respect ego's rights. Hence in one aspect all possession of facilities 
is possession of power because it is at least in an implied and con- 
tingent sense a control over the actions of others, at least in the sense 
of ability to count on their non-interference. There is a complete 
shading off between this negative, contingent aspect of power, and 
the positive aspect, ego's capacity to influence the action of others in 
the interest of attainment of his positive goal beyond merely 
counting on their otherwise expected non-interference. 

Power and its bases may be highly specific and particularized. 
Thus possession of a particular bit of land may have no further social 



[ 122 ] hivariant Points of Reference for Social Structure 

implications than the "power" to forestall trespass. But the sig- 
nificance of power in the social system, besides the institutionaliza- 
tion of rights to particularized possessions, is dependent on the fact 
of its generalization and, as a consequence of this, of its quantifica- 
tion. This generalization and quantification is a matter of degree with 
highly different levels of development in different social systems. It 
seems to depend above all on three conditions. The first is the inher- 
ent significance of what we have called the exchange problem in all 
systems of differentiated roles. The higher the degree of differentia- 
tion of the role system, the more extended the network of exchange 
relationships must become, the more that is, there must be processes 
of settlement of terms between the incumbents of different roles. 
It is in these processes of the settlement of terms that the oppor- 
tunity to exercise power arises, and that its significance to goal- 
achievement resides. This is essentially another way of stating the 
fact of the inherently relational character of possessions, including 
facilities. The significance of power to the realization of any given 
goal-orientation of one or more actors within the social system is a 
function of the extensity of the system of actual or potential ex- 
change relationships through which it ramifies. 

The second condition is the incidence of universalistic orienta- 
tions within the social system. This and the elaboration of role dif- 
ferentiation are inherently linked. The more extensive the relational 
context of an instrumental orientation in which exchange processes 
take place freely, and hence can become of prime functional sig- 
nificance, the more it is essential for these processes to be governed 
by generalized norms which in their applicability transcend the par- 
ticularity of each specific set of relationships within which they 
occur. It is only on this condition that a restriction of the range of 
exchanges which would in itself lead to constriction of the differen- 
tiation of roles can be overcome. The more narrowly particularistic 
the institutional structure is then the greater the barriers to exten- 
sion of ego's influence to alters beyond the immediate range of the 
particular associations in which he is implicated. Breakdown of par- 
ticularistic ties is the first condition of extension of the power system. 
But this taken alone leads to instability which can only be met either 
by reversion to particularistic restrictions or by the institutionaliza- 
tion of universalistic norms. 



The Foci of Crystallization [ 1 2,3 ] 

The third condition is what may be called a gradient of effec- 
tiveness or "drasticness" of means. All institutionalization of ex- 
change relations involves, as was pointed out in the last chapter, the 
definition of legitimate limits on the choice of means. The funda- 
mental functional basis of the need for such institutionalization lies 
in the fact that resort to certain means would give ego "too much 
power" in the sense that, unless his power can be generalized to 
others he could gain his ends at the expense of alter. In individual 
exchange relationships there are above all two classes of means 
which are the focus of this institutional regulation, fraud and force. 
The Hobbesian analysis shows in classic form why their unregulated 
use would lead to the "war of all against all." There is, however a 
third equally basic problem concerned with the control of organiza- 
tion, since so many goals can be attained through organization 
which would be impossible without it. This is of course preemi- 
nently true of the use of force.^ The essential point is that power 
can always in the short run be increased by going farther along the 
gradient of more and more drastic means. But, of course, since 
power, being relational, is by definition relative, ego can enhance 
his power by resort to more drastic means, only so long as alter fails 
to take "countermeasures" by resort to the corresponding means on 
his side. It is this interactive resort to more and more drastic means 
which is the source of the "struggle for power" and the inherent 
vicious-circle character of this struggle. Only by some sort of control 
operating on both parties to a conflict can the vicious circle be 
broken. 

The generalization and quantification of power in social systems 
seems to occur in two principal interdependent but distinct modes 
or directions, which may be called the economic and the political 
respectively. The economic type consists in the extension of the 
range of actually and potentially available exchange relationships, 
and hence of the range of any given actor's choice relative to the 
acquisition and disposal of rights of possession of facilities— and of 
course rewards so far as these are "negotiable." This extension is 

^ On a somewhat subtler level capacity to play on the "sentiments" of others 
is another means of attainment of goals which must be subject to institutionalized 
control. This problem belongs, however, primarily under the heading of the insti- 
tutionalization of expressive symbolism and the reward system rather than of the 
organization and allocation of facilities. 



[ 1 24 ] Invariant Points of Reference for Social Structure 

possible only under relatively rigidly defined conditions which in- 
clude on the negative side primarily the "emancipation" of the 
exchange context from diffuse and particularistic involvements so 
that criteria of instrumental efficiency may have primacy, and on the 
positive side the institutionalization of restrictions on resort to means 
of gaining advantage which would be disruptive of the operation of 
such an exchange system, notably fraud and force, and the "abuse" 
(defined in the requisite functional terms) of the control of organ- 
ization. In this sense the situation of the exercise of economic power 
must be specific, not diffuse in its pattern. 

Power which is in this sense laterally extended through a rami- 
fied exchange system, but at the same time sharply restricted in 
scope in the above sense is economic or "purchasing" power. This 
potential scope is of course enormously extended through the cul- 
tural invention of money which, in present terms, may be treated 
as the symbolic generalization of purchasing power, indeed one of 
the most remarkable and important of all human symbolizations. 
The essence of this symbolization is that, within the sharply defined 
limits of relevance to this particular type of exchange transaction 
relationship, a certain quantity of money can "stand for" or "mean" 
a whole complex of particular physical or cultural "goods" or rela- 
tional "services" to use the traditional terminology of economics. 

Economic power, particularly as culturally defined and shaped 
through the institutionalization of money, has remarkable proper- 
ties not shared by any other phenomenon of the whole system of 
social interaction. The most interesting of these properties, for pres- 
ent purposes, is the fact that it can, within the requisite limits, be 
treated as a lineally quantitative element or variable in the total 
equilibrium of social systems— perhaps it is the only variable on a 
comparable level of generalized significance which possesses this 
property. Obviously such concepts as wealth and income can be 
treated as special cases of the more general category of economic 
power. 

Here we find the point of departure of economic theory as a 
special branch of the theory of social systems. Economic theory is the 
conceptual scheme dealing with the phenomenon of economic 
power in this sense, and in the most technical sense, with the com- 



The Foci of Crystallization [ 125 ] 

plex interdependences involved in a system of such power relations 
in an "economy." The relevance of these interdependencies in turn 
to the processes of allocation of facilities and personnel within a 
social system should be obvious in the light of the foregoing dis- 
cussion. 

It should also be clear that the empirical relevance of economic 
theory in a technical sense is very strictly a function of the type of 
social system to which it is applied. This relevance depends upon 
the scope of exchange relationships where the settlement of terms 
can operate independently of the institutional variables of the social 
system and of political power. These relationships must operate 
within a framework of regulative institutions which both enforce 
the degree of emancipation from particularism and diffuseness 
which are prerequisite to the independent orientational significance 
of "economic considerations," and enforce observance of the limita- 
tions on choice of goals and means which prevent the merging of an 
economic into a political problem. In so far as these conditions fail 
to be fulfilled economic theory loses its independent relevance as an 
explanatory scheme. Its relevance, that is, must be confined to the 
sphere where what may in motivational terms be legitimately called 
"economizing" actually takes place, and in the absence of the above 
conditions this is a narrow sphere. But in such a case economic 
theory may still retain another order of significance as a canon of 
functional interpretation. Action that is, however oriented, may 
still have economic consequences, with regard to the allocation of 
facilities in the social system, and analysis of the significance of 
these consequences in terms of the social system regarded as a 
hypothetical "economy" may still be of very great importance. 

The second direction of generalization and quantification of 
power has been called the political. The range of potential exchange 
relations to which the possibility of "influence" is extended is rele- 
vant here as in the economic case. But what is distinctive about 
political power is not this, but extension of the scope of considera- 
tions relevant to its definition and exercise. Economic power, that is, 
is focused on the possession of means (the use of the term in such 
expressions as "a man of means" is significant) to maximize advan- 
tage in a range of alternatively possible exchange transactions under 



[ 126 ] Invariant Points of Reference for Social Structure 

very strictly defined conditions through the offer of balancing ad- 
vantages. Political power, on the other hand, is generalized through 
the broadening of the scope of relevance to the whole relational 
context of a given goal. On the level of the particular relational 
context political power is capacity to control the relational system as 
a system, whether it be an organization or a diffuser, less integrated 
system. 

The principle of generalization of political power then is its ex- 
tension to more and more comprehensive relational systems which 
must as power systems be integrated in this sense into master sys- 
tems and sub-systems. While the structure of economic power is, as 
we have noted, lineally quantitative, simply a matter of more and, 
less, that of political power is hierarchical; that is, of higher and 
lower levels. The greater power is power over the lesser, not merely 
more power than the lesser. Political power is relational, not merely 
in reference, that is to n potential exchange partners, but in direct 
significance. This is perhaps another way of stating the diffuseness 
of political power, in that it is a ■mobilization of the total relational 
context as a facility relative to the goal in question. 

This diffuse character of political power explains the peculiar 
relevance to it of the gradient of drasticness of means. Since ability 
to use force in its relation to territoriality is one ultimate focus of 
power in this sense, the control of the use and organization of force 
relative to territory is always a crucial focus of the political power 
system, in one sense the crucial focus. It is this which gives the 
state its central position in the power system of a complex society. 
It is in turn the functional need to organize the power system rela- 
tive to force and territory which gives control of the machinery of 
governmental organization its strategic position as a proximate goal 
of emulation for power. 

These considerations throw some light on the problems of the 
status of political science as a discipline which will be developed 
further in the final chapter. Neither power in the political sense nor 
the operation of government as a sub-system of the social system can 
be treated in terms of a specifically specialized conceptual scheme 
of the same order as that of economic theory, precisely for the reason 
that the political problem of the social system is a focus for the 



The Foci of Crystallization [127] 

integration of all of its analytically distinguishable components, not 
of a specially differentiated class of these components. Political sci- 
ence thus tends to be a synthetic science, not one built about an 
analytical theory as is the case with economics. 

In conclusion we may reiterate that the generalization of power 
in the economic direction is dependent on the institutionalization 
of universalistic and functionally specific institutions which are 
regulative institutions par excellence. The institutionalization of 
economic power is focused on the maintenance of the conditions, 
on the one hand of its generalization, on the other of its insulation 
from other components of the system of facilities, above all from 
political power. This includes preventing large concentrations of 
economic power from having "undue influence" as facilities for the 
exercise of political power. Political power, on the other hand, is 
inherently diffuse, and is greater in proportion to the scope of the 
relational context which is involved. Its generalization is, however, 
dependent on the level of univeralism. The problem of control of 
political power is above all the problem of integration, of building 
the power of individuals and sub-collectivities into a coherent system 
of legitimized authority where power is fused with collective re- 
sponsibility. 

By rewards we mean those transferable entities or possessions 
which are desired as objects of immediate gratification by actors. 
A possession is a facility so far as the actor's orientation to it is pri- 
marily instrumental (and it is not itself an ultimate "goal-object")- 
It is a reward so far as the actor's orientation (i.e., basis of interest) 
is predominantly expressive. This means that so far as ego's interest 
is in alter because the object can be "got from" alter, the orientation 
to alter should be treated as instrumental. Only when alter himself 
is, in some relevant aspect, the object, is it expressive. Ego's relation 
to alter as a means to a goal, e.g., the mother as the source of food, is 
one in terms of which the rights vis-a-vis alter should be classified 
as facilities. This example shows the fundamental character of the 
reciprocal interdependence of human beings on each other in an 
instrumental context. 

All classes of objects may, as objects of cathexis, function as 
rewards, and the problem of the allocation of rights in their pos- 



[ 1 28 ] Invariant Points of Reference for Social Structure 

session may enter into the allocative processes of the social system 
for all of them. This is obviously true of "consumer goods" in the 
terminology of economics. Such goods are both cathected objects in 
the sense of their significance to the gratification processes of the 
actor, and they are expressive symbols. In the latter capacity they 
come to be evaluated in terms of their conformity with appreciative 
standards as well as their immediate role as need-disposition grati- 
fiers. It is above all in this connection that so many physical arti- 
facts are more significantly cultural than physical objects, because 
their style-patterning is more important than any other aspect of 
them. A good example would be style in clothing or in house 
furnishings. 

But just as in the case of facilities, perhaps even more so, a 
central significance attaches to the relational aspects of the reward 
system. Just as alter's reaction to ego's action can be of fundamental 
instrumental significance for the attainment or the blocking of ego's 
goals, so alter's reactions may be of fundamental expressive signifi- 
cance so far as alter is cathected as an object. We have seen in the 
last chapter that there is generalization from the cathexis of particu- 
lar acts on alter's part, to that of alter's attitudes. This implies the 
establishment of expectations on both sides that actions toward the 
other will fit a certain pattern. Where the cathexis is positive, this 
involves an attachment, and where there is a common evaluative 
standard of expressive symbolism, we have spoken of a relation of 
"loyalty" between ego and alter. 

The expectation of a continuing pattern of attitude on alter's 
part, with the exceptions of appropriate behavior, may be regarded 
as a relational possession of ego. It is intrinsically transferable in 
the sense first that the element of contingency means that either 
party may "withdraw" his loyalty from the other if his expectations 
are not met (or from other motives). The fulfillment of his expec- 
tations by alter can therefore only conditionally be counted upon 
by ego, and is not an intrinsic property of ego's situation. Further- 
more, most attitudes toward actors are capable of being transferred 
from one actor to another. 

This is true above all because from one point of view the cathexis 
of any one actor is the result of a selection among possibilities. 
There is always implicit if not explicit a comparative reference in 



The Foci of Crystallization [ i2g] 

a loyalty relationship, namely, "I am more loyal to A than to B be- 
cause of a differential evaluation of their respective significances 
to me." This may be a wholly particularistic evaluation, e.g., because 
A is my mother whereas B is only a cousin, or it may be because A 
ranks higher by a universalistic standard of evaluation than does B, 
e.g., has a higher level of technical competence in a relevant field. 
But in any case this differential evaluation is as it were the obverse 
of the contingency of the particular loyalty; that is, the latter is 
contingent on ego retaining his place in accordance with the evalu- 
ative criteria. 

Then relational reward-possessions present an allocative prob- 
lem just as do facilities, that is, through the power problem, and in 
the homologous way. The conditions on which ego has a right to 
a certain attitude of loyalty on alters part cannot be left unstruc- 
tured and random. Indeed because of the crucial significance of the 
mutual orientation of ego and alter in interaction for the social 
system, it may be said that relational rewards are the core of the 
reward system of a society. The first principle of its organization is 
the institutionalization of the possession of relational rewards them- 
selves. Physical and cultural reward-objects then come to be built 
into an integrated reward system in the first instance through their 
symbolic association with relational rewards; that is, on the level of 
expressive symbolism.* 

Before putting forward a few considerations about this integra- 
tion it is best to raise the question of whether there is any basis of 
generalization and quantification in the reward system which is 
comparable to that in the system of facilities. This raises the ques- 
tion of the basis of classification of relational rewards. 

This in turn is the problem of classification of the fundamental 
types of attachment and hence of loyalty. Because these are so 
deeply involved in the fundamental attitude structure of the per- 
sonality, it seems justified to take as the basis of this classification 
the two pattern variables of affectivity-neutrality and specificity- 
diffuseness. This, as was shown in the last chapter, yields the follow- 
ing fourfold table: 

* This type of symbolic integration will be further analyzed in Chapter IX 
below. 



[ 130 ] Invariant Points of Reference for Social Structure 



SPECIFICITY 



DIFFUSENESS 



AfiFectivity 



Neutrality 



Receptiveness- 
Responsiveness 


Love 


Approval 


Esteem 



The bases for the significance of this classification have been 
laid in the discussion in the last chapter of the relational context of 
expressive action-orientation. It remains here to draw a few of the 
implications for the structure of the reward system. 

There seem to be inherent empirical connections between dif- 
fuse love attachments and particularism. This means that through 
love attachments an actor is likely to be bound only to a small circle 
of persons "close" to him. However, the same order of attachment 
may be involved, as we have seen, in his integration with collectivi- 
ties, including very large ones such as the nation. But a very im- 
portant feature of such attachment to a collectivity is that it is not 
a basis of differential reward as between those who share member- 
ship, though there may of course be differential rewards in the form 
of statuses and other symbolically significant things within the col- 
lectivity—but this is different from the significance of membership 
as such. Furthermore, love attachments become attenuated into 
"casual" friendliness as they go down in the order of precedence of 
obligation, but precisely because of this attenuation, to be treated 
in a friendly way is not a focally significant reward in most situa- 
tions from the point of view of personality. 

The attitudes of receptiveness and responsiveness in specific ex- 
pressively significant contexts are considerably more capable of 
generalization. Indeed by virtue of their specificity they are in cer- 
tain respects comparable with the pattern of economic exchange. 
It is of course well known that under certain circumstances mutual 
erotic gratification may be made to fit such a context, though this is 
never the central pattern of the institutionalization of this class of 



The Foci of Crystallization [131] 

rewards. Similarly with the type of expressively oriented activity 
we may call recreation or entertainment. Indeed in all probability 
what is usually thought of as friendliness should probably be 
placed in this category. It is a kind of "recreational penumbra" of 
orientations, the core of which belongs on another level. 

In societies with a primacy of expressive orientations it is prob- 
able that the primary focus of the total reward system is to be 
sought on this level (i.e., of love and receptiveness-response). In 
this case institutionalization will tend to prescribe the limits and 
the scope of obligations involved in legitimate love attachments, as 
well as defining the range of legitimacy of the expressive interests 
and activities. The proliferation of recreational activities and of art 
would be expected in such a society. 

There would, however, appear to be considerably greater pos- 
sibilities of generalization where the balance is shifted from affec- 
tivity to the affectively neutral side. For evident reasons rewards 
in the form of attitudes of approval and esteem would be more 
prominent in societies and subsystems of any society where either 
universalism or achievement values or both were prominent. 

There is an interesting parallel between the distinction between 
economic and political power on the one hand, and approval and 
esteem rewards on the other. Approval is an attitude focused on a 
specific context, a quality complex or a type of performance. It is 
therefore capable of abstraction to a relatively high degree from the 
other features of the object. We can approve or admire competent 
performance even though we are far from admiring other things 
about the person in question. Approval-rewards are clearly of great 
importance to the reward system of a society which institutionalizes 
universalistic-achievement values and which gives a prominent 
place to roles defined in these terms and those of functional specific- 
ity. The great difference from economic power, however, lies in 
the fact that there is no symbolic quantification of the objects of 
approval to compare with money with respect to simplicity and lack 
of ambiguity. This, however, is one principal reason why money 
tends to acquire such a prominent status as a symbol of approved 
qualities or achievements in such a situation. It is a peculiarly 
appropriate symbol. 

The case of esteem is more closely analogous with political 



[ 132, ] Invariant Points of Reference for Social Structure 

power. Approval may be given v^^ithout the implication of a general- 
ized rank-ordering. Esteem, because of the element of diffuseness, 
however, makes segregation of particular contexts more difficult. 
Hence there is at least a tendency to a hierarchical ordering in terms 
of esteem. This hierarchical ordering we may call 'prestige, which is 
the relative esteem in which an individual is held in an ordered 
total system of differentiated evaluation. 

There is, therefore, a sense in which all the elements of the 
relational reward system come to be integrated in terms of a ranking 
system in terms of esteem, just as the control of facilities is ordered 
in a political power system. This ranking system in terms of esteem 
is what we may call the system of stratification of the society. It is the 
general resultant of many particular bases of differential evalua- 
tion. Non-relational reward-objects naturally have to be integrated 
with the prestige system in one aspect of their significance as expres- 
sive symbols. Hence many elements of the "style of life" come to 
have significance, among other things, as symbols of prestige in the 
system of stratification. 

One further general point needs to be made. AflFective neutral- 
ity in general terms means, as we saw in the last chapter, primacy 
either of instrumental or of moral orientations. In the case of ap- 
proval and esteem it must mean the latter because only this is 
directly relevant to expressive orientations. This is the fundamental 
analytical basis of the place of moral sentiments in the institutional- 
ization of the reward allocation systems of societies on which Durk- 
heim and Max Weber laid such great stress. Both affective and 
affectively neutral attitudes play a fundamental part in the sanction 
system of role-orientations. The present analysis gives us a basis 
for discriminating their respective places, and their relation to the 
instrumental aspect of sanctions. 

We may now turn to the integrative foci of the functional 
problems of the social system. These fall, in accordance with the 
discussions of the last chapter, into two well defined classes. First 
are the negative problems of defining the limits of permissiveness 
for "private" interests or self-orientation, both of individual actors 
and of sub-collectivities. The second is that of the institutionaliza- 
tion of the positively integrative functions of the social system 
considered as a collectivity; that is, the definition of the gradations 



The Foci of Crystallization [ i33 ] 

of responsibility, and the structuring of leadership, including execu- 
tive and representative roles. 

In approaching this problem area it should first be called to 
mind that the institutionalization of roles is itself a mode of inte- 
gration of the social system. It is the most elementary level of put- 
ting together of the units. Our concern now is with the higher 
reaches of integration of many sub-integrations. This conception of 
a hierarchy of integrations may be carried a step farther. A collec- 
tivity is a system of roles integrated in certain ways, which were 
discussed in the last chapter. But a social system is in one aspect a 
network of sub-collectivities, connected by "interstitial" pattemings 
and mechanisms. At the same time a society, and many though not 
all types of partial social system, is itself a collectivity of a higher 
order of organization. Thus our fundamental starting point has to 
be the general nature of the collectivity and hence of its possibili- 
ties of differentiation. Conversely the problems of the society are 
referable back to any collectivity, with the appropriate allowance 
for its partiality. 

The first basic integrative reference then is to the limitations on 
permissiveness for orientation in terms of private interests. These 
limitations are referable to functional "problem" contexts of the 
social system as a collectivity. These are in turn classifiable as the 
regulation of the allocative processes, and adequate provision for 
collective needs. This is the functional focus of the significance of 
what we have called regulative institutions. 

The problem of the regulation of allocative processes may be 
broken down in terms of the foregoing classification. There must 
be regulation of the processes by which roles themselves and their 
relationships change within the system. Only in a limiting case is 
the role-structure of a system completely fixed. Most social systems 
are dynamically changing in this as in other respects. But room for 
change does not mean that any actor or group of them can "inno- 
vate" by redefining their roles in any way they may happen to 
desire. Some types of such innovation are compatible with the sta- 
bility of the social system while others are not. Hence the institu- 
tionalization of patterns of legitimation of private role-innovation 
is one important context of regulation of permissiveness. 

The second context is regulation of the processes of allocation of 



[ 134 ] Invariant Points of Reference for Social Structure 

personnel where the problem is to see that the "right" people get 
into the right roles, and that people stay "where they belong" in 
terms of status. Essentially the same is to be said about the regula- 
tion of the allocation of facilities and of rewards, heading as they 
do up to the political power problem and the prestige problem. In 
all three of these contexts there is not only the problem of protecting 
a status quo but of the institutionalization of regulated innovation. 
This is extremely closely connected with regulation of what have 
been called the competitive aspects of the processes of allocation. 

A stable equilibrium of purely competitive orientation is, of 
course, as economic theory has shown, fully conceivable. Nonethe- 
less such interaction systems must be presumed to be in general 
more unstable than the automatically ascriptive type and probably 
more so than the appointive or decision-selection type. The predic- 
tion of just how personnel, facility and reward allocation will come 
out when left to a freely competitive process may be highly uncer- 
tain. A social system in which such processes are prominent must 
therefore presumably have a considerable range of tolerance for 
differences of outcome. At the same time the disruptive potentiali- 
ties are so great that there must also be limits to this range, even 
though they are flexible. It seems probable that an "individualistic" 
society of this sort will also have to be able to tolerate considerable 
deviations from any abstract standard of "justice." 

With respect to any or all of the above integrative problems 
there is a range of possibilities as to how this set of norms limiting 
permissiveness, that is, the system of regulative institutions, is both 
patterned and institutionalized in the sense of the structure of the 
sanction system. Here there seem to be two most significant poles of 
variability on the latter basis, the "informal" and the "formal." In 
the first case sanctions are left in "private" hands alone. They are 
a matter of the "spontaneous" reaction of alter to what ego does. 
There is no differentiation of roles about the axis of implementation 
of the common value patterns as a collective interest. This informal 
mode of institutionalization is, the evidence seems to show,* the 
fundamental foundation of "social control" in all societies next to 
the institutionalization of roles in general. There is little hope of a 
formal sanction system operating effectively in most cases unless 
it is backed by such a system of moral sentiments as on the whole 



The Foci of Crystallization [ i35 ] 

favor the institutionalized pattern system so that alter is inclined 
spontaneously to react favorably to conformity and unfavorably to 
deviance on ego's part. 

The second polar type, however, is that of formalized sanctions. 
This implies, as noted, differentiation of roles relative to responsibil- 
ity vis-a-vis the collectivity for maintenance of the integrity of a 
normative system. There are, in turn, two main functions in such 
differentiated roles, namely, inter'pretation, which is important be- 
cause of the frequent range of uncertainty as to just what role- 
obligations are and how generalized rules apply, and enforcement. 
Enforcement here should not be interpreted to mean only the 
application of negative sanctions in case of deviance, but special 
responsibility for use of any and all sanctions, positive or negative. 
The difference from the spontaneous informal case is that in that 
case sanctions are a matter of "private morality," whereas in the 
formal case they are a matter of specific role-obligation. 

Most larger-scale social systems of course have important ele- 
ments of both types of institutionalization. As noted, the funda- 
mental groundwork tends to be informal, but the more complex 
and dynamic the social system, the more this tends to be supple- 
mented by the differentiation of roles carrying collective responsi- 
bility, which thus have directly integrative functions in this sense. 

The other aspect of the foci for integrative structuring is that of 
the positive promotion of collective goals or interests. Again in a 
limiting case this may be informally structured, with completely 
spontaneous collective reactions. But the limits of this informality, 
according to size of group and other factors, are extremely narrow. 
Very soon "leadership" roles appear, which in most complex social 
systems become of very great significance. As we noted above such 
roles may in turn be differentiated according to functions internal 
to the collectivity as "administrative" roles, and those external to it 
in relations outside, in "representative" roles. 

There is of course a wide variety of functional problems con- 
cerned with the relation between leadership roles and the rest of 
the collectivity, problems which have been intensively worked over 
in studies in the field of government, and elsewhere. Following 
Max Weber here we may put primary stress on the basis of the 
legitimacy of "authority" to take action which is "binding" on the 



[ 136 ] Invariant Points of Reference for Social Structure 

collectivity as a unit and hence its members. Authority to bind and 
to coerce a member of the collectivity is, in this respect, of the 
same fundamental character as authority to assume a treaty obliga- 
tion. In other words, the primary starting point for the analysis of 

TABLE 3 
PARADIGM FOR THE ANALYSIS OF SOOAL SYSTEMS 

Prerequisites of Social Structure: 1) Motivational Resources for Role-hehavior 

requirements. 2) Situational Resources and Conditions. 3) Cultural 

Accumulation: knowledge, artifacts, etc. 



structure of the ob- 
ject situation 
(as entering into the 
definitions of role- 
expectations ) 



Organisms 



Ego as 

Personality 



Alter as 
Personality 



QjUectivities 



Physical 
Objects 



Cultural 
Objects 



Social ob- 
jects ori- 
ented to 
selectiv- 
i t y by 
quality or 
perform- 
ance mo- 
dalities 



All ob- 
jects as of 
C og n i- 
tive-Cath- 
ectic sig- 
nificance 
and as in- 
strumen- 
tal means 
or condi- 
tions 



FUNCTIONAL FOCI FOR 

STRUCTURING OF THE 

SOCIAL SYSTEM 



1 . Allocative Foci. 

a) Distribution of role- 
content tjrpes. 

b) Distribution of per- 
sonnel between 
roles, including 
memberships in col- 
lectivities. 

c) Distribution of fa- 
cilities, among roles 
and actors. 

d) Distribution of Re- 
wards among roles 
and actors. 

2. Integrative Foci. 

a) Sub-coUectivity sol- 
idarities. 

b) Society - wide soli- 
darity (Relation to 
the Ethos of the 
Culture). 



SELECTIVE CHOICE-ALTER- 
NATIVE FOCI FOR THE 
STRUCTURING OF ROLE- 
EXPECTATIONS (pattern 
variables) 



Primarily relevant to sta- 
tus-structure patterning. 

a) Universalism — 
Particularism. 

b) Ascription — 
Achievement. 



2. Primarily relevant to at- 
titude-orientation within 
roles. 

c) AflFectivity — Affective 
Neutrality. 

d) Specificity — 
Diffuseness 



3. Primarily relevant to in- 
tegration of the collec- 
tivity. 

e) Self-Orientation — 
Collectivity - Orienta- 
tion. 



variability lies in the nature of the value-orientation patterns which 
define this aspect of the role. 

These functional foci of crystallization of the structure of the 
social system discussed in this section are shown in relation to the 
pattern variables and to the structure of the situation in Table 3. 



Internal Differentiation of Social Systems [ 137 ] 

§ THE INTERNAL DIFFERENTIATION 
OF SOCIAL SYSTEMS 

WE have now reached the point where an attempt must 
be made to work out a basis for the structural description of a social 
system as a whole, showing the basis of the differentiation of its units 
from each other, the ranges of that differentiation, and the struc- 
tural relations of the units which constitute the system. 

We will classify these possible sources of structural differentia- 
tion under six headings as follows: 

RELATIONAL INSTITUTIONS 

1. The Categorization of actor-units as objects of orientation. Their 
classificatory differentiation and distribution, i.e., their object- 
roles (statuses), within the social system. 

a. Individual actors as objects 

b. Collective actors as objects 

2. The Classification of role-orientation types and their distribution 
within the social system. 

a. Roles of individual actors 

b. Roles of collective actors 

REGULATIVE INSTITUTIONS 

3. The "Economy" of instrumentally oriented relationships; classifi- 
cation and distribution of facilities and the organization of the 
power system. 

4. The "Economy" of expressively oriented relationships; the classi- 
fication and distribution of rewards and the organization of the 
reward system. 

CULTURAL INSTITUTIONS 

5. The Cultural Orientation System 

The patterning of cultural orientations in relation to the social 
structure; ideology, religious beliefs, expressive symbol-systems 
and their syntheses including mechanisms of enforcement and 
positive implementation. 

RELATIONAL AND REGULATIVE INSTITUTIONS 

6. The Integrative Structures 

Social-relational integration (moral); the social system as itself a 
collectivity; regulative norms and their enforcement. Roles insti- 
tutionalizing special responsibilities for collective interests. 



[ 138 ] Invariant Points of Reference for Social Structure 

It will be maintained that filling in the above outline with the 
requisite detail of properly conceptualized statements of empirical 
fact will constitute an adequate description of a concrete social 
system, the amount of detail required depending on the problem. 
This of course implies that under each main heading there is avail- 
able an adequate classification of the ranges of possible variability 
and then that the facts under each heading and the proper sub- 
classes can be put together to describe the system coherently. Work- 
ing out at least the starting points for these sub-classifications will 
be the principal task of the present section. But before entering upon 
it a few remarks about the rationale of the classification as a whole 
are needed. 

Perhaps the most familiar feature of the classification is the 
distinction between the first and second categories, namely, the 
classification of actors as objects, and the classification of orientation 
role-types. The employment of this distinction and its relevance to 
the analysis of social structure, along with the relevance of the con- 
cept of "possessions" to categories three and four, makes it possible 
to clarify a number of what have hitherto been baffling problems. 

The classification of object-units is concerned with what has 
sometimes been called "categorization" in the analysis of social 
structure, what in the last chapter were called the ascriptive quali- 
ties and the performance capacities. The ascription-achievement 
variable was, it has been seen, concerned with the modalities of 
objects; it is therefore the major axis around which the classification 
under this heading must be worked out. Such categories of social 
structure as age and sex differentiations clearly belong here. But 
just as clearly both individual and collective actors must be included, 
of course with due attention to the differences. It has been evident 
throughout the development of the present conceptual scheme from 
early in Chapter I that collectivities must in certain contexts be 
treated as actors.^ If this is true in general two obvious conclusions 
follow for the present context. First they are objects just as are 
individual actors and must be included in any classification of 
social objects. Second, the classification and distribution of collec- 

^ This view is also extensively discussed in Values, Motives and Systems of 
Action. 



Internal Differentiation of Social Systems [ 139 ] 

tivity types, that is what, relative to the social system in question 
are its SMl7-collectivities, must be treated as part of the structure of 
the social system. 

The second main heading concerns the classification and dis- 
tribution of role-orientation types. These are, as we have seen, basic 
units of the social system. But they are units seen in one of the 
two possible perspectives, that of the orientations of actors, while 
the object-position of the same actors is the other perspective. The 
attempt to combine hoth in the formulation of the role concept 
without making allowance for the difference of perspective has 
been the source of considerable difficulty in the analysis of social 
structures. The essential point is perhaps that the total unit of 
social structure is an interactive relationship. Such a relationship 
includes, at the minimum, two actors, each in two capacities, first 
as an orienting actor, second as an object, hut the same actor does 
not operate in hoth capacities in the same relationship from the 
same orientation point of reference.^ 

In a completely "free" orientation relationship ego is free to 
"define" alter as an object any way he sees fit, within limits of what 
"makes sense." But here we are talking about social structures. It 
is taken for granted that social structure through institutionalization 
places limits on the range of legitimized orientation of an actor in 
a given status of ego. By exactly the same token it places limits on 
the ranges within which he may legitimately define alter as an 
object. In other words alter as object is institutionally "categorized." 
Only certain of the intrinsically possible meanings permitted of 
alter as an object are to be acted upon in this particular social sys- 
tem or the relevant part of it. 

The first heading then concerns the categorization of alters. 
What, in an "existential" sense, are they within this social system 
and its relevant parts? The second heading deals with exactly the 
same concrete actors, but as egos, with the structuring of their orien- 
tations to the given object-world, the alters. Each actor is a "bundle" 
in each respect. For each social relationship in which he is involved 
he has, that is, what may be called an object-role and an orientation- 

^ Ego may for certain purposes be located as an object to himself — but this 
special case does not affect the above statements. 



[ 140 ] Invariant Points of Reference for Social Structure 

role. Just as in orientation terms he is not a single unitary entity, he 
has for instance an instrumental role toward one object, and an 
expressive role toward another, so in his object-roles he can also 
be "broken down," he may be an ascriptively significant object for 
one, an achieving object for the other and so on. This separation 
of the object-role and the orientation-role of course involves a spe- 
cial type of abstraction. It must never be forgotten that these are 
both abstractions from the same concrete roles of the same concrete 
actors. 

The second pair of main headings of the classification also call 
for preliminary comment. Their rationale rests heavily on the anal- 
ysis of the nature of facilities and of rewards and of "rights" to 
them put forward in the preceding section. Besides the allocative 
distribution of actors themselves as object-units, what is in fact 
allocated as part of the social structure consists in rights to these 
two categories of possessions, which in the specifically relational 
category of possessions comes to be identical with (or at least in- 
separable from) the possessions themselves. The concept of rights 
to possessions (and the obverse, the obligations to respect these 
rights) constitutes the relational link between the orientation-role 
aspect of social structure and the object-role aspect. Under these 
two categories, therefore, are treated the specifically relational struc- 
tures or aspects, as distinguished from the classification and distri- 
bution of structural units. 

The possibility of reducing this relational aspect of the organi- 
zation of rights to the two categories of facilities and to rewards 
means an enormous simplification of the usual common sense ways 
of handling such problems. It is derived directly from the classifica- 
tion of evaluative action-orientations themselves, reserving the 
moral class for special treatment in the integrative context. Of 
course as a classification of concrete relational nexi it must be put 
in terms of primacies, since all the concrete elements are inherently 
involved in every concrete social relationship. 

The fifth category is the cultural orientation system as such, so 
far as it is not already taken account of in the value-orientation 
patterns which are involved in the preceding four categories. Pri- 
marily, that is, this concerns belief systems and systems of expres- 



Internal Differentiation of Social Systems [ 141 ] 

sive symbols. They cannot, in the nature of their place in systems 
of action generally, vary at random relative to the structure of the 
social system itself and must like the other elements vary within 
determinate ranges relative to definite foci of crystallization,'^ 

The sixth category concerns the overall integrative structure of 
the social system as a whole. It has already been made clear that 
in this connection it is necessary to consider the society itself as a 
collectivity, or perhaps (as in the case of Medieval Europe with 
church and state) of two (or even more) interpenetrating and par- 
tially integrated collectivities. Many partial social systems of course, 
such as a market complex, may be lacking such an integrative 
structure within themselves. 

Finally we may point out the relation of the present classifica- 
tion of the primary elements of social structure to the classification 
of the types of institutions presented in Chapter II above. Very 
clearly the primary relational institutions fall under categories one 
and two. Categories three and four are the focus of the primary 
regulative institutions and five of the cultural institutions. Category 
six, finally, has relevance to both of the first two classes of institu- 
tions. The structure of leadership roles itself may be regarded as a 
relational structure— but in addition the overall collectivity has regu- 
lative functions including those toward beliefs and expressive 
symbols. It must not be forgotten that relative to all these categories 
of structural elements there may be any degree of institutionaliza- 
tion from complete anomie at one pole to "perfect integration" at 
the other. 

The procedure will be next to present a sub-classification under 
each of the six main headings with a brief commentary in connec- 
tion with each, and then in the next chapter to enter into a 
discussion of how these can be put together to describe a total 
social system. For filling in the first heading we take up the dis- 
cussion of ascriptive and achievement criteria in the last chapter.^ 

' Fuller analysis of these problems will be presented in Chapters VIII and 
IX below. 

* What we are presenting here, it should be made clear, is a scheme of the 
invariant points of reference or foci of crystallization relative to which concrete 
social structures become patterned and organized. 



[ 142 ] Invariant Points of Reference for Social Structure 

I. Categorization of actor-units in ohject-roles: 

A. Individual actors 

1 . Ascriprive Quality foci 

a. Classificatory 
Sex 

Age 

Organic and personality traits 

b. Relational 
Biological position 
Spatial location 
Temporal location 
"Ecological" situation 
Collectivity memberships 

2. Performance-capacity foci (all classificatory) 

a. Instrumental primacy 
Technical competence 

Instrumental leadership capacity Cexecutive and repre- 
sentative) 

b. Expressive primacy 

Capacity to elicit receptiveness and response 

Capacity to form and maintain diffuse attachments and 

loyalties 

Expressive leadership capacity 

c. Moral primacy 

un . ^ „ 1 « , ^ „ ) both eliciting 

rrivate moral character \ 1 ° 

Moral leadership capacity (charisma) ( j ^ 

ir t J ^ -^ J ancl esteem 

B. Collectivities as actors 

I. Ascriptive Quahties as foci 

a. Classificatory 

Size (number of participant individual actors) 
Composition (object-role types, distribution of relevant 
qualities of constituent individuals as detailed under A). 
Constituent orientation-role types (as under II below). 
Traits as a collectivity-unit (e.g., "rationalism" or "tradi- 
tionalism," "individualism" or "collectivism"). 

b. Relational 

Territorial location focus (is membership territorially 

bound or notr" how?). 

Temporal location 

Inclusiveness (relative to any given other collectivity is 



Internal Differentiation of Social Systems [143] 

membership mutually exclusive, are the two overlapping, 
or is collectivity B a sub-collectivity of collectivty A?). 
2. Performance-capacity foci 

a. Instrumental primacy (e.g., a "productive" organization, 
a military unit). 

b. Expressive primacy (e.g., a theatrical troupe, certain types 
of propaganda agency). 

c. Moral primacy (e.g., a church). 

This is a somewhat elaborate classification but a simpler one 
will not do justice to the complexity of the subject-matter. At any 
rate, in the main, it is systematically derived and should serve to 
order empirically descriptive materials. It is, from one point of view 
not as elaborate as it seems in that it incorporates generally signifi- 
cant variables which have played a critical part throughout the 
development of the present conceptual scheme, namely, ascription- 
achievement, universalism-particularism through its relation to the 
classificatory-relational distinction, and the classification of types of 
action-orientation. It is by virtue of such connections that the detail 
of such a classification can be given generalized significance. 

Of course, there remains the task of classifying the possible and 
significant ranges of variation with reference to each of these foci 
and certain of their combinations. For example, biological position 
in combination with sex and age, give the points of reference for 
the classification of the actual possibilities of kinship structures. If 
this problem of classification of concrete types were approached 
solely in terms of logically possible permutations and combinations 
it would very quickly become impossible complex. It will be neces- 
sary, therefore, to look for possibilities of simplification; a problem 
which will be raised in the following chapter. 

II. Classification of orientation-role types 
A. Individual actors 

I. Primacy of "private" interests (self-orientation). 

a. Instrumental— orientation to alter primarily as a source of 
facilities, i.e., acquisition of rights to instrumental posses- 
sions or services, "contractual" or cooperative. 

b. Expressive— orientation to alter primarily as a source of 
rewards, i.e., rights to relational possessions and other 
possessions as symbolic of them. 



[ 144 ] Invariant Points of Reference for Social Structure 

c. Moral— orientation to alter primarily in terms of "private 
morality," i.e., their respective ego-integrative standards. 
These may or may not be deviant relative to institution- 
alized collective moral standards. 

(In all three cases if there is institutionalization at all, it 
is regulative institutionalization in terms of "rules of the 
game," the conditions on which rights may be established 
and relinquished as limits of permissiveness.') 
2. Primacy of collective obligations (collectivity-orientation). 
Ego's role that of collectivity member. 

a. Instrumental primacy of orientation with performance of 
instrumental functions sanctioned as obligation to the 
collectivity. Orientation to alter within the collectivity 
primarily as a "cooperating" colleague, to any alter out- 
side, ego takes a representative role. Facilities are for the 
collectivity, not individualized. 

b. Expressive primacy of orientation with performance of 
expressive functions sanctioned as obligation to the col- 
lectivity. Orientation to alter within the collectivity as 
"comrade" with whom reciprocity of sentiment is shared, 
orientation outside the collectivity in a representative role. 
Rewards are for the collectivity, not individualized. In 
the case of an individual they symbolize status in and 
services to the collectivity. 

(In both the above two cases the focus is not on the limits 
of permissiveness for private interests, but on the positive 
obligations of fulfillment of membership expectations. But 
the focus is not on the significance of the collectivity in the 
larger social system, that comes under B below; it is on ego's 
orientation to the collectivity.) 

c. Moral primacy. Expectation of both instrumental and ex- 
pressive content of obligations to the collectivity (e.g., 
most kinship roles). With clear cut primacy in either 
direction this type would slip over to a or b type. Both 
rewards and facilities are for the collectivity and orienta- 
tion to any alter outside is in a representative role. Obli- 
gation to collectivity is not merely a matter of "perform- 
ance of duty" but of solidarity in sentiment. 

B. Collectivities as Actors 

I. Primacy of "private interests," i.e., of the particular col- 
lectivity vis-a-vis the wider social system. 



Internal Differentiation of Social Systems [ 145 ] 

a. Instrumental— orientation to other actors, collective and 
individual primarily as facilities (including prospective 
members as contributors of "services") and including en- 
hancement of power position of the collectivity as a pos- 
sible goal. 

b. Expressive— orientation to other actors, collective and indi- 
vidual, primarily as rewards, including above all enhance- 
ment of the collectivity's prestige as a focus. 

c. Moral— orientation to other actors, collective and indi- 
vidual in terms of their respective moral standards and 
of the possibility or lack of it of solidarity with them, i.e., 
of merging into a wider collectivity. 

2. Primacy of collective obligations to a larger collectivity of 
which the first is defined as a part. Primacy of the "functions" 
of the sub-collectivity for the larger collectivity. 

a. Instrumental primacy of orientation, with instrumental 
functions on behalf of the larger collectivity sanctioned 
as obligations to the latter, e.g., the army's obligations to 
the "state" of which it is an organizational part. 

b. Expressive primacy of orientation with expressive func- 
tions for the larger collectivity sanctioned as obhgations, 
e.g., the choir as part of the organization of the church. 

c. Moral primacy— essentially parallel to the individual case. 

The above classification, it is evident, is organized about the 
types of evaluative action orientation, and the variable of self- 
collectivity orientation. This, as distinguished from category I, is 
not merely a classification of foci of crystallization but of actual 
role-orientation types because it is concerned with the fabric of the 
relational structure itself, not the properties of the objects which 
enter into those relationships as in the case of Heading I. It is there- 
fore in fact a classification of the possibilities of variation of social 
structures. 

III. The "Economy" of Instrumental Orientations 

(Here, instrumentally oriented roles of the types delineated under 
II, A and B are thought of as integrated to from differentiated com- 
plexes. These are of three types: i) "ecological" complexes of divi- 
sion of labor without organization as collectivities, 2) collectivities 
and 3) the instrumental economy of the social system as a whole 
considered as an ecological system. The fourth possibility, the 
social system as a whole as an instrumentally oriented collectivity 



[ 146 ] Invariant Points of Reference for Social Structure 

does not require special treatment because in its fundamental 
structure it is the same as any other collectivity.) 

A. The "instrumental ecological complex," seen with any given 
ego as a point of reference. 

1. Ego's technical role. 

2. Structuring of ego's "disposal" relations. 

3. Structuring of ego's "remuneration" relations. 

4. Structuring of ego's facility-procurement relations. 

5. Structuring of ego's cooperative relations. 

(Structural variability occurs especially with regard to the 
segregation of one from all the other functions, or the fusion 
of one or more of them into the same role. Segregation extreme: 
technical role— fusion extreme; without organization artisan, 
independent professional role.) 

(The content of the technical role or its fused counterparts 
will vary enormously, and such roles must always also be classi- 
fied by content of "production" goal which are as various as 
"functions" on behalf either of actors or of a social system can 
be. The social system can, within the limits of permissiveness 
for private interests, be conceived as a "seamless web" of such 
instrumental ecological complexes each with an ego as its 
referential center. Certain such groups of complexes may be 
singled out as "markets" or "fields of competition," etc., i.e., as 
units of a sort.) 

B. The instrumentally oriented sub-collectivity or "organization" 
(II-B-2a), as a system of differential instrumental roles. 

1. Differentiated technical roles— "contributions" to the co- 
operative production process. 

2. "Policy roles," decision-making with regard to the goal-orien- 
tations of the organization, "what to produce," quantities, 
timing, "public relations," etc. 

3. Administrative or "implementation" roles. 

a. Internal to organization. 
Allocative— budget, facilities, etc. 

Supervisory— "seeing that things get done" (instrumental 
authority). 

b. External to organization (representative). 
Disposal functions. 

Income-securing and facility-securing functions. 

Cooperation arranging and implementing roles. 
(Except so far as the collectivity is an "organ" or an "agency" 
of a more inclusive collectivity, such collectivities constitute foci 



Internal Differentiation of Social Systems [ 147 ] 

of ecological complexes relative to the larger social system. 
They operate within the range of permissiveness for self- 
orientation for collectivities— which may of course be differen- 
tiated by type of collectivity. Each one is the point of reference 
for such a complex. Similarly there is differentiation of func- 
tional content relative to the social system, and grouping as in 
"industries" or "institutions of higher education." Such terms 
may designate either a status class of actors or an ecological 
complex or both.) 
C. The instrumental economy as a differentiated and integrated 
system. 

1. Types of unit and their distribution; individual actors, or- 
ganizations by size, composition, role-constitution type, etc. 

2. Functional content-differentiation of units. 

Production, product distribution, income distribution, facility 
provision, cooperation. 

3. The instrumental units as a power system. 
(Institutionalization of power relations and "regulation of 
competition.") 

Obviously the subject-matter under this heading has been in- 
tensively dealt with in economics and political science. The present 
attempt is limited to taking over a few of the familiar concepts of 
these fields in such a way as to facilitate connecting them with the 
general analytical framework of this work. This would be the pri- 
mary starting point for an analysis of economic and political insti- 
tutions, though in the political case considerable attention needs 
to be devoted to the expressive and integrative elements as well as 
the instrumental. 

IV. The "Economy" of Expressive Orientations 

A. The "ecological" complex of expressive reciprocities with any 
given ego as a point of reference. 

1. Ego's specific gratification and expressive-symbolic orienta- 
tion to a particular object, or class of objects. 

2. Structuring of ego's receptiveness relations. 

3. Structuring of ego's response relations. 

4. Structuring of occasions. 

5. Structuring of ego's diffuse attachments and loyalties. 

(As in the instrumental case structural variability will be in terms 
of fusion-segregation wath respect to the elements of this complex. 
The economy of "private" individual expressive orientations is 



[ 148 ] Invariant Points of Reference for Social Structure 

another "seamless web" with each individual ego as a point of 

reference.) 

(Also, again, the "content" of the expressive interest will vary, and 

there must also [C below] be a classification by content.) 

B. The expressively oriented sub-collectivity (the Gemeinschaft) 
(II-B-2b) as a system of differentiated expressive roles. 

1. DiflFerentiated expressive "contributions" to the collectivity, 
rewarding different members and the collectivity as a whole 
in different ways. 

2. Expressive leadership roles, eliciting receptiveness and re- 
sponse, becoming focus of attachments and loyalties. 

a. Internally— symbolic foci of loyalty. 

b. Externally— representative roles, e.g., as "propagandist." 
(Fundamentally this is exactly parallel to the instrumental case, 
but of course structural elaboration does not go so far, and it is 
much rarer to find anything approaching "pure" cases of ex- 
pressive primacy, than of instrumental primacy.) 

C. The expressive economy as a differentiated and integrated sys- 
tem. 

1. Types of unit; individual actors, collectivities by size, com- 
position, role-orientation type, etc. 

2. Functional content-differentiation of units. 

Fusions and segregations, receptiveness-responsiveness, love, 
approval, esteem orientations. 

3. The expressive units as a prestige system (when institution- 
alized, stratification of the social system). 

As noted, pure expressive primacy is relatively rare in the more 
conspicuous social structures. It is therefore essential to "dissect 
out" the elements of this expressive interaction structure. It is 
highly conspicuous in affectively accented relationships such as 
much of kinship or friendship, and of certain types of solidarity 
and leader-follower relations. 

V. The Cultural Orientation System 
A. Belief Systems. 

I. Existential Beliefs. 

a. Empirical— Science and empirical lore. 

b. Non-Empirical— Philosophy and supernatural lore. 

c. Speciahzation of roles with respect to investigative in- 
terests (e.g., scientist and philosopher). 



Internal Differentiation of Social Systems [ 149 ] 

2. Evaluative Beliefs. 

a. Ideologies. 

b. Religious ideas. 

c. Role differentiation with respect to responsibility for 
evaluative beliefs (roles of religious and ideological "au- 
thorities")- 

B. Systems of Expressive Symbols. 

1. Purely expressive symbol systems. 

a. Expressive of accepted attitude system. 

b. Expressive of adjustive needs in response to strain. 

c. Specialization of roles with respect to symbolism (e.g., 
artist or performer). 

2. Evaluative symbolism. 

a. Symbolization of collective solidarity. 

b. Symbolization of meaning-adjustment patterns; religious 
symbolism. 

c. Differentiation of roles with respect to evaluative sym- 
bolism—moral-expressive leadership or priesthood. 

In addition to providing a set of foci of crystallization for cul- 
tural institutions as such, the above classification calls attention to 
the fact that roles may be differentiated with respect to the special 
significances of cultural problems other than those of value-orien- 
tation as such in their general bearing on role-structure. The roles 
of scientist, philosopher, theologian, artist and priest— in the sense 
of "cult administrator"— fit in here. As noted above, this whole 
aspect of the relation of cultural patterns to the social system will 
be dealt with more in detail in Chapters VIII and IX below. 

VI. Integrative Structures 

The system of moral value-orientation patterns on the social rela- 
tional level in their relevance to the institutionalization of the social 
system as an overall collectivity. 

A. Institutionalization of the regulative patterns governing and 
defining the limits of the private sphere of orientations— for 
individuals and sub-collectivities. (The interests will be classifi- 
able as instrumental, expressive and moral in the sense either 
of ego-integrative or sub-collectivity integrative.) 

1. Through spontaneous action and informal sanctions. 

2. Through formalized enforcement machinery. 

a. Differentiation of roles with respect to enforcement func- 
tions. 



[ 150 ] Invariant Points of Reference for Social Structure 

B. Institutionalization of positive collective functions, instrumental 
or expressive. 

1. Informally. 

2. Through differentiation of leadership roles and institutionali- 
zation of their authority. 

a. Oriented to internal coordination functions— administra- 
tive roles. 

b. Oriented to the situation external to the collectivity- 
representative roles. 

(In content the above classification should be the same as III-B 
and hence is not elaborated again here. Among the problems are 
those of the extent to which the integration of cultural orienta- 
tions is fused with that of value-orientations in general, e.g., 
are "church" and "state" the same structures or are they differen- 
tiated from one another?) 

The above classification is somewhat elaborate, and especially 
in the finer details, highly provisional. Such taxonomy is, of course, 
not profitable if undertaken only for its own sake. It is essentially 
a tool. Only in rather exceptional cases will any one research study 
involve very large parts of the total scheme. But it is extremely 
important to have such a scheme and to have it coherently worked 
out, to serve as a system of points of reference within which to 
locate any more specialized study and to begin to establish connec- 
tions between the different parts. Such a scheme is, furthermore, 
the basis from which the comparative analysis of different social 
structures must start. It is the main outline, in short, of the struc- 
tural framework to what has been called a "structural-functional" 
level of theoretical analysis.^ 

* Far more than any other single source this scheme derives from that of 
Max Weber as outhned in Chapter I of The Theory of Social and Econovtic 
Organization, 



V 

y THE STRUCTURE OF THE SOCIAL 
SYSTEM, III: EMPIRICAL DIFFERENTIATION AND 
VARIATION IN THE STRUCTURE OF SOCIETIES 



THE classification presented in the last section of the 
foregoing chapter brings us a long step nearer to the possibility of 
treating systematically the concrete structure of societies in terms 
of the internal differentiations in the structure of any particular 
society and the ranges of variability between societies. At this point, 
however, we encounter a serious difficulty. From a certain abstract 
theoretical point of view a systematic treatment of these problems 
could only be attained by methodically spelling out all the logically 
possible permutations and combinations of all the elements which 
have been distinguished in the outline of points of reference, or 
which could be derived by further subdivision of the categories. 

Certainly far more work along these lines should be carefully 
and systematically undertaken than has so far been the case. Such 
an undertaking is, however, far beyond the possible scope of the 
present work. Many particular phases of it will prove to be of great 
importance in connection with the solution of problems in more 
specialized fields of sociology. We do not, however, propose to 
attempt to carry such structural morphology farther here. Before 
leaving the treatment of social structure as such it will, however, 
prove useful and illuminating to attempt to short-cut this process by 
mobilizing available empirical and theoretical knowledge to give 
some indications of the main lines of internal differentiation and 
comparative variability of types of social structure. 

151 



[ 152 ] Empirical Differentiation and Variation 

There are two devices by which we can attempt to take such a 
short cut. The first is by applying the broad classificatory scheme 
we have developed to the assessment of the significance of certain 
empirical uniformities which are fairly well established in sociology. 
The essential point is that in certain crucial areas of social structure 
we do not find that empirically observable structures cover any- 
thing like the whole range of theoretically possible variability; 
possible, that is, according to purely logical permutations and com- 
binations of structural components. Actual structures are, rather, 
concentrated in empirical "clusterings." In the first section of this 
chapter we will review certain highlights of evidence for the special 
importance of four such clusterings, those i) of kinship, control of 
sex relations and socialization, 2) of the organization of instru- 
mental achievement roles and stratification, 3) of the relation 
between power, force and territoriality, and 4) of the relation of 
the paramount integration of value-orientations to cognitive orienta- 
tions and certain problems of personality adjustment in "religion." 
If the existence of such clusterings can be validated, even only in a 
rather rough way, this validation ser\^es a two-fold purpose for the 
sociologist. On the one hand it justifies his short-cutting investiga- 
tion of the whole range of structural possibilities and concentrating 
on a fraction of them; thus it enormously simplifies arriving at 
least at a first approximation of a systematic classification of em- 
pirically significant ranges of differentiation and structural variation 
of societies. On the other hand, it can serve as a highly important 
lead into the formulation, and hence testing, of fundamental 
dynamic generalizations, of laws of social process, since the explana- 
tion of why the logically possible range of variability is empirically 
restricted can be found only in terms of such laws. 

The second short cut involves making use of certain of the posi- 
tive theoretical results of the foregoing analysis. The whole nature 
of the theory of action in general, and hence of the theory of social 
systems, as here developed, is such that precisely with respect to 
variability of structure, patterns of value-orientation as the focus of 
institutionalization, must play a crucial role. Empirical demonstra- 
tion that this was not the case would, in effect, be a refutation of 
the present general conceptual scheme, or the reduction of its ana- 



'Emyirical Clusterings of Structural Components [ 153 ] 

lytical relevance to relative insignificance. We are, therefore justi- 
fied in taking the possibilities of variation in fundamental value- 
orientations, i.e., in pattern-variable combinations, as a point of 
departure for developing a provisional classification of generalized 
types of social system in structural terms. If this is taken as a point 
of departure it is possible to introduce modifications of the purely 
logical implications of such a classification, modifications which are 
necessitated by what we know about the empirical interdependence 
of patterns of value-orientation with the other components of the 
social system. This attempt will be undertaken in the final section 
of the present chapter. 

In the middle section we will attempt to make the transition 
between the problems presented by the empirical clusterings to be 
reviewed here in the first section and the classification of total socie- 
ties, by showing the importance of what we may call the adaptive 
structures and the corresponding integrative imperatives of the par- 
ticular social system for the limitations of compatibility of different 
structural elements as parts of the same society. 

§ SOME EMPIRICAL CLUSTERINGS OF THE 
STRUCTURAL COMPONENTS OF 
SOCIAL SYSTEMS 

I . Kinshif Systems 

FROM a purely taxonomic point of view any considerable 
prominence of kinship in social structures generally would seem 
highly problematical. Elaborate as the classification under the first 
heading in the scheme presented in the last chapter. Categoriza- 
tion of Objects, was, it got only so far as to name the principal 
ascriptive foci of a kinship system, namely sex, age and biological 
relatedness, without developing a classification under each or show- 
ing how they were combined, to say nothing of developing a classi- 
fication of types of kinship structure themselves. In other words, 
kinship in terms of the possible combinations of the general struc- 
tural elements of social systems has a high degree of specificity. The 
fact that kinship looms large in every known society means that a 
great many other logically possible permutations of the structural 



[154] Empirical Differentiation and Variation 

elements have either been eHminated or relegated to secondary posi- 
tions in the social structure. This calls for explanation. 

But not only do kinship systems, that is, prominent groupings 
in a population constituted on the basis of biological relatedness, 
exist but certain further general facts are highly significant. The 
first of these is that membership in a kinship unit and status within 
it is universally the primary mode of initial status ascription of the 
new-bom infant in all known societies. Following this, a highly 
significant part of the socialization process almost always occurs 
within the kinship unit, with kinship personalities serving as stra- 
tegically important socializing agents. Thus just as initial status is 
ascribed by birth in a kinship unit and relations to the rest of the 
social structure are initially mediated only through relation of that 
unit as a unit to the outside society, so child-care is a function every- 
where ascribed to kinship units, and to various statuses within 
them. Details vary, especially the incidence of other agencies such 
as organs of "formal education" and various others such as health 
care, but the central fact remains. 

Third, there is a universal relation between kinship structures 
and the regulation of erotic relations between the sexes. It is uni- 
versally true that there is a taboo on incest, namely that sexual 
relations as well as intermarriage are, for at least the vast majority 
of the population, except for spouses forbidden within the conjugal 
family, and often within larger kinship units. It is unusual for the 
legitimacy of sexual relations to be confined to the marriage rela- 
tionship, but there is never lack of discrimination with regard to 
sexual access to married persons; their spouses always have defined 
sexual privileges, and post marital sexual relations outside are most 
generally rather narrowly restricted both by eligibility of partners 
and by occasion.^ 

Finally, kinship units themselves, in spite of their many varia- 
tions, fall within a narrow sector of the total range of structural 
variability of types of collectivities. In pattern variable terms, roles 
within them are always functionally diffuse and collectivity-oriented. 
Their constitution on the basis of biological relatedness precludes 
the primacy of universalistic orientations, and narrowly limits the 

^ Cf. G. P. Murdock, Social Structure, for the comparative evidence on this 
point. 



Empirical Clusterings of Structural Components [155] 

relevance of achievement patterns, at least as criteria of membership, 
to the marriage selection process. 

The important point is the near universality of the limitation of 
variability to such narrow limits both with respect to function and 
to structural type. Why is not initial status-ascription made on the 
basis of an assessment of individual organic and personality traits"? 
Why is not all child care and responsibility sometimes placed in 
the hands of specialized organs just as formal education is? Why is 
not the regulation of sexual relations divorced from responsibility 
for child care and status ascription? Why are kinship units not 
patterned like industrial organizations? It is, of course, by no means 
excluded that fundamental changes in any or all of these respects 
may sometimes come about. But the fact that they have not yet 
done so in spite of the very wide variability of known social sys- 
tems in other respects is none the less a fact of considerable 
importance. 

The broad lines of the explanation of this particular clustering 
are fairly well known, though many details are still obscure. The 
most fundamental considerations probably have to do with the 
consequences of the plasticity, sensitivity and dependency of the 
human infant and with certain closely associated features of the 
place of "sex" in the need-structure of the human personality. Pre- 
sumably there is continuity from sub-human origins in one critical 
respect, namely the centering of the earliest child-care on the 
mother. This fact, plus the disabilities of pregnancy and the fact 
that only recently has other than breast-feeding become widely 
feasible, lie at the basis of the differentiation of sex roles. 

It seems, then, that the personality of the human infant has 
always developed in the context of certain crucially important early 
attachments, that to the mother looming by far the largest. What- 
ever the importance of these facts for the general possibilities of 
personality development, it seems that they are crucial for the per- 
petuation of kinship as a central focus of social structure. The most 
essential point is that the child grows up with a deeply rooted need 
for adult attachments which can serve as substitutes for his infan- 
tile attachments. Furthermore, this attachment system comes to be 
structured along the axis of sex discrimination. Surely, in spite of 
the apparently very great institutional plasticity of erotic need- 



[ 156 ] Empirical Differentiation and Variation 

structures, the great regularity with which homosexuahty is tabooed, 
or at most permitted within very narrow hmits, is a further fact 
which deserves to be ranked with those of initial status ascription, 
that of child care and the regulation of heterosexual relations as a 
central social uniformity. One essential point, then, is above all 
that the child has his erotic development channeled in the direction 
of normal heterosexuality and that this includes not only needs for 
erotic gratification in a specific sense, but for the placing at least of 
some erotic gratifications in the context of a diffuse heterosexual 
attachment. A stable attachment of a man to a woman with inclu- 
sion of sexual relations taken for granted, almost automatically re- 
sults in a family. If this happens, the forces tending to integrate 
the child into the same unit are very powerful indeed. 

It is a highly open question how far the human family has an 
"instinctive" basis. However that may be, there is a powerful com- 
plex of forces on the action level which, once the family is given, 
tends to perpetuate it. The essential point is that the conditions of 
socialization within a kinship unit predispose the child to assume 
both marital and parental roles at the relevant stage of his own life 
cycle. It is by no means out of the question that this basic complex 
of social structures and motivational forces should sometime be 
broken. Our knowledge is not yet sufficient to be able to say in 
much detail what the conditions necessary to break out of it would 
be, nor what would be its effects on personality and social structure. 
But, in spite of the enormous and highly significant variability of 
kinship structure itself, the persistence of the kinship complex 
throughout the range of variability of social structures in other 
respects is indicative of a powerful combination of forces. 

The most recent large-scale demonstration of its power is the 
case of Soviet Russia.^ There is nothing in Marxist ideology in favor 
of preservation of the family; indeed the balance is strongly the 
other way. In the early days of the revolution it was taken for 
granted that the family was mainly a "bourgeois prejudice" and 
was in process of immediately "withering away." Then came a very 
powerful reaction so that in legislative terms a far stricter level of 
official enforcement of family obligation than in most Western 

^ Cf. Alex Inkeles, "Some Aspects of Social Stratification in the USSR," 
American Sociological Review, Sept. 1950. 



Empirical Clusterings of Structural Components [ 157 ] 

countries emerged. A possible set of forces operating to bring this 
about may be suggested, along with whatever may have seemed 
"good policy" to the top leadership. The basic need-disposition 
structure on which motivation for the familial roles of adults is 
built up is developed in the context of childhood attachments. 
Ambivalence relative to these attachments is, of course, the rule 
though varying in intensity. The revolutionary situation may well 
have given opportunity for expression of the negative side of the 
ambivalence. But it is well known that in situations of acute psy- 
chological insecurity there is a strong tendency to regression. A 
revolutionary period certainly creates a great deal of insecurity. It 
may well be, therefore, that the resurgence of a demand for, or at 
least a toleration of, strict family morality, involved a widespread 
regression to attachment needs with high security values. This in- 
terpretation, if correct, would illustrate the difficulty of "abolishing" 
such a deep-rooted complex of role-orientations as those underlying 
the place of kinship structures in societies.^ 

2. Instrumental Achievement Structures and Stratification 

A second principal clustering which limits the variation of 
structures which might otherwise be formally possible, is that of the 
relation of instrumental complexes to stratification. The essential 
fact here seems to be that there are rather sharp limits to the inde- 
pendent variability of the instrumental structure and the distribu- 
tion of facilities, on the one hand, the distribution of rewards on 
the other. The actual variability, that is, occurs within a "band" 
which is considerably narrower than the range of logically possible 
permutations and combinations. 

The more "strung out" dimension of this band is the degree to 
which instrumental orientations are segregated out from fusions 
with expressive orientations and are differentiated. On this con- 
tinuum, the modern Western type of occupational role structure 
stands near the pole of maximum segregation, while the situation 
characteristic of so many non-literate societies, where the over- 

^ A similar process took place in the French Revolution in connection espe- 
cially with the attempt to abolish the legal distinctions between legitimate and 
illegitimate children. Cf. Crane Brinton, French Revolutionary Legislation on 
Illegitimacy 1798- 1804. 



[ 158 ] Empirical Differentiation and Variation 

whelming proportion of instrumental functions is carried out in 
kinship roles, stands close to the opposite pole. This is, to be sure, 
a highly significant range of variability in social structures and the 
differences along it are fundamental in a whole series of respects. 

But the "band" is relatively narrow. This is a way of saying in 
figurative terms that there is not very much variability along an- 
other dimension. This dimension is the matter of the degree of 
independence of instrumental role allocation and hence distribu- 
tion of facilities from prestige distribution, or allocation of rewards. 
Whatever the type of structure with regard to fusions and segrega- 
tions, and the degree of functional differentiation of roles, these 
two tend to go hand in hand, to be closely integrated with each 
other. 

There are two primary aspects of this integration. The first 
concerns problems internal to a universalistic, functionally specific, 
and affectively neutral sub-system of instrumental orientations. Here 
the relational reward system consists primarily of approval and 
esteem, and their obverses disapproval and disesteem, and the dis- 
tribution of non-social reward-objects in accordance with their sym- 
bolic relations to an approval-esteem scale. The second concerns 
the response and love aspects of the reward system and its relation 
to the instrumental complex. The significance of kinship in this 
latter context is, because of the considerations just outlined, so great 
that it is above all a question of the relations between the instru- 
mental complex and the family. 

First, within the instrumental complex itself. With the elabora- 
tion of the division of labor there is an inherent tendency to dif- 
ferentiate along two axes both of which have inferiority-superiority 
implications. In the first place, achievement values cannot mean 
anything at all, if there is no discrimination between doing things 
"well" and doing them "badly." The capacity to do things relatively 
"well" (which is always at least implicitly a comparative judgment, 
relative to other actors) may be called "competence" or "skill." 
With any at all elaborate system of the division of labor there will 
inevitably be a considerable range of differentiation of levels of 
competence, especially when a system of different technical roles 
and not just one such role is considered. 



Em'pirical Clusterings of Structural Components [ 159 ] 

Secondly, beyond rather elementary levels, instrumental role- 
difFerentiation requires organization. Organization in turn differen- 
tiates roles along the axis of "responsibility" for the affairs of the 
collectivity. It seems to be one of the best attested empirical general- 
izations of social science that every continuous organization which 
involves at all complex cooperative processes, is significantly differ- 
entiated along this axis, informally if not formally. 

It goes almost without saying that the imperatives of effective- 
ness demand that with differentials of competence and of responsi- 
bility there should go differentials in facilities. It would clearly not 
be efficient to place the best tools in the hands of the least efficient 
workers in order to compensate them for their lower efficiency 
status, still less perhaps to entrust the most important facilities to 
those carrying the least responsibility. The latter is indeed strictly 
impossible because of the relational component in facilities them- 
selves. Thus the "connections" necessary to adjust an organization 
to its social situation, can only serve this function if they are acces- 
sible to those exercising responsibility. There is, therefore, an inher- 
ent tendency to allocate greater facilities to those on the higher 
levels of competence and responsibility. 

This tendency is hoth a functional imperative of effectiveness 
and efficiency of instrumental structures, and an inherent implica- 
tion of the valuation of instrumental achievement. But the valua- 
tion of instrumental achievement itself means that achieving higher 
levels of competence and/or responsibility, and having larger facili- 
ties at one's command are in themselves rewards, and rewards 
which are inherently differential. It is literally impossible to have 
an instrumental system sanctioned by the valuation of achievement 
without the internal differentiation of the role and facility structure 
coming also to be a differentiation of rewards, an internal stratifica- 
tion. This conclusion follows directly from the fundamental 
theorem of institutional integration of motivation presented in 
Chapter II. 

The only way to avoid this would be to suppress the valuation 
of the differences of competence or responsibility, including denial 
of their functional relevance. Here again the history of Soviet Rus- 
sia is instructive. Marxist ideology, including Lenin's own state- 



[ i6o ] Emfirical Differentiation and Variation 

ments, did radically deny that any competence above that of the 
ordinary "worker" was a legitimate basis of differential valuation.* 
But what has happened in fact is that, with the developing indus- 
trialization of the Soviet Union, both facilities and rewards have 
become markedly differentiated, including monetary reward. The 
fact that the Soviet industrial manager belongs to the "intelligent- 
sia" while his American counterpart is called by Marxists a "capi- 
talist" does not alter the essential structural situation. Both receive 
rewards greatly in excess of those going to ordinary workers. 
Whether in this respect the equalitarian ideal of communism will 
be realized in the future remains to be seen. Perhaps a sociologist 
is at least entitled to be skeptical. 

This, of course, does not in the least mean that there is no 
room for variability in the relations between instrumental complexes 
and reward systems. There is very considerable room, but the fact 
remains that the "band" is far narrower than the permutations and 
combinations of the structural elements of such systems would by 
themselves lead us to believe had to be the case. 

But this is not all. The same individual actor who is the incum- 
bent of instrumentally oriented, e.g., occupational roles, also has 
certain expressive needs which are not gratified in that role. He is 
above all incorporated into other role systems where immediate 
gratifications and diffuse attachments and loyalties to individuals 
loom large. The relative exclusion of such orientations from an 
occupational role system is itself a prerequisite of the latter develop- 
ing to a high degree of elaboration. 

This is the essential basis for the segregation of kinship and 
occupational roles in "industrial" societies. But no such society so 
far known has shown strong signs of eliminating the kinship unit 
entirely or for a long period— as we illustrated by the case of Soviet 
Russia. In view of these facts it is not conceivable that, so long as 
there is a kinship structure, it should be totally unintegrated with 
tlie occupational structure. This integration above all concerns its 
relation to the reward system. The solidarity of the kinship unit is 
of such a character that if certain facilities and rewards are available 
to one member, they will have to be "shared" with the other mem- 
bers. It is strictly inconceivable that most of the men highly placed 

* Cf. Barrington Moore, Jr., Soviet Politics, the Dilemma of Power, Chapter II. 



Errfpirical Clusterings of Structural Components [ 1 6 1 ] 

in the occupational sphere, should fail to share what their incomes 
can buy, with their families if they have them, and perhaps still 
more fundamental, that they should not share their prestige. So 
long, that is, as there is a solidary kinship unit, it is impossible for 
the wives and children of those high and low in the occupational 
system to be equally treated, regardless of their 'personal achieve- 
ments. In other words, these two basic components of the reward 
system of the society, occupational approval or esteem and the sym- 
bolic accoutrements thereof, and "emotional security," love and 
response in the kinship unit, must go together in some way. The 
consequence of this is that the combination of an occupationally 
differentiated industrial system and a significantly solidary kinship 
system must be a system of stratification in which the children of 
the more highly placed come to have differential advantages, by 
virtue of their ascribed kinship status, not shared by those lower 
down. Again this generalization is amply confirmed by the history 
of Soviet Russia. It is conceivable that this empirical generalization 
will some day be invalidated for instance by elimination of the 
kinship unit. But in the light of the historical persistence of this 
clustering, the question of how this would be possible is sharply 
posed. 

If what has just been said is true of "industrial" societies, how 
much more so in the cases closer to the "fusion" end of the con- 
tinuum referred to above. Indeed it can safely be said that in such 
societies, anything even closely approaching "equality of opportu- 
nity" to the degree to which that is characteristic of modem indus- 
trial societies, is out of the question. But unless the need for kinship 
solidarities can be radically reduced below, for instance, the present 
American level, there is an inherent limit to the development, not 
only of absolutely egalitarian societies, but even of complete equality 
of opportunity. 

3. Territoriality, Force and the Integration of the Power System 

A third very central empirical clustering in social systems con- 
cerns the power system. We have already shown the way in which 
instrumental orientations, through the relational focus of facilities, 
tend to focus on power as a proximate goal and how, since facilities 
and rewards are so intimately connected, and the power of one actor 



[ 162 ] Em'pirical Differentiation and Variation 

is always relative to that of another, power can readily become the 
focus of disruptive conflicts. Finally it was also shown that force in 
one primary context, namely that of the 'prevention of undesired 
action, is an ultimately effective means, and force is inherently 
linked to territorial location because it is a physical means. 

This complex of facts is of such critical functional significance 
to social systems that it is safe to say that no paramount integrative 
structure of a society could perform that function effectively unless 
it were intimately tied in with the control of power relations in 
general and force in particular. No society can subsist unless there 
is a basis for "counting on" some control of the use of force, and 
unless disruptive conflicts which inevitably become "struggles for 
power" tending by progression along the gradient of resort to in- 
creasingly drastic means to eventuate in resort to force, are kept 
within bounds. If it is a partial social system which is in question 
an essential part of the problem of its relation to the society is that 
of its place in the power system. 

Certain types of integrative structure are, of course, very directly 
organized about these foci. The ideal type case is what we refer to 
as the state, which is the equivalent for this area of the social struc- 
ture of the kinship system and the system of stratification for the 
other two. There is a very wide range of variability with respect to 
the extent to which such a differentiated structure emerges. Among 
other things it is a function of the level of organization of the use 
of force, and of course its technology. This in turn is connected 
with the level of technology and organization in general— if there 
is a highly developed occupational system it is always possible that 
the organizational patterns which characterize it can be applied to 
organization of the use of force. We may say that the higher the 
level of organization the more potentially disruptive violent conflict 
can become, and therefore the greater the functional need for its 
control. But in any case force must be territorially organized. It is 
not possible to have a variety of different jurisdictions commanding 
force within the same territory without definition of their limits. 

One concrete illustration of the importance of these considera- 
tions may be given. There seem to be certain elements of inherent 
instability in societies where the overwhelming bulk of the popu- 
lation is organized on the basis of peasant village communities. 



Empirical Clusterings of Structural Components [163] 

One of the reasons for this is the fact that the village community as 
the primary focus of solidarity can only within very narrow limits 
be an effective unit for the organization of the use of force. It is, in 
the face of any more extensive organization, not a defensible unit. 
Hence there must always be a "superstructure" over a peasant 
society, which, among other things, organizes and stabilizes the 
use of force. The question is how far such a superstructure is, as 
it were, "organically" integrated with the self-contained village 
communities and often the level of integration is not high. This 
circumstance is of great significance for the history of China, and, 
for example, of Eastern Europe. Among many other things it has 
much to do with the striking fact that the Communist movement 
has had so much more success in peasant societies than in indus- 
trialized societies, which have a much firmer structure between the 
lowest level community unit and the paramount integration of the 
power system. 

We may conclude, then, that societies where there is almost 
unrestricted freedom to resort to force, and above all where several 
agencies with independent control of organized force operate within 
the same territorial area, are as rare as societies where children are 
socialized without any reference to kinship relations or where the 
reward system is in inverse relation to the gradations of competence 
and responsibility in the principal areas of valued achievement. 

4. Religion and Value-Integration 

A fourth empirical clustering may be briefly delineated. In the 
first place there are certain types of situation of human life in any 
society which, though varying in specific structure, incidence and 
intensity in diff^erent societies have certain universal features. There 
is the limitation of the human life span and the universal experi- 
ence of death, especially of premature death, not only as an expec- 
tation for the person who knows he is going to die, but as posing a 
problem of emotional adjustment to the survivors. The crucial sig- 
nificance of attachments to human individuals is such that death 
cannot be treated with indifference. Secondly, whatever the value 
system institutionalized in a society, the realization of the expecta- 
tions which it defines is necessarily to some degree both uncertain 
and uneven. In part this results from the exposure of men to an 



[ 164 ] Em'pirical Differentiation and Variation 

external nature which is capricious and in some respects "un- 
friendly" in relation to human interests— the vagaries of the weather 
constitute one prominent example. But more fundamentally it 
results from the empirical impossibility of complete integration of 
any value-system with the realistic conditions of action. Every social 
system is in some degree malintegrated, which means that there is 
always a problem of the discrepancy between institutionally legiti- 
mized expectations and the actual outcome of events. There is 
always a problem of what attitude should be taken to what in terms 
of the current value system is undeserved suffering, and to the 
actual existence of unpunished behavior in contravention of the 
moral norms of the society, the "problem of evil." The moral econ- 
omy of a human society never has perfectly balanced books. 

From what we know of the psychology of expectations and the 
consequences of frustration, it is clear that there are difficult prob- 
lems of adjustment in these areas. Just as it is not possible to be 
indifferent to the death of an object of intense attachment, so it is 
not possible simply to take the frustration of one's fundamental 
expectations with respect to values, as to what, for example, is fair, 
"in one's stride" as it were, saying, "what the hell." It is therefore 
imperative that there be some sort of socially structured orientation 
to these problems of discrepancy precisely between events and 
institutionalized expectations. This problem of the Ausgleich, the 
ultimate balancing of the motivational and moral economy, is the 
core of the significance of religion in a sociological context. 

The phenomena in this field are exceedingly complex, and can- 
not be gone into in detail here. There is, of course, a very wide 
range of possible structures. But the essential point for present pur- 
poses is that whatever mechanisms of adjustment in this area exist 
in a society— and they must in the nature of the case be more than 
merely idiosyncratic to particular personalities— they must be socially 
structured, whatever these may be. They must in some sense and to 
some degree be integrated with the dominant system of institution- 
alized values. They cannot vary at random relative to it. There must 
also be some order of cognitive orientation which covers both areas 
and the relation between them; the problem of the "meaning" of 
the discrepancies cannot be simply ignored in the belief systems of 
the society. Furthermore, there must be some integration on the 



Em'pirical Clusterings of Structural Components [ 165 ] 

level of expressive symbolism. These problems will be further dis- 
cussed below in Chapters VIII and IX, respectively. 

Essentially the same order of analysis could be carried farther, 
not only by citing other empirical clusterings of the components of 
social structure, but by citing certain highly generalized relations of 
interdependence between the ones which have already been re- 
viewed. Here only one illustration of this interdependence will be 
given, that of certain relations between religion and the power 
system. 

The religious movement, because of its relation to general value 
integration, claims a paramount jurisdiction over human value- 
orientations, which must somehow be integrated with the values 
institutionalized in the state. Some of these movements, however, 
have, in their religious ethics, radically repudiated the use of force 
or more broadly concern with power. 

Such movements face a basic dilemma. So long as they are 
alienated from the central institutional structure, the problems of 
power and force can be relegated to "Caesar" in the sense of Early 
Christianity. But if the movement becomes institutionalized as the 
dominant religion of a going society, it must somehow come to 
terms with these problems. The possibilities are various. The sim- 
plest solution structurally is for the religious movement to become 
merged with the "political" integrative structure of the society, but 
this is a solution which places peculiarly severe strains on the main- 
tenance of what in this, as in perhaps other respects, are "other- 
worldly" values. But the structural segregation (not separation in 
the American sense) of church and state as in mediaeval Catholi- 
cism is not an easy and simple solution either. If the religion is 
highly organized as a church it cannot completely dissociate itself 
from responsibility in this context— hence we have such phenomena 
as the church "itself" repudiating the use of force, but heretics 
being burned at the stake by "the state" as soon as they had been 
condemned for heresy by an ecclesiastical court. 

This "dilemma of institutionalization" relative to a religious 
value-system is one of the most important threads of analysis of 
social systems and will, in particular, be further analyzed in Chap- 
ter XI on Social Change below. Here it may be remarked that it is 
also very much of a dilemma for a "secular religion" like Commu- 



[ i66 ] Empirical Differentiation and Variation 

nism which also repudiates coercion and the use of force, as a 
matter of ethical principle, in the ideal state; indeed this is perhaps 
the most definite item in the official Marxist forecast of what "com- 
munism" really will turn out to be. But as we all know, as a move- 
ment, not only in promoting the revolution within "capitalist" 
societies, but in the stage of "socialism" within the Soviet Union, 
far from repudiating the use of force, the Communist movement has 
magnified and glorified it. The obvious question is, how if at all will 
the transition be made. 

These four examples of empirical clusterings of social structures 
are meant to be illustrative, not exhaustive. They are meant to 
show in the first place that the structural analysis of social systems 
is not merely a matter of spinning out the logical possibilities of 
the permutations and combinations of certain more or less arbi- 
trarily defined structural components. We have taken a step toward 
bringing these components into connection with the problems of 
dynamic analysis, which is always the analysis of motivation in 
relation to personality structures and to situations. This is another 
way of saying that social systems must meet the functional pre- 
requisites of their persistence as systems. 

These empirical clusterings thus provide us with excellent ap- 
proaches to the analysis of dynamic problems. It is well known that 
value-patterns in many cases vary beyond the limits of these clus- 
ters, as in the case of doctrines repudiating the use of force, as just 
noted. TTiere is, therefore, a highly important set of problems which 
concern the possibilities of institutionalization of patterns along the 
edges of the "band" of historically given structures, and beyond 
those edges. Along the edges we are presented with what are, more 
or less definitely ready-made "experimental" situations, of which the 
Soviet regime is a grand-scale example. 

That such situations should continually arise is indicated by 
evidence which will be presented later^ that there are strong forces 
in all social systems making for commitment to "utopian" patterns 
of value-orientation, that is, patterns which are incompatible with 
the knov^m conditions of effective long-run institutionalization. 
Thus it seems fair to say that in contemporary society advocacy of 

° See below, Chapter VII. 



The Constitution of Empirical Societies [ 167 J 

complete abolition of the family, of absolute egalitarianism or of 
absolute repudiation of coercion, can be placed in this category. 

However, it should be made very clear that it is dangerous to 
suggest that there is a rigid line at the edge of the band. On the 
contrary there is every reason to believe that the line is indefinite. 
Society is not a static thing, and some things certainly become pos- 
sible at certain stages of its development which were previously not 
so; to take a simple example the modem scale of organization would 
probably not be possible without modem methods of communica- 
tion and record keeping. But this indefiniteness of the line at any 
given time does not mean that "anything is possible" if some people 
only want it enough, and it most certainly means that if the line is 
to be importantly shifted, specific mechanisms to meet the relevant 
functional exigencies must also be developed. There must be a 
development of "functional alternatives" to the structures which 
have been eliminated. 

§ THE CONSTITUTION OF EMPIRICAL SOCIETIES 

THE implication of the foregoing review of empirical clus- 
terings of the elements of social structure is that societies are sub- 
jected to certain functional exigencies without which we cannot 
account for the fact that the known range of actual social structures 
is only a fraction of those which would result from a random assort- 
ment of the permutations and combinations of their structural com- 
ponents. These exigencies are of two classes: first, the universal 
imperatives, the conditions which must be met by any social system 
of a stable and durable character, and second, the imperatives of 
compatibility, those which limit the range of coexistence of struc- 
tural elements in the same society, in such a way that, given one 
structural element, such as a given class of occupational role system, 
the type of kinship system which goes with it must fall vdthin 
certain specifiable limits. 

The elements of social structure have been derived from two 
sources, the pattems of orientation of action, and the elements of 
the situation to which it is oriented. The relevance of the orienta- 
tion elements to the organization of systems of action, including 
social systems, centers on the role of pattems of value-orientation, 



[ i68 ] Em'pirical Differentiation and Variation 

because it is in the selective dilemmas to which these patterns apply 
that the basic alternatives of such organization are to be found. We 
may say, then, that if the structure of social systems were solely a 
function of the "free choices" of their component actors, their main 
structural outline would be capable of description in terms of the 
patterns of value-orientation alone, and these in turn would be 
derivable from cognitive and expressive orientation patterns. The 
extent to which the structure of social systems is not derivable from 
cultural elements is therefore a measure of the importance of the 
determinants underlying what we have called the two classes of 
"exigencies" or "imperatives" to which they are subject in the real- 
istic conditions of their operation as systems. These resultants of 
these factors may be considered as patterns of deviation from what 
would be the model of "perfect integration" in terms of the domi- 
nant pattern of value-orientation. Such patterns we may, relative 
to a given value system, call the adaptive structures of the social 
system. A complete account and classification of such structures 
cannot be worked out in the present state of knowledge. But the 
knowledge we do have can serve as a rough guide to the beginning 
of systematization. 

We may then distinguish that part of the social structure which 
directly institutionalizes the dominant patterns of value-orientation 
of the culture; there is little doubt for instance that in the American 
case the core of this is the occupational system. But as a concrete 
sub-system of the social system even this cannot correspond exactly 
wdth the pattern-expectations of the value-system itself. There will 
have to be adaptive aspects even of this structure, which may be 
interpreted as modes of adaptation to the exigencies of institution- 
alizing the value patterns in question under the given conditions, 
tliat is to say, in the light of the strains to which the population in 
question are subjected, in these roles themselves, and in combining 
these with the other roles in which the same people are involved 
in other aspects of the society. In the American occupational case, 
for example, the simultaneous involvement of the same individuals 
in botli occupational and kinship roles is one of the key problems. 

Only in a limiting case, however, would the social structures 
which direcdy institutionalize the dominant value patterns, even 
with the above qualifications, meet most of the functional pre- 



The Constitution of Empirical Societies [169] 

requisites of a going society. There will, then, in the same society, 
be other structures which are adaptive in a still broader sense, in 
that they are organized primarily by the institutionalization of 
patterns other than the dominant value patterns; this would be 
the case, for instance, with kinship in American society. 

We have already presented evidence to indicate that the exigen- 
cies of a going society are such that it is exceedingly unlikely that 
any one consistently integrated pattern can cover the necessary 
range. There will, therefore, have to be institutionalization of 
secondary or subsidiary or variant value patterns, institutionaliza- 
tion of which is in a sense conditional, in that its application and 
hence legitimation is limited to certain contexts in such a way as to 
minimize interference with the main value pattern. The problem 
of integration posed by the necessity of "tolerating" and indeed 
institutionalizing patterns deviant from the main values is one of 
the main integrative problems for social systems, the more so, the 
more complex and differentiated their structure. 

It is, therefore, possible to approach the analysis of types of 
social structure from the side of the patterns of value-orientation. 
By this procedure the first step will be to consider at what points in 
the system of foci of crystallization reviewed in the last chapter the 
primary foci of significance for the value-system in question will 
be found, and what the functional conditions of realization of the 
value patterns in question in that area are. How will these necessi- 
tate modification of the fully ideal pattern? Then the question will 
have to be raised, given what we know about the functional im- 
peratives of social systems and their empirical working out, what 
other structures must also exist in the same social system, and how 
can these other structures be integrated with the central value- 
focus structures? This procedure vv/ill in fact be followed out in a 
sketchy way in the final section of the present chapter for each of 
the four main pattern-variable combinations for social value 
systems. 

Before undertaking this task, however, it will be best to build 
a somewhat firmer foundation for it by inquiring more systematically 
about some of the minimum structural features of all societies and 
then showing how these provide starting points for further differen- 
tiation and variation. The contention will be that there are certain 



[ 170 ] Em'pirical Differentiation and Variation 

types of relationship which must find a place in any society, though 
their relative importance and their relation to others will vary 
widely. What we will be doing, then, is to approach the problem 
of the constitution of the empirical society from both ends, from 
that of certain functionally required minimum structures, and 
from that of the differentiation of types of value-orientation pat- 
tern, and the implications of implementation of these in a concrete 
social relationship system. 

Throughout the discussion, in both contexts, the system of 
points of reference developed in the preceding chapter, particularly 
the fundamental outline of six categories presented on page 137, 
will be our primary guide. The question will always be, in the 
society we are describing, what structures are found which fit 
under each of the six categories, and of course the further elaborated 
sub-categories so far as differentiation goes far enough to make 
these relevant. 

We may start by pointing out a conspicuous and apparently 
fundamental asymmetry in the relationship between ascriptive and 
achievement foci of status and role definition. There is, that is, a 
sense in which categorization in ascriptive terms apparently has 
a certain priority over that in achievement terms. There has to be 
an ascriptive base relative to which achievement-expectations are 
defined. When we combine these considerations with the implica- 
tion of the universality of the kinship cluster, we may focus atten- 
tion on a fundamental complex of social structures in which ascrip- 
tive criteria play a central part and which, so far as we know, is 
common, though with many variations, to all societies. 

This is the cluster which in classificatory terms utilizes the quali- 
ties of age and sex, and in relational terms those of biological posi- 
tion and of territorial location as ascriptive points of reference. In 
the first instance on these bases kinship groupings are built up, with 
the conjugal family serving as the nuclear unit. Though there is 
enormous variation in the structure of kinship systems, there is con- 
stancy with respect to this focus.^ Moreover, as was pointed out in 
the last section, this fact has further implications. This is true, first, 
because given the kinship unit, the status of the child in the wider 

® On the whole subject of the variability of kinship systems and their relation 
to residential location see G. P. Murdock, Social Structure. 



The Constitution of Empirical Societies [171] 

society must be predominately ascriptively defined, and indeed the 
wider the influence of kinship the more powerful the ascriptive 
emphasis generally. Secondly, in terms of the other pattern vari- 
ables, there is an inherent relationship between this ascriptive em- 
phasis and particularism and diffuseness. Particularism follows from 
the fact of ascription by relational criteria. Diffuseness follows from 
the fact that the kinship unit is not organized about specific func- 
tions, but about a generalized solidarity of those placed together by 
the relevant ascriptive criteria. Only with respect to the choice of 
marriage partners, under certain conditions, does this primarily 
ascriptive structure of kinship come to be broken through at certain 
points. 

A central aspect of the diff"use ascriptive solidarity of kinship 
units is the fact that they constitute the units of residence of most 
normal populations. It is this circumstance which links biological 
relatedness as an ascriptive focus with territorial location. Hence, 
so far as the kinship unit is the unit of residence, we have kinship 
and community of residence directly linked together. In residential 
terms the community is a cluster of kinship units, or put a little 
differently the eff^ective concrete kinship unit is at the same time the 
primary unit both of a kinship system and of a system of territorial 
organization of the population. 

There are, of course, many exceptions to this pattern. Various 
population elements such as students, some specialized work groups, 
e.g. lumberjacks, monks and nuns, and military forces, do not "live" 
in kinship units. But there is no known society where living apart 
from kinship units is the primary pattern for the normal individual 
throughout the life cycle. 

There are intricate inter-relationships between kinship and resi- 
dence which need not concern us here.^ But given the universality 
of this combination of the two structures it constitutes a focus from 
which ramifying structural relationships can be followed out. The 
combination, for instance, gives one component at least of the socio- 
logical setting of the problems of territorial mobility and stability of 
populations. It is above all because territorial mobility must either 
move kinship units as units, or set the individual into relationship 

^ Cf . Murdock, op. cit. 



[ 172 ] Empirical Differentiation and Variation 

with a different set of kinship units that it acquires its sociological 
significance. 

However, there are two directions of ramification which may be 
selected for comment here. They are essentially two fundamentally 
different ways of organizing kinship units into larger clusterings. 
The first of these is the ethnic group. An ethnic group is an aggre- 
gate of kinship units, the members of which either trace their origin 
in terms of descent from a common ancestor or in terms of descent 
from ancestors who all belonged to the same categorized ethnic 
group. It may according to the point of view either be regarded as 
an extension of kinship into larger aggregates or as the matrix, 
defined in terms of biological relatedness, in which a given kinship 
unit fits. An ethnic group is normally endogamous and recruitment 
is by birth, though, of course, assimilation by intermarriage or even 
other mechanisms is in a certain proportion of cases possible. The 
biological distinctness of an ethnic group will presumably only be 
significant to the social structure if the group is characterized by a 
distinctive social status in the larger social system, a status which is 
very often at least marked and symbolized by a distinctive cultural 
tradition.^ 

The second direction of ramification is the sorting out of kinship 
units relative to prestige status within the social system. This is 
what we call social cluss, a class being an aggregate of kinship units 
of approximately equal status in the system of stratification. Ethnic 
grouping and class can coincide where there is little or no class 
mobility. The Indian caste system is an approximation to this situa- 
tion. But in the case of an "open" class system the distinction be- 
tween the two is, of course, crucial; the ethnic and the class bases of 
differentiation cut across each other. 

Within every society, therefore, it becomes necessary to ask what 
is its kinship system, what is the basis of its organization into com- 
munities at the various levels of inclusiveness, and is it differentiated 
into ethnic and/or class groups? What groups and on what bases 
and how related to each other? It is possible that there are func- 
tional equivalents of these structures. We have seen that in the case 
of kinship this is highly unlikely. In the case of community it would 

® As in the case of the Jews. In the case of the Negro color as a visibility 
symbol in a sense takes the place of a distinctive culture. 



The Constitution of Empirical Societies [ 173 ] 

appear to be strictly impossible. It is possible in the case of ethnic 
grouping, but only on the basis that the society as a whole consti- 
tutes a single undifferentiated ethnic group. It is, then, itself always 
an ethnic group relative to groups outside what has been treated as 
the same society, so we can say that in a strict sense this basis of 
organization is never absent. Theoretically all humanity could be a 
single ethnic group, but this seems rather remote. Similarly ethnic 
and class composition may in a limiting case coincide. But class dif- 
ferentiation within ethnic groups is the rule rather than the excep- 
tion. Finally, some degree of prestige differentiation of kinship units, 
that is, of class differentiation, also seems to be universal. 

The fact that these types of groupings are built about relation- 
ally ascriptive criteria has critical implications for the role-patteming 
within them. With the one exception of choice of marriage partner, 
membership in a kinship group can be only ascribed. Similarly with 
an ethnic group. In the case of a community, entry into the com- 
munity may be voluntary, but given residence the rest is ascribed, 
e.g. liability to local taxes. This at least greatly narrows the range of 
achievement criteria. Secondly, residence either ensures or predis- 
poses to diffuseness of role-obligations rather than specificity, since 
there is no way of ensuring that the exigencies of a situation from 
which either there is no escape, or only at the cost of changing 
residence, can be confined to any specifically defined context. 

Therefore, we may say that membership in the four types of 
groupings, kinship, community, ethnic and class, should char- 
acterize every individual actor in every society and such groupings 
should, with the requisite qualifications, be looked for as part of the 
structure of every society. Moreover, these groupings will be pat- 
terned partly, if not wholly, in ascriptive terms; they will have im- 
portant indeed usually predominant particularistic elements, and 
they will have diffuse emphases, if not without qualification. 

What might be called a "minimum society" might as a structure 
be describable exclusively in terms of these four categories if the 
requisite discriminations of differentiated roles within each of them 
were made. It will be noted that none of them is organized primarily 
about the primacy of an orientation type. 

The next set of questions concerns the differentiation of roles 
and sub-collectivities not only within these four groupings but in 



[ 174 ] Emfirical Differentiation and Variation 

structural independence from any of them. These will, in the first 
instance, concern the areas open for, and the structures developed 
within sub-systems of, "private" instrumental and expressive orienta- 
tion. At the lowest level of differentiation these would be purely 
"interstitial" to the ascriptive groupings, in which case such orienta- 
tions would, in the ideal type case, be confined to representative 
roles on behalf of the sub-collectivity. This would, for example, be 
true of negotiating marriage arrangements between kinship groups 
or relations between adjacent communities. 

But such structures may be more than interstitial. In such a case 
the structurally more primitive type is, as we have seen, the "eco- 
logical complex," for example, in the instrumental case a market 
nexus, in the expressive a network of "purely personal" friendships. 
Then, as a next step in structural elaboration, particularly in the 
instrumental case, there may develop collectivities characterized by 
primacy of an orientation type instead of an ascriptive basis of con- 
stitution. By far the most prominent of these is the instrumen tally 
oriented organization. 

Both within the ecological complexes and the collectivities con- 
stituted by orientation types a premium is placed on achievement 
criteria over ascriptive. Similarly there is much more scope for uni- 
versalism, and in the instrumental types, instrumental primacy 
implies affective neutrality. 

Both ecological complexes and their constituent orientation- 
primacy roles should, in these terms, if at all stabilized, be treated 
as parts of the structure of the social system, as, of course, are con- 
stituent collectivities organized on other than an ascriptive basis. 
They will still in a sense always be interstitial to the ascriptive 
groupings, but can, of course, develop to a point where they over- 
shadow all except the broadest basis of community and of ethnic 
belongingness. This is, of course, the case in the "industrial" type 
of society. 

The integrative structures fit into this schematization readily. 
The power-territoriality-force complex is of such importance that 
what is ordinarily considered to be a society will, if on a high level 
of differentiation, generally almost always be organized as a single 
collectivity on this basis, will, that is, be a "politically organized" 
society. There are rare cases, such as classical Greece, where a 



The Constitution of Em^pirical Societies [ 175 ] 

"family" of city-states rather than any one really constituted the 
society. But the relation of this overall political collectivity to the 
"private" spheres of the constituent actors, both individual and col- 
lective, constitutes a principal area of the structural features of any 
social system. As noted, this will almost always be closely integrated 
both with a territorial basis of community and with an ethnic tradi- 
tion, as well as with internal differentiation on a class basis. 

There is, however, as we have seen, a possibility that certain 
aspects of the integration of cultural orientations will be integrated 
in part separately from the political integration. This is the case 
when there is a "church" distinct from the state. It is also possible 
for cultural integration to belong almost wholly to a private and 
informal sphere without overall formal organization, as in the case 
of Hinduism in India, which for much of its history has coexisted 
with a plurality of political units. 

Finally, what we have above called the "economies" of the allo- 
cation of facilities and of rewards as overall organizations must be 
treated as part of the structure of the society. As we have seen they 
must be closely integrated with each other and with the system of 
ascriptive traits. They are essentially to be regarded as modes of 
ordering the units of the system, the orientation-roles and the object- 
roles of the constituent actors both individual and collective. We can 
speak of differences in the degree of equality or inequality of the 
distribution of facilities and rewards, of degrees of stringency of con- 
trol of this distribution, of relative prominence of individuals and 
of collectivities as units, and the like, and of equality and inequality 
of opportunity of access to both facilities and rewards, and degrees 
of mobility and immobility relative to ascriptive starting points. 

The above considerations give us one frame of reference for 
treating the problem of structural differentiation of societies. Under- 
lying all of the more elaborate types of differentiation are the funda- 
mental ascriptive groupings of which, in turn, kinship and terri- 
torial location seem to be the most fundamental, though ethnicity 
and class rank close to them. There may be, as voluminous evidence 
from anthropological investigations shows, a wide variety not only 
of variations, but of structural elaborations in various directions, 
without breaking through the primacy of these ascriptive foci and 
the predominandy particularistic-diffuse role patterns organized 



[ 176 ] Eni'pirical Differentiation and Variation 

about them— variation within these ranges is by and large charac- 
teristic of non-hterate societies. In general both instrumental and 
expressive functions are carried out within the fused type of role- 
structure (Type 4, Chapter III, p. 87). Segregation of such inter- 
ests is predominantly by occasion, not by role differentiation. 
The contexts of exchange transactions, mediating particular roles in 
relation to each other, are also predominantly included in the 
particularistic-diffuse role system, are institutionalized above all in 
terms of kinship relations or, as it has sometimes been put, the 
"fiction of kinship." The "economies" of the facility and reward 
systems are thus not structurally differentiated out, but are integral 
parts of the central ascribed role-systems themselves. There will, of 
course, inevitably be some "interstices" in such a system, but by and 
large this is the major structural type. Within it, let it be repeated, 
there is room for very considerable structural variation and 
elaboration. 

A qualitatively new gradient of structural differentiation is, 
however, entered upon when two further closely interdependent 
developments take place. The first of these is the specialization of 
the roles of individual actors and of collectivities in relation to in- 
strumental and expressive interests and functions as such, roles 
which are structurally indefendent of the ascribed diffuse solidarity 
groupings. The second is the growth of a nexus of "free" exchange 
relationships between these role and collectivity units where the 
settlement of terms is not fused into the particularistic solidary rela- 
tionship structure, but is allowed to be independently variable. This, 
in turn, necessitates the institutionalization of rights to possessions, 
both as facilities and as rewards, on a basis which is more than just 
one aspect of an ascribed-particularistic-diffuse solidarity structure. 
This new gradient of differentiation is that usually regarded as con- 
stitutive of the more "advanced" types of society, and the process 
may be carried to greatly varying degrees of elaboration. It certainly, 
however, opens out possibilities of the arrangement of human affairs 
which are altogether absent from the other type, no matter hx)w 
great the elaboration within it. Certainly it is connected with liter- 
acy on the cultural level, and the concomitant capacity for abstrac- 
tion and for cumulative cultural developments. 

Different types of value-orientation will, of course, have different 



The Structural Imperatives of a Social System [177] 

selective emphases relative to the above structural possibilities. The 
way in which these selective emphases work out will be reviewed in 
the final section of the chapter. 

The above applications of the classification on page 137 and 
following of the last chapter bring us relatively close to a system of 
categories necessary for the adequate empirical description of a 
society as a system. They have all been systematically derived from 
the fundamental components of action theory. As a first approxima- 
tion they should be complete; and very definitely they are not 
ad hoc. They constitute a systematic oudine of the structure of the 
system, in terms which can link quite directly with whatever 
dynamic knowledge we have available, and can serve as a highly 
important guide to research. 

The next task will be to explore certain of the interconnections 
between these parts of the social system. The facts brought forward 
in the discussion of empirical clusterings will again serve as a guide. 

§ THE STRUCTURAL IMPERATIVES OF A 
GIVEN SOCIAL SYSTEM 

LET US go back to the problem of the subjection of a given 
value-orientation pattern to the exigencies of implementation in a 
given situation. An essential part of this situation is the nature of the 
other parts of the social system in which the pattern itself is 
institutionalized. 

Action toward the implementation of a value-orientation pat- 
tern, that is, must not only be adapted to certain motivational and 
situational exigencies which are universal to the human species and 
hence to the existence of stable social systems at all, but must meet 
certain conditions of compatibility within the same social system. 
The former set have been called the universal imperatives, the latter 
imperatives of compatibility or the structural imperatives. Only the 
two together can give us the limits to ranges of social variability. 

First let us discuss some of the problems of the modem type of 
"industrial" occupational structure. Its primary characteristic is a 
system of universalistic-specific-affectively neutral achievement- 
oriented roles. There must not only be particular roles of this type 
but they must fit together into complex systems both within the 
same organization and within the ecological complexes linking in- 



[ lyS ] Em'pirical Differentiation and Variation 

dividuals and organizations together. It is out of the question for 
such a role system to be directly homologous with a kinship struc- 
ture, so that it should be essentially a network of interlocking kin- 
ship units, as many other social structures, like the feudal, tend to 
be. It must for a variety of reasons be segregated from the kinship 
system, because certain ranges of freedom independently of kinship 
pressures, including freedom for mobility, i.e., change of status, are 
essential to it. These conditions would be incompatible with those 
essential to many types of kinship system. Indeed it can be said that 
the "conjugal" type of the latter, which isolates the conjugal unit 
from other solidarities to a high degree, is the only kinship type 
which interferes relatively little with an industrial economy. Hence 
we may say with considerable confidence to those whose values lead 
them to prefer for kinship organization the system of mediaeval 
Europe or of Classical China to our own, that they must choose. It 
is possible to have either the latter type of kinship system or a highly 
industrialized economy, hut not hath in the same society. Either 
one requires conditions in the corresponding part of the social struc- 
ture, which are incompatible with the needs of the other. In other 
words, a given type of structure in any major part of the society 
imposes imperatives on the rest, in the sense that given that struc- 
ture, if it is to continue, other relevant structures in the same society 
cannot vary beyond certain limits which are substantially narrower 
than are the general limits of variability of social structures in the 
relevant spheres. 

A second example may be taken from the Chinese politico- 
cultural integration, the '^bureaucratic Empire." This involved, it 
will be remembered, under the Emperor, a synthesis of religious and 
cultural authority in the hands of an appointive official group, 
trained in the Confucian classics, and selected by competitive ex- 
amination. This selection was nominally open to all on a basis of 
complete equality of opportunity. 

Actually, with few exceptions except in times of political dis- 
organization, there was an effective monopoly of access to official 
position in the hands of a land-owning, town-dwelling "gentry" 
class. This class, though its informal privileges were in conflict with 
the strict implications of the Confucian value system, had an essen- 
tial set of functions in making such a regime possible. The two were 



The Structural Imperatives of a Social System [179] 

integrated in such a way as to block at least two important types of 
development, either of which would have destroyed the system. 
The first was a feudal system which would have led to an appropria- 
tion of governmental power on a kinship basis and thereby broken 
down the universalism and central control of the governmental 
apparatus. This was prevented on the one hand by depriving the 
influential elements of the gentry of the incentive to feudalize be- 
cause they were "on the inside" anyway, while on the other hand, 
the centrally controlling agency, through the power of appointment 
and related facilities, was in a position to play potentially dangerous 
elements off against each other.^ 

Secondly, however, this structure also blocked the development 
of anything like "capitalism" though in other respects the setting for 
the latter was highly favorable. It did this by control of the towns, 
through the residence there and the participation in governmental 
power of the gentry, and by the capacity to absorb upwardly mobile 
elements into its power orbit and way of life. Capitalism would 
have destroyed the Confucian synthesis by shifting the balance of 
internal power to a group which could not be integrated into the 
"humanistic universalism" of the diffuse politico-cultural type which 
was distinctive of the Chinese "literati." The state would have had 
to become bureaucratic in a sense resembling the Western types. 
This case, therefore, again illustrates the dependence of a key struc- 
ture of a society, the special Chinese type of "bureaucracy," on its 
relation to another structure, the status of the gentry class, and one 
which was not by any means in full conformity with the cultural 
value-pattern which gave the former its raison d'etre. 

One more example may be briefly cited, this time of a case where 
structural incompatibility was a powerful dynamic factor leading to 
the breakdown of a notable social integration, that is, to an altered 
state of equilibrium of the system. This is the famous problem of the 
relations of church and state in mediaeval Europe. It is quite clear 
that culturally the Catholic church was essential to mediaeval civili- 
zation, it was its paramount cultural focus of integration. But it was 
institutionalized in terms of a hierarchy of priestly office, the func- 
tion of which was the implementation of the sacerdotal powers of 

® Another important institution was equality of inheritance between sons, 
which weakened the long-term consolidation of the kinship interests. 



[ 1 8o ] Empirical Differentiation and Variation 

the papacy. Centralized control was the very essence of the Catholic 
system. But the secular structure was organized on a feudal basis. 
The structural conflict focused on the fact that above all the essen- 
tial facilities for the functioning of any organization were accessible 
only through feudal tenure. Every bishop and priest, therefore, was 
in an equivocal position, as a priest of the church and as a vassal of 
a feudal superior. The two roles were structurally incompatible. 

In such a situation the very upswing of the power and the cul- 
tural prestige of the church in the 1 1 th century could not but have 
a most corrosive effect on feudalism. But the dissolution of feudalism 
in turn strongly stimulated the forces which eventually destroyed 
the synthesis of mediaeval civilization. There was never more than 
a precarious balance between the church and the secular power 
structure, and this was fraught with high tensions. The victory of 
either would destroy the other. It is probably of fateful significance 
in Western civilization that it was a victory for the church, because 
if the balance had tipped the other way the hereditary principle in 
social organization would probably have been consolidated, not 
attenuated.^^ 

Again as in the case of the empirical clusterings which define 
relative universals of social structure, the boundaries of the varia- 
tions which the structural imperatives of compatibility permit are 
not rigidly fixed. Indeed, as the mediaeval case shows, a good deal 
of structural conflict can be tolerated at the price of strain and 
perhaps instability. But there are certainly limits to this tolerance, 
even though they may change with the change of ultimate social 
"resources." These structural imperatives, then, give us another way 
of narrowing down the range of social variability which it is realis- 
tically important to take into serious consideration. The two sets of 
limitations to empirical variability combined make at least an 
approach to the problem of systematic analysis of the general range 
of comparative social structure feasible. 

§ PRINCIPAL TYPES OF SOCIAL STRUCTURE 

WE MAY now return to the value-orientation side of the 
problem of classification of types of social structure. We will proceed 

^^ The celibacy of the priesthood was probably an important factor, because 
it exempted the church from the full force of vested interests in heredity of status. 



Principal Types of Social Structure [ 1 8 1 ] 

by taking up each of a series oF value-orientation patterns in turn 
under the assumption that this pattern is the dominant value-pattern 
of a society. We will inquire first about its most direct institution- 
alization in a social structure, in what sector it can be most directly 
institutionalized, and broadly what type of structure is most likely to 
be found there. Note will also be taken of the types of adaptive struc- 
tures most likely to be found within this area. Then we will inquire, 
in the light of the foregoing analyses, what principal additional 
adaptive structures are likely to be found in other sectors of the 
society, and within what ranges they must fall in order to meet the 
imperatives of compatibility, given the central value-institutionaliza- 
tion structure of the society. There will also be a brief noting of 
probable foci of strain, instability and susceptibility to processes 
of change. 

Because of the central place of the pattern variable scheme in 
the theory of action, we vdll take the four fundamental value- 
orientation types of social values set forth in Chapter III in Table 2a 
as our point of departure. These, it will be remembered, are defined 
by the combinations of the two pattern variables of ascription- 
achievement and universalism-particularism respectively. The rea- 
sons why these two pattern variables have been given priority for 
this purpose have already been discussed. 

In the light of the foregoing section it will be clear that, from 
the point of view of certain interests in comparative social structure, 
this approach will introduce what from some points of view may be 
regarded as a bias. Either universalism or achievement or both enter 
into three of the four combinations we shall treat. This means that 
societies which are organized to an overwhelming degree around the 
four types of relationally ascriptive foci we discussed in the last sec- 
tion, will automatically fall into one of the four types. But as shown, 
for example by Murdock's work, there is enormous structural varia- 
tion in a whole series of respects within this type, and certainly in 
numbers of cases the great majority of known societies fall in this 
category. It may, therefore, be said that our approach here is biased 
in favor of stressing the importance of a small minority of known 
social systems which depart from this type. 

There is probably involved here a difference in perspective and 
interest between the sociologist and the anthropologist. Many of the 



[ i82 ] Empirical Differentiation and Variation 

social variations in which the latter is most interested will not be 
brought out on this basis, though they can be treated by more de- 
tailed breakdowns in terms of the same conceptual scheme. It would 
seem also to follow that the differentiations in which the anthro- 
pologist was most interested were less likely to be functions in a high 
degree of major differentiations of value-orientation, though this 
factor is by no means to be excluded. But on the other side of the 
coin, the present approach serves to accent lines of fundamental 
structural differentiation which are in some sense of "evolutionary" 
significance. They are above all the types which tend to emerge 
when major types of cultural development in the literate cultures 
have occurred, the emergence of the religious systems, the develop- 
ment of science and the like, and these developments have had a 
profound relation to changes in the structure of society itself. Both 
types of interest belong legitimately within the theory of action and 
of social systems. Our present approach seems to be deeply founded 
in the structure of the theoretical scheme itself, as well as in em- 
pirical problems relative to the significance of types of variability 
among "civilizations" rather than among primitive cultures. 

Obviously what can be presented in the remainder of the present 
chapter is a highly schematic introductory sketch and most defi- 
nitely not a "treatise" on comparative social structure. Its intention 
is to indicate the feasibility of an approach to a problem which, since 
the breakdown of the older evolutionary sociology, has not been 
satisfactorily handled in a systematic way. Carrying the implications 
of this approach through to a high degree of empirical elaboration 
is an enormous task which cannot be attempted within the limits of 
the present work. 

I. The Universalistic- Achievement Pattern 

This is the combination of value-patterns which in certain re- 
spects introduces the most drastic antitheses to the values of a social 
structure built predominantly about the relationally ascriptive soli- 
darities we have discussed, of kinship, community, ethnicity and 
class. Universalism has above all two major types of application by 
itself. In the first place it favors status determination, i.e., the alloca- 
tion of personnel, allocation of facilities and rewards, and role- 
treatment on the basis of generalized rules relating to classificatory 



Princifal Types of Social Structure [183] 

qualities and performances independently of relational foci. Sec- 
ondly, on the cultural level it favors a cognitive as opposed to an 
expressive interest. These emphases already involve a certain "ten- 
sion" relative to much of the "givenness" of social situations, such as 
kinship and community relations. 

The combination with achievement values, however, places the 
accent on the valuation of goal-achievement and of instrumental 
actions leading to such goal achievement. The choice of goals must 
be in accord with the universalistic values. Therefore promotion of 
the welfare of a collectivity as such tends to be ruled out. The col- 
lectivity is valued so far as it is necessary to the achievement of in- 
trinsically valued goals. This is the basis of a certain "individual- 
istic" trend in such a value system. 

The achievement element also has a further bearing on the 
problem of goal selection. If any goal is given, there is some kind of 
pressure to achievement; in precisely this sense achievement-orienta- 
tion is as it were an endemic and partly an actual aspect of any 
action system. But achievement-orientation as itself a fundamental 
value pattern, not as only instrumental to other values, implies that 
the choice of goals should embody this value, that the choice of 
goals and not merely the attainment of goals derived from other 
value-considerations should be regarded as an expression of the 
actor's achievement values. This, in the first place, eliminates tra- 
ditionalism as a criterion of goal selection. But it also seems to 
exclude a universalistically defined absolute goal system, because 
this is intrinsically capable of attainment once and for all, and such 
attainment would from then on deprive the achievement component 
of the value-system of its meaning. Only where such an absolute 
goal was defined as continually subject to threat even though at- 
tained would it fit. 

At any rate, more congenial to the universalistic-achievement 
complex is a pluralism of goals with unity in the direction rather 
than the specific content of the goal-states. This is particularly con- 
genial to integration with inherently dynamic cultural patterns, 
such as those of science which do not admit of a final state of 
perfection. 

Hence we may speak of the valuation of a pluralistic and/or 
individualistic system of goal-achievement through instrumental 



[ 184 ] Empirical Differentiation and Variation 

actions as the primary concern of people holding such a value- 
orientation pattern. This will lead to valuation of activities segre- 
gated from the relational solidarities— the primary focus of such a 
social system will hence rest in a diflFerentiated instrumental com- 
plex, in occupational roles, in the ecological nexi of exchange, in 
possessions and in instrumentally oriented organizations. The com- 
bination of achievement interests and cognitive primacies will mean 
that it is a dynamically developing system, with an encouragement 
for initiative in defining new goals, within the acceptable range, and 
an interest in improving instrumental efficiency. This means that 
the instrumental complex will tend to be a progressively developing 
and differentiating system of the division of labor, hence of dif- 
ferentiated occupational roles. This is the type of structure central 
to what are often called "industrial" societies. 

There will, in the nature of the case, be a number of adaptive 
aspects of such a structure. In the first place the goals of occupa- 
tional aspiration, to say nothing of actual role-activity, cannot in a 
simple sense be the direct embodiment of achievement values in all 
cases, because they have to be realistically adapted to the exigencies 
of the actual occupational opportunity system in which, once an 
elaborate division of labor has become established, many things have 
to be done which, though necessary conditions of highly valued 
achievement-outcomes, it is not easy to value "in themselves." While 
in less elaborately differentiated systems these might be links in the 
chain of instrumental steps to a valued goal for the individual, 
when they are all a given individual does, the question of his moti- 
vation to do them becomes acute. The most obvious cases of this 
sort are found in the labor role. But there is an important component 
of this sort in two other types of occupational role, those involving 
collective responsibilities and those involving the facilitation of ex- 
change functions where such a high premium is placed on the per- 
suasion of the exchange partner. Thus both the executive and the 
salesman roles involve acceptance of conditions which may not be 
directly very meaningful in terms of individual achievement values. 
In the higher reaches the rewards are such that the strain may not 
be very serious, but even here this may be a factor in the tendency 
for "success" to become dissociated as a goal from its basis in valua- 
tion of intrinsic achievement. 



Principal Tyyes of Social Structure [ 185 ] 

One adaptive problem of such a system, then, is to integrate 
reahstic achievement orientations in the actual occupational struc- 
ture with what may be called intrinsic achievement values. There 
will inevitably be considerable discrepancies, which are bridged by 
the institutionalization of compensatory rewards, e.g., short working 
hours, and of the obligations, for example, of the adult male to have 
a regular job and earn a living, even though what he does is "not 
very interesting." A second adaptive context which may be men- 
tioned is that concerned with the difficulty of implementing genu- 
inely universalistic criteria of judgment of performance-qualities 
and achievements, so that the individual is put in the right place 
and his rewards are nicely proportioned to his actual achievements. 
In this sphere we find institutional patterns which seem directly to 
contravene the principles which would be deduced from the domi- 
nant value-orientation pattern. Examples are the prevalence of 
seniority as a criterion of status, promotion and privileges through- 
out much of industry, and the "tenure" system in the academic 
world and in civil service. TTiese may be treated as adaptive stnac- 
tures which have the function of mitigating the structured strains 
inherent in the exposure of people to competitive pressures where 
detailed universalistic discriminations are impracticable. From this 
point of view such a system is subject to a delicate balance. On the 
one hand it must resort to adaptive structures which are in conflict 
with its major value patterns, because to push these patterns "to 
their logical conclusion" would increase strain to the breaking point. 
On the other hand, it must not let the adaptive structures become 
too important lest the tail wag the dog, and the major social struc- 
ture itself shift into another type. 

Along with the institutionalization of occupational roles, it is 
clear that such a social structure is also heavily dependent on the 
institutionalization of rights in possessions, that is property, and of 
the patterns of exchange within certain limits. The functional re- 
quirement is above all that possessions and exchange relationships 
should be sufficiently free from restrictions which would prevent an 
approach to an optimum development of a system of facilities for 
instrumental achievement, and a flexibility of rewards which can be 
proportioned to achievements. 

Next, the reward system must be integrated with such an occu- 



[ i86 ] Em'pirical Differentiation and Variation 

pational structure. As noted above, this must take the form that 
achievements within the system should be valued, and that this 
valuation should be expressed in attitudes of approval and esteem 
and their antitheses properly distributed within the system. Non- 
relational rewards must, in turn, be symbolically integrated with 
these attitudes and their gradations. This implies, as noted above, 
a certain minimum of inequality, though its extent and exact con- 
tent will vary with the specific achievement goals and reward sym- 
bols and the degree of differentiation of the occupational role system. 
In the most general terms it may be said that the basic reward in 
such a system is "success," defined as level of approval for valued 
achievement. There are, however, extremely complex problems 
concerning the integration of such a reward system, and above all 
the ways in which various expressive symbols can be integrated 
with the dominant value-attitudes. 

Approval and esteem are sources of direct gratification but, as 
we have seen, of a specialized character. Above all, they exclude 
direct gratification of need-dispositions, other than the needs for 
approval and esteem themselves, in specific terms or in diffuse at- 
tachments. These and a variety of other considerations lead us to 
predict that as adaptive structures there will be institutionalized in 
this type of social system a variety of patterns at variance with the 
main universalistic achievement patterns. In the first instance these 
will be found in the kinship cluster which is above all built about 
ascriptive statuses and diffuse affective attachments. As noted above 
no industrial society has yet appeared which has come close to dis- 
pensing with kinship as a major part of the social structure. Perhaps 
two main things may be said of the type of kinship system which 
can best be integrated with the industrial type of occupational sys- 
tem. First the extent of solidarities must be limited so that the indi- 
vidual in his occupational role does not come into too drastic con- 
flicts with his kinship roles. Very broadly this tends to be accom- 
plished by confining the most stringent kinship obligations to the 
conjugal family of procreation, and isolating this in a relative sensp 
from wider kinship units. Further, the involvement of the kinship 
unit with the occupational system tends to be primarily focused on 
the adult male. Especially with a system of formal education, which 
serves functions especially of technical training for occupational 



Princi'pal Ty^pes of Social Structure [187] 

roles, and is, in one primary aspect, a kind of system of pre-occupa- 
tional roles, the relative exclusion of minor children is relatively 
easy. The primary problems and strains center on the role of the 
wife and mother. The "easy" solution is for her to be completely 
excluded from the occupational system by confining herself to the 
role of housewife. In most industrial societies, however, there tends 
to be a good deal of adaptation and compromise relative to this solu- 
tion. The second important feature is the accent on affectivity in 
the kinship system. This has partly the function of inhibiting the 
development of some of the kinds of kinship patterns which would 
be a threat to the operation of an individualistic type of occupational 
system. Partly, however, it serves as a counterbalance to the accent 
on neutrality in the occupational system in that it offers a field for 
diffuse affective attachments which must be inhibited in the occu- 
pational realm. 

Thus from the perspective of the institutionalization of a uni- 
versalistic achievement value system the kinship structure and the 
patterning of sex roles should be considered primarily as adaptive 
structures. There is, however, every indication that they are of such 
crucial functional significance to the motivational economy of the 
occupational system itself that their institutionalization is of high 
strategic importance. They cannot be left uncontrolled, and must in 
some fashion be integrated with the instrumental system. Because of 
the fundamental difference of patterning, however, the relation be- 
tween the two structures is bound to be a major focus of strain in 
this type of society. 

Just as the imperatives of such a social system impose rather 
strict limitations on the variability of kinship patterns, so also does 
it with respect to the smaller units of territorial community within 
the system. The primary basis for this is the imperative of free 
mobility within the occupational system which means that too close 
ties of community solidarity, which are inevitably diffuse rather than 
specific, can be a serious threat to the main system. Similarly with 
regional differentiations. Perhaps partly as a compensatory mech- 
anism in this context such societies tend to develop intense diffuse 
affective attitudes of solidarity with reference to the largest unit of 
community, namely the nation. The connection between the de- 
velopment of industrialism and of nationalism is well attested. Soviet 



[ i88 ] Rmfirical Differentiation and. Variation 

Russia in this as in so many other respects, seems to be no exception, 
in spite of its "intemationahst" ideology. At the other end of the 
scale the intensity of sentiment about the "American home" may 
well be another compensatory mechanism. One reason for this is 
that the conjugal family is the unit hath of kinship and of com- 
munity as the local unit of residence. It, rather than the individual, 
must in certain respects be the unit of mobility. Its solidarity is less 
of a threat to universalism and achievement values than would be 
that of a larger unit of community as well as kinship. 

Ethnic subdivisions within such a society are not, as such, in 
harmony with its main structural patterns and hence create strains. 
They do, however, often exist not only by "historical accident" such 
as immigration, but they persist in such a way as to suggest that they 
have functions. On the one hand for the members of a given ethnic 
group it may be suggested that they constitute a focus of security 
beyond the family unit which is in some respects less dysfunctional 
for the society than community solidarity would be; on the other, 
for the outsider they often seem to perform an important scapegoat 
function as targets for displaced aggression. Nationalism absorbs 
many of the motivational forces not only of community but of 
ethnic solidarity since the national is normally at the same time a 
territorial community and an ethnic unit. 

Stratification in terms of an open class system seems to be in- 
herent in this type of society. In order to accord at all with the major 
value patterns it must be open. But some form not only of class 
differentiation in the sense of differential rewards for individuals, 
but of integration in terms of styles of life including all members of 
the kinship unit seems to be inevitable. The basis of this is above all 
the fact that the family must be integrated into the reward system, 
and, therefore, that the differentials of rewards must be expressed in 
a style of life for the family as a unit, including women and chil- 
dren, and not only for the occupational status-achiever. There is, 
therefore, as noted above, an inherent limitation on absolute equality 
of opportunity in such a society. 

Finally, too closely integrated a religious system would be dys- 
functional in such a society. If the orientation of such a religion 
were strongly other-worldly it would undermine motivation in the 
central role system— if not this, it would, like Marxism as a "re- 



Principal Types of Social Structure [ 189 ] 

ligion," tend to shift the balance over to the universahstic-ascriptive 
type to be discussed below. The pattern of religious toleration and 
a diversity of denominations as in the American case seems to be the 
least disruptive structure. The state in such a system, it may be 
remarked, tends to be regarded as any other collectivity, justified 
only in terms of its service to valued goal-achievement. It may very 
well be, then, that the problem of institutionalizing collective politi- 
cal responsibility is one of the most serious points of strain in such 
a social system. The primary diffuse solidarities of such a society 
then are family-home, class, community, ethnic group, religious de- 
nomination, and nation. There is also room for an ecological system 
of diffuse affective attachments. These are exceedingly prominent 
in the cross-sex relationships of the "dating" period with the attend- 
ant romantic love complex, but tend to be absorbed into the kin- 
ship unit by marriage. Intrasex friendship as diffuse attachment is 
much less prominent, probably because it can too readily divert from 
the achievement complex. Among men it tends rather to be attached 
as a diffuse "penumbra" to occupational relationships in the form of 
an obligation in a mild way to treat one's occupational associate as 
a friend also. It is thereby spread out, and does not form a focus of 
major independent structuring. The very fact that affectionate 
bodily contact is almost completely taboo among men in American 
society is probably indicative of this situation since it strongly limits 
affective attachment. 

It may be suggested that expressive orientations are less danger- 
ous—outside the family— in specific rather than in diffuse forms, and 
that this has something to do with the proliferation of "entertain- 
ment" in industrial societies. In these forms the actor can take his 
gratifications piecemeal, as it were, without incurring the obliga- 
tions inherent in diffuse attachments. 

In general, what place is occupied by the affective-expressive 
orientations constitutes a major adaptive problem for this type of 
social structure. The problem of the place of diffuseness is another 
such problem focus. Its connection with affectivity has already been 
dealt with. It recurs, however, in connection with the "political" 
functions, within organizations and within the society as a whole. 
Where the emphasis on specificity is strong, there will be strong 
inhibitions against letting approval pass too readily over into esteem, 



[ ipo ] Empirical Differentiation and Variation 

against imputing general superiority to an individual, a role or a 
class. This is one of the most important factors in the fluidity and 
openness of the class system of such a society. Similarly, of course, 
with general inferiority. It may, then, be suggested that leadership 
roles in such a society tend to be unstable, and a focus of a good 
deal of anxiety and aggression. This is one factor tending to throw 
the balance in an individualistic direction and toward an anti- 
authoritarian attitude. 

It was noted above that in value-orientation terms there was a 
tendency for such a society to be individualistic rather than collec- 
tivistic in its emphases. This seems to be, above all, associated with 
the connection between universalism, achievement and specificity. 
The segregation from the fusions involved in diflFuseness, either of 
generalized status ascriptions or of afi^ective attachments, seems to 
be essential to the mobility of personnel and facilities and the alloca- 
tion of rewards by achievements, which this pattern requires. Lead- 
ership roles, for example, are least questionable where the organiza- 
tion has specific achievement goals, rather than, as with a political 
organization, diffuse ones. This set of considerations may well, then, 
underlie the "economic" bias of American society, and the fact that 
political responsibility is a point of strain. 

The collectivistic direction of emphasis, then, has a tendency to 
pass over into the universalistic-ascription type which will be dis- 
cussed presently. First, however, a few more words may be said 
about some directions of variation of the universalistic-achievement 
type. First it is possible for the achievement goals to be non- 
empirical. Unless, however, as in the case of Calvinism, these non- 
empirical goals give rise to direct empirical implications (the King- 
dom of God on Earth) which can be taken as the immediate goals, 
the eff^ect is to displace the whole emphasis away from the occu- 
pational achievement complex and thus alter the character of the 
society profoundly. The activities oriented to the primary achieve- 
ments can no longer be rational-instrumental but must assume a 
symbolic-ritual character. This possibility has probably been most 
fully realized in Catholic Christianity where the church has been 
an organization for the realization of non-empirical goals. This 
throws the main emphasis away from the secular instrumental com- 
plex and puts a premium on its stabilization through traditionalism 



Frincifal Ty'pes of Social Structure [191] 

and/or authoritarianism rather than its continuing development. By 
the same token the pressure against giving affectivity and difFuseness 
prominent places decreases. This may well have something to do 
with the fact that the Latin countries, with their Catholic back- 
ground, have proved relatively unsusceptible to the development of 
industrial patterns and that in certain respects, in spite of their 
religious transcendentalism, they have leaned in a "hedonistic'* 
direction. 

2. The Universalistic- Ascription Pattern 

It will not be possible to take space to treat the other three t3^es 
of society as fully as was done with the Universalistic-Achievement 
type, but since a comparative base line has been established, it ought 
not to be necessary. 

The universalistic element has the same order of consequences 
here as in the above case, but its combination with ascription gives 
it a different twist. First, the emphasis becomes above all classifica- 
tory. There may be a secondary achievement orientation in that the 
ideal state of affairs to which action is oriented may not exist in the 
here and now, in which case there is an obligation to attempt to 
bring it about. If it is present, conversely there is an obligation to 
defend it against threats. Achievements, however, are valued instru- 
mentally, not in themselves. Because of the universalistic quality of 
the definition of the ideal state there is a strong tendency to dualism, 
to drawing a sharply absolute distinction between conformity with 
the ideal and deviation from it, and in action terms, being "for it" 
or "against it." 

This dualism appears in two distinct ways. The first is the one 
just mentioned, the dualism of attitude toward particular persons, 
collectivities, etc. The second is a dualism of locus of application of 
the value pattern itself. On the one hand the existing institutional 
structure— or parts of it— may be felt to embody the ideal values and 
be sanctioned by them. On the other hand the ideal pattern may be 
set over against the existing pattern— an ideal state against a corrupt 
present. In either case the dualistic tendency is present though in a 
sense it seems paradoxical that the same type of value pattern can be 
involved in both extreme conservatism of certain types and extreme 
radicalism. 



[ 192 ] Empirical Differentiation and Variation 

Because of the universalistic element there is tlie same emphasis 
on the sphere of occupation and organization and its independence 
of kinship or narrowly defined community. However, there are cer- 
tain important differences. First, the strong emphasis on classifica- 
tory qualities tends, in terms of social structure, to become an 
emphasis on status rather than on specific achievements. Hence the 
inevitable elaborate differentiation of roles where achievements are 
concretely of high importance and where universalistic criteria 
apply to them, tends to work out to a status-hierarchy where the 
accent is on what a given actor is rather than on what he has done}^ 

Secondly, there is a strong tendency to collectivism because of 
the absence of valuation of the particularization of achievements. 
The ideal state tends to be defined as one enjoyed by the society as 
a collectivity, or to be achieved by it. Furthermore, it is easy to make 
the transition from an ideal state to be achieved, to the ascription of 
ideal qualities to the collectivity. 

TTiird, there is a tendency to authoritarianism, in that the clear 
conception of what is ideal for all makes it natural for those who 
have roles enjoining collective responsibility to "see to it" that every- 
one lives up to the ideal, either directly, or in making the proper 
contribution to the collective achievement. 

In more general terms, there is a strong tendency to give diffuse- 
ness priority over specificity. Status, then, tends not to be specific to 
a particular occupational role for instance, but tends to become very 
readily generalized relative to a general prestige scale. An aspect of 
this generalization of status is the tendency to ascribe qualities to 
the whole group to which an individual belongs. Since universalism 
precludes frank recognition of particularistic elements, the group, 
e.g. kinship or class, is held to have inherent qualities. Hence con- 
ceptions of aristocracy, and of ethnic, especially national qualities, 
are congenial to this orientation. Esteem tends to take precedence 
over approval in the reward system. 

Perhaps it may be said that this type is subject to peculiarly 
drastic internal tensions. There seems to be an inherent connection 
between achievement, universalism and specificity which is broken 

^ This is the conservarive case. In the revolutionary case the same kind of 
status hierarchy tends to appear in the revolutionary movement itself, the party. 



Frincifal Types of Social Structure [193] 

through in this case. Actual achievement must play an important 
part, the more so the more differentiated the social structure. But 
the fact that achievement is not valued for itself is a source of strain. 
In one respect the accent on collectivism may be a manifestation of 
this strain in that it acts to inhibit the individualizing tendencies 
of an emphasis on achievement. Furthermore there are particularly 
strong inhibitions on affectivity, centering particularly on the 
"honor" of status, either within the society or as a member of it in 
general. Affective manifestations, therefore, tend to be relegated to 
even more secondary positions than in the first type. Especially, par- 
ticularistic attachments are devalued. There is thus no real German 
counterpart of the American romantic love complex. 

Because of the strong accent on the occupational system in this 
case, the limitations placed on the size of the kinship unit and its 
constitution are similar to those involved in the first type. There is, 
however, an important difference in the definition of familial roles. 
The primary focus of these differences lies in the importance of 
status-categorization in a diffuse sense, which above all works out 
in sharpness of categorization of the age and sex roles as they im- 
pinge on the internal structure of the family. Above all the feminine 
role tends to be defined in sharp contrast to the masculine. Because 
of the importance of discipline in the politico-occupational struc- 
tures and the importance of affective needs, it seems likely that this 
type of society will have a strong accent on women as love-objects 
and as responsive, but not as having instrumental or moral capacities 
of a high order. Combined with the general emphasis on hierarchy 
and authority in this type of society, this would seem to suggest an 
authoritarian family structure, in which the wife was carefully 
"kept in her place." This is notoriously characteristic of the tradi- 
tional German family structure. 

The reader will recognize that many of the traits being sketched 
here seem to fit German social structure. Indeed "conservative" 
German society seems to be one of the best cases of this type where 
the accent is on the status quo. Nazism, on the other hand projected 
the ideal state into a political future ideal, conceived to be an emana- 
tion of the mystically ideal qualities of the German Volk. There are 
also certain respects in which Soviet Russia approximates this type. 



[ 194 ] Eni'pirical Differentiation and Variation 

Communism is a Utopian ideal state of affairs to be realized by col- 
lective action. The primary status-focus revolves about the Party as 
the elite vanguard of the realization of the ideal. 

It again may be emphasized that this ideal type tends to have 
a "political" accent as distinguished from the economic accent in the 
American case. This is associated with its diffuseness and the tend- 
ency to mobilize all resources in the interest of the collective ideal. 
The combination of this politicism and universalism have something 
to do with the tendency to aggressiveness of such societies. This is 
accentuated by the severity of internal strains and the tendency to 
project the attendant anxiety and aggression on the outsider. The 
very effectiveness of authoritarian measures in eliminating internal 
opposition probably contributes to this aggressiveness, in that it 
deprives the population of internal scapegoats which are both rela- 
tively "safe" and which are sufficiendy important and formidable 
to be "worth while" to be aggressive about. The degree of internal 
tension is such that a low level of free floating aggression would 
seem to be out of the question. 

It also follows from the general characteristics of this type that 
a particularly strong emphasis should be placed upon the state, as 
the primary organ of realization or maintenance of the ideal states 
of collective affairs. In a corresponding sense collective morality, as 
distinguished from individual morality, has a particularly central 
place. The wide range open to private interests in the first type is 
therefore felt to be a "low level of morality," defined by preoccupa- 
tion with self interest as opposed to the common interest. 

It appears from the above sketches that one way of broadly 
characterizing the differences between the achievement-universal- 
istically and the ascription-universalistically oriented types of society 
is to say that the first is "individualistic," the second "collectivistic." 
This seems broadly true and significant. What we have done is to 
give a considerably fuller analysis of the factors underlying the ap- 
plication of these terms than is current in common usage. The same 
is true of the terms authoritarian and anti-authoritarian, which also 
broadly fit the contrast. Both pairs of terms should be understood 
to characterize derivative resultants of the major value-orientation 
components of the social system in relation to the imperatives of 
social integration. 



Principal Types of Social Structure [ ^95 ] 

3. The Particularistic Achievement Pattern 

Turning to the third type which combines achievement values 
with particularism, we may start with the familiar implications of 
the achievement-orientation. The focus of this is the valuation of 
social objects for what they do rather than for what they are. The 
problems arise in connection with the content of what achievements 
are valued, and in what context of social relationships in other 
respects. 

The shift from universalism to particularism precludes that the 
primary criteria of valued achievement should be found in uni- 
versalistic terms such as efficiency or conformity with a completely 
generalized ideal. They must, on the contrary, be focused on cer- 
tain points of reference within the relational system itself, or in- 
herent in the situation in which it is placed. It may be presumed 
that, as defining role-expectations, these are in the first instance the 
relational bases for the categorization of objects, namely biological 
relatedness, territorial and temporal location. There are, then, cer- 
tain "secondary" points of reference in the structure of social rela- 
tionships themselves, notably membership in solidary collectivities 
as such and relations of superiority-inferiority. 

The element of achievement which is combined with these par- 
ticularistic emphases precludes that the orientation to them should 
be predominantly passive. The achievement emphasis then leads to 
the conception of a frofer pattern of adaptation which is the prod- 
uct of human achievement and which can be maintained only by 
continuous effort and if not maintained must be reachieved. At the 
same time the relational focus precludes that this achievement 
orientation should set goals transcendent to the system. 

The classical Chinese social structure seems to fit this pattern 
very closely. It can be said to have been organized primarily about 
the relational reference points of kinship, local community, con- 
tinuity with ancestors, the ordering of hierarchical relationships, and 
a general orientation to collective morality emphasizing responsi- 
bility for the functioning of collectivities, all the way from the 
Emperor's responsibility for the society as a whole, to the father's 
responsibility for his family. Both instrumental orientations and 
"spontaneous" expressive orientations tend in such a system to be 



[ 196 ] Emfirical Differentiation and Variation 

subordinated. Activities in which either is involved tend to be car- 
ried out within the diffuse sohdary units which constitute the main 
structure, the instrumental activities on their behalf. 

In the first place this whole structure fits with the well-known 
"familism" of Chinese society. There is a strong emphasis on the 
solidarity of the kinship unit, extending beyond the conjugal family. 
This extension is above all carried out in the temporal dimension 
to emphasize continuity with the ancestors, and hence responsi- 
bility toward them. The exigencies of maintaining continuity in 
kinship terms are, however, such that the female line of descent is 
drastically sacrificed to the male, female subordination is thus pri- 
marily an adaptive structure. The problem of equality of the statuses 
of brothers, however, seems to involve exigencies other than those 
primarily involved in kinship, namely, those of the achievement 
complex. 

The kinship unit in China has also been extremely closely inte- 
grated with territorial community, which is one of the reasons why 
land has been of such overwhelming importance. In the first in- 
stance this has involved the family's land holding in the village 
community, but also the family burial grounds as symbolic of con- 
tinuity with the ancestors. On a higher status level it has involved 
the kinship group's residence in the town as one of the cluster of 
gentry families of that town. 

The differentiation of such a social system beyond the level of 
extreme localism, partly through the exigencies of integration of 
power, partly through the problems of cultural uniformity tran- 
scending the local unit, has involved also a hierarchical differentia- 
tion. This has tended to be directly institutionalized in a pattern 
congruous with that of kinship, first with reference to the patri- 
archal superiority of the land-owning gentry over the peasantry, 
pardy with reference to more individualized achievement superiority 
and political authority. 

The fact that Chinese society did not remain organized in feudal 
terms seems to be connected with the achievement component in 
the fundamental value-orientation which among other things derives 
from the fact that heredity of status is the most drastic antithesis of 
an achievement value. At any rate the top status elements under the 
emperor were structured in achievement terms through the exami- 



Princi'pal Types of Social Structure [197] 

nation system and the appointive status of the official. This involved 
an element of mobility and could symbolically set personal achieve- 
ment goals before every Chinese boy. But the relative weakness of 
universalism in the general value-orientation was associated with 
the fact that it was a diffuse rather than a specific achievement pat- 
tern, attaining "superiority" rather than competence. We have al- 
ready seen that the gentry class functioned as an adaptive struc- 
ture as between this political organization and the rest of society. 

This diffuseness in turn was connected with the fact that su- 
periority of status was so closely connected with responsibility. In 
this sense the Chinese system tended to be both collectivistic and 
authoritarian. The weakness of universalism and the attendant 
specificity made it difficult for achievement to become individual- 
istically oriented. There was a coincidence of superiority and re- 
sponsibility in strictly collective terms. The fact of being particu- 
laristically bound within the relational system also contributed to 
the accent on traditionalism, the acceptance of a model of propriety 
which was permanently binding and which, since it was conceived 
to have been realized in the past, was to be continually re-achieved. 

This type of system involves a far more unequivocal acceptance 
of kinship ties than is the case with either of the universalistic types. 
Kinship plays a central part in the whole hierarchical network of 
solidary collectivities, and is in a certain sense the prototype of them 
all. But orientations within the kinship unit are none the less struc- 
tured in certain directions, notably in that spontaneous affectivity 
is strongly inhibited in favor of a "moralistic" attitude of responsi- 
bility for the interests of the unit. Anything like the American 
romantic love complex is excluded by this set of facts. Indeed spon- 
taneous affectivity tends to be tolerated only as interstitial and con- 
stitutes one of the main foci for deviance. 

Instrumental orientations must either be kept under control or 
strongly inhibited, because their individualistic trends could readily 
destroy the central collective solidarities. It is this above all which 
channels achievement in collective directions. But the strong inhi- 
bition on instrumentalism has the consequence that a certain pri- 
macy of symbolic actions develops, a "code of propriety" which is 
more ritual than instrumental. Indeed Confucian morality, in addi- 
tion to its collectivistic trend, tends to this ritualistic proprietv rather 



[ 198 ] Em'pirical Differentiation and Variation 

than to what to the Western mind is an "ethical" orientation to 
good works. 

Thus the particularistic-achievement type of society has a col- 
lectivism in common with its exact opposite combination of pattern 
variables, because particularism inhibits the individualistic implica- 
tions of achievement-orientation just as ascription inhibits those of 
universalism. On the other hand, by contrast with the rationalism 
of both the universalistic types, this type tends to be traditionalistic, 
in that its particularism precludes the placing of primary achieve- 
ment goals outside the given relational system. 

4. The Particularistic- Ascri^tive Pattern 

There remains the combination of particularism with ascription 
as the definition of a dominant social value-orientation pattern. This 
case has certain similarities with the one just discussed but also cer- 
tain important differences. Because of its particularism it shares the 
tendency for the organization of the social structure to crystallize 
about the relational reference points, notably those of kinship and 
local community. But because of the ascriptive emphasis these tend 
to be taken as given and passively "adapted to" rather than made 
the points of reference for an actively organized system. 

One might say with such an orientation there would be a pref- 
erence for a minimum of differentiation beyond what was essen- 
tially given in the human situation. But because of such exigencies 
as those presented by the power problem this is seldom possible. 
Some integration beyond the local community both in power and 
in cultural terms is nearly inevitable. Such larger integrative and 
ecological structures tend, therefore, to be accepted as part of the 
given situation of life, and to have positive functions when order is 
threatened, but otherwise to be taken for granted. There is not the 
same incentive to use such structures as the political in order actively 
to organize a system, they are there first as given facts, second as 
insurance against instability. 

The absence of the achievement emphasis even further inhibits 
the development of instrumental orientations and the structures 
associated with them than in the previous case. Work is basically 
a necessary evil just as morality is a necessary condition of minimum 
stability. Hence the overwhelming preponderance of emphasis is 



Princi'pal Types of Social Structure [ ^99 ] 

thrown in the expressive direction. These are above all the artisti- 
cally oriented societies. They tend to be traditionalistic for two rea- 
sons, first that there is no incentive to disturb tradition; on the con- 
trary a strong vested interest in its stability, second that there is a 
high elaboration of expressive symbolism which is in fact a system of 
conventions. It can only serve this function if the symbolic mean- 
ings are highly stabilized. Morality, therefore, tends to be focussed 
on the traditionalistic acceptance of received standards and ar- 
rangements. 

Morality and responsibility tend to focus in two directions. The 
first is with reference to forestalling the dangers inherent in un- 
regulated expressive orientations which, not only through aggres- 
sion, but through attachments which conflict with a given order, 
can be highly disruptive. The second is with reference to situational 
dangers to the established order. 

Such societies tend to be individualistic rather than collectivistic 
and non- if not anti-authoritarian, but in each case with important 
differences from the application of the same concepts where uni- 
versalism is involved. The individualism is primarily concerned 
with expressive interests, and hence much less so with opportunity 
to shape the situation through achievement. There tends to be a 
certain lack of concern with the remoter framework of the society, 
unless it is threatened. Similarly, there is no inherent objection to 
authority so long as it does not interfere too much with expressive 
freedom, indeed it may be welcomed as a factor of stability. But 
there is also not the positive incentive to recognize authority as 
inherent that exists in the cases of positive authoritarianism. The 
tendency to indifference to larger social issues create^ c situation in 
which authority can become established with relatively little opposi- 
tion. Hence a susceptibility to "dictatorship" is not uncommon in 
such a society. The Spanish-American seems to be a good example 
of this social type.^^ 

The foregoing has been a mere sketch of four types of social 
structure. In no sense does it pretend to be either a thorough and 

^^ The author has been greatly sensitized to the special features of this type 
of social structure and its culture by Dr. Florence Kluckhohn, in many oral dis- 
cussions, and in her Los Atarquenos, unpublished Ph.D. dissertation, Radcliffe 
College. 



[ 200 ] Enfpmcal Differentiation and Variation 

systematic analysis of each type individually or a careful and sys- 
tematic comparison of them with each other. Above all it has not 
even begun to approach the difficult analysis of mixed and transi- 
tional cases, of which there are undoubtedly many. It has been pre- 
sented here for a very specific purpose, to give a sense of concrete 
relevance to the claim that the categories of social structure de- 
veloped in this chapter and the preceding ones do provide a starting 
point for systematic comparative analysis and eventually the con- 
struction of a typology of social structures. 

This illustrative discussion has, we think, gone far enough to 
substantiate that claim. The types, not only in terms of direct spell- 
ing out of the implications of the basic value-orientations, but in 
terms of the adaptive structures which go with them, certainly make 
sense empirically. Even on such a superficial level as the present 
one they stimulate many insights and seem to make otherwise 
bafiQing features of certain societies understandable. When the same 
basic conceptual framework is applied systematically and in detail, 
with careful checking of empirical evidence, and when it is com- 
bined with a much more sophisticated analysis of motivational 
process, there is every reason to believe that a highly useful set of 
tools of comparative empirical analysis will prove to be available. 

Now we must leave the analysis of social structure as such and 
proceed to further development of the theory of motivational proc- 
esses in the social system, the processes both of its maintenance and 
of its change. In analyzing these problems the relation between the 
social system and its roles on the one hand, and personality on the 
other, will always have to be in the forefront of our attention. 



VI 



THE LEARNING OF SOCIAL 
ROLE-EXPECTATIONS AND THE MECHANISMS OF 
SOCIALIZATION OF MOTIVATION 



THE social system is a system of action. It is a system of 
interdependent action processes. The structural aspects which have 
been singled out for attention in the three preceding chapters 
involve a certain mode of abstraction from this process. It is now 
necessary to fill in certain aspects of what has been abstracted from, 
to analyze certain aspects of the element of process itself in the con- 
text of the social system. For this purpose it is necessary to clarify 
further the concept of mechanism, which is here used in a sense 
parallel to its use in physiology and in personality psychology. 

A process is any way or mode in which a given state of a system 
or of a part of a system changes into another state. If its study is an 
object of science any process is assumed to be subject to laws, which 
will be stated in terms of determinate interrelations of interdepend- 
ence between the values of the relevant variables. Frequently, how- 
ever, the laws governing a process are incompletely known, or even 
not at all. Then it may still be possible to describe the process in 
terms of the initial and the final states, and possibly intermediate 
stages or go a step further to state empirical generalizations about it. 

A scientist studying the interdependences of variables generally 
isolates the particular process or class of them in which he is inter- 
ested and treats it as a system. For some purposes, however, it is 
necessary to treat the process in question as part of a larger system. 

20 1 



[ 202 ] The Learning of Social Role-Expectations 

When this is done in such a way that interest is focused on the sig- 
nificance of alternative outcomes of the 'process for the system or 
other parts of it, the process will be called a mechanism. 

This concept is of the first importance in the present context. 
There is no reason to believe that there is anything relative about 
the laws of motivational process, beyond the sense in which all scien- 
tific laws are relative. But while the laws are not relative, the mech- 
anisms of motivation are, because they are formulated with specific 
reference to their significances for a particular class of system. The 
particularly important point is that the mechanisms of personality 
as a system are not the same as the mechanisms of the social system, 
because, in the ways which have been set forth in this work and 
elsewhere, personalities and social systems constitute two different 
classes of system. In so far as "psychology" gives us completely gen- 
eralized laws of motivational process they are as much and as directly 
applicable to processes of action in the context of the social system 
as anywhere else. But in so far as what psychology gives us is not 
laws but mechanisms, the high probability is that they are mech- 
anisms of the personality as a system. In this case the presumption 
is that they are not directly applicable to the analysis of social 
process, but their content in terms of laws must be reformulated in 
terms of its relevance to the social system. Social systems thus do 
not "repress" or "project," nor are they "dominant" or "submissive"; 
these are mechanisms of the personality. But the motivational proc- 
esses which are involved in these mechanisms also operate in social 
systems. We are profoundly concerned with these processes, but in 
their relevance to the mechanisms of the social system. 

It is necessary to explain a little further just what this means. 
We may take for granted that motivation is always a process which 
goes on in one or more individual actors. We may speak of the 
"motivation" of a collectivity only in an elliptical sense as referring 
to certain uniformities in the motivations of its members, or to a 
certain organization of those motivations. But in order to select the 
relevant uniformities and patterns of organization, it is necessary to 
have criteria of relevance which are seldom if ever given in gen- 
eralized knowledge of motivational process itself. It must be given 
in terms of mechanisms which involve, as part of their conceptuali- 
zation, the specification of the types of consequences of alternative 



The Mechanisms of Socialization [ 203 ] 

outcomes of the processes concerned which are significant to the 
social system. But in order to make this specification in turn we must 
be in a position to say in systematic terms what these consequences 
are. It is this circumstance which, in the present state of knowledge, 
gives the "structural" analysis of the social system a certain priority 
over its "dynamic" or motivational analysis. If we do not have the 
structural analysis we do not know where to begin dynamic con- 
ceptualization, because we are unable to judge the relevance of 
motivational processes and laws, above all to distinguish between 
mechanisms of personality and mechanisms of the social system. 

The first task is to set up a classification of the motivational 
mechanisms of the social system and to relate this systematically to 
the classifications of the mechanisms of personality. In another pub- 
lication^ the mechanisms of the personality system have been classi- 
fied in three categories, those of learning, of defense and of adjust- 
ment. Learning is defined broadly as that set of processes by which 
new elements of action-orientation are acquired by the actor, new 
cognitive orientations, new values, new objects, new expressive in- 
terests. Learning is not confined to the early stages of the life cycle, 
but continues throughout life. What is ordinarily called a "normal" 
adaptation to a change in the situation or the "unfolding" of an 
established dynamic pattern, is a learning process. 

The mechanisms of defense are the processes through which 
conflicts internal to the personality, that is between different need- 
dispositions and sub-systems of them, are dealt with. In the cases of 
complete resolution of such conflicts the mechanisms of defense 
merge into those of learning. Finally, the mechanisms of adjust- 
ment are the processes by which the individual actor deals with ele- 
ments of strain and conflict in his relations to objects, that is to the 
situation of action. He may thus face the threat of loss of an object 
of attachment, of frustration of the attainment of a goal through 
situational strains and the like. Again, with complete resolution of 
situational strains and conflicts the mechanisms of adjustment merge 
with those of learning. A completely successful substitution of a new 
object for one entailing severe conflict may thus obviate the need 
for dependency on the object the loss of which is threatened. 

^ Parsons and Shils, Values, Motives and Systems of Action, Chapter 11. 
This chapter is of first importance as background for the present discussion. 



[ 204 ] The Learning of Social Role-Expectations 

This way of conceiving and classifying the mechanisms of per- 
sonahty functioning impHes a most important assumption which 
should be brought into the open. Learning as conceived above is a 
process of change in the state of the personality as a system. Defense 
and adjustment are conceived as equilibrating processes, processes 
which counteract tendencies to change the system in certain ways. 
There is in this classification no class of mechanisms for maintaining 
a stable motivational process in operation. In other words, we are 
assuming that the continuance of a stabilized motivational process 
in a stabilized relationship to the relevant objects is to be treated as 
not frohlemutical. This assumption, though seldom made explicit, 
seems to be of very general applicability in psychology. It may be 
compared to the first Newtonian law of motion, the law of inertia, 
which states that the -prohlems for mechanics concern not what 
makes bodies move, but what makes them change their motion, in 
direction or velocity. We shall assume the motivational counterpart 
of the law of inertia in the present discussion, that it is change of 
intensity or "direction," i.e., orientation, of action which poses the 
problems for the dynamics of action theory. Hence for the social 
system as well as the personality we will not be concerned with the 
problem of the maintenance of given states of the social system 
except where there are known tendencies to alter those states. This 
principle gives us a clear criterion of what constitutes a motivational 
problem in the context of the social system. 

Now it must again be remembered that motivational processes 
are always processes in individual actors. Therefore, the application 
of the above criterion means that the problems of the mechanisms 
of the social system arise where, from our knowledge of individuals, 
we have reason to believe that there are tendencies to alter estab- 
lished states of the social system. What, then, for our immediate pur- 
poses is an established state of a social system, or relevant sub- 
system? 

The answer to this question is given in the basic paradigm of 
social interaction which has been discussed so often. An established 
state of a social system is a process of complementary interaction of 
two or more individual actors in which each conforms with the 
expectations of the otherC's) in such a way that alter's reactions to 
ego's actions are positive sanctions which serve to reinforce his given 



The Mechanisms of Socialization [ 2,05 ] 

need-dispositions and thus to fulfill his given expectations. This 
stabilized or equilibrated interaction process is the fundamental 
point of reference for all dynamic motivational analysis of social 
process. 

It is certainly contrary to much of the common sense of the 
social sciences, but it will nevertheless be assumed that the mainte- 
nance of the complementarity of role-expectations, once established, 
is not 'problematical, in other words that the "tendency" to main- 
tain the interaction process is the first law of social process. This is 
clearly an assumption, but there is, of course, no theoretical objec- 
tion to such assumptions if they serve to organize and generalize 
our knowledge. Another way of stating this is to say that no special 
mechanisms are required for the explanation of the maintenance of 
complementary interaction-orientation. 

Then what classes of tendencies not to maintain this interaction 
are there? Fundamentally they can be reduced to two. First it is 
quite clear that the orientations which an actor implements in his 
complementary interaction in roles, are not inborn but have to be 
acquired through learning. We may then say that before he has 
learned a given role-orientation he clearly tends to act in ways which 
would upset the equilibrium of interaction in his incumbency of 
the role in question. The acquisition of the requisite orientations 
for satisfactory functioning in a role is a learning process, but it is 
not learning in general, but a particular part of learning. This 
process will be called the process of socialization, and the motiva- 
tional processes by which it takes place, seen in terms of their func- 
tional significance to the interaction system, the vtechanisms of 
socialization. These are the mechanisms involved in the processes 
of "normal" functioning of the social system. 

However, the problems of the socialization process are formu- 
lated on the assumption that the factors producing the equilibrium 
of the interaction process are stabilized with the exception that the 
requisite orientations for adequate functioning of a given actor in a 
given role have not yet been learned. But concretely this is not the 
case. Both within the individual actors as personalities and in the 
situation in which they act there are factors tending to upset the 
equilibrium. Changes in the situation as such may be said to present 
new learning problems and thus fall within the scope of socializa- 



[ 2o6 ] The Learning of Social Role-Expectations 

tion. But certain changes arising from the personaHties of the inter- 
acting factors and their reactions to situational changes are another 
matter. 

We have seen that the very structure of the interaction process 
provides the major dimension for the organization of such tend- 
encies. They are tendencies to deviance, to depart from con- 
formity with the normative standards which have come to be set up 
as the common culture. A tendency to deviance in this sense is a 
process of motivated action, on the part of an actor who has unques- 
tionably had a full opportunity to learn the requisite orientations, 
tending to deviate from the complementary expectations of con- 
formity with common standards so far as these are relevant to the 
definition of his role. Tendencies to deviance in this sense in turn 
confront the social system with "problems" of control, since deviance 
if tolerated beyond certain limits will tend to change or to dis- 
integrate the system. Focusing, then, on the tendencies to deviance, 
and the reactions in the social system which operate in the direction 
of motivating actors to abandon their deviance and resume con- 
formity, we may speak of the second class of mechanisms, the 
mechanisms of social control. A mechanism of social control, then, 
is a motivational process in one or more individual actors which 
tends to counteract a tendency to deviance from the fulfillment of 
role-expectations, in himself or in one or more alters. It is a re- 
equilibrating mechanism. 

The mechanisms of social control comprise aspects of the two 
classes of mechanisms of the personality which have been called 
mechanisms of defense and of adjustment. They constitute, that is, 
defense and adjustment relative to tendencies to violate role-expecta- 
tions. Psychologically the particularly close relationship to the super- 
ego is immediately evident. It should, however, again be emphasized 
that though the mechanisms of social control comprise elements of 
these personality mechanisms, they are not the same, but are mech- 
anisms of the social system. Just what specific systematic interrela- 
tions exist will have to be explored in the subsequent analysis. Of 
the two classes, however, for obvious reasons the mechanisms of 
personality adjustment are dynamically the more closely related to 
the mechanisms of social control. It is, after all, in the interrelations 
with social objects that both the problems of adjustment of the per- 



The Internalization of Social Value-Orientations [ 207 ] 

sonality and of control for the social system, arise. On the other hand 
functionally, the mechanisms of social control are more closely 
analogous with the mechanisms of defense, since both are concerned 
with the processes by which a system of action is internally inte- 
grated, and disruptive tendencies are held in check. 

A word should also be said about the relations between the 
mechanisms of socialization and social control on the one hand and 
the allocative processes of the social system on the other. The alloca- 
tion of personnel between roles in the social system and the socializa- 
tion processes of the individual are clearly the same 'processes viewed 
in different perspectives. Allocation is the process seen in the per- 
spective of functional significance to the social system as a system. 
Socialization on the other hand is the process seen in terms of the 
motivation of the individual actor. Learning to decide between al- 
ternatives of role-incumbency which the social system leaves open 
to the individual is certainly part of social learning and such de- 
cisions manifest the value-orientations acquired through socializa- 
tion. The process of allocation of facilities and rewards on the other 
hand is from the motivational point of view a process of acquisition 
and loss of valued object-relations by individual actors. It is thus a 
process of "flow" in a stabilized situation (e.g., of "income") or it is a 
process of situational change requiring adjustment by the actor. The 
adjustments may be successfully learned through socialization mech- 
anisms or they may be factors in producing tendencies to deviance 
and hence foci for the operation of mechanisms of social control. 

The present chapter will be concerned with the processes of 
socialization and their mechanisms, leaving until Chapter VII the 
analysis of deviance and the processes of social control. 

§ THE SOCIALIZATION OF THE CHILD AND 
THE INTERNALIZATION OF SOCIAL 
VALUE-ORIENTATIONS 

THE term socialization in its current usage in the literature 
refers primarily to the process of child development. This is in fact a 
crucially important case of the operation of what are here called the 
mechanisms of socialization, but it should be made clear that the 
term is here used in a broader sense than the current one to desig- 



[ 2o8 ] The Learning of Social Role-Expectations 

nate the learning of any orientations of functional significance to 
the operation of a system of complementary role-expectations. In this 
sense, socialization, like learning, goes on throughout life. The case 
of the development of the child is only the most dramatic because 
he has so far to go. 

However, there is another reason for singling out the socializa- 
tion of the child. There is reason to believe that, among the learned 
elements of personality in certain respects the stablest and most 
enduring are the major value-orientation patterns and there is 
much evidence that these are "laid down" in childhood and are 
not on a large scale subject to drastic alteration during adult life.^ 
There is good reason to treat these patterns of value-orientation, as 
analyzed in terms of pattern variable combinations, as the core of 
what is sometimes called "basic personality structure" and they will 
be so treated here. Hence in discussing certain highlights of the 
socialization of the child, primary emphasis will be placed on this 
aspect of socialization in more general terms. 

Before proceeding it may be emphasized that the socialization 
of the child is a case of socialization in the strict sense of the above 
definition, not of social control. What has sometimes been called 
the "barbarian invasion" of the stream of new-bom infants is, of 
course, a critical feature of the situation in any society. Along with 
the lack of biological maturity, the conspicuous fact about the 
child is that he has yet to learn the patterns of behavior expected 
of persons in his statuses in his society. Our present discussion is 
not concerned with the fact that children, having learned these 
patterns, tend very widely to deviate from them, though this, of 
course, happens at every stage, but with the process of acquisition 
itself on the part of those who have not previously possessed the 
patterns. 

As a mechanism of the social system, the combination of moti- 
vational processes in question must be conceived as a set of proc- 
esses of action in roles which, on the basis of known facts about 
motivational process, analytical and empirical, tend to bring about 
a certain result, in the present case the internalization of certain 

* Tte commonest apparent type of exception is that explained by ambivalence 
in an earlier orientation system. In such a case there may of course be dramatic 
changes of overt behavior. 



The Internalization of Social Value-Orientations [ 209 ] 

patterns of value-orientation. This result is conceived to be the out- 
come of certain processes of interaction in roles. 

In order to analyze the processes then, it is necessary to have 
two classes of information available. First we must have knowledge 
of the processes or mechanisms of learning from the point of view 
of the actor who is in the process of being socialized. Secondly, we 
must have in mind the relevant features of the interacting role 
system, which place the socializee, if the term may be permitted, 
in a situation which favors the relevant learning process. The 
assumption is that mechanisms of socialization operate only so 
far as the learning process is an integral part of the process of 
interaction in complementary roles. Thus not only the socializing 
agents hut the socializee must be conceived as acting in roles. At 
the instant of birth, perhaps, the infant does not do so. But almost 
immediately a role is ascribed to him which includes expectations 
of his behavior. The behavior of adults toward him is not like their 
behavior toward purely physical objects, but is contingent on his 
behavior and very soon what are interpreted to be his expectations; 
thus "the hahy is expecting to be fed." It is only when this mutual- 
ity of interaction has been established that we may speak of the 
socialization process. Purely physical care of the infant in which he 
has no role but is merely a passive object of manipulation is, if it 
ever exists, not socialization. 

In Values, Motives and Systems of Action five cathectic-evalua- 
tive mechanisms of learning were distinguished and systemically 
related to one another. All of these are relevant to the present 
context and what they are and how related must be briefly reviewed 
here. In the background stand the cognitive mechanisms of dis- 
crimination and generalization. The five are reinforcement-extinc- 
tion, inhibition, substitution, imitation and identification. The first 
three do not necessarly involve orientation to social objects, while 
the last two do. 

Reinforcement-extinction is the name given for the most general 
relation between the gratifying-depriving features of the outcome 
of a behavioral process, and the strength of the tendency to repeat 
it under appropriate conditions. The broad law is that in general 
the receipt of gratifications will tend to strengthen the pattern while 
that of deprivations will tend to weaken it. This generalization 



[ 2 1 o ] The Learning of Social Role-Exfectations 

should, of course, be carefully interpreted in the light of the many 
different meanings in the content of gratifications and deprivations 
and the complex interrelations of need-dispositions in the personal- 
ity system as well as the significance of many variations in the con- 
ditions. A simple "hedonistic" interpretation is clearly inadequate. 

The second mechanism is inhibition, which means simply the 
process of learning to refrain from carrying out the action motivated 
by a given need-disposition, in the presence of an appropriate oppor- 
tunity for gratification, regardless of what happens to the "affect" 
involved. There is a fundamental sense in which inhibition is the 
obverse of, and inherently linked with, learning itself. For unless 
complete extinction of previous need-dispositions were immediately 
given with every new step of learning, learning would be impos- 
sible, for the attachment to the old pattern would be unbreakable. 
Inhibition is thus in one direction the process of breaking through 
motivational inertia. 

TTie third general mechanism is substitution, which means the 
process of transferring cathexis from one object to another. Substi- 
tution obviously involves inhibition, in the form of renunciation of 
cathexis of the old object, but in addition it involves the capacity 
to transfer, to "learn" that the new object can provide gratifications 
which are more or less equivalent to the old. Thus in the most 
general terms "progress" in learning means, first, at least enough 
reinforcement to prevent extinction of motivations, second, capacity 
to inhibit the need-dispositions which block new orientations, and 
third, capacity to accept new objects, to substitute. 

Closely connected with these cathectic-evaluative mechanisms 
are the primarily cognitive mechanisms of discrimination and gen- 
eralization. Discrimination is the very first condition of the construc- 
tion of an object-world, and must continue to operate throughout 
all learning processes. Generalization on the other hand, by pro- 
viding awareness of the common attributes of classes of objects, is 
an indispensable condition of substitution, and of higher levels of 
organization of an orientation system. Above all, generalization is 
essential to the cathexis of classes of objects and even more of 
abstract categories and cultural objects, i.e., symbols, as such, hence 
to any process of successive substitutions building up to these 
cathexes, including processes of symbolization. Probably the acqui- 



The Internalization of Social Value-Orientations [211] 

sition of at all generalized patterns of value-orientation involves 
this mechanism deeply. 

Imitation is the process by which specific items of culture, spe- 
cific bits of knowledge, skill, symbolic behavior, are taken over 
from a social object in the interaction process. In one sense then 
it may be conceived as a process of short cutting the process of 
independent learning, in that alter is able to show a shorter and 
easier way to learn than ego could find by himself. Of course imita- 
tion presumably must prove rewarding in some sense if the act to 
be learned is to be reinforced. But above all imitation does not 
imply any continuing relation to the "model," or any solidarity 
attachment. 

Identification, on the other hand, means taking over, i.e., inter- 
nalizing, the values of the model. It implies that ego and alter have 
established a reciprocal role relationship in which value-patterns 
are shared. Alter is a model and this is a learning process, because 
ego did not at the beginning of it possess the values in question. 
Identification may be subclassified according to the type of values 
and the nature of the attachment to alter. The most important 
variations would be according to whether it was a specific or a 
diffuse attachment and whether it was an affective or love attach- 
ment or a neutral or esteem attachment. In any case this is obviously 
the most important of the learning mechanisms for the acquisition 
of value patterns. 

We may now turn to the features of the interaction process 
itself, as a complementary role structure, which are important for 
the socializing effect of the operation of the learning processes just 
reviewed. The socializing effect will be conceived as the integration 
of ego into a role complementary to that of alter(s) in such a way 
that the common values are internalized in ego's personality, and 
their respective behaviors come to constitute a complementary role- 
expectation-sanction system. 

The first point to mention is that, prior to and independent of 
any identification, alter as an adult has certain control of the situa- 
tion in which ego acts, so that he may influence the consequences 
of ego's actions. Put in learning terms, he may use these to rein- 
force the tendencies of ego's behavior which fit his own expecta- 
tions of how ego should behave, and operate to extinguish those 



[212] The Learning of Social Role-Exfectations 

which are deviant. Corresponding to the learning mechanisms of 
reinforcement-extinction, then, we may speak of socialization mech- 
anisms of reward-funishment, the particular and specific orienta- 
tions to ego's behavior which tend to motivate him to conformity 
and dissuade him from deviance from aker's expectations.^ These 
are to be conceived in abstraction from alter's functioning as a 
model either for imitation or for identification. 

However, rewards and punishments obviously operate to induce 
inhibitions and substitutions. The simplest motivation for an inhibi- 
tion presumably is learning that gratification of a need-dispositon 
will bring deprivational consequences.^ So far as these consequences 
have been imposed by a social object contingent on ego's action 
they constitute punishments. For substitution, on the other hand, 
presumably a combination of rewards and punishments is, if not 
indispensable in all cases, at least an optimum; namely the punish- 
ment of continued retention of the old object, combined with re- 
warding of cathexis of the new. 

Secondly, alter may operate not only as a reinforcing-extin- 
guishing agent but as a model for imitation. In addition to imposing 
contingent consequences on ego's specific acts he may hold up a 
model, which in turn becomes the focus of reinforcement-extinction 
processes, however actively they may or may not be carried out by 
alter's own action. In this case we may say that alter as an active 
model adopts the role of a "teacher" and because the term fits 
directly, we may speak of socialization hy "instruction" as the im- 
plementation of the mechanism of imitation by the socializing agent. 
In the learning context the term imitation emphasizes what hap- 
pens when there is a model for imitation. In the socialization con- 
text the fact that a model of a given type is 'provided to "instruct" 

^ It is of course possible for ego to reward or punish himself, given motivation 
to do so, which implies internalization of the relevant value-orientations. 

^ There are many complex problems of the psychology of learning involved 
here which it is desired to leave open: For example Solomon's studies of avoidance 
conditioning seem to show a quite different pattern from the "classical" rein- 
forcement experiments. It is extremely important not to beg any of these questions. 
The aim of the present sketch is to place some of the problems of the psychology 
of learning in the context of their possible significance for the social system. This is 
done essentially by analyzing the role-structure of the socialization process. It is 
hoped that sufficient parsimony is observed on the psychological side to avoid 
commitment to dubious generalizations. 



The Internalization of Social Value-Orientations [213] 

ego is just as much the focus of attention. Thus attention is directed 
to the specific role of alter as well as to ego's learning processes as 
such. 

Finally, the mechanism of learning (generally in addition to the 
others in a complex process) may be identification. For identifica- 
tion to take place there must develop a further feature of the inter- 
action relationship of ego and alter. In addition to what alter does 
in the sense of his overt discrete acts with their reward-punishment 
significance, and to what he offers in the sense of patterns for imita- 
tion, alter's attitudes toward ego become the crucial feature of the 
socialization process. We have seen at a number of points how 
crucial this step in the integration of an interactive system is. In- 
deed it is in this way that we have defined an attachment, namely an 
orientation to alter in which the paramount focus of cathective- 
evaluative significance is in alter's attitudes. Overt acts thereby come 
to be interpreted mainly as "expressions" of these attitudes, that is, 
as signs, or even more as symbols of them. 

When a reciprocal attachment has been formed ego has ac- 
quired, as it was called in Chapter IV, a "relational possession." He 
acquires a "stake" in the security of this possession, in the mainte- 
nance of alter's favorable attitudes, his receptiveness-responsiveness, 
his love, his approval or his esteem, and a need to avoid their with- 
drawal and above all their conversion into hostile or derogatory 
attitudes. 

The generalizations about motivational processes which are 
summed up in what is called the mechanism of identification appar- 
ently imply the extremely important generalization, we may per- 
haps say theorem, that value-orientation patterns can only be in- 
ternalized from outside^ through reciprocal attachments, that is, 
through ego becoming integrated in a reciprocal and complementary 
role relative to alter which reaches the level of organization and 
cathectic sensitivity which we call that of attachment and a common 
value pattern involving loyalty. The third of the basic classes of 
mechanisms of socialization, then, we may call the mechanisms of 
value-acquisition with all the implications as to the nature of the 
process, not only within the personality of ego, but in terms of his 
interaction with alter, which have been outlined above. 

° There may, of course, be creative modifications from within the personality. 



[ 214 ] ^^^ Learning of Social Role-Exyectations 

This sketch of the significance of the process of identification 
is extremely elementary and leaves many crucial problems unsolved. 
The stress has been placed on the building up of a pattern of values 
common to ego and to alter, ego being considered as acquiring the 
values from alter through identification. This leaves open, how- 
ever, several crucial problems concerning the processes of differen- 
tiation of such a value-system. Above all the roles of ego and alter 
are generally complementary and not identical. There is, therefore, 
an element of common value but equally an element of differential 
a-pflicahility of the common value element to ego and to alter. Ego 
as a small child is clearly not expected to behave exactly as alter as 
an adult does. Furthermore, ego and alter may be of opposite sex, 
thus introducing a further differentiation. 

On this basis we may distinguish the following elements in the 
value-patterns acquired by ego from alter through identification; a) 
the common value-orientation in sufficiently general terms to be 
applicable both to ego's role and to alter's and hence, presumably 
more broadly still, e.g., to the family as a whole, etc. This would 
take the form of allegations that such and such things are right or 
wrong, proper or improper, in rather general terms; b) alter's expec- 
tations—in value-orientation terms for ego's behavior in his role, 
e.g. differentiated from alter's by age and possibly by sex and per- 
haps otherwise; and c) the complementary expectations for the 
definition of alter's role. 

There is still a fourth element involved in the possible differen- 
tiation from the roles of either ego or alter of third parties, e.g., the 
father if alter is the mother, and finally a fifth in that ego's role is 
not static but expected to change in the process of his "growing up" 
—so that a valuation relative to his own future is very much part of 
his value-acquisition. The complex problems involved in these dif- 
ferentiations will be briefly touched upon in the subsequent dis- 
cussion but their analysis can at best only be begun. 

Of course many features of the actual process of socialization of 
the child are obscure, especially the factors responsible for differ- 
ences in outcome, and for pathologies. However, using the above 
conceptual scheme it will be worthwhile to attempt a brief sketch 
of some of the highlights which at least can provide the points of 



The Internalization of Social Value-Orientations [215] 

departure for some hypotheses, if not the codification of estabhshed 
knowledge. It should be remembered that our concern here is with 
the acquisition of value-orientation patterns, and factors which may 
be responsible for the internalization of diflFerent types of value- 
orientation pattern. Hence our primary focus will be on mechanisms 
of value-acquisition through identifications. 

There are throughout two terms to the analysis, namely the 
role of the socializing agent and of the socializee. In the latter case 
there are three primary classical attributes of the infant, his -plas- 
ticity, which is simply a name for his capacity to learn alternative 
patterns, his sensitivity, which may be interpreted to be a name for 
his capacity to form attachments in the above sense, and his depend- 
ency. The last is, given the first two, the primary "fulcrum" for 
applying the leverage of socialization. The infant, as an organism, 
is helpless and dependent on others for the most elementary grati- 
fications of food, warmth and other elements of protection. 

The socializing agent is, therefore, inherently in a position to 
begin the process of socialization by being the agent of rewards and, 
implicitly at first, then explicitly, of punishments. The beginning 
orientation of the infant very soon must include awareness of the 
role of the adult in this most elementary sense. It is, then, the 
securing of the leverage of the infant's motivation to secure the 
specific rewards of being fed, kept warm, etc. and avoid the cor- 
responding deprivations* which constitute the first beginning of his 

^ Just as in the case of the more specific processes of learning, many problems 
arise concerning the more specific significances of particular infantile needs and 
their handling in the course of socialization, including degrees of leniency and 
severity with respect to such matters as weaning and toilet training and the 
significance of the timing of discipline in such areas. Again we cannot attempt 
here to go into these problems in detail but can only attempt to provide a general 
framework of role analysis within which these detailed problems may be ap- 
proached. It may, however, be tentatively suggested that if the processes of 
identification are as important as the present approach seems to indicate, the 
presumption is that these specific details of child-training practice are likely to 
be primarily significant in their capacity as expressions of the attitudes of the 
socializing agents, rather than through their independent intrinsic efiFects. It 
seems probable that the strong emphasis on the latter in some circles has been 
colored by seeing the socialization process in terms of a reinforcement theory of 
learning alone wdthout reference to the processes of interaction in roles which 
are of primary interest to the present discussion. 



[ 2 1 6 ] The Learning of Social Role-Expectations 

flaying a role as distinguished from being merely an object of care J 
Certain elements of this care come to be expected to be contingent 
on conformity with alter's expectations, starting with respect to 
such responses as crying, smiling, or coming to get something (after 
learning to walk). 

It is probable that the basis of attachments begins to be laid 
down before much imitation occurs, because it takes considerable 
maturation before the infant has high capacity for imitation. It is 
probably of great significance that, except in disorganized condi- 
tions, there is relatively little direct and early frustration of the 
infant's fundamental physiological needs. The primary frustrations 
come with the necessity to make substitutions for the original ob- 
jects— e.g., weaning. But certain other gratifications coming from 
pleasant physical contact and the like are especially likely to be 
contingent on the adult's attitudes toward the infant, and thus on 
his own behavior. This is probably a main basis of the strategic 
significance of erotic gratifications and needs in human personality, 
that their genesis in physical contact with the mother, through 
suckling, fondling, etc. is likely to be a most prominent focus of 
role-expectation contingency at an early stage of socialization. Then 
by a series of substitutions an adult structure of erotic need-disposi- 
tions gets built up. 

In any case generalization from the particularity of rewarding 
acts on alter's part plus early dependence is the process of genesis 
of early attachments. Perhaps the first thing to be said about the 
earliest attachments is that they are in the nature of the case pri- 
marily affective if only because the infant does not yet have the 
capacity for inhibition which underlies affectively neutral orienta- 
tions. It seems to be completely established that inhibition must be 
learned, and how, when, in what contexts and subject to what 
limitations is one of the most important problem areas of socializa- 
tion theory. 

Secondly, there is the question of the temporal priority of spe- 
cific and diffuse attachments, in the pattern variable sense. Both 
are, if we assume reward-punishment for particular acts as the 

^ The existence of genetically inborn social-relational needs may remain an 
open question here. If they exist this provides additional motivation to role- 
assumption. 



The Internalization of Social Value-Orientations [217] 

primary starting point, results of processes oF generalization. But 
the generalization from the specific act to the category of action of 
which it is an example seems tentatively to be the more elementary 
one. Hence one would expect that an attachment to the mother as 
for example, the source of food gratifications, would be the first 
type of attachment. The generalization to a diffuse attachment in 
which she is the person who "cares for" ego, not merely in the sense 
of ministrations but of attitudes, requires a further step. The duality 
of meaning of the word "care" in the language would appear to be 
significant. 

Granting both sensitivity and dependency, there is still a prob- 
lem of the mechanisms by which this generalization takes place. 
It may be suggested that here again the erotic sphere plays a par- 
ticularly strategic part. Precisely because of many of the practical 
exigencies of infant care, bodily contact with the mother plays an 
important part in the relationship. Though as psychoanalytic theory 
has emphasized, the oral, anal and even urethral zones have in 
early childhood special erotic potentialities, it may well be that the 
more significant property of the erotic sphere is its diffuseness. The 
specific acts of care, such as feeding, have in a certain sense an 
instrumental character; as such their significance may not be con- 
fined to the fact that they provide a favorable basis for building up 
response needs as distinguished from reward needs and generalizing 
these to the person of alter rather than to the particular context or 
class of acts. Much of the significance of the erotic sphere may thus 
rest on the fact that it is a favorable bridge between reward and 
response, in that, from the dependence on erotic rewards, especially 
the diflFuser ones of affectionate bodily contact, the path to diffuse 
attachment can most readily be entered upon. 

If this interpretation is correct, it would seem to follow that 
though specific fixation on specific erogenous zones would ordi- 
narily occur in the normal socialization process to some degree, the 
more extreme fixations which play a prominent part in pathological 
syndromes should be treated as consequences of some disturbance 
of the normally more diflFuse functions of erotic interest. It is sug- 
gestive that erotic fixation on parts of ego's own body may indicate 
disturbance of security of a diffuse erotic interest in relation to 
alter. This would make oral and anal eroticism more significant as 



[ 2 1 8 ] The Learning of Social Role-Expectations 

secondary aspects of libidinal development than as the primary foci 
of it. 

If the foregoing analysis is correct even the most elementary 
attachment of a specific response character means that the step to 
role-playing in the full social system sense has been taken. There is 
already a common value pattern shared by ego and alter, namely 
the valuation of their mutual attitudes of affection, such that par- 
ticular acts are treated as "expressions" of the appropriate attitudes, 
not simply as discrete rewards and punishments. There are definite 
norms of appropriate behavior on hoth sides. The dependence of 
this development on capacity for generalization is clear. 

Such an attachment means that the child is not merely recep- 
tive to the responses of alter, but has learned to respond himself, 
for example, by smiling and "cuddling up." But at about this point 
another of the most fundamental alternatives of socialization pat- 
terning opens out. The child has an obvious interest in eliciting 
both revi^ards and responses from the adult. But there is an enor- 
mous inequality in realistic capacity to perform. In this context the 
socialization process may take the turn of encouraging ego in pas- 
sivity, an orientation which is in a sense appropriate to his helpless- 
ness, or it may encourage him in building up the more symmetrical 
reciprocity of receptiveness and response, if not of concrete reward- 
actions. Indeed it would seem that because of the inherent inequal- 
ity in the latter sense the only real possibility for motivating an 
active orientation lay in encouraging responsiveness as well as re- 
ceptiveness on the child's part, that is, rewarding it hoth with dis- 
crete acts and with enhanced receptiveness and responsiveness on 
alter's part. It is clearly through internalization of the values 
expressed in attitudes along this dimension that orientation, in terms 
of the variable of ascription-achievement, tends to be built up. This 
may, for instance, be extremely important to the development of the 
achievement values of American Society. 

It seems highly probable that early diffuse attachments, partic- 
ularly to the mother, constitute the focus of what is sometimes 
called the security system of the child. Security in this sense may 
be taken to mean that there is a certain stabilization of his system 
of orientation, by virtue of which the child is able to develop a 
certain tolerance of frustration. But the price of this security is, in 



The Internalization of Social Value-Orientations [219] 

the early attachments, a certain enhancement of dependency. This 
may be culturally variable in that the presence of mother surrogates 
mitigates the degree of dependency on the one attachment, but 
ordinarily this does not involve a difference of -pattern as between 
the objects of attachment from which new values could be learned. 

The tolerance of frustration, which becomes possible within a 
diffuse love attachment, seems to provide a major clue to the further 
significance of such an attachment, namely as a lever for imposing 
the learning of new values. Part of the frustration to which a child 
is exposed is inherent in the physical and other aspects of the situ- 
ation, but a substantial part of it consists of disciplines, whether 
administered to the child deliberately or not, which may be con- 
sidered to be mechanisms of socialization. 

The uses to which the leverage of frustration tolerance is put 
will vary with the nature of the roles for which individuals are being 
socialized, which in turn are very different in different societies. 
Making allowance for this variability, however, we may concen- 
trate the discussion on some considerations relevant to the processes 
of acquisition of some of the value-patterns not directly involved in 
the diffuse love relation of mother to small child. These are above 
all the independence necessary to an autonomous achievement orien- 
tation, the capacity for affective neutrality, for universalism and for 
functional specificity independent of the direct gratification inter- 
ests of childhood, especially in affectively neutral contexts. These 
are admittedly value-patterns of particular significance in the adult 
role-system of our own society, but they have varying kinds of rele- 
vance in other societies. 

Success in making the transition from dependent status in a 
diffuse mother attachment to a more "grown up" stage depends on 
two primary sets of conditions. The first is the combination of 
objects of identification offered by the situation in which the child 
is placed, the value patterns they embody, and their relations to 
each other in the earlier stages, especially the relations of the two 
parents. The second is the set of conditions which provide a psycho- 
logically favorable situation for the process of identification to 
operate. 

The second is not primarily our concern but a few things may 
be said about it. The first of these favorable conditions apparently 



[ 220 ] The Learning of Social Role-Expectations 

is adequate security in the above sense. In the first instance this 
centers on the mother. One may, however, say that, for the father 
to serve as an important identification object, he must be included 
in a sohdarity system with the mother, so that neither is the child 
excluded from the mother-father solidarity nor the father from the 
mother-child solidarity— for purposes of simplicity we may omit ref- 
erence to siblings. It is from his inclusion in this diffuse solidarity 
system, the family as a collectivity, that the child derives his primary 
support. 

Secondly, there must be an imposition of disciplines which, 
given the starting points, constitute frustrations of the child's al- 
ready established need-dispositions, especially certain needs for 
immediate gratification, and his dependency needs. It may be sur- 
mised that these will include not only ad hoc frustrations but will, 
at critical points, include failure of alter to respond to ego's estab- 
lished expectations; what had become established as legitimate ex- 
pectations from alter at one stage of childhood, are not responded 
to at the next stage. 

Ego may respond to these frustrations with adjustive mechan- 
isms; indeed, to some degree he certainly will. But these must not 
become frozen in combination with defense mechanisms so that 
the socialization process is blocked, so that, for instance, alienative 
need-dispositions become established. It would seem, then, that 
certain adjustive responses to the pressure of frustration of expec- 
tations would have to be treated permissively, in the sense that they 
are "tolerated" by alter without jeopardizing ego's security. If the 
attachment were specific to the need-disposition context in ques- 
tion, alters failure to reciprocate would necessarily jeopardize the 
security of the attachment, but by virtue of the latter's quality of 
diffuseness it is possible for alter to show in other ways that the 
attitude of love has not been disturbed. Just what the balance in 
detail of failure to reciprocate, of permissiveness, and of expression 
of diffuse love should be, will vary with the kinship system and the 
roles for which ego is being socialized. It also involves problems of 
psychological process on which our knowledge is fragmentary, and 
the available evidence cannot be reviewed here. 

Finally, it may be said that the frustration involved in the 
refusal to reciprocate ego's expectations must be balanced by a 



The Internalization of Social Value-Orientations [ 221 ] 

promised reward for the fulfillment of alter's expectations, that is, 
for learning the new orientation. If a diffuse love attachment is 
already given, and if we maintain that relational rewards are by 
this time the most fundamental, we may see that specific signifi- 
cances attach at this later stage to the attitudes of approval and 
esteem on the part of alter. These can above all be the conditional 
elements in the reward system which are manipulated by the social- 
izing agents, along with specific gratification-rewards. 

In our own society, particularly, this throws a considerable light 
on the problem of "conditional love." If capacity for independent 
achievement is to be learned, there must be a conditional element 
in the reward system. Ideally it is not the parent's love attitude 
which is conditional, but his approval for specific performances. 
A capacity to segregate these two aspects would be a condition of 
parental adequacy. But under certain conditions this segregation 
will tend to break down, and the love, not merely the approval, 
become conditional. This may be expected, if it is sufficiently severe, 
to have pathogenic consequences for the child. 

It may be noted that these four prerequisites, security, discipline 
(implying frustration), permissiveness, and affectively neutral re- 
lational rewards are also characteristic of the psychotherapeutic 
process, and in this capacity are deeply involved in the equilibrium 
of the social system. There are fundamental differences which will 
be commented upon at the proper points, but it is important to 
note that socialization, psychotherapy and other mechanisms of 
social control are intimately interdependent. These relationships 
will be further analyzed in the following chapter and in Chapter X 
below. 

Within this framework it is interesting to look at the possible 
significance of the differentiation of the two parental roles in the 
socialization process, above all with reference to the question, why 
is a father important? Even if his participation in the routine care 
of the child is minimal! That he is extremely important is indicated 
again by the erotic factor and by the intricate geometry of sex role 
identification and of erotic attachments. It is highly suggestive that 
normal heterosexuality is institutionalized in all known societies, 
hence that homosexuality is with few exceptions tabooed, and that 
there is a universal incest taboo within the principal solidary kin- 



[ 222 ] The Learning of Social Role-Expectations 

ship group, which universally includes the conjugal family. We 
presume that to a significant degree this patterning is learned 
through socialization, is not therefore a sample manifestation of 
the "sexual instinct." 

Precisely in this connection the difference between psycho- 
therapy and socialization is suggestive. The small child whose 
security rests primarily on his attachment to his mother has not yet 
learned the value-orientations of higher levels of maturity. We may 
suggest that acceptance of certain pressures to take further steps in 
maturing, with their attendant frustrations, is in such circumstances 
less disturbing if the responsibility for the pressure can be divided 
between the parents and hence does not come primarily from the 
central love-object. With all the variability of sex role from society 
to society, it can be said to be universally true that the adult mascu- 
line role is less implicated with detailed child care than the femi- 
nine, and is more implicated with prestige and responsibility in the 
wider society beyond the narrow kinship circle. 

The fact of the father's solidarity with the mother makes it pos- 
sible, therefore, for him to be the symbolic focus of certain pressures 
on the child. The situation can be defined in the terms that, "you 
have to do this because your father wants you to," and the mother 
will support the father in this but still be less directly involved. 
Security in the mother relation is less likely to be jeopardized by 
this pressure because she does not have to take the full onus of the 
pressure on herself. There is, of course, room for wide variations in 
the ways in which this influence is concretely exerted and the 
responsibilities are divided, but this seems to be a common element. 

It seems to be significant that in the geometry of erotic attach- 
ments, in the case of both sexes, the sacrifice of the erotic element 
in the attachment to the mother seems to figure prominently in the 
"price" which has to be paid for growing up. It is a critical fact that 
children of both sexes start with a primary attachment to the mother 
which, since Freud, we know contains a prominent erotic element. 
The boy has to renounce the erotic element of his mother-attach- 
ment in favor of an adult heterosexual attachment which must, 
however, be outside the family of orientation. The heterosexual 
orientation remains, but the particular object, indeed class of ob- 
jects in the case of the mother surrogates, e.g. older sisters in our 



The Internalization of Social Value-Orientations [ 223 ] 

society, other kinswomen in others, must be renounced. Generally 
this renunciation must be in favor of a generation mate. The com- 
mon phenomenon of men being sexually interested in younger 
women, but seldom older women, might even be interpreted as a 
reaction formation against incestuous wishes, connected as they are 
with dependency needs. Seen in this perspective the Oedipus con- 
flict of the boy may be regarded as connected with the pressure to 
renounce in certain respects the expectations of his infantile attach- 
ment-role vis-a-vis his mother, rather than with sexual rivalry in the 
ordinary sense. The father is symbolically identified as the source 
of the pressure, in part no doubt because the boy cannot bring 
himself to believe that his mother would "do this to him." In the 
more general sense of course both parents are merely manifesting 
their attitudes of what is expected of a "big boy." 

It may be presumed that in this situation the relational rewards 
mentioned above are above all connected with the masculine role- 
identification of the boy, they thus not only include accepting the 
generalized values of both parents, which it may be presumed in 
the normal case they share, but involve particularizing those values 
in application to himself by his coming to understand that he must 
grow up to be a man, in a normative sense. It is the wp-proval and 
esteem of both his parents for his demonstrations of masculinity 
which forms one of the main foci of his socialization at this point. 
He therefore identifies with his father in a double sense; first, in 
that he shares the values in general and for his age group of both 
parents, and second, that he accepts the norm that their application 
to him should be in the differentiated role of a boy as distinguished 
from that of a girl. In our society at least the prolonged "latency 
period," with its evidences of compulsive masculinity, and its strict 
segregation of the sexes, not by adult decree but by peer-group 
pressure, as socially patterned phenomena, strongly suggests that 
the learning process in this case is heavily involved with compli- 
cated adjustive processes. 

The case of the girl shows an interesting combination of simi- 
larities and differences. The "danger" of retaining her infantile 
status is not that of identification vdth the wnrong sex role, but 
failure of capacity to form an adequate attachment to the opposite 
sex. Her father is presumably the prototype of the masculine object 



[ 224 ] ^^^^ Learning of Social Role-Ex'pectations 

for her as he is for her brother. But again the incest taboo forbids a 
simple transfer of erotic attachment from the mother to the father, 
there must be renunciation first of the mother attachment, second 
of an infantile erotic attachment to the father, and then develop- 
ment of a mature attachment to a man. This involves a complex 
combination of identifications with the mother and with the father. 
In terms of sex role, of course, the prescription is for acceptance of 
the role of the mother, hence identification with her in this sense. 
But there must still be the process of emancipation from the infan- 
tile mother-attachment. It may be presumed that identification with 
the father plays a crucial part in this, but because of the comple- 
mentarity of the sex roles it may be relieved of certain of the 
pressures operating in the case of the boy. It may be presumed that 
because of the pressure to renounce the mother-attachment there is 
a tendency to transfer the erotic needs to the father, but this in 
turn is inhibited by the implications of the incest taboo. It may well 
be that this blocking is a fundamental focus of feminine resent- 
ments against men. But the important point is that for the girl as 
well as the boy the father constitutes an important focus of the 
pressure to grow up, to renounce infantilism, and hence to learn 
the value orientations of the adult world of the society; in both cases 
attachment to the mother is a barrier to this learning, and the 
father's intervention constitutes a lever to pry the child loose from 
this attachment. 

It may be inquired what, from the present point of view, is the 
crucial difference between the role of sexuality in the infantile 
mother-attachment and in normal adult sexuality? Adult sexuality 
is fitted into a context of acceptance of adult values and roles gen- 
erally while infantile sexuality is not. On the infantile level eroti- 
cism is an integral part of, and symbolizes, the total role in which 
security rests; on the adult level it is put in its proper place in the 
larger complex of values and roles. A man is "worthy" to enjoy an 
erotic love relationship only in so far as he lives up to the general 
value-pattern for the masculine role in the society, as he attains 
requisite levels of competence, responsibility, etc. Similarly a woman 
must accept her familial role, her attachment to a fully masculine 
man not a mother figure, and the responsibility of socializing her 
children in terms of the general value system, as a condition of 



The Internalization of Social Value-Orientations [ 225 ] 

being loved in the sense which is an altered repetition of the infan- 
tile prototype. It is this integration of the erotic needs with the 
adult value-system of the society which defines the essential differ- 
ence between normal adult sexuality and "regressive" sexuality. At 
the same time the powerful force of erotic need-dispositions on the 
normal adult levels testifies to their crucial role in the socialization 
process. It is at least strongly suggestive that though these needs 
can be shaped and integrated with adult roles they are too deeply 
rooted to be eliminated. The relevance of this situation to the preva- 
lence of the empirical clustering of social structures about the kin- 
ship system, which we discussed in the last chapter, is evident. 

An essential part of this process is the progressive introduction 
of new patterns of value-orientation. The stress on particular pat- 
terns will vary greatly in different social systems, and their incidence 
will be differently distributed between different roles. But the 
greater responsibility of the adult in all societies, as compared with 
the child, means above all that the capacity for inhibition, hence for 
affectively neutral orientations, and for achievement must be de- 
veloped to some important degree. Also universalism is by no means 
negligible in any society, for example, with reference to technical 
efficiency. 

It may be suggested that identification with the father is criti- 
cally important, especially with reference to these components of a 
value-orientation system in all societies, but the more so the more 
these latter value-patterns are institutionalized. There are also 
crucial questions as to how far the mother role must also be altered 
in conformity with varying emphases on different components in 
the system of value-orientation. The necessity of this is given in the 
requirement that both parents share a common value system and in 
its terms show solidarity vis-a-vis their child. Only this solidarity 
permits the leverage of socialization relative to the early mother- 
attachment to operate. 

One of the most interesting features of the socialization process 
of the child, as reviewed in terms of the acquisition of value-orien- 
tations as formulated by the pattern variables, is the hierarchy of 
capacity for and incidence of the principal value-patterns. From 
this point of view the affective orientations are the first and in a 
sense easiest to acquire because of their direct relation to infantile 



[ 226 ] The Learning of Social Role-Expectations 

dependency and gratifications. Affective neutrality is more difficult, 
and needs to be motivated by diffuse affective attachments. At the 
same time it requires emancipation from too great exclusiveness 
of these attachments. Universalistic orientations would appear to 
be the most difficult to acquire. Activity-passivity, which is related 
to achievement-ascription, and specificity-diffuseness on the other 
hand are not so direcdy related to this hierarchical scale except that 
one may perhaps say that passivity is more "primitive" than activity, 
and that affective specificity is more primitive than affective diffuse- 
ness, since it involves a lower level of generalization. 

This hierarchy clearly is related to the phenomena of regression 
which have concerned personality psychologists so greatly. The 
orientation element, which is most difficult to acquire and which in 
a sense depends on the most complex set of prerequisite conditions, 
is, at least under certain types of strain, hkely to be the first to 
break down. Furthermore it is one with relation to which the 
socialization proces is most likely to go wrong, since it involves the 
most complex prerequisite and hence around which more of the 
neurotic type of defensive and adjustive mechanisms are likely to 
cluster. 

This structure of the value-orientation patterns relative to the 
socialization process, sketchy as its presentation has been, is clearly 
of the first importance for understanding the functioning of social 
systems, of different types. It is clear from the preceding chapter 
that different types of society and sub-system, because their role- 
orientation patterns are built up of different combinations of the 
pattern variables, impose very different sorts of strain on the sociah- 
zation process and on the personality types which result from it. 
They are, hence, vulnerable to different types of strain in different 
ways. 

§ BASIC PERSONALITY STRUCTURE: MODAL 
CLUSTERING AND DIVERSITY 

WE HAVE seen that each one of the pattern variables is 
intimately involved in that aspect of the socialization process which 
concerns the acquisition of value-orientation patterns. It has been 
possible, in a rough way, to show that each of them may present 
crucial alternatives at different stages of the socialization process, 



Basic Personality Structure [ 227 ] 

and that it is within the possibihty of variation of the role taken by 
alter to swing the balance one way or the other. Of course what has 
been presented above is in this respect a very crude sketch. These 
alternatives in fact appear not once but many times, and there are 
very complex combinations of influences emanating from the role- 
expectations of the various socializing agents. But this sketch has 
been sufficient to show the relevance of the pattern-variable scheme 
to the analysis of socialization, and the kind of theoretical approach 
which would be indicated to carry the analysis farther with genuine 
empirical rigor. 

It follows, then, from the above analysis that in principle any 
one of the major pattern variable combinations can become inter- 
nalized as a result of socialization processes and presumably, though 
this question has not been explored here, without a primary part 
being played by recourse to the operation of mechanisms other than 
the learning mechanisms, that is, without "neurotic" complications. 
At least the indications are very strong indeed that there is no one 
humanly "normal" pattern of internalized value-orientation so that 
all others could be considered to be "neurotic" deviations from it; 
for example some pattern of the "mature personality" in general. 

It seems to be without serious qualification the opinion of com- 
petent personality psychologists that, though personalities differ 
greatly in their degrees of rigidity, certain broad fundamental pat- 
terns of "character" are laid down in childhood (so far as they are 
not genetically inherited) and are not radically changed by adult 
experience. The exact degree to which this is the case or the exact 
age levels at which plasticity becomes greatly diminished, are not 
at issue here. The important thing is the fact of childhood character 
formation and its relative stability after that. 

Secondly, if the above account of the process of value-acquisi- 
tion is correct only in its broadest lines, it follows that the combina- 
tion of value-orientation patterns which is acquired must in a very 
important degree he a function of the fundamental role structure 
and dominant values of the social system. 

This statement needs to be qualified in two ways. First, as we 
shall show presently, it cannot be a function only of this funda- 
mental role structure. Secondly, the roles in which socialization 
takes place are predominantly kinship roles, and we have seen that 



[ 228 ] The Learning of Social Role-Exfectations 

these are in certain structural respects among the less variable as 
between primacies in the values ot" the pattern variables. 

We are then justified in concluding that the weight of evidence 
is strongly in favor of the existence and importance of an element 
of "basic personality" as Kardiner has called it, which is a function 
of socialization in a particular type of system of role relationships 
with particular values. Patterns of value-orientation play a pecu- 
liarly strategic part both in the definition of role-expectation pat- 
terns and in personality structure. Hence it may be concluded that 
it is the internalization of the value-orientation patterns embodied 
in the role-expectations for ego of the significant socializing agents, 
which constitutes the strategic element of this hasic 'personality 
structure. And it is because these patterns can only be acquired 
through the mechanism of identification, and because the basic 
identification patterns are developed in childhood, that the child- 
hood structure of personality in this respect is so stable and un- 
changeable. 

The value-orientation patterns are so crucial in this regard be- 
cause they are in fact the principal common denominator between 
personality as a system and the role-structure of the social system. 
If the whole analysis of action systems presented up to this point 
is correct this must be the strategic set of features of personalities 
which is most directly shaped by socialization processes. The same 
analysis of action, however, enables us to introduce certain very 
important qualifications and limitations relative to the concept of 
basic personality structure. 

The most important is that such a concept must be interpreted 
to refer to a component of the normal personality structure in a 
society, not to that personality structure as a concrete entity. Sec- 
ondly, such a personality structure cannot be uniform for a whole 
society, but it must be regarded as differentiated with regard to 
those status-differentiations in which kinship groups function as 
units within the same society, and also by sex within the same 
classes of kinship units. 

We assume that all normal early socialization of children occurs 
within the context of kinship, though often, of course, supple- 
mented by other agencies such as schools and peer groups. The 
fundamental lines of differentiation in socialization patterns will 



Basic Personality Structure [ 229 ] 

then be by sex within any given status group, and relative to the 
more general role-structure in which the parents are involved. The 
fact that it is the status differentiations which involve kinship units 
as units which are significant means that class, community and 
ethnic differences would be the most important within the same 
society. We must speak, then, of broad differentiations of basic 
personality structure between major types of societies, and of nar- 
rower differentiations by these status categories within the same 
society. 

But even so the basic personality structure will be only one 
as'pect not only of the total concrete structure of the personality, but 
of its concrete value-orientation aspect. This is because of a variety 
of factors. In the first place no two human organisms are alike by 
genetic constitution. Therefore the same influences operating on 
different genetic material will not necessarily bring about the same 
result. It is a case analogous to that of the same beam of light re- 
fracted through diflFerent prisms; the spectra will not be identical. 

But, secondly, it is the concrete constellation of reciprocal role 
relationships which constitutes the socializing influence, and within 
the same broad status groupings of the society these are different in a 
variety of ways. One of the most obvious is the age, sex, birth-order 
composition of kinship units. Even though there is a broad simi- 
larity of pattern, in detail the relationship of a first child and a 
second child to the mother is never identical, first, because the 
mother is older when the second child is bom, second, because of 
the presence of the first child. The relation of a second child to 
the mother is never quite the same if the first is a brother as it is if 
it is a sister, and so on. These variations may be almost random 
within certain status-groups, and their consequences thus "iron 
out," but they nevertheless produce differences of result for people 
who are, broadly, being socialized for the same adult roles. There 
is also, thirdly, the fact that the individual idiosyncrasies of the 
socializing agents enter in. It is the concrete reciprocal role rela- 
tionship to the particular person in the particular situation which 
influences the learning process, and this may be more or less "typi- 
cal," no two cases are absolutely identical. 

It must be kept in mind that a personality is a distinctive action 
system with its own focus of organization in the living organism 



[ 230 ] The Learning of Social Role-Ex'pectations 

and its own functional imperatives. Given the initial diversity of 
genetic constitution, plus the diversity of situational influences, 
including the combination or role-interactions, it would be strictly 
impossible for socialization, even in a relatively uniform milieu, in 
terms of major differentiations of social structure, to produce a 
strictly uniform product. The diversity of personality structures of 
those occupying the same status in the social structure, which is 
one of the best attested facts of clinical observation, is thus not 
fortuitous but is fundamentally grounded in the nature of the rela- 
tions between personality and the social system. The two systems 
of action are inextricably bound together, but they not only are not, 
they cannot he identical in structure or in the process of func- 
tioning. 

This diversity of personality structures relative to the role struc- 
ture of the social system implies that we cannot rely on the building 
up of basic personality structures alone to explain the fundamental 
motivational processes of social systems. There are, it would seem, 
three further places we must seek. The first of these is to the 
capacity of the individual to make rational adaptations to the 
exigencies of his situation. This capacity is clearly along with 
genetic endowment a product of the processes of socialization in 
which identifications and value-acquisition will have played a prom- 
inent part. Once given the value-orientation patterns of the person- 
ality as internalized these processes of rational adaptation are not 
theoretically problematical to the sociologist and will not be further 
treated here. 

Second we must look for additional mechanisms of socialization 
than the acquisition of basic value-orientations as sketched above, 
and third, where motivation to deviance exists, for mechanisms of 
social control. The latter will be deferred to the following chapter, 
but before approaching the former a few further remarks may be 
made about types of basic personality structure and their relations 
to the distribution of variations from them. 

The facts concerning the nature of the acquisition of value- 
orientations, which we have reviewed, make it quite clear that the 
empirically observed diversity of concrete personality types cannot, 
relative to the dominant value-pattern system of the society or sub- 
system of it, vary at random. The point of reference for analyzing 



Basic Personality Structure [ 2,31 ] 

the distribution will, of course, have to be the relevant institutional- 
ized pattern-type. This, it is to be remembered, will always be 
differentiated by sex role. The "modal personality type" for a social 
system or sub-system then will be that which predisposes to con- 
formity with the major role-expectations of the sex role patterns in 
that part of the society, will be that is, the type which, in personal- 
ity terms, is most congruous with these expectations. 

The variability from this modal type may be, in principle, ana- 
lyzed with respect to any one or any combination of the pattern 
variables. Where the modal type is achievement-oriented some 
individuals may incline to passivity; where it is also universalistically 
oriented some may, while retaining the achievement-orientation, 
incline to particularism and so on. Hence the permutations and 
combinations of Table 2 should be kept in mind for reference 
purposes in this type of analysis. The strength of the socialization 
mechanisms is, however, sufficiently great so that it would seem 
very improbable that the completely antithetical types would be as 
common as those which varied from the modal type with respect to 
one, or possibly two, of the variables. 

In addition to this general consideration, however, something 
can be said about specific factors which would tend to influence 
the distribution of more or less variant^ types. Of these, three may 
be mentioned. First, the source of the deviation from the modal 
type may have been an identification with a model alternative to 
that which might be regarded as normal. Of course in these terms 
there are many different shadings possible because of the diversity 
of concrete adult personalities in any child's situation. But some of 
these alternatives may be relatively definitely structured. Perhaps 
the most obvious of these possibilities is the identification with a 
model of the wrong sex, so far as sex-role orientations are concerned, 
since both sexes are so readily available and so crucially important. 
This is apt to be a highly complicated matter, with, for instance, 
connections with the problem of homosexuality. But apart from 
such considerations, the value-pattern elements in the character for 
example of the parent of opposite sex may be taken over instead of 

^ The term variant in a meaning similar to this has been used hy Florence 
Kluckhohn. Cf. "Dominant and Substitute Profiles of Cultural Orientation," 
Social Forces, May, 1950. 



[ 232 ] The Learning of Social Role-Ex'pectations 

those of the parent of the same sex. Thus in a given population one 
would expect to find that a certain proportion of the men leaned 
toward the value-patterns appropriate to the feminine role in that 
society or sub-system and vice versa. For example, in a sector of our 
own society, where universalistic-specific values are particularly 
prevalent, a minority of men might lean more in the particularistic- 
diffuse direction, hence be more inclined to assume roles primarily 
emphasizing informal organization. 

Cross-sex identification is, of course, by no means the only pos- 
sibility of finding an alternative role model. There may well be 
other, slightly variant persons of the same sex.^ Here perhaps par- 
ticularly uncles, aunts and substantially older siblings may be highly 
important if they are substantially different from the parent of the 
same sex. Also in a complex and heterogeneous society like our 
own, an identification process started in such a direction may well 
take on association with various sub-cultures within the society, 
including perhaps the ethnic. Such a society offers a rich fund of 
alternative value-patterns, often without being defined as radically 
deviant. 

The second direction in which the distribution of variant per- 
sonality types may be organized is that of the "hierarchy of regres- 
sion possibilities" discussed above. The important process here 
would not be regression itself, but the failure in the course of 
socialization to make some of the last steps successfully. This would 
seem to apply particularly to universalistic orientation trends and 
the affectively neutral-specific combination. Regression to particu- 
laristic orientations is one of the most important possibilities in a 
universalistically oriented role-system, and further "overemotional" 
types in situations which call for affective neutrality are familiar. 
A failure on these levels may, of course, be a result of failure in the 
early years to achieve a diffuse affective attachment to the mother, 
but it might be manifested in these other types of orientation con- 
text. It should be kept in mind that the relevant structure of the 
regression hierarchy will vary according to the value-orientation 
pattern in question; it is not constant for all types, not even for the 
sex roles within a social sub-system— thus the manifestation of affec- 

® Which may, of course, relative to the modal type, include the parent of the 
same sex. 



Basic Personality Structure [ 2,33 ] 

tivity by crying in certain types of situation is "childish" for a man, 
but not for a woman. It must, of course, also be kept in mind that 
we are here speaking of regression in relation to the order and con- 
ditions of acquisition of value-orientation patterns, not of object- 
attachments as such. Though the two are, of course, closely related, 
the fact that psychoanalysts particularly so often have the latter in 
mind when speaking of regression should not be a source of con- 
fusion. Indeed the failure to distinguish these two things is charac- 
teristic of much psychoanalytic thinking. The capacity, through 
generalization, to abstract a value-orientation pattern from the origi- 
nal object through identification with which it was first acquired, is 
obviously one of the most important results of successful socializa- 
tion. 

It is highly probable that no process of socialization occurs 
without an important part being played by the special mechanisms 
of defense and adjustment. But this exposition has deliberately 
attempted to abstract from such considerations in order to throw 
the operation of the mechanisms of socialization into full relief. It 
seems obvious, however, that in seeking role-models alternative to 
the parent of the same sex and in failing to attain what is for the 
role system in question the normal order of steps of value-acquisi- 
tion, that it is extremely likely that such mechanisms will be in- 
volved in the total process in important ways. Here attention will, 
however, be called to only one important aspect of their operation. 
We have seen that conformity-alienation is inherently a primary 
dimension of all interaction systems. The assumption of a role by 
the socializee means ipso facto that he comes to be faced with a 
conformity problem, and therefore the development of an alienative 
predisposition toward alter's expectations is always an immediate 
possibility. Those elements of such alienation which are built into 
the personality in the course of the elementary socialization process 
we may call the ■primary alienative (and conversely conformative) 
need-dispositions. Both the mechanisms of defense and those of 
adjustment, where such a need-disposition exists, may be various. 
These will be analyzed more fully when the problems of deviance 
and social control are taken up. But here it may merely be noted 
that alienation is always a possible product of something going 
wrong in the process of value-acquisition through identification. 



[ 234 ] The Learning of Social Role-Expectations 

It may be presumed that in the genesis of alienative need- 
dispositions the negative affect is in the first instance directed 
against the object of attachment as a person. But the phenomenon 
of interest here is the more generahzed ahenation from the value- 
patterns involved in the role-expectation. This, then, would moti- 
vate the actor to avoid conformity with these patterns, whenever 
encountered, either by withdrawal or by actively seeking a counter- 
orientation. This can be a source of motivation to seek alternative 
identifications and may also reinforce regressive tendencies. In any 
case the possibilities of primary alierxation are among the most 
important factors giving direction to the distribution of variability 
from the modal personality type. 

What will be called secondary alienation is not built into the 
primary value-orientation patterns of the personality, but is a conse- 
quence of the fact that a personality with a given value-orientation 
pattern in his character structure is faced, in a sfecific role, with 
role-expectations which are uncongenial to his need-dispositions 
and that, therefore, he is motivated to try to avoid conformity with 
them, though of course this component of his motivation may be 
outweighed by others such as a fear of the consequences of 
sanctions. 

Even without primary alienative need-dispositions the diversity 
of personality types within a given role-system is such that further 
mechanisms would be necessary in order to secure the level of uni- 
formity of behavior which is required by most roles in a social 
structure. There are three sets of facts, however, which cut down 
considerably the need for further mechanisms on the socialization 
level. These may be briefly mentioned before taking up the latter. 

First, there are the mechanisms of social control, which operate 
to secure conformity with role-expectations in spite of need-disposi- 
tions to avoid that conformity. The simplest and most obvious of 
these are the reward-punishment mechanisms which may give 
sufficient rewards for conformity and punishments for deviance to 
tip the balance in favor of conformity. This aspect of reward ajid 
punishment will, however, have to be taken up later. 

Secondly, to a widely varying degree for different roles and in 
different social systems, there is institutionalized a range of tolera- 



Basic Personality Structure [ 2.35 ] 

tion, so that conformity does not need to mean absolute uniformity 
of behavior. Put a Httle differently, along with prescriptions and 
prohibitions, there are also permissions. Very often, however, there 
is a certain relativity in the permissiveness in that there may be, as 
some anthropologists say, "preferred patterns," that is, a hierarchy 
among the permitted ones. Perhaps the most important case of this 
is that where there are differentiated levels of achievement within 
a role, as is true for example of most modem occupational roles. 
Then there will be differential rewards correlated with the differen- 
tial achievements, so that the actor whose grade of achievement is 
low, while he may not be deviant, is still "paying a price," in that he 
fails to get the higher rewards, both, for example, in money earn- 
ings and in approval. Finding his place on such an achievement 
ladder may, however, constitute a tolerable adjustment for a variant 
personality, and this is an important kind of flexibility in the rela- 
tion between the social system and the individual. Of course this is 
still more sure where the place occupied within the permitted range 
is a "matter of taste" without clear hierarchical distinctions. 

Finally, the third element of flexibility is the very important one, 
which again varies from society to society, of the existence of a 
system of alternative role-ofportunities so that there is no one set of 
role-expectations which every individual who starts at a given 
status-point must conform with or pay the cost of deviance in sanc- 
tions. There seems to be little doubt that in a complex and mobile 
society like our own, one of the major sorting-out factors between 
alternative role-opportunities is to be found in differences of the 
value-orientation patterns of different personalities. When the major 
family status factors have been taken into account, and such obvious 
performance-capacity factors as I.Q., there is still a substantial 
residual variance with respect to occupational career orientation.^® 
It seems highly probable that one of the major factors in this resid- 
ual variance is the variability of basic personality structure within 
the population concerned, which is not a function of the modal 
role-expectation patterns of their initial status. 

•^*' This has been clearly demonstrated in an unpublished study of the social 
mobility of high school students in the Boston area by S. A. Stouffer, Florence 
Kluckhohn, and the present author. 



[ 236 ] The Learning of Social Role-Exfectations 

§ THE SITUATIONAL ROLE-SPECIFICATION 
OF ORIENTATIONS 

THESE three types of mechanism of accommodation in the 
social system to the non-role-adapted diversity of personality types 
do not, however, even taken together, account for actual motivation 
to the degree of conformity w^ith role-expectations normally found 
in a stable social system. In addition to sheer rational adaptation to 
the exigencies of situations, there is still another highly important 
set of mechanisms of socialization which may be called the situa- 
tional role-specification" of orientations. 

It may be recalled that the constellation of value-orientation 
patterns, which we have called basic personality structure, has in 
particular two features. First, being defined only in pattern variable 
terms, it is extremely general. Second, the identifications out of 
which it has been constructed are early identifications, which in the 
great majority of cases are superseded before adulthood. These two 
facts are closely connected. If there are general criteria of maturity, 
one of the most important is probably the combination of the stabil- 
ity of basic orientation patterns with relative flexibility of object 
choice, and action patterns, that is, relatively high capacity for sub- 
stitution and reality testing. In this sense, as well as in the sense that 
attachments have concretely changed, it is necessary for the adult 
to become emancipated from his childhood identifications. 

But in this transition it is necessary for the actor to acquire more 
specific orientations relative to the specific situations and expecta- 
tions of his adult roles; there is a further process of socialization 
on a new level. A very important part of this consists in the 
acquisition of the more complex adult culture of sophisticated 
knowledge, technical skills, and canons of expressive orientation, 
tastes and standards of taste. It may be presumed that in detail the 
paramount learning mechanism in these acquisition processes is 
imitation, since in the higher societies the level of complexity and 
sophistication of what has to be learned is such that individual 
creativity as the frimary process is out of the question. It is, of 

^^ Specification and specificity in the present usage should not be confused 
with specificity in the pattern variable sense. The context should make the dis- 
tinction clear. 



The Situational Role-Specification of Orientations [ 237 ] 

course, above all about this complex cultural content that the proc- 
esses of formal education come to be organized. 

But this is not to say either, that identification ceases to be an 
important learning mechanism on this more mature level, or that it 
is only specific cultural content which still has to be learned. 

First let us taken an example, which will be developed more at 
length in a later chapter in other contexts. Suppose we have an 
individual in whom the general value-orientation pattern of achieve- 
ment-universalism, specificity, neutrality and collectivity-orientation 
is well established in his basic personality structure. First, as a male, 
he must learn that a man is expected, when he "grows up" to 
become the incumbent of an occupational role, to "do a job," to 
"earn his living" and very probably to support a family. He learns 
that the occupational system is hierarchically graded, and that if he 
is properly ambitious for "success" he should aim to reach one of 
the higher levels in the occupational system. We have, then, the 
connection of a highly generalized achievement-orientation with 
the much more specific, but still very generalized goal of success in 
an occupational system. 

The basic personality orientation patterns are indeed a function 
of the social system in which the individual was socialized. But 
they are too general directly to embody the specific structure of the 
situation as a complex of alternative role-opportunities or the spe- 
cific cultural definitions of what constitutes occupational success. 
The father may, in this respect, also be a highly important role 
model, but much more in terms of his specific role in the occupa- 
tional system and his specific attitudes toward his own and other 
occupations and toward the specific context of what is meant by 
success. If the father were an American physician on the one hand, 
or a Chinese gentleman-scholar on the other, it would make a very 
important difference on this level, in part at least, independendy of 
the father's significance as a primary role-model on the level previ- 
ously discussed. Resorting to an alternative role model would, on 
this level, not have quite the same significance as on the primary 
level. For example, in American society upward mobility is to a 
degree institutionalized. If a father in the lower status levels is 
ambitious for his son, and other conditions are given, he might 



[ 238 ] The Learning of Social Role-Exfectations 

well be a highly appropriate primary role model and a completely 
inappropriate secondary role model for the son. 

The degree of specificity of the orientation may be still further 
increased. Within this rather general orientation to occupational 
success the individual in question may incline toward a professional 
career and within that toward the medical profession. In this case 
he must, of course, orient himself to an extremely complex process 
of formal training, but also toward the definition of the specific role 
of physician (and the many sub- types within it), to what success in 
medicine or the relevant branch means, and the like. 

Or we may take a different example. A need-disposition for 
diffuse affective attachments is presumably a component of the basic 
personality structure of all normal people in our society. But besides 
this orientation structure, much needs to be learned for adjustment, 
for example, to the role of marriage in our type of society. The pre- 
disposition to seek an object of the opposite sex and to fuse erotic 
gratifications in the diffuse attachment may be regarded as given in 
the basic personality structure. But the status of marriage, the re- 
sponsibility for children, the standards with respect to an acceptable 
home, the mores wdth respect to the style of life of a married couple, 
and all the rest are not directly derivable from the basic personality 
structure. Certain patterns in basic personality structure are, of 
course, important prerequisites for a successful marriage, but the 
specific definition of the role and its specific values is another matter. 

Every society then has the mechanisms which have been called 
situational specifications of role-orientations and which operate 
through secondary identifications and imitation. Through them are 
learned the specific role-values and symbol-systems of that particular 
society or sub-system of it, the level of expectations which are to be 
concretely implemented in action in the actual role. 

Relative to the orientations of basic personality structure these 
are much more specific. But they are generalized in another sense in 
that they inculcate definitions of expectation which apply to all 
incumbents of the ty^e of role in question in the particular social 
system. Thus this set of mechanisms has two primary functions. 
First is the specification of more generalized motivational orienta- 
tion patterns to the point where they connect up with the suffi- 
ciently concrete definition of the situation in the actual social 



The Situational RoleSfecification of Orientations [ 239 ] 

system actually to motivate conformity with concrete role-expecta- 
tions. Tlie second is, in combination with the system of sanctions 
and mechanisms of social control, to counterbalance the variability 
of basic personality structure, so that a level of uniformity emerges 
which would not be possible were concrete adult role-orientations a 
simple and direct manifestation of the basic personality structure.^^ 
Of course this second function, the motivation of uniformity of role- 
behavior, is only possible because there is an important range of 
flexibility in the average personality. The "determination" of char- 
acter in the early process of basic personality formation is not a pre- 
determination of all future behavior in detail, but only of a basic 
directional orientation. There is still considerable plasticity so that, 
when allowance has been made for ranges of toleration and alterna- 
tives of role-opportunity it is only those toward the extremes of the 
range of variability of basic-personality structure who are not variant 
hut deviant, in the sense that their need-dispositions not merely 
make it a bit harder to conform, but psychologically impossible. Of 
course this line between the variant and the deviant is, in most 
societies, by no means rigid and many factors of post-childhood ex- 
perience may throw the balance one way or the other. There are also 
mild and/or temporary deviances which do not place the individual 
in an irrevocably deviant role, but may afford some relief from the 
pressures to conformity. 

It is to be presumed that with respect to the role-specification 
mechanisms as with respect to those of value-acquisition, there is, 
in a given social role-system, a hierarchy of learning stages. Thus 
from a variety of points of view in our society experience in the 
course of formal education is to be regarded as a series of apprentice- 

^^ It may be noted that neglect of such considerations is one of the most 
serious shortcomings many of the views current in the "Culture and Personahty" 
school of thought where there is an attempt to connect culture patterns and child 
training practices in such a direct way. First, this view does not allow for the 
fundamental fact of the variability of basic personahty structures as a direct result 
of socialization in the same "culture" or structured role system. Secondly, how- 
ever, it fails to see the significance of the second great class of socialization mechan- 
isms. It tends to think of the role-behavior of the adult as the direct "acting out" 
of need-dispositions on the basic personality structure level, thus treating institu- 
tions apart from the details of child-training practices as epiphenomena. This view 
is implicit in Kardiner's concept of the distinction between "primary" and "sec- 
ondary" institutions. 



[ 240 ] The Learning of Social Role-Ex]f)ectations 

ships for adult occupational roles, even apart from the degrees to 
which the actual content of instruction, e.g., arithmetic and linguistic 
skills, can be direcdy used there. Thus to a much higher degree than 
in the family, in school the child learns to adjust himself to a specific- 
universalistic-achievement system. He is brought into explicit com- 
petition with his classmates, and his standing with respect to the 
achievement orientation pattern is overtly symbolized in grades, as 
well as in the other rewards and punishments administered by the 
teacher, and in her attitudes. So far as the child accepts the role- 
expectations of the school system, attainment of good marks, which 
is one form of success, becomes what may be called a situationally 
generalized goal. This is a point at which a great many possible 
motivational factors may converge. One child may become highly 
interested in the subject-matter he is learning itself, another more 
interested in the favorable attitudes of the teacher, still a third in 
surpassing his classmates. But these different motivations may all 
converge on a common direction of actual behavior, namely the striv- 
ing for marks. This illustrates how the social system operates to 
socialize different personality orientations so that in spite of the 
diversity of their basic personalities, they may still fulfill the same 
set of role-expectations, at least within the limits of tolerance. Of 
course it must not be forgotten that there are those who fail to fulfill 
these expectations altogether. But that is another story. 

There is, then, a sense in which the school system is a microcosm 
of the adult occupational world, and experience in it is a main field 
of operation of the second stage mechanisms of socialization, the 
specification of role-orientations. There are, of course, a whole series 
of stages within this before full adult status is achieved. Here only 
one further aspect will be mentioned, that of the place of new 
identifications. It seems probable that the predominance of women 
teachers in the early grades in American school systems is important 
not merely because of the fact that on comparable levels of training 
and technical competence they can be secured to work for less pay 
than men, and thus save economy-minded school boards and* tax- 
payers money. There is probably considerable significance in the role 
of the woman teacher as an object for identification, obviously a 
significance connected with the process of emancipation from earlier 
attachments to the mother. 



The Situational Role-Specification of Orientations [ 24 1 ] 

It is suggested that this importance Hes in a dehcate balance be- 
tween similarities to and diflFerences from the mother. The fact of 
being a woman and of having a kindly, protective attitude toward 
the children is the most important similarity. A woman can by and 
large permit herself greater tenderness and solicitude than can a 
man. But there are also striking differences. The teacher is respon- 
sible for a class of some twenty or more children. They are almost of 
an age and therefore much more directly in competition with each 
other than siblings are, even in large families. The teacher cannot 
give each one the solicitude that would be normal in a mother. 
Moreover the relation is focused on the specific content of the cur- 
riculum; it is not general supervision and care, and it is sharply 
restricted to the school period. It is much more universalistic 
in content and specific in focus than the relation to the mother. 
Moreover the child does not have the same level of rights by ascrip- 
tion that he has vis-a-vis his mother; he can more readily be held to 
achievement standards. 

We know that dependence on the mother is particularly intense 
in the American kinship system, and we also know that emancipa- 
tion from that dependence is particularly important for the adult in 
an achievement-oriented individualistic society. Too abrupt and 
drastic a transition might involve intolerable strain with neurotic 
consequences. The woman teacher as an identification figure may 
therefore perform a very important function in American sociali- 
zation. 

To connect with the mother it is significant that the teacher be a 
woman; but it may be equally important that she should not be too 
much like the mother, or there would not be any new element in the 
pattern of her influence on the child. Perhaps this situation has 
something to do with the prevalence of the "irrational prejudice" 
against married women as teachers. Symbolically at least, since they 
are or should be mothers, for teachers to be married women might 
be dimly felt to be too close an assimilation between the mother 
role and the teacher role. Perhaps the traditional American "old 
maid" school teacher has her functions. 

Finally, it may be remarked that a very important step in respect 
to identifications as well as otherwise comes with the transition to 
"secondary" education, now usually in Junior High School. This is 



[ 242 ] The Learning of Social Role-Ex'pectations 

the breaking up of the one class per school grade into a different class 
—and teacher— for each subject. Then the child no longer has the 
one identification figure for his school life, he can no longer speak of 
"my teacher" but only of "my English teacher" and "my science 
teacher." This is another big step toward the acquisition of uni- 
versalistic orientations, in that the focus is on competence in the 
subject matter rather than the more diffuse, general, and hence 
parent-like superior knowledge and standing of the teacher. The 
teacher approaches the role of a technical expert, not of a general 
prestige and authority figure. It is perhaps significant, that it is at 
this point that the American child generally first encounters men as 
teachers to a significant degree. 

It should be clear that socialization does not in this sense cease 
with the attainment of adult status. Societies differ a great deal of 
course in the degree to which they call upon their members for 
major role changes after the childhood period, but many, like our 
own, do so to a considerable extent. Even to take one nearly uni- 
versal example, namely marriage, the content of the role is con- 
tinually changing, partly as a function of the individual's own age 
and that of his spouse. The childless stage of marriage means in fact 
a different role from that which is assumed with the advent of 
children. The number and ages of the children change the char- 
acter of the role, as of course happens drastically in our society when 
the "stage of the empty nest" is reached. Similarly in those occupa- 
tional roles which have a typical "career line," the expectations shift 
quite substantially as new stages in the career are reached. Here one 
of the most important problems of adjustment is that concerned 
with starting a career in a position of low responsibility and in the 
course of it coming to assume large responsibilities. In one phase it 
is a shift from subordination to many people to superordination over 
many. It is well known that such shifts place considerable strains 
upon individuals, but it remains a fact that many accomplish them 
successfully; they can hardly do so without undergoing a com- 
plicated learning process. 

Finally, many societies are involved in processes of social change. 
Such changes may, even over the span of active adult life, be con- 
siderable, so that the expectations of an early period must be con- 
siderably readjusted to meet the requirements of a later one. Here 



The Profit Motive [ 243 ] 

again the process can be successful only through the operation of 
learning mechanisms in the context of socialization, of further role- 
specification of orientations. 

§ AN EXAMPLE: THE "PROFIT MOTIVE" 

IN CONCLUSION we may develop a somewhat fuller illus- 
tration of the operation and functions of the mechanisms of situa- 
tional role-specification of orientations by examining certain aspects 
of the place of the so-called "profit motive" in modem liberal socie- 
ties. The popular term is placed in quotation marks because in the 
light of the present theoretical analysis of role-motivations it is apt to 
be somewhat misleading. Some psychologists have spoke of a pri- 
mary acquisitive drive or instinct. Whatever the major orientation 
pattern of the modem "businessman" may be, it is not in any simple 
sense a manifestation of such a drive. 

The profit motive is rather, in the above sense, a situationally 
generalized goal which is learned in the course of what has been 
called the secondary socialization process. It is not general to human 
beings, but is very specifically culture-bound to certain types of roles 
in specific social systems. It is not bound to any particular basic 
personality type,^^ though in certain respects it is certainly more 
congenial to some than to others. Its situational generalization, how- 
ever, has precisely the function of making it a possible common 
orientation of action deriving from a diversity of "psychological" 
motivational roots, and combinations of them. 

The structural focus of the orientation to profit is, of course, the 
phenomenon of instrumental exchange, which, as we have seen, 
has some place in every social system. Since there is in the structure 
of the situation inherent motivation to secure relatively advan- 
tageous terms in exchanges— not to be so oriented in any sense could 
be compatible only with the extreme of masochism, or of drastic 
other worldliness, and even there one might say that the masochist 
sought advantage in what others considered to be disadvantageous. 

^' One of the cruder versions of the idea that it does manifest such a type is 
the conception of some psychoanalytic amateur sociologists that "capitalism" is a 
manifestation of the "anal character." There is certainly a grain of truth in this 
idea, but hardly more. It completely overlooks the focal problems of the organiza- 
tion of the social system. 



[ 244 ] ^^^ Learning of Social Role-Expectations 

In any case, then, in this most general sense the profit motive is 
"endemic" in all social relationship systems. 

However, differentiation of the instrumental complex, its segre- 
gation from diffuse solidarities and above all the development of 
money, enormously extends the range of relevance of exchange. The 
availability of money as a generalized medium of exchange makes it 
possible through the securing of advantageous monetary terms to 
enhance the means available to gratify all need-dispositions with 
reference to which purchasable means may be important. In a 
market economy like ours the range of monetary purchasability is 
extremely wide. It is particularly important to be clear that the 
relevance of this range of exchangeability has virtually nothing to 
do with what is ordinarily considered the "ethical quality" of the 
goals to which monetary resources are a means. Thus every re- 
ligious movement seeks to "raise money," that is to make a profit, 
for its particular purposes, just as much as the man who wants to 
bet his earnings on the races or to drown his sorrows in drink. To 
have more money rather than less is simply, with only a few ex- 
ceptions, to be in a more advantageous position to realize whatever 
goals the actor may have in mind. In this sense the "profit motive" is 
nothing but a primary aspect of what may be called "practical 
rationality." 

But, of course, this is not all. Means-objects inevitably acquire 
symbolic significance, and the quantifiability of money as a pos- 
session means that money lends itself peculiarly to the symbolization 
of prestige. Since it is useful, in one sense its possession is inevitably 
a reward as well as being a facility for the attainment of other re- 
wards. Hence money, income, or wealth, i.e., resources convertible 
into or measurable in money terms, are, in an economy with a high 
development of monetary exchange, an important reward symbol. 
As such profit may be a measure of otherwise valued achievement 
acquisition, or it may be a direct goal of success-striving, so that 
other forms of achievement content become instrumental to mone- 
tary gain. 

Further, there are complex relations between money as a reward 
symbol and other components of the reward system, money as a 
symbol of achievement being one. Another obvious one is the con- 
nection between monetary resources and the style of life, in such a 



The Profit Motive [ 2.45 ] 

way that money is the means of purchasing valued items of the style 
of life, but conversely, the display of style of life items may be a way 
of telling the public that one has a large income— the case which 
Veblen called "conspicuous consumption." Incidentally among cer- 
tain Bohemian groups this relationship is inverted, the style of life 
is, among other things, meant to advertise that the actor is con- 
temptuous of the "flesh pots" of the bourgeois world, that he accepts 
and glorifies "honorable poverty." 

Whatever the range of variability with respect to these symbolic 
significances of money income and earnings, there is in a developed 
market economy— even in socialism— as we have noted, a strong 
tendency for integration of the income scale with the general 
prestige scale of the social system. This aspect must in turn be inte- 
grated with certain possibilities of orientation to monetary gain, 
which are inherent in the structure of the situation in a system of 
instrumental division of labor. The following possibilities may be 
noted: 

i) The interest in gain may be a purely personal orientation, 
the actor merely taking advantage of an opportunity presented in 
the situation. Such opportunities necessarily arise in a money 
economy. 

2) It may become a feature of an institutionalized role for an in- 
dividual who is as such a unit in an ecological complex of market 
relationships. There are two principal sub-types of this, a) where 
he is an artisan or independent professional practitioner who has to 
engage in financial transactions for disposal and acquisition of 
facilities, but these are conditional to his main occupational goal 
which is to "produce" or to "provide service"; and b) where he is 
an independent "businessman," e.g., a merchant, whose role is 
institutionally defined as to "make money." 

3) It may be orientation in a membership role within a collec- 
tivity. In any collectivity, most roles are not primarily oriented to 
profit-making; they are oriented rather to cooperation in the sense 
of Chapter III. Cases would be professional technicians or ordinary 
"workers." Only certain representative roles, which are concerned 
with mediation of the affairs of the collectivity vis-a-vis the outside 
situation can be oriented to profit. These again are of two main 
types, a) In a collectivity which as a unit is not oriented to profit, 



[ 246 ] The Learning of Social Role-Ex'pectations 

the problems of exchange for disposal, remuneration and provision 
of facilities still remain. Roles may be specialized relative to these 
functions. When it becomes an obligation of the role to secure 
advantageous terms on behalf of the collectivity, the incumbent is 
oriented to profit. Examples would be the treasurer of a university 
or a hospital, b) In a collectivity, which as a unit is oriented to 
profit, a "business firm," profit has primacy as the paramount obliga- 
tion of the top executive roles. But in both these cases profit-making 
becomes the role-obligation of a role on behalf of the collectivity; it 
is not orientation to "personal gain" in the usual sense. 

The question of the orientation of the individual actor to the 
collectivity in which he participates presents still a further structural 
aspect of the problem. He must secure his personal remuneration 
and must settle terms with the collectivity, with respect to the 
assumption or continuation of his role within it. This is, of course, 
the place where fersonal orientation to profit can operate in relation 
to organizations in the occupational world. There is naturally a 
connection between the "value" of a man's services to the collec- 
tivity and the terms he is able to secure for his services to it. But the 
connection is seldom simple and direct, and certainly when he 
occupies one of the above two types of roles he generally does not 
put his earnings on behalf of the firm or organization directly into 
his own pocket. 

There is, thus, a whole range of possible significances of orien- 
tation to financial "gain" in a market economy. But the most im- 
portant common denominator of these is not motivational in the 
usual sense, it is not a "propensity of human nature." It is, rather, 
an aspect of the structuring of the situation of action. It concerns 
a highly generalized mode of action in which a highly generalized 
class of advantages is to be sought, which funnels all manner of 
motivations into a common channel. On the level of structure there 
is a wide variety of difFerent role elements which are articulated in 
different ways into the monetary market system. Tliese are, first, 
the purchasing interests of "consumers," a purely "instrumental" 
interest. Second, the disposal interests and facility-procuring in- 
terests of independent "producers," though thev may be only sec- 
ondarily oriented to "making money." Third, the interests of em- 
ployed persons in securing income through the contract of employ- 



The Profit Motive [ 247 ] 

ment. Fourth, the orientation of independent individuals to making 
money "on their own." Fifth, the role of conducting market trans- 
actions on behalf of an organization, though the organization is not 
primarily profit-oriented and sixth, the corresponding type of role 
where the organization is primarily profit-oriented. Only four and 
six are in any usual sense "capitalistic" or "profit making" orien- 
tations. 

But in addition to these aspects of the problem we have the 
symbolic place of money income in the reward system of the society, 
as a symbol of achievement and of success, and of course as a means 
of exercising power. 

We can speak properly of individuals as oriented to profit, then, 
so far as by socialization they have become integrated within this 
system of role-expectations and situational opportunities. Within 
any given role in the system there is room for a variety of different 
nuances of personal orientation, of different attitudes toward money 
in each of the many different respects in which it enters into the 
structure of the situation. But as the basis of a uniformity of the 
orientation of action the profit motive is a situationally generalized 
goal, its generality comes from its place in the definition of the situ- 
ation, and the integration of this with the individual's orientations, 
not from any pre-socialization features of the motivation of the 
individual. 

It is, furthermore, not of the same order of generality as the 
orientation-directions which are grounded in the elementary struc- 
ture of the interaction relationship, such as the need-dispositions for 
affection, for security or for a sense of adequacy. It is precisely this 
difference which justifies treating the profit motive as a "secondary" 
product of the socialization process. There are many societies where, 
even in the most general non-monetary sense, orientation to favor- 
able exchange terms has a relatively minimal significance. For it to 
acquire a significance remotely approaching that in the modern in- 
dustrial type of society, even in its socialist version, means that rela- 
tively specific features of the specific social structure have to be in- 
corporated into the orientation of the personality on the secondary 
socialization level. There has to be a role-specification of orienta- 
tions going far beyond the most generalized basic personality orien- 
tations of the primary socialization level, and to a certain extent 



[ 248 J The Learning of Social Role-Expectations 

cutting across tliem. It is by such mechanisms that motivation 
adequate to the more detailed role expectations of a social system, 
perhaps particularly those involved in the adaptive structures which 
are not direct manifestations of the primary value-orientations, are 
built up. 

The above, as has several times been noted, treats only one half 
of the problem of motivational process in the social system. The 
other half is the analysis in motivational terms of the sources of 
tendencies to deviance, and the mechanisms of their control. To 
this we now turn. 




DEVIANT BEHAVIOR 
AND THE MECHANISMS OF SOCIAL CONTROL 



IT HAS been evident from the beginning of this work 
that the dimension of conformity-deviance was inherent in and 
central to the whole conception of social action and hence of social 
systems. One aspect, that is, of the common cultural patterns which 
are part of every system of social interaction, is always normative. 
There is an expectation of conformity with the requirements of the 
pattern, if it be only in observing the conventions of a communica- 
tion pattern, for example, by speaking intelligibly. The comple- 
mentarity of expectations, on which such great stress has been laid, 
implies the existence of common standards of what is "acceptable," 
or in some sense approved behavior. In the preceding chapter we 
have dealt with the processes by which motivational structures re- 
quired for behavior in conformity with such normative social ex- 
pectations are built up. We must now turn to the other side of the 
coin, the processes by which resistances to conformity with social 
expectations develop, and the mechanisms by which these tenden- 
cies are or tend to be counteracted in social systems. 

It is a cardinal principle of the present analysis that all motiva- 
tional processes are processes in the personalities of individual actors. 
The processes by which the motivational structure of an individual 
personality gets to be what it is are, however, mainly social processes, 
involving the interaction of ego with a plurality of alters. Thus the 
sectors of the motivation of the individual which are concerned with 
his motivation to deviant behavior, are the outcome of his processes 

249 



[ 250 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

of social interaction in the past and the whole problem must there- 
fore be approached in social interaction terms. In the analysis of 
deviance as well as of socialization we must focus on the interactive 
processes as it influences the orientation of the individual actor in 
his situation and in orientation to the situation itself, including 
above all the significant social objects, and to the normative patterns 
which define the expectations of his roles. 

Deviance and the mechanisms of social control may be defined 
in two ways, according to whether the individual actor or the inter- 
active system is taken as the point of reference. In the first context 
deviance is a motivated tendency for an actor to behave in contra- 
vention of one or more institutionalized normative patterns, while 
the mechanisms of social control are the motivated processes in the 
behavior of this actor, and of the others with whom he is in inter- 
action, by which these tendencies to deviance tend in turn to be 
counteracted. In the second context, that of the interactive system, 
deviance is the tendency on the part of one or more of the com- 
ponent actors to behave in such a way as to disturb the equilibrium 
of the interactive process (whether a static or a moving equilibrium). 
Deviance therefore is defined by its tendency to result either in 
change in the state of the interactive system, or in re-equilibration by 
counteracting forces, the latter being the mechanisms of social con- 
trol. It is presumed here that such an equilibrium always implies 
integration of action with a system of normative patterns which are 
more or less institutionalized. 

It is clearly the conception of deviance as a disturbance of the 
equilibrium of the interactive system, which is the more important 
perspective for the analysis of social systems. But we must still be 
quite clear that it is essential to be able to follow this analysis from 
the level of ascertaining uniformities in the processes of change in 
the structure of the social system, to that of analyzing the relevant 
motivational processes in the personalities of the individual actors. 
Hence there is always also a reference to the first context implied. 

It should also be made clear that there is a certain relativity in 
the conceptions of conformity and deviance. These are concepts 
which refer to problems of the integration and malintegration of 
social systems and sub-systems. It is therefore not possible to make a 



The Genesis of Deviant Motivation [ 2,5 1 ] 

judgment of deviance or lack of it without specific reference to the 
system or sub-system to which it applies. The structure of normative 
patterns in any but the simplest sub-system is always intricate and 
usually far from fully integrated; hence singling out one such 
pattern without reference to its interconnections in a system of 
patterns can be very misleading, e.g., the judgment that a person 
who tells a "white lie" as a way out of a conflict situation is a "dis- 
honest person." Similarly the concrete individual actor never acts in 
one role only, but in a plurality of roles and situations, with complex 
possibilities of variation in the expectations and tensions to which 
they subject the actor. Furthermore, there is the problem of the time 
sector which is taken as relevant to the analysis of a system. Actions 
are mortised together in time sequence as well as in other respects, 
and conflicts can focus on time-allocation as well as on the con- 
flicting claims of diff"erent interaction-partners. 

These are all problems of the first importance and must be made 
as clear and explicit as possible. Nevertheless the fact remains that 
all social action is normatively oriented, and that the value- 
orientations embodied in these norms must to a degree be common 
to the actors in an institutionally integrated interactive system. It is 
this circumstance which makes the problem of conformity and de- 
viance a major axis of the analysis of social systems. The fact that in 
its working out it is highly complex, does not imply that it can be 
safely ignored or cannot be satisfactorily analyzed. The crucial 
significance of this problem focus derives as we have seen from two 
fundamental considerations; first that the frame of reference of 
action makes the concept of orientation a primary focus of analysis 
and second, the fact that we are dealing with the "boundary- 
maintaining" type of system, which defines what we must mean by 
the concept of integration of the system. 

§ INTERACTION AND THE GENESIS 
OF DEVIANT MOTIVATION 

LET US go back then to the fundamental paradigm of 
social interaction including the assumption, stated at the beginning 
of the last chapter, that a stably established interactive process, that 
is, one in equilibrium, tends to continue unchanged. We will fur- 
ther assume that ego and alter have, in their interaction, developed 



[ 252 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

mutual cathectic attachments to each other, so that they are sensitive 
to each other's attitudes, i.e., attitudes are fundamental as sanctions, 
and that the interaction is integrated with a normative pattern of 
value-orientation, both ego and alter, that is, have internalized the 
value-pattern. We have stated many times that such an interaction 
system is characterized by the complementarity of expectations, the 
behavior and above all the attitudes of alter conform with the ex- 
pectations of ego and vice versa. 

This paradigm provides the setting for the analysis of the genesis 
of motivation to deviance. Let us assume that, from whatever source, 
a disturbance is introduced into the system, of such a character that 
what alter does leads to a frustration, in some important respects, 
of ego's expectation-system vis-a-vis alter. This failure of the fulfill- 
ment of ego's expectations places a "strain" upon him, that is, 
presents him with a problem of "adjustment" in the terms which we 
have used. There are always, we may presume, three terms to this 
problem. First ego's expectations in the interaction system are part 
of his own system of need-dispositions which in some sense press 
for gratification. Second, these expectations are organized to include 
an attachment to alter as a cathected object, and third the value- 
pattern governing the relationship has been internalized and viola- 
tion of its prescriptions is directly a frustration of some of ego's need- 
dispositions. In so far as the adjustment problem is "serious," in that 
alter's disturbing behavior is more than momentary and in that it 
touches some strategic area of ego's orientation system, ego will be 
forced to restructure his orientation in one or more of these three 
respects. He can first restructure his own need-dispositions, by 
inhibition and by one or more of the mechanisms of defense, such 
as simply repressing the needs which are no longer gratified. He can, 
secondly, seek to transfer his cathexis to a new object and relieve the 
strain that way and, finally, he can renounce or seek to redefine the 
value-orientation pattern with which alter is no longer conforming. 

In any one or more of these three directions there may be resolu- 
tion of the strain by a successful learning process; ego may learn 
to inhibit his need-disposition, he may cathect a new object which 
will fulfill his expectations, or he may extinguish or alter the value- 
pattern. This would be the obverse of alter abandoning his changed 
behavior. In either case equilibrium would be re-established, in one 



The Genesis of Deviant Motivation [ 253 ] 

case with a changed state of the system, in the other with a restora- 
tion of the old state. 

But another outcome is possible, and in many cases very likely. 
That is that, in one or more of the above three respects, a "compro- 
mise" solution should be reached. Our primary interest is not in the 
internal integration of the personality but in ego's adjustment to 
social objects and to normative patterns. Hence first, ego may not 
abandon his cathexis of alter by substituting an alternative object, 
but may retain his cathexis, but this cathexis can no longer be 
"undisturbed." Ego must have some reaction to the frustration 
which alter has imposed upon him, some resentment or hostility.^ In 
other words the cathectic orientation acquires an ambivalent char- 
acter, there is still the need to love or admire alter, but there is also 
the product of his frustration in the form of negative and in some 
sense hostile attitudes toward alter. In so far as this happens of 
course ego is put in an emotional conflict in his relation to alter. 
Similarly, the integration of ego's expectations with the value-pat- 
tern has been disturbed by alter's failure to conform with it, the 
pattern may be too strongly internalized for ego to be able to aban- 
don it and accept one in conformity with alter's behavior. Here 
again ego may develop an ambivalent attitude structure, at the same 
time adhering to the normative pattern and resenting the "cost" of 
this adherence in that it involves him in conflict with alter and with 
aspects of his own personality. 

There are many complications involved in the possibilities of 
handling the strains inherent in such an ambivalent motivational 
structure. For our purpose, however, they may be related to two 
fundamental alternatives. The first is repression of one side of the 
ambivalent structure so that only the other side receives overt ex- 
pression. If it is the negative side which is repressed, ego will con- 
tinue to be attached to alter and/or to be motivated to conform with 
the normative pattern in question. If the positive side is repressed, 
conversely ego will tend to abandon his attachment to alter, in the 
sense of giving it overt expression, and to refuse to conform with the 
normative pattern. The second fundamental possibility is for ego to 
try to find a way to gratify both sides of his ambivalent motivation 

^ Another very important phenomenon of reaction to strain is the production 
o£ phantasies. 



[ 254 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

Presumably in the same concrete relationship this is impossible^ 
since the two are in conflict. But in a more extensive and complex 
interaction system there may be such possibilities either because 
contexts and occasions can be segregated, or because it is possible 
to find alternative objects for one or both sides of the need- 
disposition structure. This latter possibility will become very im- 
portant to the discussion of the social structuring of deviance later 
in this chapter. But for the present let us adhere to the simpler case. 

The negative component of such an ambivalent motivational 
structure relative to a system of complementary expectations will be 
called an alienative need-disposition, the positive component, a con- 
formative need-disposition. It should be noted that in these theo- 
retical terms alienation is conceived always to be part of an ambiv- 
alent motivational structure, while conformity need not be. Where 
there is no longer any attachment to the object and/or internaliza- 
tion of the normative pattern, the attitude is not alienation but 
indifference. Both social object and pattern have become only 
neutral objects of the situation which are no longer a focus of ego's 
cathectic need-system. The conflict in such a case would have been 
solved by full resolution, through substitution of a new object, 
through inhibition or extinction of the need-disposition, and/or 
through internalization of a new normative pattern. 

Where alienative motivation is present, but the conformative 
component is dominant over the alienative, we may speak of com- 
'pulsive conformity, where on the other hand the alienative com- 
ponent is dominant over the conformative, we may speak of com-pul- 
sive alienation. The psychological reasons for using these terms are 
not far to seek. The essential point is that ego is subject not only to 
a strain in his relations with alter, but to an internal conflict in his 
own need-disposition system. Precisely because he has a negative 
feeling toward alter, but at the same time a powerful need to retain 
his relation to alter and to the normative pattern, he must "defend 
himself" against his need to express his negative feelings, with the 
attendant risk of disturbing his relation to alter still further or prd- 
voking him to retaliatory action, in the more extreme case, of losing 

^ It is of course possible within limits through time allocation. At certain 
times ego's resentment may break through into hostile acts (including verbal) 
and the positive attitude then regain ascendancy. 



The Genesis of Deviant Motivation [ 2-55 ] 

alter. This is, indeed, in relation to social interaction relationships, 
the basis of the defense mechanism of reaction formation. The 
pattern is to "accentuate the positive," to be compulsively careful to 
conform with what ego interprets as alter's expectations (which by 
institutionalization are also his own) so as to minimize the risk of 
disturbing the relationship still further. 

Conversely, if the alienative component is dominant, the fact 
that the attachment to alter as a person and to the normative pattern 
is still a fundamental need, means that ego must defend himself 
against the tendency to express this need-disposition. He must there- 
fore not only express his negative reaction, but be doubly sure that 
the conformative element does not gain the upper hand and risk his 
having to inhibit the negative again. Therefore his refusal to con- 
form with alter's expectations becomes compulsive. This defense 
against the repressed component is in both cases the primary basis of 
resistance against the abandonment of "symptoms," even though 
they involve ego in serious negative sanctions in his social rela- 
tionships. 

It is here that we have the focus of the well-known vicious circle 
in the genesis of deviant behavior patterns, whether they be neurotic 
or psycho-somatic illness, criminality or others. It may be presumed 
that the reaction of ego to the change in alter's behavior, which re- 
sulted in resort to adjustive and defensive mechanisms involving 
ambivalence, will be in some way complementary to the change alter 
introduced. For example, alter, instead of recognizing the merit of 
a piece of work ego has done, may have shown marked disapproval^ 
which ego felt to be in contravention of the value-pattern with re- 
spect to competent achievement shared by both. Ego reacted to this 
with resentment which, however, he repressed and became compul- 
sively anxious to secure alter's approval. This compulsive element in 
ego's motivation makes him excessively "demanding" in his relation 
to alter. He both wants to be approved, to conform, and his need for 
approval is more difficult to satisfy because of his anxiety that alter 
may not give it. This in turn has its effect on alter. Whatever his 
original motivation to withhold the approval ego ex-pected, ego has 
now put him in a position where it is more difficult than it was be- 
fore for him to fulfill ego's expectations; the same level of approval 
which would have sufficed before is no longer sufficient. Unless a 



[ 256 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

mechanism of social control is operating, then, the tendency will be 
to drive alter to approve even less, rather than more as ego hopes. 
This will still further increase the strain on ego and intensify his 
resentment, hence, if the alienative component does not break 
through, it will add to the compulsiveness of his motivation to seek 
approval through conformity with alter's expectations. The pressure 
of ego's conflict may also of course lead to cognitive distortion so 
that he thinks that alter's expectations are more extreme than they 
really are, and that therefore he is being held to intolerable 
standards. 

This is the essential structure of the generation of cumulative 
motivation to deviance through the interaction of complementary 
ambivalences in the motivational systems of ego and alter. Of course 
this is a highly simplified and abstract paradigm. The "direct line" 
of development of the vicious circle could not empirically proceed 
far without some modification for two sets of reasons. First the need- 
dispositions of ego and alter which are the focus of the developing 
conflict are only parts of a complicated system of need-dispositions 
in the personalities of each. The alterations in these parts growing 
out of the interaction process would lead to repercussions in the rest 
of the personality systems which would modify the development of 
the interaction itself. Secondly, the interaction of ego and alter on 
which we have focused is only a sector of a larger system of social 
interaction which involves other actors than ego and alter, and per- 
haps their interaction in other roles. These complications must duly 
be taken into account, and are of course extremely important for the 
mechanisms of social control. But the vicious circle in the interaction 
of two actors is the fundamental paradigm of the genesis of the 
motivation for deviant behavior. 

§ THE DIRECTIONS OF DEVIANT ORIENTATION 

WE MAY now return to the question of what are the most 
important further diff^erentiations in the direction of deviant motiva- 
tion itself, whether it be in the compulsively conformative or 
alienative direction. Two such further diff^erentiations appear to be 
particularly important. In the first place, the diff^erentiation between 
activity and passivity, is of generally recognized psychological 



The Directions of Deviant Orientation [ 2.57 ] 

significance.* If the conformative and the ahenative types each be 
subdivided according to whether the orientation is primarily active 
or passive, we derive the following four-fold classification : 



PASSIVITY 



Conformative 
Dominance 



Alienative 
Dominance 



Compulsive Performance 
Orientation. 


Compulsive Acquiescence 
in Status-Expectations. 


Rebelliousness. 


Withdrawal. 



This classification is of interest, not only because of its direct 
derivation from the analysis of the interaction paradigm, but be- 
cause it restates, from the motivational point of view, in essentials 
the classification put forward some years ago by Merton in his well- 
known paper on Social Structure and Anomie.* What Merton calls 

^ There may be a variety of aspects and sources of this distinction. For 
present purposes it may, however, be regarded as a direct derivative of the funda- 
mental paradigm of interaction itself. The conformity-alienation dimension of 
possible deviance concerns, as we have just seen, the orientation of any actor to 
the pattern aspect of the established system of expectations — or any part of it — 
which is institutionalized and internalized in the interaction system. Activity- 
passivity, on the other hand, is the dimension concerned with one primary aspect 
of the mutual orientation of ego and alter to each other as objects. The point of 
reference is, as always, a stabilized system of interaction. The concept of "activity" 
defines deviation from the role of an actor in this stabilized process in the direc- 
tion of taking more "initiative," of taking a larger degree of control over the 
interaction process, than the role-expectations call for. "Passivity," on the other 
hand, is the obverse, it is the direction of taking less initiative, of letting alter 
control the situation and himself, to a larger degree than the role-expectations 
call for. 

There is a third dimension of the possibilities of deviance, which will be 
discussed presently. This concerns relative primacies, in the orientation of the 
actors, as between the pattern element and the social object element of the inter- 
action system. A stabilized interaction system always involves a balance between 
these. This balance can be upset, on the one hand by giving a greater primacy to 
the pattern — either by insisting on conformity or by alienative resistance to it — 
on the other hand to orientation to alter as a social object positively or negatively. 
All three of these dimensions are thus grounded in the essential structure of the 
interactive relationship system. 

* Revised and extended version in his Social Theory and Social Structure, 
Chapter III. 



[ 258 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

"conformity" is clearly what we here mean by the equilibrated con- 
dition of the interactive system without conflict on either side or 
alienative motivation. Merton's "innovation" and "ritualism" are 
our two compulsively conformative types, while "rebellion" and 
"retreatism" are clearly the two alienative types. Since Merton's 
paradigm was formulated in terms of relations to institutionalized 
goals and means, it is interesting to find that the active emphasis 
puts the primary stress on goals— as its relation to the achievement 
pole of the pattern variable of ascription-achievement would lead 
one to expect— while the passive emphasis puts the stress on means. 
In each case, however, we may infer, the compulsive element puts 
a strain on genuine conformity with institutionalized expectations, 
but in the two cases the primary incidence varies. We may surmise 
that Merton's paradigm is most readily applicable to a social system 
where achievement values are prominent, then because achieve- 
ment goals are highly institutionalized, the actively ambivalent per- 
son can find the easiest "way out" in accentuated goal striving. 
Where ascriptive values were institutionalized, especially in com- 
bination with particularism, this outlet would largely be closed. 
Because of this element of culture-boundness of the Merton para- 
digm, and because of the inclusion of the motivational element, we 
may presume that the version presented here is the more general 
one, of which Merton's is a very important special case. 

The second further differentiation of the directions of deviant 
motivation which needs to be introduced concerns the possibility of 
differentiation between focusing on one or the other of the two 
fundamental components of the interactive system beside ego's own 
need-disposition system, namely alter as a person, i.e., a social object, 
and the normative pattern which integrates their interaction. Both 
are, as in the case of ambivalence, inevitably involved. But there may 
be dominance of compulsive concern in one direction or the other. 
The introduction of this further differentiation yields the eightfold 
classification presented in Table 4. 

Where the conformative element is dominant and ego's primary 
concern is with his relations to alter as person, anxiety focuses on 
disturbance of the relation, on the possibility that alter may turn his 
favorable attitude into an unfavorable one and may aggressively 
punish ego or withdraw from the relationship. There are, funda- 



The Directions of Deviant Orientation [ 2.59 ] 

mentally, two ways in which ego can seek to cope with the situation, 
in relation both to his own anxiety and to alter. He may, if he is 
actively oriented, seek to put alter in a position where it is impos- 
sible for him to do anything but fulfill ego's expectations, that is, to 
dominate him. If, on the other hand, he is passively inclined, he 
may seek to protect his interest in the relationship by acquiescing in 



TABLE 4 

ACTIVITY 



PASSIVITY 



Conformative 
Dominance 



Compulsive Performance 
Orientation 


Compulsive Acquiescence 


Focus on 

Social 

Objects 


Focus on 
Norms 


Focus on 

Social 

Objects 


Focus on 
Norms 


Dominance 


Compulsive 
Enforce- 
ment 


Submission 


Perfectionistic 
Observance 

(Merton's 
ritualism) 


Rebelliousness 


Withdrawal 


Aggressive- 
ness toward 
Social Ob- 
jects 


Incorrigi- 
bility 


Compulsive 
Independ- 
ence 


Evasion 



Alienative 
Dominance 



alter 's every wish, lest failure to do so jeopardize the relationship, 
that is, he may be submissive to alter. 

If the alienative component of ego's motivation is dominant he 
is by definition less concerned with preserving alter's favorable atti- 
tudes than he is with expressing his alienative need-dispositions. 
Hence in the active case he will tend to act aggressively toward alter, 
to "pick a fight" with him relatively regardless of the risk of 
alienating alter, to seek a "showdovvni." If, on the other hand, he is 
passively inclined, his tendency will be, not aggressively to force a 
"showdown" but to avoid exposure to uncongenial expectations on 



[ 26o ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

alter's part, to be com'pulsively independent, in the extreme case to 
break the relationship akogether by withdrawing from it. The four 
cases may be grouped together by saying that both dominance and 
submission are expressions of a compulsive dependency need, to 
avoid losing alter as an object at almost any cost, while aggressive- 
ness and passive compulsive independence have in common that 
they are motivated by a compulsive need for independence, a need 
to avoid giving way to the dependency need at almost any cost. 

Turning to the cases where the normative pattern is the primary 
focus of the conflict, on the conformative side we may differentiate 
according to activity and passivity, a compulsive need to enforce the 
norm on alter, and a compulsive need for perfectionistic observance 
on the part of ego himself. An alternative to compulsive enforcement 
on alter is, for the actively oriented, to develop a compulsive 
achievement drive for himself. He may of course manifest both 
tendencies as in the familiar case of the compulsive achiever who is 
merciless in his demands on his subordinates. The passively inclined 
vdll tend to evade demands for active achievement or control and 
focus his compulsiveness on the details of conformity-expectations. 

Finally, where the alienative component is dominant, the active 
type is the "incorrigible," the one who flouts rules and laws ap- 
parently "for its own sake," whose attitude is "try and do anything 
about it." The passive type on the other hand tends to evasion of 
conformity with the normative pattern, to do his best to avoid situ- 
ations in which the expectations can be implemented, or sanctions 
applied. 

These are, of course, definitions of the direction of deviant 
tendencies. First it must not be forgotten that they are always rela- 
tive to a particular set of complementary role-expectations, to a par- 
ticular alter or class of alters, and to a particular normative pattern 
or sub-system of them. In some cases the ambivalence may, in the 
personality of the actor, be highly "localized" in its application. But 
it may also under certain circumstances become more or less highly 
generalized, transferred by substitution from the original objects and 
normative patterns. In the extreme cases we may have personalities 
with a highly generalized need-disposition for rebellion or for with- 
drawal. It is not possible to go into all the complications here. 

Secondly, of course, the actual behavior patterns which will 



The Directions of Deviant Orientation [ 261 ] 

result are not a function only of the ways in which deviant motiva- 
tion comes to be built into the motivational structure of the person- 
ality, but of the nature of the situations in which the actors are 
placed. As noted, this always involves third persons, and also a 
variety of features of the normative pattern system and the sanction 
system. What we have presented is only the barest beginning of a 
dynamic analysis of these complex processes. Some of the further 
complications will have to be analyzed as we proceed. 

The differentiation between alter as a social object and the 
normative pattern itself as a focus of strain and of compulsive moti- 
vation throws light on a common differentiation in psychological 
discussion. We may say that the need for security in the motiva- 
tional sense is the need to preserve stable cathexes of social objects, 
including collectivities. Tendencies to dominance or submission, 
aggressiveness or compulsive independence, then, may be inter- 
preted as manifestations of insecurity. The need for a feeling of 
adequacy on the other hand, we may say, is the need to feel able to 
live up to the normative standards of the expectation system, to con- 
form in that sense. The compulsive enforcer, the perfectionist, the 
incorrigible and the evader, then, could be interpreted as motivated 
by a sense of inadequacy. Of course both are concretely involved in 
every action system. Many complex resultants are possible. But 
these seem to be the fundamental points of reference for analysis 
of these processes. Insecurity and inadequacy are by the same token 
the primary foci of anxiety. 

The distinction is of course analytical. Probably a stable inter- 
active relationship without common value-patterns is not empirically 
possible, hence both aspects are always involved in the same concrete 
relationship. Nevertheless it is an analytical distinction of far- 
reaching importance in the theory of action and can help us greatly 
to focus our analysis both of the sources of alienative need- 
dispositions and of the directions and mechanisms of deviant be- 
havior tendencies. We may say then in general terms, that aliena- 
tion from social objects tends to focus on problems of security, on 
anxiety about being able to count on their receptiveness-responsive- 
ness or their love, approval or esteem, while alienation from norma- 
tive patterns as such tends to focus on a problem of adequacy on one 
or both sides of the interactive relationship, that is, ego's own 



[ 262 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

capacity to fulfill the expectations of conformity, or alter's capacity 
(including motivation) to do so, or both. In the case of threats to 
security the focus of anxiety is the problem "can I count on him, or 
might he 'let me down'?" In that of threats to adequacy the focus 
is on the other hand the problem "Is there any use in trying?" either 
because "I don't think I can do it" or "Even if I do, he probably 
won't do his part" so that expectations of the rewards of conformity 
may be frustrated. In both cases alienation should be regarded as a 
reaction to "disillusionment," the feeling that it just isn't any use in 
ego trying to do his part, because "what do I get for it?" 

It should be kept clear that the problem of adequacy is not re- 
stricted to the cases where achievement-orientations as distinguished 
from ascriptive are involved in the normative patterns in question. 
There may be very important performances involved in living up to 
an ascriptive pattern, as of the obligations of a given status. Of 
course where the value-pattern itself places a special emphasis on 
achievement as such the problem of adequacy is accentuated, and 
alienation from achievement-expectations may be a particularly im- 
portant possibility. 

There is an important source of asymmetry in the motivational 
structure of the need for security. This is the consequence of the 
overwhelming importance of infantile dependency, and hence of 
the asymmetrical structure of early attachment relationships. We 
may say that very generally there are underlying need-dispositions 
to regress into passive dependency. It would seem that on the whole 
compulsive independence is more common as a reaction formation 
against these passive dependency needs than the other way around, 
dependency needs as a reaction formation against independent, 
assertive needs. However important such a generalized source of 
"skewing" of the logical possibilities of deviant orientation, it is 
certainly overlaid by the pressures of particular types of social situ- 
ations and cultural patterns. For example the reaction to latent de- 
pendency needs may be particularly important in the dynamics of a 
society like our own where the expectations of individualistic 
achievement are particularly pronounced. 

There is an important relation between the classification pre- 
sented in Table 4 and the pattern variable affectively-neutrality. 
This becomes evident with respect to dominance and submission. 



The Directions of Deviant Orientation [ 263 J 

In both cases ego's primary concern is assumed to be to protect him- 
self against threats to disrupt the relationship. To do this he tries 
to manipulate sanctions, to make it "worth while" to alter to fulfill 
his expectations. These sanctions can, however, assuming that atti- 
tudes are the crucial ones, be of two main types according to the 
affectivity-neutrality variable. On the positive side they are the 
responsiveness and love attitudes, on the one hand, those of approval 
and esteem on the other. Domination through love seems to be 
what happens in what is sometimes called "maternal overprotec- 
tion." On the other hand the "authoritarian" father presumably 
dominates mainly through the affectively neutral sanctions. 

The relation to value pattern elements also differs according to 
the aflFectivity-neutrality variable. Where the affectivity pole has 
primacy the dominant values must be those of expressive symbolism. 
Where, on the other hand, neutrality has dominance they will be 
either instrumental or moral. On this basis the types where the focus 
of compulsive motivation is on norms may also be subdivided; thus 
compulsive enforcement may be that of standards of taste, as in the 
case of the mother who is very rigid in enforcing good manners on 
the part of her child, or it may be on standards of efficiency or of 
morality. An example here would be a parent who held his child to 
excessively high standards of achievement, e.g., punishing him for 
making only a normal record in school and the like. 

The specificity-diffuseness variable is of course also involved in 
the definition of the sanctions which operate in these compulsive 
motivation systems in interaction. The character of the motivational 
picture will vary also as a function of this variable. 

It was showoi in the last chapter that internalization of these 
generalized normative patterns involves the process of identification 
with the relevant significant alters. In the light of its relevance to 
the problem of alienation it should be clear how important is the 
basic classification of types of attachment and hence of modes of 
identification, in terms of these two pattern variables of specificity- 
diffuseness and of affectivity-neutrality. A normative pattern is not 
an actor, it cannot react to ego's action, only another actor, an alter, 
can do that. The normative pattern cannot, as an object of cathexis, 
therefore be a source of direct and immediate gratification, it serves 
gratification interests only indirectly through organizing and sta- 



[ 264 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

bilizing ego's own personality system and through influencing the 
gratifications he receives in interaction with the situation, notably 
of course the alters in it. Perhaps this is what primarily we mean 
as the significance of the "internalization" of patterns as distin- 
guished from the "enjoyment" of cathected social and physical 
objects. 

The implication of these considerations would seem to be that 
where orientation to a normative pattern as such has clear primacy 
over that to alter as a person, the orientation will have to be affec- 
tively neutral. Conformity with the pattern cannot be immediately 
and directly gratifying in itself. But the most direct and immediate 
rewards which are possible for conformity are the attitudes of the 
significant persons, alter's and ego's own, that is, their approval and 
esteem. This is of particularly crucial significance to the problem of 
social control since approval and esteem, both external and internal, 
that is, ego's own self-approval and self-esteem, may be regarded as 
the first-line stabilizing or control mechanisms of the social system, 
that is, the most immediate mechanisms of motivation to conformity 
with normative patterns. The establishment of sensitivity to the 
attitudes of approval and esteem, again both external and internal, 
is one of the most fundamental requirements of adequate socializa- 
tion of the individual and serves as the central core of his system of 
motivation to conformity. It is here, then, that the alienative need- 
dispositions are most directly dangerous to the stability of a social 
system. They will consist in "not caring what they think," or at least 
turning to alternative persons with other attitudes for approval and 
esteem. 

There is, however, a complex kind of interdependence between 
these attitudes of approval and esteem and the types of attachment 
where affectivity has primacy, the receptiveness-response and love 
types, as they have been called. The probability has been pointed 
out in the last chapter that only the establishment of such attach- 
ments provides an adequate motivational basis for the acceptance of 
the affectively neutral types of orientation, hence for the higher 
levels of disciplined organization of the personality which is in turn 
essential to adequate performance in many roles in a complex social 
system. This indeed itself constitutes a form of organization and of 
focusing of gratification interests, especially in the diff^use love type. 



The Directions of Deviant Orientation [ 265 ] 

where a fundamental reciprocity of orientation is established, which 
can form a highly important stabilizing factor in some parts of social 
systems, and plays a particularly important part in the socialization 
process. Hence the type of alienation where the focus is on the actor 
as a person rather than on the normative pattern, is also highly im- 
portant. It takes the form of aversions to particular types of expected 
specific receptiveness and response, and to the personality of alter as 
a whole, in the extremer cases what we would call "hate." 

There are certain important empirical connections which can 
immediately be discerned when these variations in the character of 
the sanction system are taken into account. In general the norma- 
tive patterns defining the larger framework of the social relationships 
system tend to be affectively neutral, particularly where certain 
kinds of value system such as our own universalistic achievement 
pattern predominate. In such a case the most imperative demands 
for conformity would appear to be found relative to the patterns 
themselves, that is, to "impersonal" expectations as of efficiency in 
achievement, acting "according to the rules" and the like. It would 
seem likely, then, that the pressures of the system of social control 
would tend to deflect deviant tendencies into channels which 
would be relatively less threatening to the system. In general devi- 
ance relative to persons in intimate relationships is probably less 
threatening than relative to value-patterns as such. Furthermore, 
the withdrawal direction is less threatening when alienation pre- 
dominates than is the rebellious direction. Hence compulsive inde- 
pendence would be expected to be very common in such a social 
system, especially since submissiveness contravenes a fundamental 
implication of the value system relative to independence. 

Perhaps two further aspects of the psychology of deviant be- 
havior should be briefly commented upon before turning to a more 
explicit and systematic discussion of certain situational problems. 
It is clear that, whichever of the basic alternatives in dealing with 
them is taken, the presence of important alienative need-disposition 
elements implies an important element of conflict on the personality 
level in the social system. This means that either the alienative or 
the conformative need-disposition elements must frequently be 
repressed, or at least relatively dissociated from whichever is the 
dominant orientation component. It is well-established that, if the 



[ 266 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

relevant need-disposition has not been fully extinguished, it will 
tend to find some outlet, however indirect. The mechanisms of dis- 
placement and projection perhaps formulate the most important 
types of such outlet. But the very fact that the connection between 
the object of a displaced affect and the need-disposition from which 
it arises— and even more so in the case of projection— is intrinsically 
so loose, means that there is normally a considerable instability in 
the object-cathexes and motivational imputations involved. This 
seems to be the most important basis for the existence of what is 
often called "free-floating" affect. By virtue of the fact that the ap- 
propriate need-dispositions exist, and that their normally appropriate 
object-cathexis is blocked, such affect may be conceived as "seeking" 
a second-choice appropriate object. There is a certain relative un- 
satisfactoriness in any such choice which is available, hence readi- 
ness to transfer to still another. The affect may be love-readiness, 
aggression, passive evasiveness relative to norms, or any one of a 
variety of other types. But the common feature is the fluidity and 
instability of the cathexis. In turn the urgency of the need for 
cathexis may lead to a compulsive intensity of the cathexis once 
achieved, the very intensity of which, however, is a symptom of its 
instability. The relevance of such considerations to such phenomena 
as romantic love attachments or group prejudice scarcely needs to be 
pointed out. In general it comprises the cases where the affective 
intensity can be shown to be "over-determined" relative to any in- 
trinsic significance of the object. 

Secondly, the elements of conflict involved in the presence of 
alienative need-dispositions clearly have implications for the structure 
of cognitive orientation. The obvious point is the relevance of the 
mechanism of rationalization to coping with the attendant strain on 
the cognitive level. Rationalization is an adjunct and instrument 
of repression in that cognitively it denies the existence of a 
conflict and attempts to present a consistent picture in accord with 
approved normative standards of proper motivational orientation. 
There are many possible "devices" to which rationalization may 
resort in order to make the actor's behavior and attitudes plausible 
and acceptable, such as the appeal to "extenuating circumstances," 
the imputation of exaggerated deviance to alters and the like, but 
they have in common an element of cognitive distortion of what, in 



Further Situational As'pects of the Genesis [ 267 ] 

terms of the cognitive culture which is predominantly institution- 
alized, is the appropriate and adequate explanation and justification 
of action. Again the relevance of these considerations to the genesis 
and structuring of ideologies needs no further comment at this time. 

§ SOME FURTHER SITUATIONAL ASPECTS OF THE 
GENESIS AND STRUCTURING OF DEVIANCE 

WE MUST now supplement the above considerations about 
the roots of alienative need-dispositions in the personality, and the 
processes of mutual stimulation of these alienative tendencies in the 
interaction process with an analysis of certain crucial features of 
normative patterns themselves and their variability. The problem of 
conformity cannot be dissociated from a consideration of that with 
which conformity is expected. 

The most fundamental classification of the components of nor- 
mative patterns which is derived from the pattern variable scheme 
need not be further discussed just now. Here only a few observa- 
tions on points of relevance to the present context are necessary. The 
first point to emphasize is that the ways in which "pressure" is 
exerted on the motivational system of the actor will vary as a func- 
tion of the kind of pattern with which he is expected to conform. 

This is in the nature of the case a very complicated field. Yet 
considerations such as those advanced in the last chapter relative to 
the process of socialization would make it seem likely that in spite 
of socio-cultural variations some types of value-pattern impose in- 
herently greater strains on most human beings than others; some 
such factor is for example essential to the meaning of the concept 
of regression. For present purposes we need not consider whether 
the principal sources of these strains are to be found in constitu- 
tional features of the human organism or in certain constants of the 
process of socialization. A good example is the degree of stress on 
affective neutrality. 

There is a sense in which as we have seen, all normative pat- 
terning involves an element of affective neutrality, in that as was 
noted, conformity with a normative pattern cannot in itself be a 
source of direct and immediate gratification. However, some types 
of normative pattern impose the disciplines of affective neutrality 
far more stringently and over far wider segments of the action system 



[ 268 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

than do others. Some on the other hand seem more concerned with 
the organization of and selection among direct gratifications, ratlier 
than their postponement or diversion from particular contexts. These 
are above all the patterns which organize social relationships to a 
high degree about diffuse love attachments, and further stabilize 
expressive activities in terms of relatively definite and rigorous sys- 
tematization of expressive symbol and action systems, as for example 
in a large amount of ritual and etiquette. On the other hand our 
own society, with its very strong instrumental emphases and very 
long-range planning, puts a strong accent on affective neutrality and 
requires exceptionally high levels of discipline in certain respects. 

Somewhat similar considerations, as we have seen, apply to 
achievement patterns and to universalism. Indeed in this respect the 
latter is probably the more fundamental. This seems to derive above 
all from the fact that universalistic requirements cut across the par- 
ticularism of attachments to persons. The fundamental importance 
of the latter in all human socialization seems to be established 
beyond question. Hence where patterns involve a prominent uni- 
versalistic emphasis, it is necessary not merely to inhibit certain 
"natural" cathectic tendencies, but to transcend them, in the sense 
of developing a capacity of cathexis of all members of a univer- 
salistically defined class of social objects and correspondingly to 
internalize the valuation of abstract principles. This latter step is 
thus, in the universalistic case, possible only through a special elab- 
oration of the development of "secondary" motivational structures. 

The upshot of all this is that one focus of strains consists in the 
difficulty of conformity with the expectations involved in the par- 
ticular type of pattern in question. In general this difficulty can be 
analyzed in the same fundamental terms which were used above. It 
will, that is, involve elements of ambivalence and conflict. 

It is highly probable that there is a commonly human compo- 
nent in this motivational difficulty of fulfillment of certain types of 
expectations, but it is equally clear there is a component deriving 
from particular combinations with other elements. One example 
will suffice to illustrate the point. American society certainly re- 
quires an exceptionally high level of affectively neutral and uni- 
versalistic orientations, both of which are, it would appear, in- 
trinsically difficult of attainment. But because of the conditions of 



Further Situational Aspects of the Genesis [ 269 ] 

socialization in the isolated conjugal family, it seems probable that 
particularly middle class males develop a strong dependently tinged 
love need. This is itself a powerful lever for motivating the accept- 
ance of disciplines. But this is a source of additional strains be- 
cause in so many of the crucial masculine roles in our society this 
is almost the last need which can be directly gratified. Indeed the 
opportunities for gratification of a dependency component are in- 
herently extremely limited for the American adult, except in deviant 
patterns. The American must therefore go farther in the process of 
socialization than many others for two sets of reasons: first, because 
he must reach higher levels of affective neutrality and universalism, 
and second, because he has a more strongly developed set of de- 
pendence needs from which he must become emancipated. This 
seems to be one of the focal points of strain in American society. 

There is a second important range of problems concerning the 
difficulty of conformity with a normative pattern which focuses in 
the nature of the pattern itself. This concerns the question of how 
far the expectations of conformity are or are not specific and de- 
tailed. We have emphasized the importance of the fact that all 
normative patterns are to an important degree generalized relative 
to the particularity of the situations in which they apply. But there 
are enormous variations in the degree to which this is true. In pro- 
portion as the pattern becomes more generalized and hence "ab- 
stract" the problem of "interpretation" becomes accentuated. In 
other words, the actor faces the problem not only of living up to the 
expectations of his role, assuming that he knows exactly what they 
are, but of knowing just what is expected of him. In a society like 
our own there is an extensive proliferation of highly generalized 
rules and hence of difficulties in their interpretation. It may be noted 
that one of the primary functions of the legal profession is to advise 
clients on what their rights and obligations are. That the client 
should know them without expert advice is by no means to be taken 
for granted in a complex society, especially where certain aspects 
of the normative pattern system, those embodied in the formal law, 
are being continually changed by new legislation as well as by other 
processes. 

Psychologically the importance of this element of indefiniteness 
of expectations which derives from the generality of norms, lies in 



[ 270 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

the element of uncertainty which it introduces into the orientation 
system. To the relevant degree the actor is confronted with an 
"unstructured" situation in which he must take responsibility for 
an independent solution. We know that this factor is particularly 
difficult to tolerate for some types of personality, especially we may 
surmise, the compulsive conformists. By increasing anxiety, the im- 
pact of indefiniteness of expectations in this sense may be a factor 
in deepening the vicious circle of progressive motivation to deviance. 
It may also provide loopholes for those whose motivational pattern 
leans to non-conformity, in that the very indefiniteness of the expec- 
tation makes it impossible to draw a rigid line between conformity 
and deviance, since this is a matter of "interpretation." In particular 
it is possible to utilize such a loophole to go a little farther in each 
of a succession of instances until imperceptibly the "spirit" of the 
norm comes to be violated even though no one has been able 
unequivocally to point out where the "letter" was transgressed. 

It may be pointed out that one important aspect of this problem 
of specification of expectations concerns distribution of activities 
between occasions. One of the reasons for its importance is that 
every social system has certain "safety valve" patterns, situations and 
occasions where there is an element of extra "permissiveness" or 
license for behavior which would on other occasions not be toler- 
ated. A good example is the tradition of Hallowe'en in our society, 
with its greater permissiveness for mildly aggressive and destructive 
"pranks" than is ordinarily granted. Such extra permissiveness 
stands in a certain sense in contravention of some of the more gen- 
eral normative patterns of the society and raises the uncomfortable 
question of whether the society "really means it" that conformity 
with the general rule is expected. The point is that if there is special 
permissiveness on some occasions, why should it not be extended to 
other occasions? In such cases normally there is clearly a limit 
beyond which the behavior in question would become seriously 
threatening to the stability of the social system. But this "limit" is 
a more or less broad zone; it is not a clearly defined line. 

An important special case of the indefiniteness of expectations 
concerns those roles where there is a graduated scale of possible 
achievement or performance. Here the potentially disturbing ques- 
tion is "how much is enough?" In the nature of the case not everyone 



Further Situational As'pects of the Genesis [ 271 ] 

can be capable of the highest achievement, even if what this consists 
in is clearly defined. But there is an expectation that one must "do 
his best." The problem is always to some degree open whether 
falling short of a level higher than actually achieved was due to 
factors the actor could not be expected to control or whether he 
"didn't try hard enough." 

It seems clear that this type of normative expectation pattern 
sharply accentuates what has been called the problem of "adequacy" 
by the very fact that adequate performance is not specifically defined 
but only by such vague formulae as "doing your best" or "making 
the most of your opportunities and resources." We may surmise 
that in such a situation the active compulsive conformist, the com- 
pulsive performer, will tend to be unduly "ambitious," to try to do 
so much that there can be no possible doubt that it is enough. The 
passive compulsive conformist on the other hand will tend to try to 
cut down the definition of enough to terms which in his anxiety he 
feels able to cope with, perhaps by laying overly strong emphasis 
on perfection in minor details at the cost of the larger achievements. 
The overtly alienative types on the other hand will find in this 
situation loopholes for justifying an achievement drive to goals or 
by means which are dubiously within the rules, or altogether out- 
side, or for taking a "sour grapes" attitude that they "never had a 
chance." These latter cases of course in their alienative attitudes 
shade into repudiation of the whole system. 

What has been outlined above takes account only of the most 
elementary beginnings of the complexities of the normative pattern 
system with which an actor may be confronted. A next step in com- 
plication is taken when in addition to the problem of interpretation 
of specific expectations there is introduced the problem of the ap- 
plicability of alternative norms. This type of problem is most clearly 
seen in the case of a developed legal system, where quite clearly one 
of the most important functions of the courts is to determine which 
of a plurality of rules or precedents "governs" in a particular case. 
This possibility of "conflict of rules" is inherent in the nature of a 
system of generalized norms, and becomes a more acute problem in 
proportion to their generality and complexity. This is because gen- 
erality implies abstractness, and abstractness means that one rule 
does not alone "cover" the concrete case, since the case will inevi- 



[ 272 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

tably have a variety of aspects to which a corresponding variety of 
generalized norms is relevant. But if more than one norm is in- 
trinsically applicable it is clear that there must be some order of 
precedence among them. 

The general impossibility of "having your cake and eating it" 
which underlies the general significance of the pattern variables in 
systems of action is particularly relevant here. In any at all well 
integrated institutional system the major decisions of precedence 
will be made for the individual actor through the institutionalization 
of norms and hence lie beyond his control. Thus although both the 
particularistic loyalties to kinsfolk and the universalistic obligations 
to reward technical competence are institutionalized in our society, 
an actor who is in a position of responsibility in an occupational 
organization is not at complete liberty to favor his relatives at the 
expense of people of superior technical competence. But this major 
settlement of the order of precedence of normative patterns, which 
is essential to social stability, does not go all the way. There are still 
areas of genuine doubt open to the decision of the individual actor, 
within which his own need-disposition structure may swing the 
balance between alternatives. This accentuates the "unstructured" 
character of the situation, posing problems again for the compulsive 
conformists and providing loopholes for the alienated. It is important 
to note that we are not yet here speaking of the cases where there is 
a conflict between clearly defined expectations, but only of that 
where there is a lack of clear definition of what the expectations are. 

The facts we have just reviewed about the indeterminacy often 
present in the normative definition of expectations, raise certain 
problems about the operation of sanctions. 

The most fundamental distinction relative to sanctions which 
we have made is that between the specific, discrete acts of alter 
which influence ego's situation of action on the one hand, and alter's 
attitudes toward ego and his actions on the other. Attitudes as sanc- 
tions imply either attachment to alter as an object of cathexis or 
internalization of the normative pattern alter is "enforcing" or both. 
They constitute the central core of the sanction system of a role 
complex and organize it into a system. Through them specific sanc- 
tion-acts acquire, in addition to their "intrinsic" significance the 
"meaning" of expressions of these attitudes. From the point of view 



Further Situational Aspects of the Genesis [ 273 ] 

of the stabilization of the reciprocal interaction system, alters acts 
then either "confirm" ego's feeling that his actions are "right" and 
manifest the "proper attitude" or serve as a warning that they are 
"wrong" and alter expects him to "mend his ways." 

All this is stated in terms of the "norm" of a fully integrated and 
stable interaction complex. But there is a variety of ways in which 
rifts in this integrated structure may develop on the side of the 
sanction system. They are essentially to be interpreted in terms of 
the elements which have already been discussed. Alter is subject to 
the same kinds of strain, deviant need-dispositions, uncertainty, lack 
of definiteness of expectations and the like as is ego. Therefore, in 
addition to the fact that ego is faced with an unstructured situation 
in terms of the normative pattern system itself, there is the possi- 
bility that alter 's reactions to ego's action will be systematically 
biased relative to the norm. 

It has been clear at many points that under certain conditions 
the interactive system operates to organize the motivational systems 
of the actors in such a way as to build up motivation to conformity 
with the expectations of a shared system of normative patterns, and 
that sanctions in such a "normal" case operate to reinforce this 
motivation. But the factors we have just discussed open the door to 
a range of variability on ego's part where within limits the question 
of conformity vs. deviance cannot be unequivocally settled. The 
question is whether alter's reactions are such as to tend to "bring 
ego back" toward the modal point in the range relative to the norma- 
tive pattern structure, or to motivate him to diverge more widely 
toward one extreme of the range, with the possibility of a vicious 
circle developing which carries him "over the line." 

It is clear from our discussion of alienation that an element of 
motivation to conformity is always present and important. Then 
the question is whether the sanction system operates to strengthen 
this element of an ambivalent structure of need-dispositions or to 
weaken it and/or strengthen the alienative component. The problem 
is far too complex to permit doing more than indicating a few start- 
ing points here. 

The most important consideration for present purposes is the 
effect of the indeterminate elements of the pattern and of sanctions 
on the tendency of ambivalent motivation in the interaction process 



[ 274 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

to lead to a cumulatively deepening vicious circle of intensification 
of the alienative components. Under what conditions will this 
vicious circle operate and under what different conditions can sanc- 
tions operate to nip such developments in the bud. First we may say 
that an element of unstructuredness in the expectation system, de- 
riving either from indefiniteness in the definition of normative pat- 
terns or their application, or from uncertainty as to how alter will 
react to a given action of ego's or both, opens the door to the begin- 
ning of a vicious circle. This is simply because action is allowed to 
deviate further from a modal norm without counteracting forces 
coming into play than would otherwise be the case. Here we see 
immediately that from the point of view of stability as such there 
are certain advantages in the type of social pattern which maximizes 
the detailed specification of role-expectations. 

We may assume that if alter's motivational pattern is fully in- 
tegrated with the norm and has sufficient "resiliency" not to be 
thrown out of equilibrium by the strain put upon it by ego's in- 
cipient deviance, the sanctions he will impose will tend to be such 
as to tend to re-equilibrate ego's action with the norm. There is of 
course a wide range of variation of the possible specific elements 
involved, but broadly we may assume first that on the one hand 
alter will tend to act in such a way as to influence ego's situation in 
the direction of making it advantageous for ego in reality terms to 
return to conformity, and second that alter's attitudes will be such 
as, without ambivalence, to show his disapproval of the direction 
ego's action is taking. At the same time, there will tend to be acts 
on alter's part which serve as mechanisms of tension release to ego, 
such as "laughing off" ego's compulsive exaggerations of an issue, of 
insistence on his own "rights" in the situation, or perhaps his com- 
pulsively conscientious insistence on too literal fulfillment of his 
obligations. Of course a variety of combinations of these three types 
of sanction elements may be involved. 

On the other hand, if alter's own motivational structure is ambiv- 
alent with reference to the relevant conformity problem, he and 
ego may start "working on each other" in such a way as to build up 
the vicious circle. It would seem that this can work out through 
either of two principal types of process, with enormous variations 
in detail. In the first place they can tend to become "partners in 



Further Situational As'pects of the Genesis [ 2,75 ] 

crime." Alter's and ego's alienative need-dispositions, that is, may 
match each other, so that instead of imposing negative sanctions for 
ego's deviant tendencies, and driving ego to ahenation from him, 
alter tends to act in such a way as to reward them. This may provide 
sufficient impetus to the aheady incipient trend, to cancel out the 
effect of negative sanctions from other quarters and build up an emo- 
tional vested interest in the deviant patterns through the alienative 
need-dispositions underlying them. 

The second type of process operates through the intensification 
of conflict. Alters ambivalent structure may be such that he is 
compulsively driven to impose unduly drastic negative sanctions on 
ego as a defense against his own repressed deviant need-dispositions 
and to deny him opportunities of tension release. If there is in ego 
an already established alienative need-disposition, this exaggerated 
punishment of the manifestations of his alienative needs may ac- 
centuate the conflict and actually stimulate the alienative need. This 
is usually, one may surmise, further accentuated by ego sensing that 
alter is ambivalent and somehow "secretly" approves his deviant 
tendencies and would like to reward them. The effect of this process 
of intensifying the conflict is to block the "road back" for ego, to 
make it most difficult to resolve his conflicts in a conformative direc- 
tion. It is clear, in the light of the discussion above, that it is the 
compulsive conformist types of personality which as alters are likely 
to have this kind of effect on ego. 

There are of course many further possible complications of the 
vicious circle process. A person who is in conflict will attempt a 
variety of "escape" maneuvers, one class of which will be, in the 
light of the strain in his relation to the one alter, to turn to another. 
It is thus, as we have noted, often possible to gratify both sides of 
an ambivalent need-disposition structure in a limited way by cathect- 
ing different objects in terms gratifying to each side. In determining 
such outcomes much will depend on the structure of the situation 
and of the sanction system outside the particular ego-alter relation- 
ship we have singled out for analysis. A strained relationship with 
any one alter can often be counteracted by "good" relationships in 
other directions. At present, however, it is not possible to attempt to 
follow out all these complications. All we can do is to point out that 
the outcome will depend on ego's place in the total relevant inter- 



[ 276 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

action system, not merely on his particular relation to one alter. 
Furthermore, the interaction in question is a process in time, and 
much will depend on the sequence of the various phases of the 
temporal process, especially the timing of the incidence of various 
sanctions from various quarters on ego. Thus one consequence of 
secrecy is to delay or eliminate some otherwise operable sanctions. 

In any case, and whichever of these main routes to deviance has 
been taken, the essential phenomenon from the motivational point 
of view is the emotional "investment" of the actor in his deviance. 
Internally this is what, in the particular case of the neuroses, psy- 
chiatrists often call his "secondary gain," which he cannot give up 
without help because of the serious disturbance of the internal 
"economy" of his personality which this would entail. Externally, 
vis-^-vis alter, the counterpart of secondary gain is the expectation 
of frustration by significant alters if the deviant pattern is given up. 
This expectation may be grossly unrealistic; indeed, when severe 
conflict is involved an element of distortion of reality is inevitable. 
But this is not the point; the anxiety resulting from such expecta- 
tions is real enough. The compulsively independent person for 
example is afraid to enter into attachments because of the expecta- 
tion that alter is likely to "let him down" in some way. The com- 
pulsive nonconformist equally is afraid to live up to institutional 
expectations for fear he will in fact be punished rather than re- 
warded for it— the question is always in some sense "what does it 
get me?" 

It would seem that underlying this expectation of deprivation 
is always some prototype of a previous deprivation experience. Ego 
at some time actually did feel that an object of attachment let him 
dowTi— whether he was realistically justified in this feeling or not. 
This would thus seem to be the primary basis of the significance of 
childhood experiences, as emphasized in psychoanalytic theory, that 
they provide the early prototype of the deprivational experiences 
(and of course also gratifications) around which anxiety (and hope) 
focus. Unless these anxieties about repetition of the feared depriva- 
tion are somehow allayed, it is not motivationally possible for 
ego to give up his deviant need-dispositions, because to him the 
alternative means the expectation of actualization of the dreaded 
eventuality. 



Further Situational As'pects of the Genesis [ 277 ] 

This problem of the secondary gain of deviance is a primary 
focus of the mechanisms of social control as we shall see later. In 
terms of the structure of what, in the present sense is the sanction 
system, these mechanisms must operate in one of two fundamental 
ways. The first is to "nip in the bud" the incipient tendencies to 
deviance, so as to prevent the building up of a vicious circle. The 
second is to "break through" the vicious circle, by somehow lessening 
ego's investment in his alienative need-dispositions. As mechanisms 
of the social system it is clear that the structure of alter's role vis4-vis 
ego is the focus of both orders of mechanism of social control. A 
mechanism of social control after all only acquires a function when 
ego "has a problem" in the sense that he cannot without difficulty 
be expected to overcome the tendencies to deviance by himself by 
"will power."° It is the impact on him of his relations to others 
which is the focus of the problem. But in analyzing this we must 
always bear in mind that the distinction of ego and alter is only a 
distinction between points of reference. Every alter who may be an 
"agent of social control" to ego, is at the same time an ego who may 
have his own problems of tendencies to deviance. The full analysis 
of the problem can only be attained on the level of treatment of the 
interactive system as a system, not by isolating any one personality. 
This is the fundamental difference between the sociological and the 
"clinical" point of view.* 

In all this, of course the "reality factors" in the situation must 
not be overlooked. On the more naive level, actual deviance as dis- 
tinguished from motivation to deviance, is a function of whether it 
is realistically possible to "get away with it," or whether in some 
sense it "pays." It is of course possible, and frequently happens, for 
the sheer compulsion or the severity of sanctions to forestall the 
acting out of deviant motivation and to limit its consequences in 
various ways. In the last analysis force is an infallible means of the 
prevention of any human action, as we have pointed above. These 
aspects of the problem should by no means be minimized, and will 

" Of course coercive measures of various sorts can operate to prevent ego from 
acting out his deviant need-disposition without ahering their structure. Thus the 
custodial hospitalization of chronic mental patients may prevent them from dis- 
turbing others in their normal interactive circles. 

® This is not to say that the theory of personality does not involve factors 
independent of the interactive system. 



[ 2/8 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

he given some further attention below. But from the point of view 
of the central dynamics of the social system they are not the core of 
the problem. The core is to be found in the balance of forces which 
is involved in the building up and the counteraction of motivation 
to deviance, that is, of the alienative component of the need-disposi- 
tion system. This follows from the whole conception of the social 
system set forth in this work. If any empirical justification of this 
statement is needed at this point perhaps mention of the enormous 
and tragic willingness of compulsively motivated people to "punish 
themselves" in the sense of incurring sanctions and deprivations 
which, if they were "sensible," they could easily avoid, will suffice. 

There is one further point about the system of sanctions which 
needs to be made before taking up the matter of role conflict itself. 
This is that the immediacy and the certainty of sanctions has a sig- 
nificance similar to that of the degree of the definiteness of expec- 
tations. Uncertainty as to how alter will react is a factor in the 
"unstructuredness" of the situation which is directly comparable 
with and often concomitant with uncertainty as to what the norma- 
tive pattern itself requires. Indefiniteness in the normative pattern 
will be conducive to reciprocal uncertainty about sanctions on both 
sides of the interactive relationship; this is one of the main reasons 
why it is so important. 

There is, however, another crucial factor in uncertainty of sanc- 
tions, namely the adequacy or inadequacy of communication. Alters 
reaction, that is, is a function of what he believes he is reacting to. 
In the extreme case therefore sanctions will drop out completely if 
alter is not aware of what ego has done. Such phenomena as the 
anonymity of urban society find part of their importance here. But 
short of this extreme, alter's cognition of ego's action may be partial 
or distorted or both, either because of his own motivation to distort 
or because of other impediments to full communication. This is a 
fact which obviously contributes to the possibility of vicious circles 
getting under way, since they may go some distance before alter's 
awareness of the situation permits his "normal" reaction pattern to 
come fully into force. By this time it may be too late for it to have 
the eff^ect which it would have had at an incipient stage. The 
problem of the "levels" at which cognitive processes operate is par- 
ticularly important here. Sometimes alter may "sense" a feature of 



Further Situational As'pects of the Genesis [ 279 ] 

ego's orientation which he cannot "pin down" in explicit cognitive 
terms. How far this is adequate cognition is a complex and open 
question. 

The remoteness which is antithetical to immediacy of sanctions 
may be of at least two types, first to immediacy in time, second, to 
that in the relationship system. It seems to be well established in 
learning theory that the timing of contingent gratifications and 
deprivations is a highly significant feature of the learning process. 
If the consequence in the form of alter's appropriate reaction is too 
long delayed— as for instance by difficulties of communication— the 
effect may be very different, particularly in weakening the control 
effect from that of the same reaction at an earlier time. This is 
obviously because the forces favorable to the deviant pattern may 
have had a stronger effect the longer they have operated without 
counteraction. 

The concept of "closeness" of social relationship is not a simple 
one. But there seem to be no doubt that alters are differentiated in 
terms of their degrees as well as types of significance to ego, and 
that the force of a sanction is therefore a function of its source in 
this respect as well as in others. Of the many significant problems in 
this area only one of special sociological significance will be men- 
tioned. "Formal organization," means the allocation of both expec- 
tation-definition and enforcement functions to differentiated roles. 
The incumbents of these roles cannot, in the nature of the case, 
stand in close "primary" relationships to more than a small minority 
of those to whom their decisions and actions constitute im- 
portant definitions of the situation and sanctions. They must by 
and large come to be accepted by virtue of extensive generalization 
to the authority of generalized normative patterns as such and the 
acceptance of status-definitions independently of the personality of 
the incumbent. These alters, the persons in authority whom ego 
does not "know personally" play a crucially significant part in the 
sanction system of any complex social system and the problems of 
the motivational mechanisms involved in the acceptance of their 
"authority" are of central significance for many of the problems of 
social control. It may be that the well-knov\m phenomena of the 
discrepancies between formal and informal organization can be fruit- 
fully approached in terms of the motivational difficulties involved 



[ 280 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

in social control "at a distance." We shall maintain that this is the 
case and that the conflicts over the formal sanctions of formal organi- 
zation and informal participations should be treated as special cases 
of role conflict. 

§ ROLE CONFLICT AND THE GENESIS 
OF DEVIANCE 

THE consequences of the factors in the genesis of deviant 
motivation and behavior so far dealt with may be and often are 
compounded by the factor of role conflict. By this is meant the ex- 
posure of the actor to conflicting sets of legitimized role expecta- 
tions such that complete fulfillment of both is realistically impossi- 
ble. It is necessary to compromise, that is, to sacrifice some at least of 
both sets of expectations, or to choose one alternative and sacrifice 
the other. In any case the actor is exposed to negative sanctions and, 
so far as both sets of values are internalized, to internal conflict. 
There may, of course, be limited possibilities of transcending the 
conflict by redefining the situation, as well as of evasion as for 
exam.ple through secrecy, and segregation of occasions. 

Role conflict in this sense is continuous with the elements of 
uncertainty and malintegration which have already been discussed. 
This is particularly true of the conflict of rules, and of exposure to 
alters who though not explicitly deviant, "stretch a point" in their 
reaction to ego. The beginnings of a role conflict may thus be present 
in the difficulty of living up both to the expectations of one alter 
who interprets a norm in the direction of a "perfectionistic" com- 
pulsive conformity pattern, and those of another who is also in close 
interaction with ego, and who stretches the same normative pattern 
to the verge of active rebellion, both of them expecting active re- 
ciprocation from ego. 

There is a certain endemic potentiality of role conflict inherent 
in the fact that any actor has a plurality of roles, which involve dif- 
ferences of pattern, thus of relations to alters whose interests and 
orientations mesh with ego's in different ways. These diff^erences 
have to be adjusted by an ordering or allocation of the claims of the 
difiFerent role-expectations to which the actor is subject. This order- 
ing occurs by priority scales, by occasion, e.g., time and place, and 
by distribution among alters. There are thus always a variety of 



Role Conflict and the Genesis of Deviance [ 281 ] 

activities which have their appropriate partners, which would not 
be appropriate with other partners, and which have their appropri- 
ate time and place. This allocative ordering of any given actor's 
role-system is often delicately balanced. Any serious alteration in 
one part of it may encroach on others and thus necessitate a whole 
series of adjustments. 

In the present context it is particularly important to note that a 
deviant motivation component relative to one set of role-expectations 
will have a tendency to upset this delicate balance. Thus a com- 
pulsive need to excel in an occupational role may cause the actor 
to encroach on times appropriately allocated to kinship roles, and 
make him feel that he is exposed to a conflict of expectations as 
between his boss and his wife. This may in turn accentuate elements 
of strain in his marital relationship with the possibility that this 
should lead to stimulation of the deepening of the vicious circle 
from there on. 

But the source of the conflict may not be ego-made. It may be 
imposed upon the actor from the malintegration of the social system 
itself. Not all social malintegration belongs in this category, there 
may for example be conflicts between groups with no overlapping 
membership. But, even here, in the pattern sense, there may well be 
role conflict because only part of the role-pattern defining partici- 
pation in each group justifies the expectations of the group vis-a-vis 
the adversary group. This would, for example, be the case in white- 
negro relations in the South (and in less accentuated form through- 
out the United States). This may be put as a conflict of roles in that 
for example the white man has in his role as American citizen 
internalized participation in the universalistic values of the wider 
society, the "American creed," but also as a Southerner in the pat- 
tern of "white supremacy." The conflict can, however, be mitigated 
in that he relatively seldom has to act in roles where the significant 
alters hold up the conflicting expectations to him in such a way that 
he must directly choose. He deals universalistically in some contexts 
for example vis-a-vis white colleagues in his occupational sphere, 
and particularistically vis-^-vis negro-white situations. This segrega- 
tion is essential to minimize the strain. This situation may be re- 
garded as a main basis of the Southern resentment against "northern 
interference" in the race problem. It introduces an active conflict 



[ 282 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

of the expectations of significant alters whose differences cannot be 
ignored. This forces a decision which the segregation of contexts 
has tended to make it possible to evade. 

The significance of role conflict as a factor in the genesis of 
alienative motivation should be clear from the above. Exposure to 
role conflict is an obvious source of strain and frustration in that it 
creates a situation incompatible with a harmonious integration of 
personality with the interaction system. There must be external frus- 
trations, internal conflicts or both, in the severer cases always both. 
Indeed what, on the interaction level if not the fully developed 
social role level, is exposure to conflicting expectations of some kind 
may be presumed to be the generic situation underlying the develop- 
ment of ambivalent motivational structures with their expression in 
neuroses, in deviant behavior or otherwise. 

When, however, the element of conflict is present on the level 
of institutionalized role-expectations, a further element is introduced 
which can be of great significance. The fact that both sides of the 
conflicting expectations are institutionalized means that there is 
the basis for a claim to legitimacy for both patterns. As distinguished 
then from alienative need-dispositions which are clearly stigma- 
tized by the moral sentiments common to ego and alter, and later, 
hence are the foci of feelings of guilt and shame, there is the possi- 
bility of the justification of the alienative as well as the originally 
conformative motivation. 

On one level this should serve as a factor in the intensification 
of internal conflict, and therefore call for greater pressure to resort to 
defensive and adjustive mechanisms. An example would be the 
"touchiness" of the Southern white with regard to outside inter- 
ference. But the obverse of intensification of conflict is that in a 
certain sense the defenses against overt deviance are greatly weak- 
ened if the alienative need-disposition (from the point of view of 
one of the given expectation patterns) is given a basis of legitima- 
tion. Both internal sanctions and those from significant alters are 
weakened. Then on the one hand role conflict can be seen to be very 
important as a source of motivations leading to social change, 
through some sort of undermining of the motivational bases of an 
established order which includes the provision of motivationally 
acceptable alternatives. On the other hand this possibility is poten- 



The Social Structure of Deviant Behavior [ 283 ] 

tially so dangerous to the stability of a given institutional system 
that it may be presumed that one of the major functions of the 
mechanisms of social control is to forestall the establishment of a 
claim to legitimacy for the expression of need-dispositions which are 
alienative relative to the major institutionalized patterns of the social 
system. Of course the establishment of such a "functional need" of 
the social system does not in any way explain the actual structures 
and processes related to it. But it does serve to focus our attention 
on certain points in the motivational equilibrium of the social system 
in such a way that our attention will be called to certain problems ol 
the determination of processes which might otherwise have been 
overlooked. 

§ THE SOCIAL STRUCTURE OF DEVIANT 
BEHAVIOR TENDENCIES 

WE MAY now turn to a consideration of the principal ways 
in which the factors in deviant behavior which have been reviewed 
tend to "structure out" in types of concrete pattern forms in the 
social system. Since deviance is always relative to a given institu- 
tionalized value-pattern system the starting point for this analysis is 
to be found in the classification of the main directions of deviant 
orientation developed in the earlier part of the chapter. 

It will be held that the cases of conformative dominance, where 
the compulsiveness of conformity and the accompanying skewing 
of orientation shows the presence of alienative motivational com- 
ponents are definitely to be treated as deviance. The overtly aliena- 
tive and compulsively conformative tendencies are most emphati- 
cally part of the same dynamic system and must be treated together. 

We then of course differentiate deviant orientations further ac- 
cording to the active-passive distinction, and for certain purposes 
still further according to whether the primary focus is on alter as a 
social object or on the value-pattern itself. 

We will first take up the case of purely individualized deviance, 
that is, the deviance of ego which is not shared by alter. We will then 
proceed to consideration of the case where two or more actors share 
a deviant pattern, thus forming a sub-collectivity over against those 
who remain integrated with the institutionalized system. We shall 
also consider the corresponding compulsively conformative types. 



[ 284 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

Finally we will be concerned with the further factor of indetermi- 
nacies, conflicts and differences of level of institutionalization of the 
value system and its attendant ideology, providing a basis for a claim 
to legitimacy for the deviant sub-collectivity. 

First then, let us assume that an overtly alienatively oriented ego 
is isolated in that the significant alters in his situation are all oriented 
to conformity with the institutionalized expectations. There is no 
company available to constitute the nucleus of a deviant sub-group 
nor any alternative institutionalized pattern which is congenial to 
legitimacy. 

Even under these highly simplified assumptions we can recog- 
nize the roots of certain empirical types of deviant patterning in a 
society like ours. In a very broad way we may say that the actively 
alienated person is predisposed toward individualized crime. By 
virtue of his active orientation he is inclined to defy sanctions, to 
challenge others to "do something about it." This of course leaves 
altogether open the question of what specific kinds of norms he is 
oriented against, and what other motivational complications may be 
involved. It should also be clear that such a person is not necessarily 
deviant in all respects. In particular, his active orientation may well 
be part of the institutionalized culture— he may be very much 
achievement-minded, but be under compulsion either to achieve 
goals defined as illegitimate or to achieve acceptable goals by means 
which are in contravention of the institutionalized normative 
patterns. 

On the other hand the passively oriented anti-conformist may be 
predisposed to such a pattern as "hoboism," to a maximal avoidance 
of implication in the positive expectation system of the society. The 
hobo, we may presume, is above all concerned to protect his free- 
dom, and is willing to pay what others would consider an exorbitant 
price for it. Above all he wants to be let alone to live his own life the 
way he wants to live it without recognizing any obligations to any- 
one. The person who has economic resources for a comparable free- 
dom without sacrificing ordinary living standards may be a psycho- 
logically comparable case; this is perhaps one factor in "Bohemian- 
ism." Perhaps it would be legitimate to place the schizophrenic as 
the extreme case in this direction, in that he cuts himself off from 



The Social Structure of Deviant Behavior [ 285 ] 

the ordinary interactive relationship nexus to an extreme degree and 
retreats virtually completely into his own private world. 

In both these types of cases we have abstracted from compli- 
cating combinations with other orientational factors. Illness, in our 
society, is undoubtedly motivated to a high degree and therefore 
may legitimately be regarded as a type of deviant behavior. There 
is little doubt that illness belongs predominantly in the passive- 
alienative category. But there seem to be at least two other features 
of the sick role. First there is an element of dependency, which in 
terms of our analysis means an element of conformative motivational 
orientation. Illness is predominantly a withdrawal into a depend- 
ent relation, it is asking to be "taken care of." It uses disability 
as the basis of legitimation of this claim. Since, unlike hoboism, 
illness implies the assertion of a claim upon others, it provides, as we 
shall see, a point of "leverage" for social control which is not so 
readily available without the underlying conformative motivational 
structure. Put a litde differendy, the sick person emphatically does 
not "bum his bridges" vis-a-vis the institutionalized system. Further- 
more the combination of both a dependency need and an alienative 
element in a generally passive orientation is psychologically readily 
understandable. Indeed it is hard to see how one could exist without 
at least some admixture of the other. 

In an actively oriented personality, similarly, the occurrence of 
a strong aggressively ahenative element is also certain to be com- 
bined with a conformative aspect of the need-disposition structure. 
The acting out of the actively defiant component in social situa- 
tions, however, obviously maximizes the pressure of the sanction 
system, since the rebel virtually makes it impossible for others not 
to try to suppress his deviance. Such a role as that of illness, in which 
the passive avoidance of obligations and overt dependency on others 
are combined, is therefore closed to him. But a motivational equiva- 
lent of the combination of alienative and conformative elements in 
illness is possible if the rebel can "team up" with others. This possi- 
bility will be taken up presently. 

The individual who has strong compulsively conformative need- 
dispositions constitutes a type whom it is more difficult to identify 
in the usual terms as clearly deviant. As we have seen, however, he 



[ 286 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

does definitely skew his behavior relative to institutionalized expec- 
tations. The actively oriented sub-type seems to have in our society 
at least two principal variants, or loci of emphasis, as we have seen. 
One is the compulsive achiever who places excessive demands on 
himself and on others, and who may also show his alienative motives 
by excessive competitiveness, an incapacity to tolerate normal chal- 
lenges to his security and adequacy. The other focus is the enforce- 
ment of his will and of normative patterns on others. He is the 
person who makes it his business to see that others toe the mark in 
excess of normal institutional expectations. The passive type on the 
other hand is best represented by the perfectionist or ritualist in 
Merton's sense. He evades normal fulfillment of expectations by 
making every excuse not to "stick his neck out." 

The next factor to be taken up is the possibility that ego can 
team up with one or more alters. In the active overtly alienative case 
this is exemplified above all by the criminal or delinquent gang. 
Such a gang has two obvious advantages over the situation of the 
individual criminal who "goes it alone." First, organization is by far 
the most eflFective way of coping with the overt sanctions which this 
pattern of deviance is the most certain to provoke. Second, ego and 
alter obviously by their partnership in crime reinforce each other's 
alienative need-dispositions. This greatly weakens the attitudinal 
sanctions of the normal institutionalized structure in that each has 
an alter to whom he can turn for approval of his action to offset the 
disapproval of the rest of society. 

But more than this the deviant is thereby enabled to act out hoth 
the conformative and alienative components of his ambivalent 
motivational structure. To do this he must of course make the sub- 
stitution of the pattern of the deviant sub-culture for that of the main 
social system. But having done this he can be compulsively con- 
formative within the deviant sub-group at the same time that he is 
compulsively alienated from the main institutional structure. 

The most important point is the opportunity provided by the 
existence of a deviant collectivity for ego to be overtly alienatiye 
vis-a-vis the relevant parts of the instutionalized system and at the 
same time conformative vis-a-vis the expectations of fellow gang 
members. Here the compulsive quality of the need to conform 
should be kept in mind. This fact may have an important bearing 



The Social Structure of Deviant Behavior [ 287 ] 

on various features of such delinquent sub-culture groups, such as 
the extreme concern with loyalty to the group and the violence of 
the condemnation of "ratting." The need for ego to feel that he is a 
member of a group which is genuinely solidary and which he can 
"count on" is compulsively intensified. 

This may become a peculiarly acute focus of strain for another 
reason. Our previous analysis would suggest that if the alienative 
need-disposition is combined with a strongly active orientation, the 
conformative component would, in relation to persons, tend to be 
oriented in a dominating and norm-enforcing direction. But clearly 
too widely distributed dominance is incompatible with the func- 
tional needs of a solidary group. The very fact that such a group 
must enforce a stringent discipline because it is in danger vis-a-vis 
the outside society, may mean that it is peculiarly shot through with 
internal strains, because more than in most groups it selects mem- 
bers who have a need to dominate which under the conditions of the 
group many of them cannot express. There is an impression that 
overt struggles for leadership break out especially readily in such 
groups and that they are peculiarly subject to "fission." If this is 
true it may be associated with this situation. 

There seem to be two main directions in which such tension may 
be mitigated. One is to "sublimate" the need for active conformism 
from dominance over persons within the group into the channel of 
excelling in the types of achievement which, in terms of the group 
norms, are the most valued. This may have something to do with 
the motivation to extraordinary risk-taking in such groups— such 
achievement is of course also a possible path toward the validation 
of a claim to leadership, that is, to a dominant role within the group. 
The second direction is the recruitment into the group of persons 
who are suited to play roles complementary to those of some of the 
more dominant group members. This phenomenon would seem to 
be very common; the presence in such groups of rather passively 
inclined and generally obedient types, who tend to be submissive to 
the dominant members. In certain sectors of the society such roles 
may be alternatives to that of illness. 

Thus from a certain point of view the roles of passively isolated 
avoidance-withdrawal and of active "criminal" destructiveness and 
rebelliousness may be considered the polar antithesis in the structure 



[ 288 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

of deviant behavior. When the conformist component of the am- 
bivalent motivational structure is given opportunity for acting out 
along with the alienative, the former pattern tends to shift into the 
pattern of illness, the latter into the criminal or delinquent gang 
or sub-culture. These, however, are clearly ideal types and fail to 
take account of many complicating factors. Thus it is altogether 
possible for the passively inclined personalities to form a sub-cultural 
group which instead of actively defying the institutionalized pat- 
terns and their personal bearers, asks essentially to be "let alone" 
to work out their patterns "in their own way." This seems to be the 
case with various exotic religious sects. Such roles may well be 
alternatives to that of illness. They also usually involve elements of 
active defiance here and there, but very likely as a secondary phe- 
nomenon. This would be true, for example, of Jehovah's Witnesses. 
This is understandable in the light of the general ubiquity of 
ambivalence in the motivation of deviance. 

To attempt to enter into the many possible complications of this 
order would, however, lead too far afield for the very general pur- 
poses of the present analysis. We have so far introduced two major 
components in the structuring of actual deviant behavior; first, the 
basic nature of the alienative need-disposition structure, and second, 
the availability in the social situation of roles which would mesh in 
with the complementary need-dispositions of others, especially in 
such a way as to enable the deviant to "eat his cake and have it" in 
the sense that within limits both sides of the ambivalent structure 
can be acted out. This is the salient feature of illness and the de- 
linquent gang as deviant patterns. Hoboism and individual crimi- 
nality are perhaps less important empirically precisely because they 
do not permit such a combination to a comparable degree. 

These two patterns are susceptible of further differentiation in 
terms of whether the primary alienative orientation is directed 
against normative patterns as such or against social objects, e.g., 
persons. With respect to individualized crime the obvious distinc- 
tion is that between crimes against persons and crimes against "law 
and order" or objects that symbolize normative rules. The prevalence 
of crimes against property in the pattern of urban delinquency is 
highly suggestive in this connection. This focus of differentiation 
can be readily extended to the delinquent sub-culture. One type of 



The Social Structure of Deviant Behavior [ 289 ] 

gang may be more concerned with punishing the types of people 
(including collectivities such as rival groups) who have incurred 
the wrath of its members. Another type may be more oriented to 
stealing. Most cases are presumably mixed, but the question of rela- 
tive primacy may nonetheless be significant. 

With regard to the passively oriented types, again the distinction 
seems significant. Hoboism in our society, and such variants as 
Bohemianism, seem to be above all oriented to passive evasion of 
obligations to live up to "the rules." Perhaps the schizoid direction 
of mental pathology on the other hand is more focused on avoid- 
ance of attachments to persons.^ When we turn to the types which 
combine outlets for both alienative and conformist components, 
again a distinction seems important. Illness seems particularly to in- 
volve orientation to dependency on persons, for understandable rea- 
sons perhaps mainly "mother figures" or physicians as "father fig- 
ures." The conformative component may on the other hand be 
expressed more in relation to the adequacy context in terms of a 
passively ritualistic conformism with pattern expectations, thus 
being a "good patient." 

This is clearly a complex field. There are many possible subtle 
combinations of the motivational elements we have considered here. 
They can, however, be used to generate hypotheses which should 
to a significant degree prove susceptible of empirical test. 

The compulsive conformist does not face the same problems of 
overtly breaking with the institutionalized value system as in the 
alienative case, indeed by definition the balance of motivational 
forces is opposed to this. There is, however, the possibility that such 
compulsive conformists will interact with each other in such a way 
that, relative to the main institutionalized value-pattern the expec- 
tation-sanction system becomes skewed so that there will be a typical 
pattern of deviance which is reinforced in the same way as in a 
deviant sub-culture, but without overt break by the formation of a 
new collectivity. 

Certain features of the dynamics of group prejudice seem to fit 
here. Vis-a-vis the members of an outgroup, our major value-patterns 

'' Demareth's findings are suggestive here. Cf . N. J. Demareth, Adolescent 
Status and the Individual, unpublished Ph.D. dissertation, Harvard University, 
1942. 



[ 290 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

call for an attitude of universalistic evaluation and treatment and 
tolerance for their own achievement-goals and needs within certain 
limits. Since Jews are admitted as legitimate members of the society 
the major value-pattern prescribes this type of attitude on the part 
of Gentiles toward Jews. What we call anti-Semitism constitutes in 
this respect a deviation from conformity with these features of the 
institutionalized value-system, especially in a particularistic direction. 

The hypothesis that the displacement of aggression on the Jew 
as a scapegoat object plays a part in anti-semitism has become almost 
a commonplace of social science. But from the point of view of the 
Gentile group this constitutes deviant behavior since the Jew is by 
the main value-pattern entitled to the same universalistically tolerant 
behavior as any fellow Gentile. Hence there is a strong pressure to 
"rationalize" his special treatment by such allegations as that he 
"does not compete fairly," and that he cannot be counted upon to 
be honest or loyal. Discrimination against him is thereby subsumed 
under the universalistic value system. So long as this type of legiti- 
mation is accepted and mutually reinforced within the Gentile 
group, or a sub-collectivity within it, we can have a reinforced pat- 
tern of deviant behavior without any individual having to accept the 
normal price of deviance in the form of an overt break with his 
institutionalized role and the risk of negative sanctions. Indeed, if 
the process goes far enough it is the person who conforms with the 
main value-pattern who is subject to negative sanctions. 

The compulsive conformist is in this situation able to accomplish 
the same splitting of the components of his ambivalent motivation 
as in the case of the member of the delinquent gang. The latter 
had to transfer his conformative needs to the deviant sub-group. The 
case of the anti-Semite is the obverse— the displacement of his 
alienative needs outside the group onto a scapegoat outgroup. 

An analogous type of process would seem to be involved in what 
is sometimes called bureaucratic "ossification." According to Mer- 
ton's description of the bureaucratic personality, he would in our 
terms be characterized as predominantly a passive compulsive con- 
formist. If the situational exigencies of role-performance in certain 
types of organization, and/or the process of selective recruitment of 
personnel in such roles, operate consistently in the direction of 
putting a premium on skewing the main achievement-values in the 



The Social Structure of Deviant Behavior [291] 

direction of "playing safe" and "not sticking one's neck out," there 
may well be a cumulative process, so that the "bureaucratic sub- 
culture" becomes in fact deviant without any overt break with the 
main institutionalized values. It would seem that such a process of 
cumulative skewing offered one very important possibility for social 
change since it avoids or minimizes some of the most obvious re- 
sistances to such change. 

What happens to the alienative component of the motivation in 
this case is less obvious than in that of anti-Semitism. It would seem 
that it was concentrated on passive resistance to the fulfillment of 
the normal expectations of the role. Once again this shows that the 
passively oriented person is not under the same pressure to split 
ambivalent needs as is the active. 

We may now turn to the question of the significance of the 
availability of a claim to legitimacy for the pattern of deviant be- 
havior. It should first be pointed out that this is a relative matter, 
since on one level the very existence of complementary roles in- 
volves values common to the interacting role-partners. Thus the 
willingness of an alter to take care of a sick person represents in 
itself a partial legitimation of the latter's illness; he is not in this 
particular relationship to be "punished" but "helped." Similarly in 
the delinquent gang the "partner in crime" is the focus of a partial 
legitimation. The gang has its own code and sanctions. Without the 
support of this partial legitimation the motivation to the pattern 
would be greatly weakened. 

The problem hence concerns the extension of the claim to 
legitimacy to a wider field. In the case of illness this is blocked by 
the conditional nature of the legitimation of the sick role which is 
granted in terms of the wider value-system. The claim to be taken 
care of is made contingent on admission that it would be a good 
thing to get well as expeditiously as possible. In the case of the de- 
linquent gang on the other hand the legitimation is limited to the 
sub-culture, which by definition is in overt conflict with the wider 
value-system. 

There seem to be two main possible types of situation which 
would further the extension of this claim to legitimation of an 
alienative pattern. One is the existence in the actual social situation 
of a conflict of patterns, such that ego is in a position to select a 



[ 292 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

legitimate alternative to the one against which he is alienated. If 
this alternative is part of the expectation system of the actual inter- 
action complex in which ego is involved, he is already subject to 
role-conflict in the sense discussed above and the present analysis 
thus constitutes a continuation of the discussion of that subject. He 
may deal with the conflict by seeking to escape the interaction 
situation in which the original pattern is institutionalized and 
move into the one in which the alternative prevails— a very common 
process in a complex society.^ 

The second type of situation is that in which there is a suffi- 
cient indefiniteness in the definition of the original pattern-expec- 
tations so that it is possible for ego without overt deviance to 
"interpret" the pattern in conformity with his deviant needs. These 
two are of course ideal type cases. In fact alternative expectation 
patterns normally shade into each other vdthout sharp discontinui- 
ties, especially along certain paths of transition. Thus a certain 
"liberalism" of religious orientation may be an alternative to "fun- 
damentalism." Ego's parental home may be strongly fundamentalist 
in its orientation, but his parents value education highly. This 
enables him to go away to college where he comes into contact with 
a liberal set of expectations. If he can segregate this college situa- 
tion from his parental home, e.g., by not talking about it when he 
is home for vacations, he can make the transition without an open 
break which would entail an overt definition of his attitude by his 
parents as deviant. He has achieved a legitimation of what in terms 
of the parental values was a deviant need-disposition. In general 
the presence of these bridges of common value-orientation between 
alternative patterns is one of the most important phenomena in 
this field. 

The legitimation of a deviant pattern immediately shifts it from 
the status of an individual to that of a collective phenomenon. 

® This is one of several points at which the theory of "reference groups" be- 
comes of great importance to the analysis of social systems. Ego is conceived as 
standing at the point of intersection between a system of interactive participations. 
Within limits the institutionalized patterns of his roles permit him freedom of 
choice as to which shall have priority. Beyond these limits conflicting expectations 
may be forced upon him. The structure of alternatives open to him is an essential 
component in the determination of his behavior. Cf. Merton and Kitt's paper in 
Merton and Lazarsfeld, Eds., Continuities in Social Research. 



The Social Structure of Deviant Behavior [ 293 ] 

Those whose orientations reciprocally legitimate each other consti- 
tute a collectivity which is a sub-system of the social system. It is 
obvious that when an individual has attained this type of interactive 
support it becomes immensely more difficult to undermine his moti- 
vation to deviance. Very simply his deviance is strongly rewarded. 

In general two other sets of factors contribute to the further 
strengthening of deviant motivations which have an anchor in legit- 
imation within a collectivity. The first of these is the degree of 
difficulty of stigmatizing the sub-culture pattern as illegitimate in 
terms of the wider value system. This is a function of the relative 
prominence of what have been called the "bridge" elements between 
the two value-systems. Thus at one end of the scale the delinquent 
sub-culture, though it may have a strongly enforced code within 
itself, is relatively weak in bridges to the wider value system. The 
elementary security of property and the person are such widely and 
deeply institutionalized values that delinquent gangs do not readily 
find allies outside their own numbers. Moreover, on the relevant 
levels, these value-patterns are not seriously ambiguous. At the 
other end of the scale a "leftist" political movement has many such 
bridges. Most of the "ideological issues" which define the difference 
of value systems concern highly abstract and general formulae 
which are open to much "interpretation." Moreover, many of the 
abstract formulae, such as the desirability of "social justice," of 
"democracy" or of "peace" are shared in common. Who is to say 
whether one interpretation is more legitimate than the other? 
Movements which exploit the generalities and ambiguities of domi- 
nant value-systems and their accompanying ideologies are hence 
particularly difficult to control by any means which involves de- 
priving them of the claim of legitimacy. 

The second set of factors which further the claim to legitima- 
tion is that involved in the development of a strong defensive morale 
of the deviant group. This is the homologue of the secondary gain 
of the individual neurotic, and may in fact be psychologically con- 
tinuous with it in that the mutual support of the group members 
in their deviance adds both to their investment in the maintenance 
of the deviant pattern and to the risks of abandonment of it. This is 
true on rational levels, but also on non-rational and unconscious 
levels. The anxiety as to what would happen if the deviant pattern 



[ 294 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

were abandoned is greatly strengthened by clear and unequivocal 
attitudes on the part of the other members of the group; ego would 
be clearly a traitor who was guilty of letting them down if he aban- 
doned them or questioned the legitimacy of their position. This 
situation tends to favor transferring ego's security needs to his 
fellow group members; in short, attaching the motivational factors 
involved in any institutionalized rolc-systcm, to contormity with the 
norms of the deviant sub-cultural collectivity. 

To a certain degree these two factors in the legitimization prob- 
lem are antithetical to each other, in that defensive morale is in 
part a function of the clear definition of conflict, thus of having 
"burned bridges." The deviant sub-group which is making the most 
of its claims to legitimacy will not in general tend to maximize the 
possibilities of heightening the defensive morale of its members by 
accentuating the radicality of their differences from the main value- 
system too much. However, especially by the path of interpretation, 
there is an important possibility of making the best of both these 
worlds, namely by turning the tables on the wider society and declar- 
ing the latter's value-orientations to be illegitimate in its own terms. 
The full-fledged revolutionary or prophetic religious movement gen- 
erally does just this. But even so this procedure is seldom carried 
out as radically as might be thought possible. The fact that ambiva- 
lent motivational structures are involved is clearly shown by the 
very common vacillation between on the one hand an attitude 
almost of pleading to the outgrouper to recognize the devotion of 
the deviant to the "real" values of the society and their applicability 
to him, and on the other the expression of violent aggression toward 
the same outgroupers. For example the Communists certainly often 
quite self-consciously exploit the patterns of freedom of speech and 
the like in liberal societies, but certainly in the rank and file there 
is widespread feeling that in justice they have a right to expect every 
"consideration" from the law. But at the same time that they insist 
on this right they indulge in wholesale denunciation of the "sys- 
tem" of which it is an institutionalized part. The rationalistic tend- 
encies of our common sense thinking easily obscure the ambivalent 
character of the motivations involved in such a movement. It 
scarcely seems possible, considering the processes of recruitment 
and the position of such a movement in our society, that very 



The Social Structure of Deviant Behavior [ 295 ] 

many of its members should be anything but deeply ambivalent 
about the position they have taken. This ambivalence would be 
expected to be manifested in inconsistencies of attitudes and be- 
haviour as M^ell as in the well-known fierce defensiveness whenever 
the legitimacy of their position is questioned. Where the Com- 
munist ideology has been institutionalized in a Communist state the 
situation may, of course, be quite different. 

With reference to the claim to legitimacy, there is one further 
consideration of such general significance that it requires a brief 
discussion here. This is the place occupied in all cultural traditions 
of complex societies by a "romantic-utopian" element which is 
pardy and in some sense equivocally institutionalized. The origins 
of this element appear to lie in the fundamental fact that every 
social system imposes disciplines on its component individual actors, 
and that these disciplines are never completely and fully accepted 
in the sense that they are fully integrated in the personality struc- 
ture of the actors without alienative elements and hence ambiva- 
lence. There is always the element of wishing that this did not 
have to be, and there are always elements of fantasy about states 
of affairs where the frustrating restrictions do not apply, where 
everything is, in this wish-fulfillment sense, as it "ought" to be. 
What the content of this romantic-utopian element will be will 
depend on what particular disciplines are enforced in the society 
and the complex psychological reactions to these disciplines at all 
levels of the process of socialization. 

The ways in which such elements may be handled in a cul- 
tural tradition are also various. Some of them may be expressed in 
artistic form in such a way as to divorce them drastically from the 
possibility of the implication of commitments in action. However 
important and authentic the frame of reference of the "problem of 
meaning" undoubtedly is in relation to religion, the displacement of 
frustrated wishes into the transcendental sphere seems to be one 
exceedingly common if not universal component of religions, for 
example the conception of a state where complete and perfect psy- 
chological security will exist, where the infallible love of God makes 
up for the deficiencies of finite human love, or where the element 
of coercion which to some degree seems to be inherent in human 
societies, is thought to be totally absent. 



[ 296 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

Some of these elements, however, find their way into definitions 
of the desirable in concrete social relationships, and under certain 
circumstances the ethically obligatory. They seem to play a promi- 
nent part in most "charismatic" religious and political movements, 
certainly in the Western world. The fact that much of our cultural 
tradition derives from the institutionalization of the values and 
ideologies of such movements— notably the various branches of 
Christianity and the rationalistic-revolutionary "ideas" of the En- 
lightenment—means that these elements have played a very promi- 
nent part in the cultural tradition of Western society. 

This, in addition to the high incidence of generality of norms 
implied in a universalistic value system, is one of the principal 
reasons why the element of generality and ambiguity is so promi- 
nent in our patterns of value-orientation. An open break with the 
symbolic formulae on which great social structures have been 
founded would involve a very high cost indeed. The easier way has 
been to meet the exigencies of realistic situations by interpretation, 
thus the wish to be free from any coercion whatever, and the ideal- 
ization of such a state, shifts into some such conception as "freedom 
under law." 

Tliis adaptation by interpretation, however, leaves what may be 
called a latent reservoir of legitimation possibilities in the more 
radically romantic or Utopian elements of the cultural tradition. A 
movement which utilizes these can attach in many cases to exactly 
the same symbols as the institutionalized culture uses. Thus such 
symbols as freedom and justice may receive interpretations incom- 
patible with the functional needs of the institutionalized order. But, 
precisely in terms of the approved cultural tradition, it is not pos- 
sible to stigmatize these interpretations out of hand as illegitimate. 
Taking advantage of these latent legitimation possibilities is one of 
the most important characteristics of deviant movements. 

This becomes all the more important when it is seen that such 
definitions of the situation may well have important correspondences 
wath the motivational patterns present in a population. The aliena- 
tive elements are part of it. But it is particularly important that 
linking with firmly established symbols of the cultural tradition 
makes it possible to a degree to eat your cake and have it. The basic 
pattern is to put the established values and status-persons "in the 



The Mechanisms of Social Control [ 297 ] 

wrong" with respect to what purports to be the value-system they 
themselves subscribe to. This can be particularly effective, not only 
because general formulae have to be restricted in a realistic direc- 
tion by interpretation, but because every complex social system is 
in fact shot through with conflicts and adaptive patterns with re- 
spect to whatever value-system it may have. The Utopian deviant 
can then almost always derive a profound self-justification from the 
question "do you really mean it?" with respect to the obligation to 
conform to an ideal pattern. He puts himself in a highly favorable 
light by saying or implying "You merely pay lip service to this ideal, 
I will show that I really intend to act upon it." It may be suggested 
that this is one of the points at which the modern liberal-individu- 
alistic type of society is most vulnerable to a breakdown of its 
system of social control. The diversion of deviant motivational 
elements into alternative channels would seem to be particularly 
important in such a society. 

Before closing this section it should be noted that the above dis- 
cussion of the social structuring of deviant behavior has been illus- 
trated almost entirely in terms of the American or at most the 
modem Western institutional structure and value-system. It would 
lead too far afield to attempt to develop corresponding illustrations 
of the main deviant possibilities for other principal types of social 
structure. There is no reason to doubt that the conceptual scheme 
developed here for statement of the problems and approach to their 
solution is, with proper adaptation, equally applicable to the analysis 
of deviance from any type of value pattern and within any type of 
institutional structure. 

In many other respects the above analysis is very incomplete. It 
should suffice, however, to show how the analysis of the genesis and 
consequences of deviance can be fitted into the general scheme of 
the analysis of social systems with which we are concerned. 

§ THE MECHANISMS OF SOCIAL CONTROL 

THE theory of social control is the obverse of the theory of 
the genesis of deviant behavior tendencies. It is the analysis of those 
processes in the social system which tend to counteract the deviant 
tendencies, and of the conditions under which such processes will 
operate. Like the theory of deviance, it must always be stated relative 



[ 298 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

to a given state of equilibrium of the system or sub-system which in- 
clude specification of the normative patterns institutionalized in that 
sub-system, and the balance of motivational forces relative to con- 
formity with and deviance from these patterns. 

Hence the stable equilibrium of the interactive process is the 
fundamental point of reference for the analysis of social control just 
as it is for the theory of deviance. But our attention will be focused 
on one aspect of the interactive process, the forestalling of the kinds 
of deviant tendencies we have analyzed earlier in the chapter, and 
the processes by which, once under way, these processes can be 
counteracted and the system brought back, in the relevant respects, 
to the old equilibrium state. This latter is, of course a theoretical 
point of reference. In empirical fact no social system is perfectly 
equilibrated and integrated. Deviant motivational factors are always 
operating, and become established so that they are not eliminated 
from the motivational systems of the relevant actors. In that case the 
mechanisms of social control account not for their elimination but 
for the limitation of their consequences, and for preventing their 
spread to others beyond certain limits. 

There are such close relations between the processes of socializa- 
tion and of social control that we may take certain features of the 
processes of socialization as a point of reference for developing a 
framework for the analysis of the processes of control. The preven- 
tive or forestalling aspects of social control consist in a sense of 
processes which teach the actor not to embark on processes of de- 
viance. They consist in his learning how not to rather than how to in 
the positive sense of socialization. The re-equilibrating aspects on the 
other hand are a special case of the learning process in that they 
involve the unlearning of the alienative elements of the motivational 
structure. 

Perhaps the key to the relationship of the two sets of processes 
is to be found in the fact that both socialization and social control 
consist from one point of view in processes of adjustment to strains, 
the strains either may eventuate in deviant motivation or, previous 
strains already having done so, a secondary strain may be introduced 
into the system by the pressure on it of the established deviant moti- 
vations. 

Strain, we may assume without going into all the psvchological 



The Mechanisms of Social Control [ 299 ] 

complexities, provokes four main types or components of reaction 
namely anxiety, fantasy, hostile or aggressive hitting-back or 
hitting-out reactions, and defensive measures in the sense of at- 
tempts to limit the deviation from ego's expectations and/or restore 
the status quo ante. Indeed all the reactions may on one level be 
interpreted in the latter light, but at a more differentiated level it is 
useful to distinguish these elements. Effective measures of control 
must in some sense operate on all these elements of the motivational 
structure. 

One whole important class of such measures operates only on the 
level of dealing with overt behavior. These are the measures which 
by compulsion, and by appeal to rational decision through coercion 
or inducement, prevent certain actions or deter from them or from 
carrying them beyond narrow limits. The empirical significance of 
these aspects of the social control system is not to be doubted, but 
our concern is with the subtler underlying motivational aspects. 

The first element of any social control mechanism in the latter 
sense may be called "support." Its primary direct significance is in 
relation to the anxiety component of the reaction to strain, to give a 
basis of reassurance such that the need to resort to aggressive- 
destructive and/or defensive reactions is lessened. Support may be 
of various kinds, but the common element is that somewhere there 
is the incorporation or retention of ego in a solidary relationship so 
that he has a basis of security in the sense of the above discussions. 
The stability of the love attitudes of the mother in critical phases of 
socialization is one fundamental type of case. The collectivity- 
orientation of the therapist, his readiness to "help" and his "under- 
standing" of the patient is another. These types differ fundamentally 
as role-pattern types and yet they have this common element. In one 
sense the consequence of support is to localize the focus of strain, by 
making it possible for ego to feel that his insecurity is not "total" 
but can be focused on a limited problem area for adjustment. 

Quite clearly, however, the element of support cannot be uncon- 
ditional in the sense that whatever ego does is met with a favorable 
response from alter; in that case there could be no control exerted 
over ego's motivation; he would be directly rewarded for continuing 
and possibly extending his deviance. 

Support could not be effective as reassurance if there were no 



[ 300 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

element of permissiveness relative to the pattern system from which 
ego deviates. We may say that people under strain are, whether alter 
is fully aware of it or not, expected to deviate in some ways and to 
some extent, to do and say things which would not be tolerated if 
the circumstances, or their own states were wholly normal. (The 
child is understood to be under strain in "having to learn.") In 
general this permissiveness is to be interpreted as toleration of 
"natural" reactions to the frustration of expectations. These will of 
course be of one order if alienative motivation has not become 
established, and of another order if it has. This is the basis for a 
fundamental differentiation of types of mechanisms of social control, 
namely, whether it is necessary to cope with the vicious circle 
phenomena or not. 

Permissiveness, must, however, be strictly limited if it is not to 
lead to the encouragement instead of the forestalling of the vicious 
circle. Hence there is a balance between areas of permissiveness and 
of restriction on it. The most fundamental form of the latter may, in 
the light of our analysis, be seen to be the refusal of alter to recipro- 
cate certain of the expectations which ego develops under the 
pressure of his anxiety, his fantasies, his hostility and his defensive- 
ness. Indeed support itself is in one sense a refusal on alters part to 
"justify" ego's anxieties by reacting as ego fears that he might. 
Similarly, alter will refuse normally to reciprocate ego's hostility by 
being hostile in return, or will for example not accept either domi- 
nance or submission from ego. The most fundamental difference be- 
tween a vicious circle-building reaction on alter's part and a social 
control reaction seems thus to be the combination of permissiveness 
with the discipline of refusal to reciprocate. Exactly in what areas 
this combination will operate and how the balance will be held will 
vary with the nature of the strains to which ego is exposed and with 
the role structure of the interaction system. There is, however, the 
common element that the refusal to reciprocate, like the support, is 
legitimized in terms of the institutionalized value patterns which in 
this case we may assume ego has previously internalized. 

With respect to all three basic aspects, support, permissiveness 
and restriction of reciprocation, there is a further important distinc- 
tion between the extents to which alter's action is consciously ma- 
nipulative or is not. Many of the most fundamental elements of social 



The Mechanisms of Social Control [ 301 ] 

control are built into the role structure of the social system in such 
a way that neither ego not alter is conscious of what goes on. Their 
functions are wholly latent functions. On occasion, however, one 
or more of them may be manipulated with greater or less awareness 
of what the actor is doing. These are deliberately imposed sanctions, 
and may touch any one of the three aspects of the control problem 
we have distinguished. Again in line with our previous analysis we 
may hold that the most fundamental elements of this manipulation 
concern the "relational rewards," that is, alter's attitudes of love, 
approval and esteem. There are of course other extremely impor- 
tant aspects of the control relationship, notably the control of com- 
mimication, but the attitude elements must, it is clear, have a 
critically important place. 

The process of psychotherapy is the case in our own society 
where these fundamental elements of the processes of social control 
have been most explicitly brought to light. For certain purposes, as 
we shall point out a number of times, it can serve as a prototype of 
the mechanisms of social control. It should not, however, be for- 
gotten that psychotherapy has a number of special features not 
shared by many other mechanisms involving the same fundamental 
elements. First, it is carried out in a professional role of a specialized 
type, and qualifications must be made for the differences of this role 
structure from those involved in many other types of social control. 
Secondly, in its classic form, it is carried out in a one-to-one rela- 
tionship of two persons, not a group interaction process, whereas 
many mechanisms operate through more complex group situations. 
Third, the cultural patterns of scientific knowledge of psychological 
processes and, hence, the value-standards of scientific objectivity 
play a prominent role not to be found in many other cases, and, 
finally, the therapist extends his conscious manipulation of the situ- 
ation and of the reward system in the light of his own theory, much 
farther than the case for many other types of mechanism. 

It should immediately be evident on general grounds that the 
most fundamental mechanisms of social control are to be found in 
the normal processes of interaction in an institutionally integrated 
social system. The essentials of these processes have been analyzed 
and illustrated throughout the earlier chapters of this work. Hence 
it is necessary here only to add a few points. The central phenomena 



[ 302 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

are to be found in the institutional integration of motivation and the 
reciprocal reinforcement of the attitudes and actions of the different 
individual actors involved in an institutionalized social structure. 
These considerations apply to any one pattern of role-expectations. 
But institutionalization has integrative functions on various levels, 
both with reference to the different roles in which any one actor is 
involved, and to the coordination of the behavior of different in- 
dividuals. The latter has been dealt with in a number of contexts. 

A few remarks, are, however, in order in the former context. The 
individual engages in a wide variety of different activities and be- 
comes involved in social relationships with a large number of differ- 
ent people whose relations to him vary greatly. One of the primary 
functions of institutionalization is to help order these different 
activities and relationships so that they constitute a sufficiently co- 
ordinated system, to be manageable by the actor and to minimize 
conflicts on the social level. There are two particularly interesting 
aspects of this ordering. One is the establishment of a time schedule 
so that different times are "set aside" for different activities, with 
different people. "Time off" from occupational obligations on Sun- 
days, holidays, vacations, etc. is one example. The fact that there is 
a time for each of many different activities— and also a place— keeps 
the claims of each from interfering with those of the others. In fact 
a society so complex as ours probably could not function without 
relatively rigid time scheduling, and the problem of the cultural 
values and psychological need-disposition structure of such a time 
organization is of great importance. We know that in many societies 
the motivational prerequisites for fitting into such a time-orientation 
do not exist. 

A second major area is the establishment of institutionalized 
priorities. Especially in a relatively free and mobile society it is 
inevitable that people should become involved in situations where 
conflicting demands are made upon them. It is quite obvious that 
such situations are sources of serious potential conflict. This can be 
minimized if there is a legitimized priority scale so that in choosing 
one obligation above the other the individual can in general be 
backed by the sentiments of a common value system. It is indeed 
in areas where this scheme of priorities is indefinite or not well 
integrated that loopholes for deviance are most common. One ex- 



The Mechanisms of Social Control [ 303 ] 

ample of such a potential conflict may be cited. A physician has 
peculiarly shaq)ly emphasized obligations to his patients. But he also 
has important obligations to his family. Far more than in most occu- 
pations he is often called away at times when the family has im- 
portant claims on him— meal times, evenings when social engage- 
ments may be scheduled, etc. The institutionalized expectation of 
the priority of the claims of patients is indispensable to the physician 
in dealing with his wife on such an occasion. As Merton has so well 
analyzed, the exposure to situations of such conflict without clearly 
institutionalized priorities of obligations is a very important aspect 
of anomie. 

The above considerations do not however concern mechanisms 
of social control in a strict sense though they describe essential 
aspects of the background on which we must understand the opera- 
tion of such mechanisms. When we turn to the consideration of 
normal social interaction within such an institutionalized framework 
as a process of mutually influenced and contingent action we see that 
a process of social control is continually going on. Actors are con- 
tinually doing and saying things which are more or less "out of line," 
such as by insinuation impugning someone's motives, or presuming 
too much. Careful observation will show that others in the situation 
often without being aware of it, tend to react to these minor devi- 
ances in such a way as to bring the deviant back "into line," by 
tactfully disagreeing with him, by a silence which underlines the 
fact that what he said was not acceptable, or very often by humor as 
a tension-release, as a result of which he comes to see himself more 
nearly as others see him. These minor control mechanisms are, it 
may be maintained, the way in which the institutionalized values are 
implemented in behavior. They are, on a certain level, the most 
fundamental mechanisms of all, and only when they break down 
does it become necessary for more elaborate and specialized mecha- 
nisms to come into play. 

Beyond the scope of such mechanisms there are points in the 
social system at which people are exposed to rather special strains. 
In a good many such cases we find special phenomena which have 
been interpreted to function at least in part as mechanisms for 
"coping" with such strains with a minimum of disruptive conse- 
quences for the social system. Two types may be briefly discussed. 



[ 304 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

One is the type of situation where because of uncertainty factors or 
specially acute adjustment problems there is exposure to what, for 
the persons concerned, is an unusual strain. In general the field of 
religion and magic yields many examples of this. The problem of 
uncertainty in the health field and of bereavement are good ex- 
amples. The reactions which such unusual strains tend to produce 
are of the character noted above. They both include potentially 
disruptive components and are unstructured in relation to the social 
system. In the case of uncertainty, as in gardening in the Trobriands, 
one of these may be discouragement, a general tendency to with- 
drawal. Similarly in the case of bereavement, there may be a loss of 
incentive to keep on going. Ritual on such occasions serves to organ- 
ize the reaction system in a positive manner and to put a check on 
the disruptive tendencies.® 

One aspect of such ritual patterns is always the permissive one 
of giving an opportunity for "acting out" symbolically the wishes 
and emotional tensions associated with the situation of strain. It pro- 
vides opportunities for a permissive relaxation of some of the dis- 
ciplines of everyday life which are characterized in part by a rela- 
tively strict pressure to reality-orientation. But at the same time it 
is by no means a completely free and untrammeled opportunity for 
expression. Action is on the contrary strictly channeled into cul- 
turally prescribed forms, which prevent "wandering all over the lot." 
It is a conspicuous feature of such rituals that they are communally 
prescribed and thus give the support of emphasizing group concern 
with the situation. They also symbolically assert the dominant value 
attitudes, thus in the case of death for instance the importance of 
the survivors going on living in terms of that value system, redefin- 
ing the solidarity with the deceased in these terms: it is "what he 
would have wished."^" 

^ Almost the classic analysis of this type of function of ritual is Malinowski's 
analysis of funeral ceremonies in Magic, Science and Religion. As Kroeber, op. cit., 
notes, however, there are still important problems of the universality of the 
relationship between such strains and ritual which must be further studied. 

^° We shall discuss in the next two chapters some of the ways in which the 
religious orientation of a society can be of the first importance with reference to its 
general system of values in the secular sphere. The control mechanisms in certain 
areas of special strain tend in turn to be integrated with both. This is the essential 
difference between the view of religion taken here and that of Kardiner in The 
Individual and His Society. The latter tends to treat it overwhelmingly as a 



The Mechanisms of Social Control [ 3^5 1 

A slightly different type of structuring of behavior which is cer- 
tainly in part significant as a mechanism of control is what may be 
called the "secondary institution." The American youth culture is a 
good example. Like ritual it has its conspicuous permissive aspect, so 
much so that it shades over into explicit deviance. In this permissive 
aspect it also may be regarded as primarily a "safety valve" of the 
social system in that attempting to keep youth completely in line 
with adult disciplines would probably greatly increase the strains of 
their position. But it also has more positive control aspects. One of 
these is the integration of the youth culture with major institutional 
structures, mainly in the field of formal education. This not only 
brings it under direct adult supervision, but it legitimizes some of 
the patterns, for example athletics and dances. In spite of the 
deviant fringe, the existence of such a legitimized core undoubtedly 
keeps down the total amount of deviance. 

Finally there are certain "self-liquidating" features of the youth 
culture which are relatively hard to identify but probably quite im- 
portant. In a variety of ways, through the experience of youth cul- 
ture activities and relationships the individual in the optimum case 
goes through a process of emotional development to the point where 
he ceases to need youth culture and "graduates" into full adult 
status. Of course in this as in many features of our social control 
system there are innumerable "miscarriages." But broadly speaking 
it is extremely probably that on the whole the net effect tends to 
be emotionally "maturing." For example, the very insistence on 
independence from adult control accustoms the individual to take 
more and more responsibility on his own. In the youth culture phase 
he tends to substitute dependency on his peer group for that on the 
parents, but gradually he becomes emancipated from even this de- 
pendency. Similarly in the relations of the sexes the youth culture 
offers opportunities and mechanisms for emotional maturation. The 
element of rebelliousness against the adult world helps to emanci- 
pate from more immature object-attachments, while certain features 
of the "rating and dating" complex protect the individual during the 
process of this emancipation from deeper emotional involvements 

"projective system" which expresses motivational elements which are blocked by 
the disciphnes of secular life. This is undoubtedly one major aspect of the matter, 
but only one. 



[ 3o6 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

than he is yet able to accept. The very pubHcity of such relation- 
ships within the peer group serves as such a protection. Thus the 
youth culture is not only projective but also exposes the individual 
passing through it to positively adjustive influences.^^ 

It will be noted that the above mechanisms operate within the 
framework of socially legitimated interaction. Within the normal 
processes of nipping of minor deviances in the bud of course no 
differentiated social structures are involved at all. In the case of 
"safety-valve" mechanisms like ritual, and of secondary institutional 
patterns, there are special social structures. These entail a limited 
permissiveness for modes of behavior and types of emotional ex- 
pression which would be tabooed in ordinary everyday life, e.g., the 
display of "grief" at funeral ceremonies. But this permissiveness 
is rather narrowly limited, and it is of the greatest importance that 
it operates within a system of interaction which is continuous with 
the main institutionalized social structure, differing from it only 
with respect to occasion, or as in the case of the youth culture, to 
stage in the socialization process. The behavior is emphatically not 
stigmatized as deviant, but is legitimized for people in the relevant 
situations. They are treated in the present context because of their 
relevance to the control of potentially deviant motivational elements. 

Thus it is clear that some balance of permissiveness and its 
restriction is maintained. Support is clearly given through the insti- 
tutionalized legitimation of the patterns in question and the result- 
ing solidarity. Generally speaking, however, there is little conscious 
manipulation of sanctions. 

It has been noted several times that secondary institutions like 
the youth culture shade into actual deviance. ^^ It may next be noted 

^^ Suggestive evidence of the importance of the youth culture in this connec- 
tion is given in Demareth's study of a sample of schizophrenics. An early 
"maturity" of interests combined with lack of participation in youth culture 
activities was highly characteristic of the group. Not one of the 20 had established 
satisfactory heterosexual relationships on a youth culture level. It may well be 
that without the youth culture there would be many more schizophrenic break- 
downs. See N. J. Demareth, Adolescent Status and the Individual, unpublished 
Ph.D. dissertation, Harvard University, 1942. It is also suggestive that one ele- 
ment of alcoholism for men may be connected with over-involvement in the youth 
culture and failure to become emancipated from it at the proper time. The 
alcoholic may be in part an adolescent who is unsuccessfully trying to be an adult. 

^^ It may be remarked that this is true not only of the "frivolous" youth 
culture which has been predominant in the United States, but also of the "serious" 



The Mechanisms of Social Control [ 307 ] 

that there are in a complex society many phenomena which are 
either on the edge of deviance or in important respects shade off into 
what is definitely deviant. These resemble secondary institutions ex- 
cept that the legitimacy of their broad status is more in question, 
the society often being seriously divided about it. One of the most 
striking of these is gambling. E. C. Devereux has recently made by 
far the fullest sociological study in this field yet attempted. ^^ The 
conclusion of a careful analysis is that it would be seriously disrup- 
tive to the society either to attempt to suppress gambling radically 
or to remove all the restrictions on it. On the one hand gambling 
performs important functions for large classes in the population, 
very similar to those of magic, as a kind of acting out of tensions 
which are symbolically at least associated with the economic sphere. 
On the other hand the values and sentiments which in one con- 
nection justify or rationalize the objections to gambling play a highly 
significant role in the general value system, and full permissiveness 
to gambling could not be allowed without undermining these values 
in other important spheres. 

It may be that in view of this situation, to call gambling a 
"mechanism of social control" is stretching a point. But the exist- 
ence of such behavioral phenomena, is intimately connected with 
the problem of social control, and not merely in the aspect of 
deviance from certain values. At the least it can probably be said 
that it is not merely a symptom of social disorganization, but of a 
social structure which is sufficiently elastic, even at the expense of 
serious cultural conflict, to relieve strains by permitting a good deal 
of this type of behavior, and yet to keep it sufficiently within bounds 
so that it is not too disruptive in the opposite direction. Devereux's 
analysis at least suggests that it is a mechanism for expressing and 
thus releasing strains related to the economic context which, if this 
outlet were completely closed, might be diverted into other more 

youth culture. This undoubtedly played an important part in the Nazi movement 
in Germany, and in this as in other countries contributes significantly to the 
recruitment of radical political movements and some religious sects. It is interesting 
that the deviant fringe of the frivolous youth culture shades off into delinquency, 
crime, etc., while that of the serious version shades into movements for social 
change which strongly emphasize the claim to legitimacy. 

^^ See E. C. Devereux, Jr., The Sociology of Gambling, unpublished Ph.D. 
dissertation, Harvard University, 1949. 



[308] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

dysfunctional channels. It is notable that gambling of certain sorts 
like "playing the numbers" is particularly prevalent among the 
economically disadvantaged groups. 

Whatever the verdict on the basis of better knowledge on the 
question of the functional significance of such semi-deviant activities 
as gambling may turn out to be, this case calls attention to a most 
important more general consideration. This is the functional im- 
portance to the society of certain phenomena which from one point 
of view constitute imperfections in its cultural or institutional inte- 
gration. One of these is the delicate balance involved in our pattern 
of religious toleration. Certainly in a broad sense religion is closely 
related to the integration of the social system, and the ideal type of 
a fully integrated society of a certain kind would have one com- 
pletely integrated religious system. This is true, but at the same time 
the attempt to integrate the religious structure of our society in that 
way, unless it came about by a gradual process probably involving 
profound changes in other respects, would undoubtedly be highly 
disruptive, perhaps to the point of precipitating civil war. In the 
circumstances the very looseness of the religious integration is func- 
tionally important.^'* 

Other examples which have been or will be discussed are the 
limitations on formal controls and status-rankings. There are many 
others. In such a situation there is great functional importance in 
relative insulation of many sub-systems of the larger society from 
each other by occasion or otherwise. In the absence of such insulat- 
ing mechanisms it would not be possible to prevent the conflicting 
elements from direct confrontation with each other, resulting in the 
transformation of a latent into an open conflict. 

In personal relations "tact" is such an insulating mechanism. It 
consists in the calculated avoidance of expressing certain sentiments 
and of the raising of certain questions which, if they had to be 
direcdy faced, might disrupt the relationship system. There is a 
gradual shading off from tact to the "white lie" which makes it pos- 

^'* The individualism of a social system which institutionalizes a universalistic- 
achievement value system precludes religious integration of the type either of an 
authoritarian established church or of the traditionalistic fixity of many non- 
literate religions. 



The Mechanisms of Social Control [ 309 ] 

sible, often by tacit mutual agreement, to keep potentially conflict- 
ing things apart. 

Anonymity also serves this function. In general the segregation 
of both activities and population elements does so. It is true that 
this segregation often breaks down social controls which operate 
successfully in smaller less internally differentiated communities. 
But there is another side to the picture; they also make possible the 
coexistence of potentially conflicting elements. The importance of 
this for the kind of flexibility which permits change is clear. 
Traditionalism in the sense which is obstructive even of desirable 
changes is very generally associated with a kind and degree of inte- 
gration which mobilizes the full force of control mechanisms against 
almost any kind of innovation. A society in which there is a good 
deal of "disorganization" and "pathology" is almost certainly the 
necessary price of dynamic openness to progressive change. The 
balance between flexibility and disorganization is delicate. 

With consideration of the functional significance of insulation 
we have introduced mechanisms which presuppose that alienative 
motivation relative to some parts of the social structure has come to 
be established. The first class of mechanisms we shall consider in 
this connection are, given its existence, concerned with limiting its 
impact on the rest of the social system. 

The insulation mechanisms just spoken of may thus be inter- 
preted as having the function of preventing potentially conflicting 
elements in the culture and social structure from coming into the 
kind of contact which would be likely to lead to open conflict or to 
exacerbate it— conflict is kept relatively latent. These apply in so 
far as a structuring on the collective level has already taken place. 
The mechanisms which may be summed up as isolating, on the 
other hand, have the function of forestalling even this structuring, 
and the development of appropriate cultural patterns around which 
it could be built. There are therefore two primary facets, the pre- 
vention of the formation of group structures with their greater 
intrenchment of deviance, and the prevention of a successful claim 
to legitimacy except perhaps in specifically limited ways. 

The two leading patterns in our society which exemplify this 
set of mechanisms in different ways are those of crime and of illness. 



[ 3 1 o J Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

In the case of crime the primary emphasis is on the deprivation 
of the claim to legitimacy, and even where the prevention of group 
structures has not been successful the illegitimacy of the acts gen- 
erally has been maintained. Thus it is important to realize that the 
purely negative aspect of criminal behavior is only part of the story. 
The criminal is not merely one who refuses to conform, but in 
refusing to do so in certain ways he is placed by others in his situa- 
tion in a specific institutionally defined role. That is, both the role 
expectations applied to the performer of a criminal act from then 
on and the sanction system are quite specifically structured so as to 
"push" the deviant into a certain type of position. 

Undoubtedly the structure of this sanction system in the case of 
crime has deterrent effects, except in the cases where the vicious 
circle of motivational structuring discussed above has gone too far 
for them to be effective. But it may be asked why, apart from merely 
keeping the criminal out of circulation, does society go on punishing 
even where the vicious circle exists and it will not "cure" the 
criminal. Durkheim was the first to point out clearly that punish- 
ment had another highly significant set of functions than the im- 
mediate "protection" of society. It is, in a sense, a ritual expression 
of the sentiments which uphold the institutionalized values which 
the criminal has violated. ^^ This ritual expression serves to con- 
solidate those sentiments and above all to strengthen them in that 
part of the population which has positive but latent motivations to 
the deviance being punished. Punishment is thus a kind of declara- 
tion that "you are either with us or against us," and tends to mobi- 
lize the sentiments of solidarity with the group in the interest of 
continuing conformity. A good deal of it therefore is not directed at 
the criminal himself, but at the others who potentially might be- 
come criminals. Of course where the underlying sentiment system 
in the populations contains serious elements of ambivalence, punish- 
ment may well take on the character of "overreaction." Furthermore, 
because it so drastically deprives the deviant of support and narrows 
if not eliminates the sphere of permissiveness the criminal role is in 
general not conducive to reintegrating the deviant with the social 
system. Both confession of guilt and expiation through punishment 
may, however, operate in this way if the break is not too drastic. 

^'^ See Emile Durkheim, Deux lois de I'evolution fenale. 



The Mechanisms of Social Control [311] 

An extreme case of this isolating function characteristic of our 
type of criminal role seems to be found in some cases of the use of 
black magic or sorcery in non-literate societies. It is often extremely 
difficult to draw the line between social legitimation of such activi- 
ties and their illegitimate use in connection with deviant private 
interests and grudges. But there do seem to be cases where the fact 
that a man has been attacked by sorcery is subtly legitimized by 
the community and its support withdrawn from the victim. The 
sanctioning of counteractive white magic in the community may be 
considered in such a context as a declaration in favor of the victim 
rather than his attacker. Warner goes so far as to suggest that the 
psycho-somatic consequences of this isolation or withdrawal of sup- 
port by the community account for the apparently authenticated 
cases of actual death by black magic.^^ 

The definition of acts as criminal is the type case of the very 
broad category of mechanisms of control of the most familiar kind, 
where normative patterns are "enforced" by the attachment of 
specific negative sanctions to their violation, and by the differentia- 
tion of roles with the specific functions of implementing this en- 
forcement, administrative officials of various sorts, including police- 
men, courts, and the like. The importance of these mechanisms is 
of course not to be underestimated. How they operate is, however, 
in general terms so well known, that it is not necessary to discuss 
them further here. It is through their relation to the subtler types 
of control mechanism that the problems of greatest sociological 
interest arise. Among the most important functions of such enforce- 
ment agencies is the limitation of the spread of the deviant tenden- 
cies which they define as illegitimate. 

One difficulty of organized enforcement measures may be 
pointed out here. The specialization of the enforcement roles brings 
their incumbents into close connection with criminals who are them- 
selves generally organized. If crime is important enough to necessi- 
tate elaborate enforcement organization it is unlikely that the inter- 
action will be entirely one sided. It is likely that "concessions" to the 
criminal element will be made which from the point of view of the 
"function" of the enforcement agency must be defined as "corrup- 

16 See W. Lloyd Wam-jr, A Black Civilization. See also E. E. Evans-Pritchard, 
Azande Witchcraft, and Clyde Kluckhohn, Navaho Witchcraft. 



[312] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

tion." The enforcement agent is in a position similar in some respects 
to the foreman in industry. Such corruption is Hkely to appear 
wherever enforcement on a recalcitrant population is necessary, e.g., 
in dictatorships. 

In the ideal type case it may be said that the definition of the 
deviant as a criminal overvvhelminglv emphasizes the negative side. 
It constitutes a kind of extrusion from the social group, with little 
concern for his return. He is used rather in a sense as a "scapegoat" 
on whom to project sentiments in such a context as to strengthen 
the institutionalized values. What happens to him becomes sec- 
ondary. Certain modern trends of criminological practice, where the 
"remedial" aspect enters in, however, shade over into the case of 
illness. 

As will be analyzed in some detail in Chapter X, the sick role 
is also an institutionalized role, which shares certain characteristics 
with that of criminality but also involves certain very important 
differences. Instead of an almost absolute illegitimacy, the sick role 
involves a relative legitimacy, that is so long as there is an implied 
^'agreement" to "pay the price" in accepting certain disabilities and 
the obligation to get well. It may not be immediately obvious how 
subtly this serves to isolate the deviant.^'^ The criminal, being ex- 
truded from the company of "decent" citizens, can only by coercion 
be prevented from joining up with his fellow criminals, for the 
various types of reasons and with the results discussed in the last 
section. The conditional legitimation of the sick person's status on 
the other hand, places him in a special relation to people who are 
not sick, to the members of his family and to the various people in 
the health services, particularly physicians. This control is part of 
the price he pays for his partial legitimation, and it is clear that the 
basic structure resulting is that of the dependence of each sick 
person on a group of non-sick persons rather than of sick persons 
on each other. This in itself is highly important from the point of 
view of the social system since it prevents the relevant motivations 
from spreading through either group formation or positive legitima- 
tion. It is especially important that the motivational components 
which cannot be expressed in the deviant behavior itself, in this 

^^ So far as illness is motivated it may be considered a type of deviant behavior. 



The Mechanisms of Social Control [313] 

case tend to tie the sick person to non-deviant people, rather than to 
other deviants, unhke the dehnquent gang as analyzed above. 

But again, the sick role not only isolates and insulates, it also 
exposes die deviant to reintegrative forces. Through psychotherapy, 
whether it be deliberate or not, in the sick role an actor is exposed 
to a situation where forces can be brought to bear which are capable 
of breaking through the vicious circle of the generation of deviant 
motivation. The role of therapist, therefore, can in a certain sense 
serve as a prototype of the mechanisms of social control in this more 
radical sense. It is quite clear that much of the therapeutic effect is 
attributable to certain of the features of institutionalized role of the 
physician (in modem Western society) and only part of it to his 
deliberate therapeutic measures. 

It is pardy because of its intimate involvement in the motiva- 
tional balances of the social system that the role of the physician 
will be more fully analyzed in Chapter X below. Hence, only a few 
highlights of its social control aspect will be mentioned now, to be 
more fully examined at that time. The criminal role, precisely be- 
cause of the overwhelmingly negative character of its emphasis, 
tends notably to fail in this respect. Above all two factors are lacking 
which come into the therapeutic relationship, first the element of 
support in exchange for the obligation to get well, the positive 
attitude of helping the patient with its various ramifications in ac- 
cepting him as a person and understanding rather than condemning 
him. Secondly, therapy provides permissive opportunides for ex- 
pressing under carefully controlled conditions the distorted and 
alienative components of the patient's motivational system. 

In other words to a considerable degree the criminal tends to be 
"written off" so far as a constructive social role is concerned, the sick 
person is not. Some would say that in the shift from the definition 
of many deviant acts as criminal, to that as pathological, an element 
of "softness" enters in which makes control ineffective. This is by 
no means certain, but in any case presents problems beyond the 
range of the present discussion. At least the pathological definition 
would appear in general to provide much greater opportunity for 
reintegration than the criminal even though its preventive functions 
may not be so effectively performed. Also it may be remarked that 



[314] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

there may be some serious difficulties in the attempt to combine the 
two to the degree which has become common in recent criminologi- 
cal practice. It is not, however, possible to explore this problem 
further here. 

Just as the isolation of the individual deviant may be regarded as 
the extreme form of insulation of potentially conflict-producing ele- 
ments from other parts of the social system, so there is every reason 
to believe that therapy in the context of the medical or most closely 
related types of relationship is not an isolated phenomenon. This 
would be more likely to be the case if psychotherapeutic effects were 
solely a function of the deliberate operations of the therapist as an 
applied scientist. But we shall see in Chapter X that this is most 
definitely not the case. 

If the therapeutic effect of the doctor-patient relationship is 
"built into" the social structure of that relationship independently 
of deliberate planning, it should be built into other parts of the same 
social structure. That this is true in some degree of such phenomena 
as "faith healing," and in non-literate societies of magical treatment 
of the sick, has come to be widely recognized. But the identifica- 
tion of cognate elements of our own social structure may be facili- 
tated by a more explicit analysis of the structural factors which are 
conducive to this functional result. 

This can be stated as an application of the general conditions 
of the reintegration processes of social control as outlined at the 
beginning of the present section. First, the collectivity-orientation of 
the therapist and the definition of his function as to "help" the pa- 
tient give the basis for the element of support. Second, the definition 
of the patient as "sick" gives the basis for the element of permissive- 
ness, he cannot be "held responsible" for his condition and/or cer- 
tain things he says and does in it. Third, however, certain of the 
professional features of the role enable the therapist to refuse to 
reciprocate many of the patient's tendencies in interaction with 
him, notably through the pattern elements of specificity and affec- 
tive neutrality. Finally, his definition as a technically competent 
expert gives him the opportunity to manipulate the reward system. 
His approval in particular has meaning to the patient because of his 
professional authority, which is anchored in the values of the social 
system. 



The Mechanisms of Social Control [315] 

An essential part of the leverage of the therapeutic process is the 
discrepancy between the patient's own definition of the situation— 
in "transference"— and the standards institutionalized in the pro- 
fessional role. 

Details of the structure will vary enormously but it is suggested 
that functional equivalents of these four features of the physician's 
role can be found in a wide variety of other parts of the social 
structure. ^^ The problem then is to apply these generalized patterns 
with the appropriate modifications more widely to a variety of phe- 
nomena outside the therapeutic field. The unit of the reintegrative 
process need not be the individual actor— it may be a sub-collectivity 
such as a deviant gang. 

The generality of application of the first criterion scarcely needs 
further comment. Complete break with institutionalized values is 
not a common phenomenon but a limiting case, and the closest ap- 
proaches to it are those which involve being "pushed out" as in the 
case of the criminal, rather than purely spontaneous alienation. Very 
generally then it is safe to assume that there are analogues to the 
element of support given by acceptance of an obligation to help the 
sick person to get well. Tlie question is how these opportunities are 
mobilized in actual control mechanisms. Space will not be taken to 
go fully into these here. It may, however, be suggested that some of 
the rationalistic and Utopian elements of the value tradition have this 
significance in reverse, as it were, in that they have sufficient com- 
mon ground with the institutionalized values so that by "interpreta- 
tion" it is possible to find a bridge back to these more generally in- 
stitutionalized values. Thus both individuals and movements which 
start out relatively radical have a tendency to the attenuation of this 
radicalism and to a relative assimilation to the going system. What is 
widely decried in radical circles as the tendency to "sell out" may 
from the point of view of the system as a whole be interpreted as a 
process of "getting well." Essentially the same may be said of many 
sectarian movements in religion. Though from the point of view of 
their fanatical adherents "secularization" is by definition giving in 
to the devil, from the point of view of the social system it may in- 
dicate the progressive ascendancy of the institutionalized values. 

^^ Some aspects of these problems have been previously analyzed in the 
author's paper "Propaganda and Social Control," Essays, Chapter XIII. 



[316] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

In tliis connection it should be noted that as the dynamically 
related opposite of this, religious movements and often their political 
derivatives have a very general tendency to define the issue between 
"god" and "mammon" or "spirituality" and "materialism," as though 
there were no positive moral values whatever involved on the side 
opposed to the particular movement in question. The institution- 
alized values are from this perspective not values at all, but only 
"self-interest" or the temptations of the "flesh." It may be strongly 
surmised that the very radicality of this repudiation of the institu- 
tionalized values against which such movements are in revolt in- 
volves a reaction-formation against the values to which adherents 
of the movement are in fact deeply attached. It is positive evidence 
of the above contention. Such reaction-formation is necessary be- 
cause the definition of the situation is often such that a deviant 
movement must not only attack the "abuses" of the system it opposes 
but precisely its highest achievements and the values which underlie 
them. Thus some branches of Christianity have attacked not only 
prostitution and sexual license, but the highest ideal of conjugal 
love, conceding only that "it is better to marry than to bum." The 
very value conflict necessitated by such repudiations helps explain 
the radicality of such movements once well embarked on the vicious 
circle of deviance. Nevertheless the common value element which 
makes a bridge back possible is always present to a significant degree. 

The refusal to reciprocate deviant expectations seems to be most 
definitely institutionalized in our society relative to "private" motiva- 
tions in the universalistic and functionally specific patterns of office 
and status and their consequent separation of the "office" or other 
institutionalized status from the "person" of the incumbent. The 
office gives him the justification of not responding in kind to many 
things the people he has to deal with do and say. This is even true 
of political and executive office which must carry routine responsi- 
bilities for going decisions. But there are also institutionalized in our 
society various judicial organs which are kept farther aloof from the 
give and take, the courts being the most conspicuous example. The 
relative inaccessibility of a high executive seems to be important in 
this general connection, because he can then choose his own ground 
in dealing with most others, and can use them in the context of his 



The Mechanisms of Social Control [317] 

"ofBce" in both senses, where the dignity and authority of his status 
is symbohcally emphasized. 

Barnard, in discussing the process of executive decision, lays 
considerable stress on the importance of the decision when and 
whether, and when 7iot to decide.^'** It may be surmised that very 
often the decision not to decide is in effect the refusal to be "drawn 
in" to a reciprocity of interaction which would, if participated in 
too much, jeopardize the dignity and independence of the office. It 
is also well known that the executive must take great care in the 
regulation of his personal relations, particularly if they are with 
people with whom he also has official dealings. In general, this 
insulation from particularistic reciprocities may be held to be one 
of the very important functions of the institutionalization of uni- 
versalistic and functionally specific patterns. It puts the incumbent 
of a status institutionalized in such a pattern in a position to exercise 
certain types of both manifest and latent control functions which 
would not be possible in another type of role. 

The element of permissiveness is also prominent at various 
points in our society as well as in the religious and magical rituals 
of other societies, as already noted. Perhaps the most conspicuous 
example is the institutionalized right of "partisanship." In the politi- 
cal area this is particularly marked, of course. People are not merely 
permitted but positively encouraged to let their views be known and 
to discuss them with a high degree of freedom. This is also a con- 
spicuous feature of our educational system, in that both students 
and colleagues are encouraged to state their views. The confession 
in certain religious organizations, particularly of course the Roman 
Catholic church also belongs here. Many types of organization also 
attempt, probably increasingly, to set up channels for the expression 
of grievances and suggestions. Also counseling systems which 
directly permit such expression under the guarantee of anonymity 
are becoming more common. 

Another feature which is connected with permissiveness is the 
projection on important figures and institutional symbols of attitudes 
which are more or less unrealistic and not in the long run tenable. 
These are both positive and negative. The high executive in par- 

^^ The Functions of the Executive. 



[318] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

ticular is blamed for many things for which he could not possibly be 
responsible, but equally "gets the credit" when things go well. 

In both these respects permissiveness in our society goes so far 
that, if attention were directed only to what is said and done within 
its sphere, it would hardly seem possible that the society could sur- 
vive. Thus one political party during a political campaign solemnly 
assures the public that their opponents are totally unfit to govern, 
that the values they represent are antithetical to all "true" Ameri- 
canism, etc. But when their rivals come into office nevertheless, on 
the whole the excitement subsides, and the members of the first 
party somehow find it possible to go on living in the society and per- 
forming their normal role-obligations. Even a President of the oppo- 
site party is still the President of the United States with all the 
dignity of that high office. 

This suggests that there is not only permissiveness, but a set of 
mechanisms which tend to counteract and limit that permissiveness. 
One set of these prevents certain elements of the institutional struc- 
ture as noted above from being "drawn in" to the controversies. 
Office is never treated exclusively as the "political plum" of a parti- 
san group but has its aspect of responsibility for the common wel- 
fare. In a certain sense attainment of office tends to "acculturate" 
successful candidates to its expectation system so that they do in fact 
play the role to a significant degree. 

Furthermore, in certain contexts and on certain occasions the 
actions and words of persons in office are ceremonialized as ex- 
pressing the sentiments and values common to the group as a whole. 
In function relative to the sentiment systems of the people involved 
these may sometimes be compared to the "interpretations" of the 
psychotherapist. 

It will also be shown in Chapter X that collectivitv-orientation 
plays a very important part in validating the position of the therapist. 
It mav be suggested that this is capable of generalization, that 
throughout the social system the elements of collectivity-orientation 
have important functions in the more general contexts of social con- 
trol. It is first notable that within organizations, authority is always 
institutionalized in collectivity-oriented terms, even though the or- 
ganization-purpose is primarily defined in self-oriented terms as in 
the case of a business firm. 



The Mechanisms of Social Control [319] 

Secondly, it is certainly important, that as distinct from political 
parties which closely approach the definition of wanting to "get into 
office" as such, political office itself is strongly defined, whatever the 
behavorial pattern, ideally in collectivity-oriented terms. Third, 
there are, even in a "capitalistic" society, very important organiza- 
tions and structures which are also defined in collectivity-oriented 
terms, as devoted somehow to the common welfare. Certainly in 
terms of social control one of the most important classes of these is 
the university. Its role as the carrier of the institutionalization of 
much of the cultural tradition which will be discussed in the next 
chapter, would almost certainly not be possible without this feature 
of its pattern, with its intimate connection with the values of ob- 
jectivity and impartiality. 

On the other hand it may well be that one of the important 
reasons why the business class has failed to consolidate its position 
as a national elite in a sense closely approaching that of a "governing 
class" is that its primary role has been defined in "self-oriented" 
terms, thus exposing it too readily to the charge that power would 
not be exercised as "responsibility" but as exploitation. The public 
confidence necessary to facilitate a "therapeutic" function may be 
incompatible with such a definition of the role. A deviant movement 
which opposes the "profit system" on moral grounds has relatively 
easy going if there is nothing to counteract the profit symbol. 

It is not meant to press the similarity between psychotherapy 
and other mechanisms of social control too far. Certainly there are 
just as important differences as there are similarities, but the rela- 
tionship seems to be sufficiently close, and the common factors 
sufficiently general, so that these similarities can provide important 
leads to the recognition and analysis of the operation of control 
mechanisms which as such are by no means obvious to common 
sense. What we have presented is, however, only a few suggestions 
about the problems. An immense amount of research will be neces- 
sary in this field. 

The most important general conclusions are that without deliber- 
ate planning on anyone's part there have developed in our type of 
social system, and correspondingly in others, mechanisms which, 
within limits, are capable of forestalling and reversing the deep- 
lying tendencies for deviance to get into the vicious circle phase 



[ 320 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

which puts it beyond the control of ordinary approval-disapproval 
and reward-punishment sanctions. The therapeutic function is per- 
haps the best understood case of which this is true. But it has been 
shown that this therapeutic function is not by any means dependent 
only on applied science, but also on certain features of the social 
structure. It is argued that if this be true it would be very strange 
if these broad features and their broad functional significance were 
confined to the one very specific context of illness and its treatment. 
It has been possible to suggest a few avenues of extension of the 
relevance of these features, but not to analyze them adequately. 

There is no pretense that in this final section of a long chapter 
anything like justice has been done to the exceedingly complex sub- 
ject of the mechanisms of social control. It has been possible to do 
no more than scratch the surface. Fragmentary as it is, however, this 
treatment will have served its purpose if it has been possible to show 
with some convincing illustrations, that there are in fact important 
unplanned mechanisms in the social system which in a sense 
"match" the inherent tendencies to socially structured deviance, 
with some few intimations of the directions research must take if it 
is to unravel the intricacies of the operation of these mechanisms. 

In conclusion, perhaps a few general summary propositions, 
which bring together what is most essential in this analysis, may be 
stated. 

1 . The conformity-deviance "dimension," or functional problem, 
is inherent in socially structured systems of social action in a context 
of cultural values as analyzed in this volume. 

2. The relevance of tendencies to deviance, and the correspond- 
ing relevance of mechanisms of social control, goes back to the begin- 
ning of the socialization process and continues throughout the life 
cycle. 

3. Except in a highly qualified sense at the very beginning of 
life the tendencies to deviance are not random relative to the struc- 
ture of the cultural norms and the social action-system, but are posi- 
tively structured. 

a. The need-dispositions of personality structure are a resultant 
of interaction in the socially structured role system from birth 
on, and whether conformative or involving an alienative 
component relative to role-expectations, are structured rela- 



Appendix [ 32,1 ] 

tive to the role system of the society. This structure of need- 
dispositions may be taken at any moment in time as one of 
the components determining the behavior of the individual, 
b. Whatever the "fit" or lack of it between structure of need- 
dispositions and role-expectations, individuals in social situa- 
tions are exposed to a whole series of "structured strains" 
which may further accentuate the difficulty of conformity. 
Such strains tend to be reacted to in terms of a special set of 
psychological propensities and mechanisms, the mechanisms 
of defense and of adjustment. TTiis set of circumstances 
further structures the tendencies to deviance. 

4. The tendency to deviance is finally also conditioned by the 
objective opportunities provided in the social system, in the struc- 
turing of which the "loopholes" in the system of social control are 
particularly important. 

5. Every social system has, in addition to the obvious rewards 
for conformative and punishments for deviant behavior, a complex 
system of unplanned and largely unconscious mechanisms which 
serve to counteract deviant tendencies. Very broadly these may be 
divided into the three classes of a) those which tend to "nip in the 
bud" tendencies to development of compulsively deviant motivation 
before they reach the vicious circle stage, b) those which insulate 
the bearers of such motivation from influence on others, and c) the 
"secondary defenses" which are able, to varying degrees, to reverse 
the vicious circle processes. 

6. Structured deviant behavior tendencies, which are not suc- 
cessfully coped with by the control mechanisms of the social system, 
constitute one of the principal sources of change in the structure of 
the social system. This set of problems will have to be taken up in 
Chapter XI below. 

APPENDIX 

Since the completion of the manuscript of this chapter, there 
have been some further developments in the underlying paradigm 
for the analysis of deviance and social control. Rather than attempt- 
ing to revise the manuscript to make a place for them, it seems best 



[ 322 ] Deviant Behavior and Social Control 

to state them in extremely succinct fashion in a brief appendix to it. 

It will be remembered that four essential conditions of successful 
psychotherapy were stated above, which served as prototypes of the 
corresponding elements in other mechanisms of social control. These 
were support, permissiveness for the expression of deviant expecta- 
tions, denial of reciprocity for these deviant expectations, and con- 
ditional manipulation of sanctions, notably the relational rewards, 
in this connection. The question arises of what the systematic rela- 
tions between these elements may be, and what in turn is the relation 
of the resulting paradigm to that defining the directions of deviant 
orientation. 

The element of support clearly concerns the mutual cathexis of 
the actors in an interactive relationship. The therapist, for example, 
supports his patient so far as he cathects him, that is, holds the posi- 
tive attitude toward him which is relevant to the role in question. 
He treats him as a full-fledged member of the collectivity, which in 
this case is that composed of therapist and patient. This appropriate 
measure of support may be deviated from in either of two directions. 
On the one hand under-support consists essentially in withdrawal of 
the positive cathexis, or its conversion into hostility. This is essen- 
tially what psychiatrists mean by "rejection." On the other hand, 
support may be given, but by reciprocating alter's deviant expecta- 
tions or overtures in contravention of the normative pattern defining 
ego's role. In this case, again to use psychiatric terminology, the 
therapist will have allowed himself to be "seduced" by the patient. 

Rejection places the patient outside the solidary interactive rela- 
tionship altogether. Openness to seduction, the therapist's seducibil- 
ity on the other hand, disturbs the equilibrium by creating a strain 
between the cathectic aspect of the relationship and the normative 
pattern structure, which certainly should be conceived to be inter- 
nalized in the therapist, and presumably to some degree in the 
patient. 

This set of circumstances establishes a relation between support 
and its directions of deviance on the one hand, and the permissive- 
ness-denial of reciprocity pair of conditions on the other. These 
latter two conditions together define the optimum balance of atti- 
tudes relative to the normative pattern itself. Permissiveness, if it is 
to have positive therapeutic effect, is conditional on it not involving 



Afpendix [ 32.3 ] 

the therapist in reciprocation of the deviant expectations. Then the 
proper attitude with respect to the normative pattern also may be 
deviated from in either of two directions. On the one hand the 
requisite permissiveness may not be granted, the norms may be over- 
hterally and stringently enforced. On the other hand reciprocity may 
be granted where it should not be, that is, there may be an avoid- 
ance of taking responsibility for upholding conformity with the 
norm. 

The purport of these considerations is that effective social con- 
trol is dependent on an integration of two main factors, the cathexis 
of the individual actor as a social object, that is, of support, and 
taking responsibility for upholding of the normative pattern. Each 
may be deviated from in either a "too much" or a "too little" direc- 
tion. Hence, according to whether the cathectic aspect or the "pat- 
tern responsibility" aspect is the primary focus, there are four 
primary ways of deviating from this optimum balance, two in the 
negative, "rejecting" direction, two in the direction of "overfulfill- 
ment" of alter's expectations. These relations may be diagrammatic- 
ally represented as follows: 





Alienation 
Rejection 


Conformity 

Seducibility 
71 


Cathectic 
Component 




Support 




Pattern 

Component 




Pattern 
Responsibility 






Comp 
avoids 
respoi 


ulsive 
mce of 
isibility 




Con 
Res] 


ipulsive 
3onsibility 



It will be seen that this paradigm is built on two of the funda- 
mental variables which entered into the eightfold table of directions 



[324] 



Deviant Behavior and Social Control 



of deviance given on page 259 above, namely conformity and 
alienation on the one hand, social-object focus and pattern focus on 
the other. If the third of the variables included in the table is intro- 
duced, it has the effect of subdividing each of the four types of 
deviance from the optimum attitude pattern for social control into 
two sub-types. It is clear that, by this path we arrive again at the 
same list of eight major directions of deviant orientation which was 
set forth in the previous table, as follows: 



ACTIVE FORM 



PASSIVE FORM 



Aggressiveness 

Dominance 

Compulsive 
Enforcement 

Incorrigibility 


Withdrawal 

Submission 

Perfectionism 

Evasion 



Rejection 

Seducibility 

Compulsive 
responsibility 

Compulsive avoid- 
ance of responsi- 
bility 



TTie fourth element of the social control paradigm was the con- 
ditional manipulation of rewards. This does not as such find its place 
in the above classifications, but serves as a link between the other 
elements. The bestowal and withholding of such sanctions can be 
used as an instrument to swing a balance in situations of uncertainty 
at various stages of the process in question. 

It seems to be a very important conclusion that analysis of the 
directions of deviance under the pressure of strains on the inter- 
active relationship, and analysis of the conditions of reducing strain 
through processes of social control, have turned out, independently, 
to involve the same fundamental paradigm. The difference between 
the approaches in the two cases lies primarily in the fact that in 
developing the paradigm of the directions of deviance, following 
Merton, we laid, after the conformity-alienation dimension itself, 
our stress on the activity-passivity distinction, and introduced the 
distinction between focus on social objects and on patterns, only as 
a "secondary" basis of variation. In the paradigm for the analysis 
of mechanisms of control, on the other hand, this latter proved, along 



A'p'pendix [ 32.5 ] 

with conformity-alienation, to be the major axis. Only when this 
fact was seen, and the third variable of activity-passivity also intro- 
duced, was it possible to see that the two paradigms directly con- 
verge with each other. Both in fact are ways of stating both the 
conditions under which strain will be imposed on an interactive 
relationship, and under which such strain can be mitigated. Or, put 
a little differently, one states the conditions of strain, the other the 
conditions of successful re-equilibration of the interactive system 
when subjected to conditions of strain. 

It should be clear from the discussion throughout Chapter VII 
that use of psychotherapy as an example is for purposes of con- 
venience only. The paradigm we have set forth is of general sig- 
nificance for analysis of the mechanisms of social control. It is above 
all important to note that it is independent of the particular role 
structures of the interaction relationship. 



VIII 



BELIEF SYSTEMS AND 
THE SOCIAL SYSTEM: THE PROBLEM OF THE 
"ROLE OF IDEAS" 



THE most fundamental relations of the cultural tradi- 
tion to the social system have already been set forth. Indeed these 
are so fundamental to any analysis of any phenomena of action, that 
it would have been altogether out of the question to attempt to 
carry the theory of the social system to the points reached in the 
foregoing chapters without working out these fundamental prob- 
lems of the place of cultural patterns. Hence the task of this chapter 
and the following one is, taking these fundamentals for granted, to 
develop certain more specific problems of the interdependence of 
the cultural elements with those of the other components of the 
social system somewhat farther. 

We have seen that the patterns of value-orientation are particu- 
larly central to the social system. Because of this fact, and of the way 
in which we have developed its implications through use of the pat- 
tern variable scheme, it may be said that, except for the context of 
social change which will be taken up in Chapter XI, we have 
already, on the level appropriate to the present study, covered the 
field of the sociology of value-orientations. Hence this and the fol- 
lowing chapter will concentrate on the other two principal com- 
ponents of cultural traditions, the present one on systems of beliefs 
or ideas, and the following on systems of expressive symbols. First, 
however, a brief recapitulation of the general place of culture in 

326 



Belief Systems [ 32.7 ] 

action systems and the bases of the classification of its components 
will help orient the reader to the subsequent discussion. 

Culture, in terms of the conceptual scheme of this work, con- 
sists, as we have seen, in patterned or ordered systems of symbols 
which are objects of the orientation of action, internalized com- 
ponents of the personalities of individual actors and institutionalized 
patterns of social systems. The terms in which cultural phenomena 
are analyzed are, as is the case with any other components of the 
phenomena of action, theoretical constructs which the social scien- 
tist uses to order his observations, formulate his problems and pro- 
vide a conceptual framework for his interpretations. The general 
maxim that "all observation is in terms of a conceptual scheme" 
applies to the observation of what we call cultural patterns just as 
much as to any other aspect of systems of action. It is a set of ab- 
stractions from the concrete phenomena of social action processes. 

The keynote of the conceptualization we have chosen is that cul- 
tural elements are elements of patterned order which mediate and 
regulate communication and other aspects of the mutuality of orien- 
tations in interaction processes. There is, we have insisted, always a 
normative aspect in the relation of culture to the motivational com- 
ponents of action; the culture provides standards of selective orienta- 
tion and ordering. 

The most fundamental starting point for the classification of 
cultural elements is that of the three basic "functional" problem- 
contexts of action-orientation in general, the cognitive, the cathectic 
and the evaluative. It is fundamental to the very conception of 
action that there must be pattern-complexes differentiated with re- 
spect to each of these major problem contexts. These considerations 
provide the basis for the initial classification of cultural pattern 
types, namely belief systems, systems of expressive symbols, and 
systems of value-orientation. 

The fundamental relation of belief systems to social action 
processes can be most clearly brought out by referring back again 
to the paradigm of interaction. We pointed out in introducing that 
paradigm in Chapter I that one of the fundamental functions of the 
common culture which develops was communication. Without a 
sharing and a relative stability of meanings, the complementarity 
of expectations would not be possible. This applies preeminently but 



[ 328 ] Belief Systems 

not exclusively to cognitive symbol systems. Furthermore even in 
this aspect of the culture a normative element is aWays present in 
the orientation, since observation oF the conventions and standards 
of the language and belief system is a condition of communication. 

In general action terms "reality-testing" is the obviously para- 
mount function of cognitive orientation. This includes of course the 
accuracy and adequacy of the cognition of alter as an object— and 
ego's own self-knowledge. But in the context of interaction there is 
another aspect, the sharing of beliefs. Beliefs like other elements of 
culture, are internalized as part of the personality of the actor who 
holds them. That there should be a common belief system shared by 
ego and alter is in certain respects as important as that the beliefs 
should be adequate to reality outside the particular interaction sys- 
tem. Because of this duality of functional reference it is not uncom- 
mon for cognitive distortions to have positive functions in an inter- 
action system and thus for them to be resistant to correction in terms 
of pressures of reality. Put a litde differendy, if ego and alter share 
a distorted belief— about the physical environment or about third 
parties, if ego corrects his belief to bring it closer to reality while 
alter does not this introduces a strain into the relations of ego and 
alter. 

This integrative function of common beliefs in systems of inter- 
action will concern us at many points in the present chapter, but in 
so far as the cognitive interest has clear-cut primacy the primary 
focus is "existential." The primary "pure type" of cognitive orienta- 
tion, then, is what we may call the system of existential heliefs. It is 
necessary then to subdivide this category into empirical and non- 
empirical beliefs. The distinction is simply that ideas or beliefs 
will be called empirical when, in terms of the major orientations of 
the cultural tradition of which they are a part, they concern proc- 
esses which are defined as subject to understanding and manipula- 
tion in a pattern of "practical rationality," that is, in terms of what 
we call empirical science and its functional equivalents in other 
cultures.^ Contrasted with empirical beliefs or ideas in this sense are 

^ The work of Malinowski, among various others, can be held eEFectively to 
have disposed of the allegation, represented by L6vy-Bruhl and his followers, 
that primitive man had a "prelogical" mentality such that what we call empirical 
knowledge and the corresponding rational techniques had no place in his thought 
or action. Every culture includes an element of "empirical lore" which is the 



Belief Systems [ 32.9 ] 

non-empirical beliefs concerning subjects which are defined as 
beyond the reach of the methodology of empirical science or its 
equivalent in the culture in question." 

Empirical ideas or beliefs may be subdivided according to the 
classes of objects to which they apply. In terms of the theory of 
action these are the classes of objects in the situation of action as 
they have been discussed in the foregoing chapters. For present pur- 
poses we may distinguish four main classes, namely physical objects 
(including organisms) or "nature," individual actors, or person- 
alities, collective actors or collectivities and cultural objects them- 
selves. For certain purposes it may be important to distinguished 
organisms from other physical objects, as we have seen in the classi- 
fication of points of reference for the categorization of actors as 
objects in Chapter IV above. Empirical beliefs about all classes of 
objects, however, have in common the fundamental fact of the 
relevance to their cognition of the methodological canons of science, 
though these are often not explicit in the culture in question. 

The category of non-empirical beliefs is avowedly residual. That 
there should be such a category as part of a cultural tradition seems 
to be inherent in the frame of reference of action. In its existential 
reference we may refer to this as the "philosophical" belief system 
of the culture. It includes beliefs about "supernatural" entities: gods, 
spirits and the like, and about alleged properties of natural objects, 
personalities and collectivities, which are not subject to what, in the 
culture in question, are the canons of empirical knowledge (i.e., 
the cognitive value-standards). In terms of modem science, they 
are beliefs which are neither verifiable nor disprovable by the pro- 
cedures of science, which thus cannot be relegated to the categories 
of ignorance and/or error according to its standards. 

As we have said there may be a primacy of purely cognitive in- 

precursor of what we caU scientific knowledge. Cf. B. Malinowski, Magic, Science 
and Religion. 

~ This is not of course to say that the actors in another cultural tradition 
are aware of and apply our canons of scientific relevance and validity. It is rather 
to say that in every system of action there is to be found the equivalent of the 
line we draw between empirical and non-empirical ideas. Thus Malinowski's 
Trobriander, though he beheves magic to be essential to the success of his gar- 
dening, does not confuse the efficacy of magic with that of empirical technology. 
He does not beleve it is possible to make up for bad technology by more and 
better magic. 



[ 33° ] Belief Systems 

terest in relation to patterns of cognitive orientation. The type of 
actions which meets this criterion has been called "investigation." 
If the problems under investigation are empirical we may speak of 
"scientific investigation"; in so far as they are non-empirical we may 
speak of "philosophical investigation." In the latter will be included 
investigation of the logical and epistemological presuppositions of 
empirical knowledge so long as it is not questions of verifiable em- 
pirical fact and its theoretical generalization which are at issue. 

Cognitive primacy is also, as we have seen, maintained in a rela- 
tive sense when a specific goal is given, and the problem is raised of 
the most effective ways of attaining that goal, and of the "cost" in- 
volved in terms of the sacrifice of alternatives. This is what we have 
called instrumental orientation. Given the goal, the action -prohlem 
is still purely cognitive, and the solutions are hence subject to the 
primacy of cognitive standards with appreciative and/or moral con- 
siderations being subordinated. Apparent exceptions are accounted 
for by the fact that the particular goal must fit into a larger orienta- 
tion system, and that in the cost of attaining a goal may be included 
the sacrifice of appreciative or other evaluative interests. Once these 
questions are raised it is of course not possible to decide them 
according to purely cognitive criteria, but cognitive criteria are 
decisive in determining what the issues are, and what the price of 
attaining the goal will have to be. 

This introduction of expressive and evaluative considerations, 
when the means to a given goal are being weighed, indicates the 
next important elaboration of the analysis of belief-systems. This is 
the point at which a cognitive problem is no longer purely existential 
but involves, in Max Weber's term, a "problem of meaning." A 
problem of meaning in this sense always includes existential prob- 
lems, empirical and/or non-empirical. But in addition to the exis- 
tential problem is that of "what of it?" from the point of view of 
bearing of the existential considerations on the interests of actors, 
individual and/or collective. Because of inherent features of the 
structure of action systems, this meaning-reference has in turn a 
double aspect, a cathectic and an evaluative aspect. The first consists 
in the assessment of the cathectic significance for the relevant 
actors, of the actual or alleged existential states of the situation, past, 
present, or predicted future, an assessment which in the last analysis 



Belief Systems [ 33i ] 

is referable to what we have called the gratification-deprivation bal- 
ance of the personality. The second concerns the evaluative assess- 
ment of its bearing on the value-realization of the action-system in 
question. So far as an individual actor is fully integrated, that is, his 
motivational needs and his values are fully synthesized, the cathectic 
and evaluative aspects come to the same thing. In the case of a col- 
lectivity, however, there may have to be sacrifice of the interests of 
some component individuals in the interest of the collective values.^ 

It seems justified to adopt the term evaluative beliefs as parallel 
to that of existential beliefs. When, therefore, a problem of meaning 
in the above sense is involved in addition to the existential problem 
of "what is the state of affairs," we shall speak of evaluative belief 
systems.^ 

It will, therefore, prove necessary to treat belief systems in terms 
of a double classification. On the one hand we must distinguish 
empirical and non-empirical references, on the other hand, exis- 
tential and evaluative significance or relevance to the system of 
action. The combination of empirical and existential is clearly the 
case of science and its proto-scientific counterparts. That of non- 
empirical and existential we have already designated as philosophy, 
also, of course, making allowance for the fact that below certain 
standards of explicitness and logical articulation it might be better 
to speak of proto-philosophy. 

When we turn to the evaluative category we may make a paral- 
lel distinction. Where the primary reference is empirical we may 
speak of ideology. The only difficulty with this term is that it refers 
primarily to the belief system shared by the members of a col- 
lectivity, and for some purposes it may in the theory of action be 
important to speak of this aspect of the belief system of an indi- 
vidual actor. When the individual actor is the point of reference 
we shall try to avoid this difficulty by speaking of a "personal 
ideology." Finally, when the primary reference is non-empirical we 
may when the problems of meaning are of paramount significance 
speak of religious ideas, as distinguished from philosophical. 

^ This is essentially the distinction which Pareto made between "utility" for 
and of a collectivity. Cf. The Mind and Society, Vol. IV and Structure of Social 
Action, Chapter VII. 

* This is essentially what Kluckhohn Cin his chapter in Toward a General 
Theory of Action^ means by Value-Orientations as distinct from Values. 



[ 332. ] Belief Systems 

According to this view, then, there is a fundamental symmetry 
in the relations, on the one hand, of science and ideology, on the 
other of philosophy and religious ideas. In both cases the transition 
to the evaluative category means a change in the "stake" the actor 
has in the belief system, it means the transition from acceptance to 
commitment. The primary question is no longer that of interest in 
whether a proposition is "true," but, in addition to that, in a com- 
mitment to its implications for the orientation of action as such. We 
have, thus, by another route, come back to the distinction made in 
Chapter II between acceptance of a cultural pattern and commit- 
ment to it. This has very important implications for differences in 
the relation of the pattern in question, in this case a belief system, 
to the action system, notably for what is meant by its institutionaliza- 
tion in a social system. 

We shall deal with each of these four major types of belief 
system in turn, coming at the end of the chapter to a brief discussion 
of the problem of general classification of types of belief system on 
another plane, that of orientation content. 

§ EXISTENTIAL EMPIRICAL BELIEFS AND THE 
SOCIAL SYSTEM 

OUR treatment of empirical belief systems will be divided 
into four parts. First will come a brief discussion of the general 
status of empirical knowledge in social systems. Second, a very im- 
portant special case will be taken up, that of the institutionalization 
of scientific investigation as a type of role-function. Third, a few 
problems about the application of empirical knowledge on the scien- 
tific levels in practical affairs will be discussed and finally, fourth, 
there will be a discussion of social ideologies. 

There can be no possible doubt of the importance of "empirical 
lore" as part of the cultural tradition of every social system. Without 
a relatively high development of this component, we could not speak 
of a human society at all. Language and the transmissibility of cul- 
ture of course open up the possibility of the cumulative growth of 
empirical knowledge or lore. 

Throughout a very large proportion of human societies, however, 
notably but by no means exclusively in non-literate societies, there 
are, as compared to the development of modern science, sharp re- 



Existential Empirical Beliefs [ 333 1 

strictions on the rate of the development of empirical knowledge and 
even on the acceptance of available knowledge or its use in instru- 
mental contexts. These restrictions seem to have to do primarily 
with the integration of such knowledge with the other elements of 
action in such ways that investigative interests are inhibited. 

The very immediacy and urgency of practical instrumental 
needs itself constitutes a basis of inhibition. The conditions of scien- 
tific advance seem to lie in two main directions: first, the abstraction 
and generalization of knowledge, and second, the development of 
special investigative procedures. Neither of these is possible to a 
high degree under the pressure of immediately urgent practical 
needs. Under such conditions the development of knowledge will 
tend to be tied down to the immediately relevant context, and to 
readily available procedures. It takes the specialization of roles in 
these directions to make notable and rapid developments possible. 
But in "primitive" conditions this possibility is not even cognitively 
realized, to say nothing of the other institutional prerequisites being 
absent. 

Closely related to these considerations are those involved in the 
need of the social system for stabilization both of its relationship 
system and of its cultural orientations. To take one example, the 
prevalance of magic in non-literate societies seems to be associated 
with the element of uncertainty in the success of practical endeavors. 
But precisely because magic provides a non-empirical cognitive 
orientation to the unknown and uncontrollable factors in the situa- 
tion, which is in certain respects motivationally gratifying and func- 
tionally positive for the social system, the existence of magical be- 
liefs, as Firth clearly points out,^ inhibits the development of rational 
empirical knowledge, because the two are in direct competition and 
are incompatible with each other. In other words, a system of em- 
pirical beliefs, which is bordered on every hand by magical beliefs, 
is by that fact strongly inhibited from further development. It tends 
to be stabilized in a status quo. 

The same is true of various other aspects of a complex socio- 
cultural system. There is, as we have seen, always a set of vested 
interests in the maintenance of a status quo. Development of em- 

° Cf. Raymond Firth, Primitive Economics of the New Zealand Maori, 
Chapter VII. 



[ 334 ] Belief Systems 

pirical knowledge is always upsetting to some vested interest. Hence, 
unless it is positively institutionalized in itself, it is likely to develop 
only slowly and sporadically, in spite of the fact that on the other 
side there is an obvious interest in its development. Perhaps above 
all it is relevant to note that magical beliefs shade into and are inte- 
grated with religious beliefs. The latter are apt to be strongly insti- 
tutionalized in a social system and strongly integrated with the 
power and reward systems of the society. Unless the religious system 
is itself both strongly dynamic rather than traditionally oriented, 
and is dynamic in a manner favorable to empirical investigative 
interests, it also is likely to have an inhibitory effect on the growth of 
the empirical stock of knowledge. 

Closely associated with these aspects of the problem is that of 
the ways in which instrumental and investigative interests are 
bound in with predominantly expressive interests. The very im- 
mediacy of instrumentally urgent needs mentioned above is likely 
to be associated with a general orientation to immediate gratifica- 
tions and expressive activity, and hence to the relative minimization 
of the kinds of discipline which are associated with, indeed essential 
to, a high development of instrumentally oriented action-patterns. 
The primary disciplines in non-literate societies, as in many literate 
ones, are more likely to be associated with such affective-diffuse 
types of role-obligation as those of kinship than with the universal- 
istic, specific and affectively neutral patterns of the modem type of 
occupational role. It is in the very nature of the higher developments 
of empirical knowledge, that the pursuit of investigative problems 
must be universalistically oriented, that the reaching of remoter 
implications implies a high level of affectively neutral discipline, 
and that specialization— hence specificity of role function— is essen- 
tial to success. The very fact that this type of role pattern does not 
develop on a large scale except under rather special conditions has 
much to do with the relative stagnation of the development of em- 
pirical knowledge in so many societies. 

In view of these facts, the high development of science in our 
own type of society poses important problems of the relation of the 
investigative interest to the rest of the social system. To this problem 
we now turn. 



Institutionalization of Scientific Investigation [ 335 ] 

I . The Institutionalization of Scientific Investigation 

THE difference between science and empirical lore, and 
the corresponding difference between scientific investigation and 
empirically cognitive problem-solving on a common sense level, are 
gradual and in a sense relative. What was the technical science of 
yesterday has in certain respects become the common sense of today 
—as in the case of the heliocentric theory of the solar system or the 
germ theory of disease. But though the borderline is indistinct, in 
fundamental pattern there is a sharp difference. The generality of 
science far transcends the boundaries of particular practical fields of 
instrumental interest, and cuts across many of them. The role of the 
scientist becomes technical and his specialized interests and pro- 
cedures are of "no use" except for his owoi specialized purposes. The 
knowledge he possesses is only with difficulty if at all accessible to 
the untrained layman. The ultimate judgment of it must lie with 
his professionally qualified peers. Thus, the status of any given item 
of knowledge, as belonging to science or to common sense, may be 
doubtful. And the variations between these two types is a matter of 
degree. But the distinction is nonetheless vital. 

The basic norms of scientific knowledge are perhaps four, em- 
pirical validity, logical clarity or precision of the particular proposi- 
tion, logical consistency of the mutual implications of propositions, 
and generality of the "principles" involved, which may perhaps be 
interpreted to mean range of mutually verified implications.'' Very 
specific propositions of particular fact may be held to be verified 
with a certainty approaching absoluteness. The more general the 
proposition the less that order of approach to certainty in the sense 
that it is inconceivable that it should ever have to be modified, is 
possible. But science "progresses" in proportion as it is possible to 
relate very particular facts to generalized systems of implication. 

^ The reader may for purposes of orientation to the general nature of science 
and its processes of development, be referred to James B. Conant, On Understand- 
ing Science. Some of the best treatments of sociological problems relative to 
science are to be found in R. K. Merton, Social Theory and Social Structure, 
Part IV. Also the author's Structure of Social Action, especially Chapters I and 
XIX contains some relevant discussions. Cf. also "The Institutionalization of 
Social Science and the Problems of the Conference," Chapter XIV of Perspectives 
on a Troubled Decade. Published by the Conference on Science, Philosophy and 
Religion, 1950. 



[ 33^ ] Belief Systems 

Hence it is not possible to use only the one criterion. It would be 
generally admitted that analytical mechanics before the relativity 
and quantum era was in some sense a more "advanced" science than 
botanical taxonomy, even though the "meaning" of many of the 
generalized propositions of mechanics was in certain respects seri- 
ously in doubt, and taxonomy ordered enormous numbers of facts, 
with very little in its logical structure which was questionable or 
controversial. 

There is, therefore, not merely the question of whether or not a 
given item of knowledge "belongs" to science, but implied in the 
term used above, "basic norms," is the implication that there are 
levels of scientific advancement. Moreover this advancement does 
not consist only of discrete additions to existing knowledge of facts, 
but of the relation of this knowledge of fact to systematization and 
generalized theoretical analysis. This gives us the sense in which 
science, specifically on the cultural level, is a dynamic thing. Its 
inherent structure is one of variant levels of advancement. Such a 
type of culture element contains, in its relation to action, an inherent 
element of instability. There is always the possibility that someone 
will make a new discovery. This may be merely a specific addition 
to knowledge of fact, in which case it will simply be fitted in with 
the rest in its proper place. But it may be something which necessi- 
tates the reorganization to a greater or less degree, of the systema- 
tized body of knowledge. 

This growth-oriented dimension of scientific knowledge as a part 
of culture is of particular interest here. For this ties in with action; 
scientific innovation is not a culturally automatic process, but is an 
action process, and as such involves all the fundamental elements 
which are relevant to the analysis of action-processes. 

There is, however, as Kroeber has brought out with particular 
clarity,^ an inherent element of "cultural structure" which provides a 
partial but very important set of determinants of this process. For 
precisely as a cognitive system the body of scientific knowledge, in 
any given field at a given time, is definitely structured. Advance does 
not and cannot take place in random fashion in all directions at once, 
i.e., unselectively. It is structured by the intrinsic cultural features of 

'' See A. L. Kroeber, Configurations of Culture Growth, and Anthrofology, 
1948 Edition. 



Institutionalization of Scientific Investigation [ 337 ] 

that knowledge. Certain problems are inherent in this structure. 
Facts which are discovered may be more or less relevant to these 
problems. Even if discovered by chance, the consequences oF a dis- 
covery are thus a function of the way in which it fits into the 
structure of existing knowledge, and its problem-structure. The 
possibilities inherent in any given knowledge-system and related 
problem-structure are not random and infinite, but finite and spe- 
cifically structured. There will then be a determinate process of 
working out the possibilities inherent in a knowledge structure the 
building of which has once begun, until these possibilities have 
finally become exhausted. Kroeber uses this type of analysis most 
convincingly to show that creativity in scientific advance, as well as 
for example in the arts, is not a simple function of the supply of 
biologically gifted individuals, but depends on the job there is for 
them to do. By exactly the same token it cannot be simply a func- 
tion of favorable states of the social structure. This is authentically 
a cultural factor. 

Empirical knowledge is an essential part of all action, particu- 
larly when the instrumental aspect is highly developed. There is 
hence an inherent interest not only in the application of such 
knowledge, but in its further development. But at the same time we 
have seen that there are strongly counteracting factors of such a 
character that unless investigation becomes the primary technical 
function of specialized roles, the advancement of knowledge is often 
very slow and halting. Perhaps the most fundamental reason is that 
for the "practical man" the primary focus is on the attainment of 
the immediate goal itself, and knowledge constitutes simply one of 
the available resources for achieving it. But, furthermore, practical 
action tends, for a variety of reasons, to be imbedded in a matrix of 
non-rational orientation patterns (including the functional equiva- 
lents of magic) which, because they are not directly empirically 
grounded, can only be stabilized by being traditionalized. Indeed 
the general pressure toward stabilization of a system of action mili- 
tates against the advancement of knowledge because this obviously 
has many repercussions besides making the effective attainment of 
the particular goal more feasible. Also the practical man does not 
have a direct interest in the further ramifications of a scientific body 
of knowledge beyond his immediate sphere of practical interest. All 



[ 338 ] Belief Systems 

this is attested by a considerable amount of tension between scien- 
tists and practical men even in the fields where science has been 
most successfully applied. 

These reasons why the practical man develops resistances to 
himself pushing the advancement of empirical knowledge forward 
are also in turn connected with the fact that beyond certain points 
this advancement only becomes possible through the kinds of tech- 
nical means which involve specialization of roles. Knowledge itself 
becomes technical, and takes long training to master. Furthermore, 
investigation is a process which requires special skills which in cer- 
tain respects go beyond the mastery of the bases in established 
knowledge from which any given phase of the process starts. Hence 
the above considerations about the way in which changes in em- 
pirical knowledge impinge on any system of social interaction, be- 
come even more cogent when the place in a differentiated instru- 
mental complex of the specialized role of scientific investigation is 
taken into account. 

First, the technical nature of specialized science means that 
there develops what may be called a communication gap. The scien- 
tist is inevitably dependent on "laymen" for support and for the pro- 
vision of facilities. But in circumstantial detail the layman is not 
technically competent to judge what the scientist is doing, he has to 
take it "on authority." This general situation is accentuated by the 
fact that there is often a large gap between the frontiers of scien- 
tific investigation and the practical results which the practical man 
can most readily appreciate, understand and use. This is particu- 
larly because the cognitive structure of science is such that the 
ramifications of scientific problems cannot be restricted to the solu- 
tion of the kind of applied problem area in which a practical man is 
interested. He, therefore, from his own perspective often does not 
have the basis for seeing that what the scientist is doing is of 
any use. 

Such a communication gap between roles always creates a prob- 
lem of control. Besides the question of why an activity should be 
supported, which doesn't seem to be of any particular use, there are 
two types of foci of anxiety. In the first place the scientist must do 
a good many things which impinge upon others. Partly these things 
are just "queer" and their motives seem to be unfathomable. But 



InsthiUionalization of Scientific Investigation [ 339 ] 

sometimes they are potentially dangerous to some laymen, e.g., 
explosions in the chemical laboratory, and partly they impinge on 
touchy areas of sentiment. Thus, the dissection of cadavers by anato- 
mists and medical students long had to be carried out surreptitiously 
and today, with all the prestige of medical science, some religious 
groups permit autopsies only in the few cases where it is legally 
required. The activities of the Society for Prevention of Cruelty to 
Animals in trying to limit the use of animals in scientific research 
are well known. Scientists may also impose burdens on the layman 
if only by even asking him to give some of his time for a purpose 
which as a layman he does not understand. This is frequently the 
case in social science research, e.g., in interviewing subjects. 

Along with having to secure facilities from others in ways which 
impinge on their interests and sentiments, the scientist is faced with 
a good deal of anxiety about the implications of the results of his 
work. This is particularly true because the crucial significance of 
generality of implication of science means that it is not possible to 
limit these implications to the solution of clear-cut and limited prac- 
tical problems. This is perhaps particularly important in relation to 
the ideological, philosophical and religious fields. The motives of 
adherence to ideological and religious ideas are usually differently 
structured from those of belief in the simpler bits of empirical lore; 
the very fact that the elements of the situation involved present 
such extremely difficult cognitive problems and yet the affective 
interests in a clear-cut definition of the situation are so strong, makes 
that clear. But certainly no large-scale development of science is 
possible without some important impingement and hence in part an 
upsetting effect, on ideological and religious positions which play 
an important part in the cultural tradition. 

In general the practical man is hedged in by considerations 
which make only relatively ad hoc and limited resources available 
for him to make use of. Where the operations of scientific investi- 
gation may involve far-reaching repercussions on the sentiment 
system of a society, it is unlikely that the major impetus for such a 
development will come alone or even primarily^ from practical 
"interests." At the least practical interests will have to be combined 

^ The wielder of political power is the most obvious exception since he often 
cannot avoid such repercussions. 



[ 34° ] Belief Systems 

with a cultural situation which lends prestige to the relevant types 
of activity on bases other than their promise of improvements of 
practical efficiency. 

This appears very definitely to be the case with science. The 
place of science in Western society is part of the ascendancy of a 
cultural tradition which involves a high valuation of certain types 
of rationality of understanding of the empirical world, on grounds 
apart from the promise of practical applicability of the results of that 
understanding. Once such valuation is established and built into 
the institutional system, it comes to be strongly reinforced by the 
practical fruits, once science has been permitted to develop far 
enough so that these fruits have become relatively impressive. In all 
probability only when such a combination has become firmly estab- 
lished does it become possible for scientific investigation to acquire 
the level of prestige which it has enjoyed in the modern Western 
world. But even here there are many elements of ambivalence in 
public attitudes toward science and the scientist, which are ex- 
pressed in much irrational and some relatively rational opposition 
to his role.^ 

The obverse of this is that there is a strong non-rational element 
in the popular support of the scientist. He is the modern magician, 
the "miracle man" who can do incredible things. Along with this in 
turn goes a penumbra of belief in pseudo-science. Scientists them- 
selves are, like other people, far from being purely and completely 
rational beings. Their judgment, particularly toward and beyond 
the fringes of their technical competence, is often highly fallible, 
and things are said in the name of science which are very far from 
meeting the standards of scientific demonstrability, or short of 
that, showing the degree of tentativeness and suspension of judg- 
ment which is indicated in the light of the deficiencies of the evi- 
dence. From this professionally internal penumbra there is a shading 

^ Thus an article in the Vienna Presse, which the author happened to see 
while in Austria in the summer of 1948, argued with the utmost seriousness that it 
would have been a good thing for civilization had the Church in the long run 
won out against Galileo, that is, had the development of modern science been 
suppressed. The argument was that science had opened a Pandora's box with 
the contents of which humanity was unable to cope, and a kind of intellectual 
authoritarianism which would limit investigation to fields known to be "safe" was 
the only solution. Who is to say that there is no force in such an argument? 



Institutionalization of Scientific Investigation [ 341 ] 

off into the ideas about scientific matters current among the lay 
pubhc, where pseudo-science is much more prohfic. It is important 
to note that the conditions under which science could have a well- 
established place in the social system are such that the presence of 
this pseudo-scientific penumbra seems to be inevitable. It can, of 
course, to a degree be limited and controlled, and in fact is, but it 
seems unlikely that it can be eliminated. 

In the broadest possible sense, the most important feature of the 
Western cultural tradition as a bulwark of science is its strong uni- 
versalistic trend. This means in the first instance a strong emphasis 
on the importance of knowledge, an emphasis evidenced for instance 
in the stress on rational theology in all the most important branches 
of Christianity. That the hospitality to science was greatly increased 
in the "ascetic" branches of Protestantism, as compared to the Catho- 
lic tradition, is shovni by Merton's analysis of the religious situation 
in England at the time of the great scientific developments of the 
17th century. ^^ 

The valuation of knowledge in a secular direction greatly in- 
creased in post-mediaeval times, connecting with the revival of inter- 
est in and prestige of the traditions of classical antiquity. Eventually, 
in the Western world the doctrine that a gentleman ought to be an 
educated man, first as part of his ascribed aristocratic role, gradually 
shifted until it has at least become true in more recent times that an 
educated man was to be considered a gentleman, that is, knowledge 
became the most important single mark of generalized superiority. 
This is, of course, a highly schematic statement of a very complex 
development. 

The primary core of the Western tradition of higher education 
as the mark of the gentleman was in its earlier phases humanistic 
rather than scientific, though the place of mathematics is of con- 
siderable importance. But the great tradition of humanistic learning 
shares many features with science, above all the respect for impartial 
objectivity and hence for evidence; in the first instance shown in 
the concern for the authenticity of historical and literary texts, 
which is by no means so prominent in many other great literate 
traditions. The humanistic scholar in this sense was in many respects 

^° Robert K. Merton, Science and Society in lyth Century England. 



[ 342- ] Belief Systems 

the precursor of the scientist and is of course today his colleague in 
the most highly educated sector of the population. 

In the most modem era this cultural tradition has above all be- 
come embodied in the university as its principal institutionalized 
frame. Not least important of the facts about the modem university 
is that it combines the highest levels of development of the functions 
of pure scientific investigation in the same basic organizational com- 
plex with the humanistic branches of learning which have formed 
the primary core of the most highly rationalized part of the great 
expressive cultural tradition of the West. This includes, of course, 
theology as the rational foundation of religious beliefs. Furthermore, 
of course, it is highly significant that a large part of the fundamental 
training function of the major branches of applied science, especially 
in medicine and engineering, has become an integral part of the 
university. 

Apart from the institutionalization of the specific role of the 
scientist as such, which will be commented upon presently, this 
situation has the great importance of directly integrating the role of 
the scientist with those of the other principal "experts" in major 
branches of the cultural tradition. The scientist has the support of 
being considered part of the same cultural complex which includes 
the humanities. Not least important, he shares with them the func- 
tion of educating the primary elite elements of the oncoming gen- 
eration in the society. In so far as the doctrine is upheld that in gen- 
eral the "leading men" of the society should be educated men in 
the modern sense, their elite status carries with it commitment to a 
value-system of which the values of the scientist, and the valuation 
of his activities and their results, form an integral part. This integra- 
tion of science, both with the wider cultural tradition of the society, 
and with its institutional structure, constitutes the frimary basis of 
the institutionalization of scientific investigation as part of the social 
structure. It means that the scientist shares the status in the uni- 
versities with the other key groups who are primary culture bearers 
and on terms such that the values of science come to be inculcated 
in the value-system of society generally through the education of its 
primary elite elements. Without this it is highly doubtful whether 
even at its most recent stages of development, the interest of prac- 
tical men in the fmits of science could alone long sustain scientific 



Institutionalization of Scientific Investigation [ 343 ] 

investigation as the function of a major type of specialized social 
role. 

In more specific terms, it is first important to note that status on 
the faculty of a university gives the scientist a clearly institution- 
alized role with all its concomitants. In terms of modern organization 
in the occupational field, it gives him both a source of remuneration 
for himself and of course his family, and a "market" for his products, 
through putting him in relation to students and professional col- 
leagues and providing or encouraging publication channels for his 
work. It provides him by and large with the increasingly necessary 
but expensive facilities for his work, and the framework of the all- 
important cooperative relationships with colleagues and others. By 
giving him an "orthodox" occupational role, it gives not only him, 
but members of his family, an acceptable status in the society, 
e.g., he "earns a living." Moreover, the university, both through 
its general prestige and sometimes through specific administrative 
action, serves to protect his freedom to carry out his function in the 
face of forces in the society which tend to interfere with it.^^ 

The occupational role which the scientist occupies, with its 
center of gravity in the university, is an integral part of the general 
occupational system. Moreover it is of the special type we have 
above called a professional role.^^ The fact that it shares the pattern 
elements of universalism, affective neutrality, specificity and achieve- 
ment orientation with the occupational system in general does not 
require special comment here. But it is worth while to call attention 
to the fact that as a professional role it is institutionalized predomi- 
nantly in terms of collectivity— rather than self-orientation. 

There seem to be two primary contexts in which self-orientation 
in the scientific world would tend to be seriously dysfunctional. One 

^^ The fact that mechanisms of social control sometimes fail to operate 
successfully is no evidence that they do not exist, or are not effective in other 
connections. 

^^ There are, of course, many possibilities of dysfunctional phenomena de- 
veloping when scientific investigation is thus institutionalized. Thus exposure to 
the criticism of colleagues may be associated with a tendency to sterile pedantry 
and perfectionism in detail which sacrifices the importance of bold ideas. In 
general the minimization of refined competitive ratings in university faculties — 
the treatment of the "company of scholars" as a "company of equals" — may be 
interpreted to be an adaptive structure with the function of counteracting some 
of these dysfunctional tendencies. Cf. Logan Wilson, The Academic Man. 



[ 344 ] Belief Systems 

is the implication of the saying "knowledge is power." It is indeed 
true that in a sufficiently large number and strategically important 
type of cases the discoveries of the scientist would, if uncontrolled, 
put him in a position to interfere with the interests and senti- 
ments of others. These others, the "public," are in need of protec- 
tion in the whole field of the uses of science. A major factor in this 
need lies in the gap in communication between expert and layman 
occasioned by the technical character of science. The layman is 
unable to protect his own interests in a "market situation." Thus, in 
a certain sense, the scientist is institutionally endowed with author- 
ity, he is recognized as "an authority" in his field, and the general 
analysis of the functional reasons for the association of other-orienta- 
tion with authority applies. 

The second dysfunctional possibility is that of the "monopoliza- 
tion" of knowledge in its bearing on the process of scientific ad- 
vancement itself. Such monopolization would not only restrict the 
rate and spread of scientific advance, by making it more difficult to 
build on what others had done, but it would also seriously inter- 
fere with the social control mechanisms of science internal to itself. 
It is a cardinal fact that the scientist is, through discussion and pub- 
lication, exposed to the criticism of his professional colleagues to an 
unusual degree, including the checking of his results through repli- 
cation on the part of others. The idea that a "scientist's theory is 
his castle" which must not be trespassed upon, except on terms laid 
down by himself, would be incompatible with this discipline which 
is so important to the maintenance of standards of objectivity.^^ 
Finally, it should not be forgotten that the scientist requires "privi- 
leges" from his fellow men. Collectivity-orientation certainly does 
much to validate his claims to them. Tlius, when the social scientist 
requests information in an interview the subject may very likely ask, 
"why do you want to know this?" The legitimation, which must be 
explicit or implicit in the answer, is that it is in the interests of the 
advancement of knowledge, not the personal "axe to grind" that 
the interviewer may conceivably have. Often explicit safeguards 

^' This is what Merton, "Science and Democratic Social Structure," op. cit., 
Chapter XII, calls the "communism" of science. He gives an admirable functional 
analysis of its significance. 



The Institutionalization of Ap'plied Science [ 345 ] 

against misuse of information, i.e., generally "personal" or "partisan" 
rather than scientific use, have to be given. 

The above discussion has dealt only with certain aspects of the 
institutionalization of the process of scientific investigation in a 
social system. It has not treated the very complex problems of the 
repercussions of the results of this process in the rest of the society; 
something about this subject will have to be said in Chapter XI 
below in connection with the problems of social change. It has, how- 
ever, become evident that, important as the cultural aspects of sci- 
ence are, the concrete processes of its development will depend very 
heavily on the ways in which these are related to the other elements 
of the social system, some of which, of course, consist in other than 
scientific aspects of the cultural tradition. The possibilities inherent 
in a cultural configuration are, as Kroeber has so brilliantly shown, 
one essential element of scientific development. But these possibili- 
ties may remain undeveloped unless the cultural pattern element 
comes into the proper articulation with the institutional structure of 
the social system. 

The most important single consideration is that the function of 
investigation, above all in "pure" science, should become the pri- 
mary functional content of a system of fully institutionalized roles, 
roles which are necessarily occupational in type. This requires the 
support of an institutionalized cultural tradition broader than that 
of science itself, as well as of the more immediate patterns defining 
the relevant role-type. It involves all the elements of the social system 
which are relevant to the place of that cultural tradition in the so- 
ciety, in its non-scientific as well as its scientific aspects. The 
"obvious" intrinsic merits of science, as seen by the modem rational 
mind, are by no means sufficient to account for the fact that the 
scientist has in fact acquired a fully institutionalized role in modern 
Western society. 

2. The Institutionalization of Afflied Science 

JUST as scientific investigation, though an inherent pos- 
sibility of rational action, does not develop far unless it is institu- 
tionalized as part of the role structure of the social system, it cannot 
be taken for granted that even available scientific knowledge will be 
utilized in practice unless the roles in which it is utilized are equally 



[ 34^ J Belief Systems 

institutionalized. An example of this institutionalization, that of 
modem medical practice, will be analyzed in some detail in Chap- 
ter X below. Here only a few brief remarks about the setting of the 
problem will be introduced. 

In the first place very generally the kinds of technology in which 
sophisticated science plays an important part are those which take 
the "long way around." They involve approaching the attainment 
of an empirical goal by the use of elaborate equipment, training of 
personnel, and complex organization. They develop to any great 
extent only when there is a basis for the acceptance of the disci- 
plines necessary for the functioning of that type of social structure. 
Not least of these is a fundamental fact about the instrumental 
division of labor. This is the very simple fact that the incumbent of 
the ordinary differentiated role in such a system cannot, in the 
nature of the case, have a direct gratification-interest in the immedi- 
ate results of the bulk of his activity in the role. He must work for 
goals of which others are the primary direct beneficiaries, often even 
then only after a long series of further steps in the process of "pro- 
duction" following his own contribution. He must look for his own 
gratifications in two other directions. First, he has "remuneration" 
for his role-activities, which in a complex society like ours above all 
takes the form of money income contingent on his role performances 
but also includes various symbolic rewards such as prestige and 
honors. Secondly, he has the gratifications derivable from the ac- 
tivities themselves, including the complex of social relationships in 
which they are performed. These we call by such terms as pride of 
workmanship, concern with self-respect and with the approval and 
esteem of others. They involve the cathexis of affectively neutral 
value patterns. Of course the affectively positive cathexis of persons 
with whom there are occupational associations is also very generally 
involved, but this must be a specifically limited and controlled 
cathexis if it is not to interfere with occupational performance. 

The acceptance of scientifically grounded technologies in gen- 
eral fits into this context. It involves pressing these general features 
of an elaborate division of labor farther than they would otherwise 
be pressed. Above all, perhaps, it is important that the persons who 
must in the nature of the case perform the roles of implementing 
the technological ideas, cannot normally themselves be the immedi- 



The Institutionalization of A^flied Science [ 347 ] 

ate beneficiaries of the results. Hence the problem of motivating 
such innovations must be approached in the same general terms as 
those of motivating any further elaboration of the division of labor. 
It must either be in terms of the "self-interest" of the incumbent in 
possible remuneration, which almost always involves an uncertainty 
factor, or it must be in terms of the motivational significances of 
achievement values or collectivity obligations without direct regard 
to the enjoyment of the immediate results. Very generally it may be 
said that the latter class of motivational elements almost certainly 
outweigh the former in significance. 

The applied scientist, if we may call him such, is subject to 
most of the difficulties which beset the investigator. There is the 
same communication gap, in that his technical competence can be 
appreciated by the layman only in the light of results which can 
only be demonstrated after he has been "given a chance," or 
through non-logical mechanisms associated with the prestige of his 
knowledge, its sources and associations. There is the same set of 
factors which everywhere operate to oppose innovation because it 
threatens to upset the equilibrium of an established system of social 
interaction. As a major aspect of this, there is the fact that the 
applied scientist must often "interfere" with the interests and senti- 
ments of those on whom his activities impinge, who are sometimes 
the direct beneficiaries of his functions and sometimes not. 

These are the types of considerations which help to account for 
the fact that in most societies technological innovation has, in spite 
of its obvious benefits, often been surprisingly slow and halting, and 
that even in our own, where it has become institutionalized to a very 
high degree, it generates very substantial resistances in many fields. 
These resistances imply in general that there will be a high degree 
of technological development only where there is the same type of 
support from a broader general cultural tradition, and its principal 
modes of institutionalization as we discussed for scientific investiga- 
tion itself. Here we may again note that in our society the highest 
levels of technology are rooted in the universities, and share the sup- 
port of the latter with scientific investigation as such. In the case of 
medicine, which will be discussed below, it is not too much to say 
that American medicine scarcely could be said to have come of age 
as a field of applied science until, not much more than a generation 



[ 34^ ] Belief Systems 

ago, it became established that the norm for medical education was 
the university medical school, and that the norm again for medical 
research was to be found in the laboratories of such schools and of 
the teaching hospitals associated with them. Thus the scientific 
focus of medical practice, the training of the practitioner, the foun- 
tainhead of scientific innovation directly applicable in medicine, 
and the general cultural tradition of which all science is a part, have 
become organized about the university as the principal trustee of 
that tradition, as the focus of its institutionalization. What is true 
of medicine is broadly true of the other principal fields of applied 
science. 

In addition, of course, the institutionalization of applied science 
requires a direct role structure which is "adequate" to its functional 
needs. In the modem Western world this has taken place mainly 
in terms of the professional type of role. It will be argued in Chap- 
ter X in connection with the specific material about medical practice 
that, by and large, the conditions necessary for the application of 
science to practical affairs on a large scale would not be compatible 
with any other of the major types of role structure. The reasons for 
this contention will be summed up and generalized after the evi- 
dence on this particular professional group has been presented. 

In general, then, we may hold that applied science, like scien- 
tific investigation itself, requires quite definite conditions in the 
structure of the social system, as well as the cultural prerequisites in 
the form of the adequate state of existing knowledge. Knowledge 
does not "apply itself," no matter how advantageous to the society 
the results may, to our Western mind, appear. It gets applied only 
through the mechanisms of institutionalization of roles within 
which the requisite combinations of motivational and cultural ele- 
ments can develop. Only by becoming in this sense incorporated 
into the structure of the social system, thus coming to constitute 
more than a body of "ideas," does empirical knowledge acquire the 
basis for a major influence on action. 

3. The Institutionalization of Ideologies 

IN DEALING with scientific investigation we were con- 
cerned with a type of action where cognitive interests had unques- 
tioned primacy. In the case of the practical applications of science 



The Institutionalization of Ideologies [ 349 ] 

a goal is given, but subject to this given goal, on the instrumental 
level cognitive interests still have primacy. When we move to the 
consideration of ideologies we are no longer dealing with cognitive 
primacy, but with evaluative primacy. It may be noted that it is 
impossible for there to be a type of belief system where expressive 
interests have clear primacy, for there the cognitive interest would 
be subordinated to the expressive and we would have a system of 
expressive symbols, not of beliefs. The cognitive interpretation of 
the meaning of these symbols on the other hand would, as a type of 
action interest focus, become a process of investigation which would 
bring it over into the realm of cognitive primacy again. 

An ideology, then, is a system of beliefs, held in common by the 
members of a collectivity,^^ i.e., a society, or a sub-collectivity of 
one— including a movement deviant from the main culture of the 
society— a system of ideas which is oriented to the evaluative inte- 
gration of the collectivity, by interpretation of the empirical nature 
of the collectivity and of the situation in which it is placed, the 
processes by which it has developed to its given state, the goals to 
which its members are collectively oriented, and their relation to the 
future course of events. In so far as the cognitive interest has clear 
primacy the belief system is scientific or philosophical. Such belief 
systems may contribute to the building of an ideology, indeed 
always do, but solely as an object of such a paramount interest 
the belief system does not constitute an ideology. Similarly so long 
as it concerns only interpretation of a situation in terms relevant to 
the attainment of a given specific goal, e.g., victory in war, the 
belief system is a set of instrumental beliefs. To constitute an 
ideology there must exist the additional feature that there is some 
level of evaluative commitment to the belief as an aspect of mem- 
bership in the collectivity, subscription to the belief system is insti- 
tutionalized as part of the role of collectivity membership. There 
is a great variation in the mode of this institutionalization as well 
as its degree. It may be completely informal, or it may be formally 
enforced as subscription to a specified text with sanctions for devi- 
ance enforced by a specific agency. But as distinguished from a 
primarily cognitive interest in ideas, in the case of an ideology, there 

^* Since our concern is with the social system we shall not deal here with 
personal ideologies. 



[ 35° ] Belief Systems 

must be an obligation to accept its tenets as the basis of action. As 
distinguished from a purely instrumental belief there must be in- 
volvement of an idea that the welfare of the collectivity and not 
merely attainment of a particular goal hinges on the implementa- 
tion of the belief system. 

What we are here calling an ideology has its central focus in 
the empirical aspects of the interpretation of the nature and situa- 
tion of the collectivity. But it is in the nature of the case that these 
empirical elements should be combined with and shade off into 
non-empirical elements at the points where justification of the ulti- 
mate goals and values of collective action become involved. A sys- 
tem of religious ideas, on the other hand, rests primarily on the 
non-empirical premises of its belief system and "works back" as it 
were, from these to their implications for the empirical nature and 
situation of the collectivity. 

The statement that the orientation of an ideology is toward the 
"evaluative integration of the collectivity" is in need of interpreta- 
tion. By this is not meant that the actor who subscribes to the belief 
system needs to have a sophisticated theory of what integrates the 
collectivity, but only that it is felt that the welfare of the group is 
bound up with maintenance of the belief system and its implemen- 
tation in action. It can readily be seen that a belief system toward 
which such an attitude is held in common must in fact acquire in- 
tegrative significance for the collectivity. 

The primary emphasis of this volume has been on the integra- 
tion of social systems at the level of patterns of value-orientation as 
institutionalized in role-expectations. These patterns of value-orien- 
tation are elements of the cultural tradition, but are only part of it. 
Man is a cognizing animal, and so his values do not exist apart from 
beliefs which give them cognitive meaning. The dimension of 
cognitive orientation to the situation is just as essential to a total 
system of cultural orientation as is that of value-orientation to the 
choice-alternatives of action, and is analytically independent of it, 
but of course also interdependent with it. 

Furthermore, of course, the general strain to consistency in a 
cultural tradition, the more so the more highly "rationalized" it is, 
means that in general the value-orientations tend to be relatively 



The Institutionalization of Ideologies [ 351 ] 

consistent with the beHef system. The question of cause and effect 
is not at issue just now, interdependence may be assumed. 

Since there must be relative consistency in the value-orientation 
patterns of a collectivity— though perfect consistency is not possible 
—this consistency must extend to the system of beliefs which give 
cognitive meaning to these value-orientations, again imperfectly to 
be sure. If ideological beliefs and value-patterns are, as assumed, 
interdependent, relative stability and consistency of the belief sys- 
tem has the same order of functional significance as do stability and 
consistency of the value-orientation patterns. Hence there must be 
a set of beliefs, subscription to which is in some sense an obligation 
of collectivity membership roles, where the cognitive conviction of 
truth and the "moral" conviction of Tightness are merged. Again 
this integration may well be and generallv is, as we shall show, 
imperfect. An approximation to it is, however, of high significance 
to a social system. 

Ideology thus serves as one of the primary bases of the cognitive 
legitimation of patterns of value-orientation. Value-orientation pat- 
terns, it will be remembered, alwavs constitute definitions of the 
situation in terms of directions of solution of action-dilemmas. It is 
not possible in a given situation to give primacy both to technical 
competence independent of particularistic solidarities, and to the 
particularistic solidarity, and so on through the list of dilemmas. So 
far as this is possible in empirically cognitive terms, an ideology 
"rationalizes" these value-selections, it gives reasons why one direc- 
tion of choice rather than its alternative should be selected, why 
it is right and proper that this should be so. 

The importance of this function of cognitive legitimation may 
be derived from two sources, the general importance of cognitive 
orientation in action, and the need to integrate this with the other 
components of the action system. Given the importance of the cog- 
nitive interest, cognitive deficiencies in the belief system constitute 
a source of strain. The relative significance of the value-of "truth" 
in a value system may vary over a wide range. But it cannot be said 
that a human action system can exist in which in a radical sense 
"it does not matter" whether the cognitive propositions which are 
current in the society are believed to have any cognitive validity in 



[ 35^ ] Belief Systems 

any sense. Such a situation would be radically incompatible with the 
empirical relevance of the frame of reference of action. 

As we have seen the sharing of common belief systems is a 
condition of the full integration of a system of social interaction. 
Cognitive differences are thus sources of strain, but so also are 
cognitive inadequacies. 

The "trend to rationality" has a status in the frame of reference 
of action which is cognate with that of the "optimization of gratifi- 
cation." By definition it is nonsensical within the frame of reference 
to conceive an actor as preferring an increment of deprivation to a 
gratification unless there were a balancing gratification elsewhere 
in the system. Similarly, when confronted by a choice between a 
more and a less adequate belief according to cognitive standards, it is 
nonsensical, in terms of the frame of reference, to conceive the actor 
as preferring the less adequate, that is "error" to 'truth." This is true 
unless the strain introduced by the feeling of cognitive inadequacy 
is balanced by an interest in another direction which would have to 
be sacrificed— e.g., in the sharing of beliefs. 

Rationalization is in this sense an inherent "directionality" of 
the action process, like entropy in classical mechanics. It is so in 
the nature of the conceptual scheme, not as an empirical generaliza- 
tion. This poses the problem, as in the case of gratification, of the 
balances of forces which may facilitate this process, impede it or 
even counteract it. But it always requires motivational "force" to 
impede or counteract the tendency to rationalization. The empiri- 
cal problems are to locate the relevant forces in the action system 
and their relations to each other. It is thus quite possible for the 
cognitive interest to be drastically inhibited by its relations to other 
elements of action, as we have repeatedly pointed out. Furthermore 
there may be very powerful and hence effective motivations to cog- 
nitive distortion. But nonetheless belief in cognitive validity is a 
functional necessity of action systems. Further, where that belief is 
possible only at the sacrifice of cognitive value standards, this fact 
constitutes an element of strain in the action system in question. 

The significance of the function of legitimation comes to a 
head in the relation of ideology and religious ideas to the social 
system. This is simply because when we speak of ideologies we 
are dealing with a case where the cognitive interest does not have 



The Institutionalization of Ideologies [ 353 ] 

the degree of segregation from other elements of the action system 
which is possible in the cases of investigation and instrumental ap- 
plication of knowledge in specialized roles and with respect to 
specific goals. Cognitive legitimation of value-orientations is a 
matter of the integration of cognitive values with the other ele- 
ments of the social system. 

The cognitive content of ideologies may involve any one or all 
of the classes of situational objects discussed above, namely physi- 
cal objects, personalities, collectivities and cultural objects. Beliefs 
about the world of nature are certainly an essential part of the 
cultural tradition of any social system, and necessarily acquire 
ideological as well as purely cognitive-investigative or instrumental 
significance. The elaboration and generalization of this belief sys- 
tem is particularly important. Only in a few societies, of course, 
are sophisticated scientific levels of such elaboration of high ideo- 
logical significance. The importance which such belief systems 
have acquired on the ideological level is one of the salient facts 
of the modem world. Beliefs about the heliocentric view of the 
solar system, about Darwinism and the principle of natural selection, 
about genetics and the problems of human inequality will serve as 
examples. 

There is a special significance of the content of scientific knowl- 
edge in the ideology of scientists as members of professional col- 
lectivities. Tentativeness is, of course, an essential part of the value 
system which governs the role of the investigator. But equally the 
acceptance of evidence in accord with the canons of investigation, 
and of the implications of such evidence, is part of that same value 
system. Hence in a special sense, subject of course to the ultimately 
tentative character of all scientific findings, there is an obligation 
on the scientist to accept the validity of scientific findings and 
theories which have been adequately demonstrated. The extreme 
skeptic of the variety who when faced with the direct evidence 
stubbornly insists that "there ain't no such animal" cannot be a 
good "citizen" of the collectivity of scientists. Thus not only is 
there in the value-system of science commitment to the canons of 
scientific procedure, but there is commitment to a system of belief- 
content which is part of the obligation of the role of scientist. The 



[ 354 ] Belief Systems 

fact that the behefs may be modified in the hght of new scientific 
evidence does not alter this. 

In spite of the importance of behefs about empirical "nature" 
in the general cultural tradition, and their special importance for 
the ideology of natural scientists, for understandable reasons the 
more prominent content of social ideologies is to be found in beliefs 
about personalities, collectivities and cultural objects. Indeed we 
may say that the social ideology focuses in beliefs about the col- 
lectivity itself, with the other content-categories entering in largely 
in terms of beliefs about the significance of and the relations of 
personalities and cultural objects to the collectivity. Thus the 
problem of "collectivism" vs. "individualism" as an ideological prob- 
lem concerns the mode of integration of the individual personality 
system with the collectivity. 

In general it is clear that the cognitive standards of ideological 
legitimation of value-orientations must be the same as the canons 
of scientific validity. By definition the most developed empirical 
knowledge in any field at a given time is the state of science in that 
field. Hence the ultimate authority for the validity of any ideological 
tenet as a cognitive proposition must be a scientific authority. But 
the very fact that ideology unlike science has as integrative 
functions in the social system involving relations to many other 
interests than the cognitive interests of scientists, means that these 
standards will very generally not prevail in the determination of 
what beliefs will actually be held. If they do not, there have to be 
adjustive mechanisms which are homologous with the mechanism 
of rationalization in the personality system. 

Because of the central place of the sciences of action in relation 
to the subject matter of social ideologies, the problem of the rela- 
tions of the social sciences to ideology is as is, of course, well known 
particularly acute. Even more than in the case of natural science, 
because of this fact the high development of social science is subject 
to a special set of conditions of integration in the social system. 

It may be noted that an ideology is an empirical belief system 
held in common by the members of any collectivity. The focal 
type of case of course is the ideology which serves to legitimize the 
value-orientation patterns central to a stable society. These are, in 
the most fully institutionalized sense, the established beliefs of the 



The Institutionalization of Ideologies [ 355 ] 

social system. In any complex social system there will, of course, be 
differentiation on the ideological level between various sub-collec- 
tivities of the larger society. There is room for a considerable 
amount of this differentiation without any of the sub-ideologies 
being treated as explicitly deviant. 

In the last chapter, however, in dealing with deviant behavior 
we called attention to two types of cases of variability beyond the 
range of this order of sub-collectivity differentiation. The first is 
what was there called the deviant sub-culture. Here, as illustrated 
by the case of the delinquent gang, there is an explicit lack of 
appeal to legitimation in terms of the values and ideology of the 
wider society, there is an open "state of war." But within the 
deviant collectivity there is very definitely a value-system and hence 
an ideology. This ideology will always include a diagnosis of the 
basis for the break with the main society and its value system. For 
example, there will be such beliefs as that "you can't win" in the 
wider society, that "they're out to get you" and the like. It will also 
involve an ideology of the relationship system within the deviant 
collectivity, as for instance to why leadership and discipline should 
be accepted, and as to why "ratting" cannot be tolerated. In such 
cases of an open break with the value-system and ideology of the 
wider society we may speak of a "counter-ideology."^^ 

The second case is that of the deviant movement which seeks 
legitimation in terms of the institutionalized value-system, but by 
giving its own "interpretation" of the value-system and its accom- 
panying ideology. This is in general what "radical" movements do. 
Precisely because of the tension involved in the degree of break 
with the main society to which they have become committed, the 
ideological preoccupations of the members of such movements are 
likely to be very intense. They have both the interest in convincing 
themselves and in winning proselytes. It is crucially important for 
them to believe and to convince others that the aspects ot the estab- 
lished society— such as "capitalism"— against which they are in 
revolt, can be defined as illegitimate in terms of a common set of 
beliefs and values. 

In the light of the tensions involved in these situations and 
the motivational elements which are, as was shown in the last chap- 

^^ In a sense similar to Lasswell's use of the term "counter-mores." 



[ 35^ ] Belief Systems 

ter, likely to be involved in either of these two types of deviance, 
it is not surprising that the beliefs of such deviant collectivities 
often show signs of compulsiveness in the psychological sense. The 
believer must be protected against any challenge to his belief, not 
least from within himself. On high levels of generalization, as in 
the thought of radical "intellectuals," this is very likely to take 
the form of the "closed system." There are likely to be pseudo- 
logical devices by which the general formulae of the belief system 
can be believed to yield a "satisfactory" answer to any question, so 
that the possibility of damaging evidence turning up need not be a 
source of anxiety. Of course, compulsive conformity with an insti- 
tutionalized ideology may lead to the same order of cognitive distor- 
tion. The antithesis to the orientation of science is too patent to 
need elaboration. 

These two cases of the ideology of more or less explicitly deviant 
collectivities serve to call attention to some of the bases of cognitive 
distortion in conformist ideologies. In Motives, Values and Systems 
of Action (Chapter III) it was shown in some detail why it was not 
possible, in a complex social system, for a single pattern-consistent 
system of value-orientation to be completely and evenly institution- 
alized in all of the roles within the social system. Because of the 
intimate relation between value-orientation patterns and ideologies, 
this element of imperfection of integration in the value-system will 
pose cognitive problems on an ideological level. For example in our 
society the universalistic achievement values embodied in the occu- 
pational system are undoubtedly very strongly emphasized. But at 
the same time kinship ties and the solidarities which are most 
closely connected with kinship are also highly valued. There is an 
element of rank-ordering of these values but it is not fully adequate 
to solve the conflicts. Thus we have more deviation from the ideal 
of equality of opportunity than we feel altogether comfortable about. 

It was stated that, in the nature of the case, integration of the 
social sysem is the primary function of its common ideology. Hence 
where there is an element of malintegration in the actual social 
structure the tendency vvdll be for the ideology to "gloss it over" 
and "play it down." Fully to "face-up" to the reality of the im- 
portance of conflicting elements in the value-system and in the 
realistic situation, e.g., wath respect to the prevalence of some types 



The Institutionalization of Ideologies [ 357 ] 

of deviant behavior, would be a threat to the stabihty of the society. 
In these respects, relative to conflicting elements within the social 
system, ideologies have functions directly homologous with those of 
rationalization in the personality system. 

It may be noted that this statement applies just as much to the 
ideology of a deviant movement (or sub-culture) as it does to that 
of a stabilized social system. There may, in fact, be even stronger 
pressure to selectivity of emphasis in such an ideology than in an 
"official" one, because of the greater insecurity of the position of 
the adherents of the movement, both with respect to their own in- 
ternal conflicts and with respect to legitimation vis-a-vis the larger 
society. 

A second source of the cognitive distortion of ideologies lies in 
the needs of "mass psychology." The importance of this set of fac- 
tors will vary greatly with the character and size of the collectivity 
in question. But in so far as the ideology must serve to unify large 
numbers and these are not competent in the intellectual fields 
covered by the ideology, there will ordinarily be a tendency to 
"vulgarization" in the well-knovvoi ways. Oversimplification is per- 
haps the keynote of this distortion. Very simple slogans and pat 
formulae will tend to have a prominent role, and will gloss over 
the intellectual complexities of the field.-^*' 

Finally, the strongly evaluative reference of ideologies tends to 
link in with the "wishful" or romantic-utopian element of motiva- 
tion which is present in every social system. There will generally, 
it may be inferred, be a tendency to ideological distortion of the 
reality in the direction of giving reign to the wishful element. In 
the case of the ideological legitimation of the status quo it will tend 
to overidealization of that state of aff^airs. In the case of a deviant 
movement it will tend to include a romantic-utopian component in 
the definition of the goals of the movement. Conversely there is a 
tendency to paint the contrast of the idealized state of affairs, and 
what it is compared with, in exaggeratedly black and white terms. 
To a "conservative" ideology there tends to be a sensitivity about 
any suggestion of imperfections in the status quo. To the "radical" 
the institutional status quo against which he is in revolt may appear 

^® The phenomena of "sharpening" and "levehng" familiar in the work of 
social psychology are prominent here. 



[ 35^ ] Belief Systems 

to be very nearly radically evil, precisely because of the probability 
that he is compulsively motivated to rejection of it because of the 
part played by his genuine attachment to the status quo. 

It is likely, then, that ideologies will become the symbolic battle- 
ground of some of the principal elements of tension and conflict 
within a social system. In the nature of the case, there would seem 
to be an inherent tendency to polarization, to the development of 
vicious circles which is part of the general vicious circle tendency 
analyzed in the last chapter. By the same token this process of ideo- 
logical polarization must be subject to mechanisms of social control. 
Traditionalization and authoritarian enforcement are obvious pos- 
sibilities, it may be surmised. Another in the modem type of society 
operates through the linking of ideologies with the institutionalized 
pursuit of the intellectual disciplines dealing with their subject 
matter. 

In this perspective it becomes clear that the social sciences have 
a particularly crucial, and in certain respects precarious position 
relative to the ideological balance of the social system. On the one 
hand the more important social ideologies cannot avoid concern 
with the subject matter of the social sciences, nor can the latter 
simply avoid problems which touch on ideological interests. But on 
the other hand, the circumstances in which ideologies are devel- 
oped and operate are such, that it seems practically impossible to 
avoid the presence of an important area of conflict between the two 
major types of cognitive interest. The cognitive distortions which 
are always present in ideologies, often compulsively motivated, will 
tend to be uncovered and challenged by the social scientist. Some 
of the results may be accepted, but only painfully and with allow- 
ance for a process of assimilation and adjustment over time. Be- 
cause of this situation there will, more or less inevitably, be a tend- 
ency for the guardians of ideological purity in a social system to 
be highly suspicious of what social scientists are doing. 

Indeed it is not surprising that the two non-rational mechanisms 
of stabilization of ideological orientations, which we have several 
times mentioned, traditionalization and authoritarian enforcement 
of an "official" creed, are so very commonly encountered in this 
field. The "liberal" pattern of freedom of thought, which both per- 
mits ideological controversy and free interplay between the scientific 



N on-Em'pirical Beliefs and the Social System [ 359 ] 

and the ideological levels, is the exception, and certainly depends 
for its stability on a rather delicately balanced combination of con- 
ditions in the social system. It may, however, also be a highly 
important condition for many elements of the potentiality of growth 
of societies, as it is obviously a prerequisite for the flourishing of 
social science. 

§ THE RELATION OF NON-EMPIRICAL BELIEFS 
TO THE SOCIAL SYSTEM 

NON-EMPIRICAL belief is, as has been noted, a residual 
category. But, in the light of the development of modern philosophy, 
it may be claimed that this is more than just an arbitrary assump- 
tion. At many points in the theory of action the methodological 
canons of modern science are found to constitute a fundamental 
substantive point of reference. This is true of the standards of in- 
strumental efficiency of action, and of the judgment of cognitive 
distortion in relation to rationalizations and ideologies. 

Science may thus be treated as the major axis of our analysis of 
cognitive problems. In so far as this is the case it is legitimate to 
use it as a negative as well as a positive point of reference, to define 
deviations as well as correspondences. 

In these terms the first major distinction to be called attention 
to is that between deviation from the standards of empirical science 
within the scope of their applicability, and problems and beliefs 
which fall outside the scope of scientific applicability. The former 
comprise the categories of ignorance and error. ^''' The one important 
thing to establish about them here is that the beliefs which fill these 
gaps in positive empirical knowledge are not properly non-empirical 
beliefs but are scientifically inadequate empirical beliefs. They may 
be summed up in the category of "pseudo-science." 

Non-empirical beliefs by contrast concern those cognitive prob- 
lem areas which are inaccessible to scientific method or the equiva- 
lent cognitive value-standards in the culture in question. These 
may be classed in two categories. The first is the "problem of 
knowledge," the second the problem of cosmology, or that of 
"being." The essential fact about the problem of knowledge in the 

^^ This problem area has been exhaustively analyzed in the StrtictUTe of 
Social Action, and need not be further gone into here. 



[ 360 ] Belief Systems 

present context is that science yields substantive empirical knowl- 
edge which is evaluated by a given set of the canons of its validity. 
From a logical point of view, then, scientific knowledge becomes a 
closed system which it is not possible to break out of by scientific 
procedures. In scientific terms it is possible only to add to the fund 
of scientific knowledge itself, to refine and perfect within the closed 
circle. 

What is left unanswered is the radical question of "How is 
empirical knowledge itself possible?" What are the conditions in 
the nature of the universe on which it depends? This is, of course, 
the question to which Kant addressed himself, and which has pre- 
occupied the modem theory of knowledge. It is not our province 
to go into the technical philosophical problems of epistemology, but 
merely to note that this problem area constitutes one of the two 
major foci of the boundaries of scientific-empirical belief systems. 
In every system of non-empirical beliefs there will, if rationaliza- 
tion has proceeded far enough, be beliefs as to the grounding of 
empirical knowledge and its relations to non-empirical knowledge. 
An example is the theory of the relations between revelation and 
natural reason, which has played such an important part in much 
of Christian theology. 

The second problem area is that of cosmology or being. Science 
of course gives us substantive knowledge of empirical phenomena. 
But it is only here that the philosophical problem begins. It is 
essentially the problem, given empirical belief-systems and their 
place in human action, what are the implications of these facts for 
the cognitive problems which are not solved by scientific procedures? 
Are the other aspects of experience besides empirical cognition 
relevant to a "theory" of the nature of the cosmos? Is "nature," 
perhaps defined as that which is knowable by empirical science, 
the whole of "reality"? What is the relation of "life" to inanimate 
nature, of human personality to the organic world, etc.? 

This is in a sense an area of "problems of meaning." But this 
sense of the term should be distinguished from the sense in which 
that term was used in the preceding section. There the key fact 
was the bearing of a belief on the interests of actors, specifically 
the cathectic and evaluative interests. Here the context is so far 
purely cognitive. But it does involve the extension of the area of 



Non-Emfirical Beliefs and the Social System [ 361 ] 

cognitive interests beyond the circle of empirical knowledge and 
problems, to include the substantive problems ot "what of it" in a 
cognitive sense. 

It could be argued from a certain point of view that the above 
very brief statement of the main non-empirical problem areas is 
"culture bound" because empirical science does not have the same 
relative position in other cultures as it does in that of the modem 
Western World. This is, of course, empirically true, and yet it 
does not seem to be a serious source of difficulty. The question at 
issue is not the relative empirical importance of the different com- 
ponents of the cultural tradition, but the definition of their logical 
and theoretical relations to each other. There is every reason to 
believe that the same fundamental components can be found in all 
cultures. If science (i.e., empirical knowledge) is such a universal 
component, no matter how primitive its development in some 
cultures, there should be no theoretical objection to using it as a 
point of reference for the definition of its relations to other com- 
ponents within the frame of reference of action. Only the strictly 
positivistic position, which claims that there is no other cognitive 
orientation but that of science, hence that all of what are here 
called non-empirical beliefs should be classed as error, seems to be 
really culture-bound in this sense. 

In principle the same order of problems arise in defining the 
relations of philosophy, as non-empirical cognitive orientation, to 
social systems as must be faced in the case of science. We may 
speak of them under the three corresponding headings, of the 
problem of the institutionalization of philosophical investigation 
itself, of the institutionalization of "applied philosophy" and, finally, 
of the evaluative synthesis between non-empirical beliefs and the 
non-cognitive interests of action. This latter category, which we 
shall call that of religious ideas, corresponds to that of ideology on 
the empirical side. It will receive the bulk of our attention in the 
following discussion. 

Philosophical investigation, as distinguished from the general 
imbeddedness of philosophical problems and considerations in any 
system of action, can, it would seem, proceed only under condi- 
tions if anything even more specialized than those underlying the 
development of scientific investigation. For the most part there 



[ 362 ] Belief Systems 

would, in this field, seem to be no "practical utility" of specializa- 
tion which corresponds closely with that to be derived in the in- 
strumental division of labor from specialization which reaches the 
point of differentiating out the investigative function to the point 
of its becoming the content of a special role-type. In general it 
seems safe to say that differentiation of specialized cognitive roles 
in the sphere of religious interest is probably a prerequisite of ex- 
tensive development in the philosophical direction. This is essen- 
tially because the cognitive problems inherent in the problems of 
the "meaning" of a religious tradition usually constitute the prin- 
cipal points of departure for a movement of philosophical specu- 
lation. 

The case of classical Greece might at first sight appear to be an 
exception to this statement. It is true that the development of 
Greek philosophy itself took a secularizing direction, and that the 
Greek Polis was notable for the lack of special influence of a priestly 
class, especially as compared with the other societies in the Near 
East in the period. Nevertheless the special religious aspect of the 
Polis is a feature of it well known to historians. There is a sense in 
which every citizen was a priest. And certainly the ideational con- 
tent of the religious tradition, as set down in the Homeric poems 
and in Hesiod, and elaborated in the later literature, especially the 
drama, was most intimately involved in the development of philos- 
ophy. It is probably fairest to say that the Greek case was character- 
ized by a special kind of religious development, not that it occurred 
independently of religion. On the other hand the place of the re- 
ligious background in the two other most prominent movements of 
philosophical speculation we know, that of Hinduism and Buddhism 
in India, and that of the Western World, is too obvious to need 
further comment. 

The Western case, however, in its modern phase, presents a 
further complication. Building on the Greek heritage, sophisticated 
empirical knowledge and its systematization by the i6th century 
reached a point where the problem of knowledge relative to the 
canons of science began to assume a central place. It may be pre- 
sumed that the prominence of this point of reference was depend- 
ent both on a prior development of empirical knowledge, and on 
a religious tradition in which the problem of the status of empirical 



Non-Emfirical Beliefs and the Social System [ 363 ] 

"nature" had a prominent place. At any rate the "philosophy of 
science" is obviously of central importance in modern Western 
philosophy. 

Perhaps even more, then, than in the case of science, the de- 
velopment of philosophy depends on its articulation with a favor- 
able cultural tradition. But at least as much as in the scientific case 
it must be a special kind of a cultural tradition. It must be one in 
which the values involved in cognitive endeavors as such have a 
high place, and which at the same time can tolerate considerable 
departures from strict traditionalism. As we shall see, because of 
the prominent part played by expressive interests and by certain 
types of symbolism in religion generally, there tends to be a very 
strong strain to traditionalism in the religious field, and anything 
approaching ascendancy of a class of religious specialists in the 
social system often has the efiFect of traditionalization of virtually 
the whole of the culture. Thus there is a sense in which the pro- 
fessional philosopher is apt to be even more disturbing and threat- 
ening to the other elements of the society on which his thought 
impinges, than is the case with the scientist. ^^ 

Generally speaking the resistances to the development of philos- 
ophy as a specialty are so formidable that it would appear that only 
a cultural tradition, in which the pressure to the solution of non- 
empirical cognitive problems is very strong, could counteract them. 
This pressure can also, of course, be aided by a balance of power 
within the society such that the classes with the strongest interest 
in checking philosophical developments are in turn checked by a 
delicately balanced relation to others. 

Thus in India the great philosophical development, culminat- 
ing in the Buddhist movement, seems to have been associated with 
a balance between the two associated but distinct classes of the 
Brahmans and the Ksatriyas. After the latter were substantially 
eliminated by foreign invasion the philosophical development soon 
practically stopped, and the religious tradition became the highly 
stereotyped one we know as Hinduism. In the case of Christianity 
it is very doubtful whether a rational theology, which could form 
the seeding bed of a great philosophical tradition, could have gotten 
really started if the philosophical tradition of the Greeks had nof 

^^ Even in Greece, Socrates was condemned to death. 



[ 364 ] Belief Systems 

been still alive in the territory into which the movement spread, 
and certain elite classes thus been committed to a favorable attitude 
toward philosophy. 

These problems are of great significance lor the whole question 
of the "role of ideas" in social change. If the culture and social 
structure of the Western World had not developed in such a way 
that scientific investigation had become institutionalized in a dis- 
tinctive pattern of specialized roles, science, which after all is a 
body of "ideas" and nothing else, could not have acquired the enor- 
mous influence which it is now having on social developments, 
both through technological applications and through its relation to 
ideologies. Similarly, if a body of religious ideas is to have a great 
influence on social change, its "chances" are at least greatly en- 
hanced, if as a cognitive structure it has acquired the levels of 
clarity, logical articulation and profundity of reasoning and insight, 
which it seems probable that only a sophisticated tradition of pro- 
fessional philosophical thinking can give. It is no more likely that 
the great influence of Christianity, of Hinduism or of Buddhism 
would have come about only through the activities of the "practical 
men" of religion, the administrators of cults, of church organiza- 
tions, the curers of souls, or even the prophets, than is the case with 
the practical men of everyday affairs, who we all agree would not 
by themselves have created modern science. The fact that the solu- 
tions of the cognitive problems are "there" to be found, and that it 
would from some point of view "be a good thing" if they were 
found, does not account for the fact that a great tradition of ideas 
in fact develops. 

The problem of "applied philosophy" as homologous with ap- 
plied science presents considerable difficulties, and only a few 
tentative suggestions can be offered here. Perhaps the simplest type 
of case is that where the philosophy is on the border lines of science 
rather than of religion. Indeed the logician and the mathematician 
are so much on this border line that it is often unimportant to 
attempt to distinguish them from scientists. The application of 
their work is in the first instance to science itself, then in turn to 
practical affairs as part of science. But the fundamental sociological 
problems are the same as in the case of science. 

A different case is that of the relation of philosophy to ideolo- 



N 071-Enipirical Beliefs and the Social System [ 365 ] 

gies. Precisely because the ideological uses of scientific ideas are 
apt to be general rather than specific, and because of the evaluative 
element in ideologies, it is natural that in a society where there is 
a developed philosophical tradition, there should have to be some 
kind of articulation between the philosophical tradition and the 
current ideologies. In the Western World philosophy has, of 
course, played a very important part in the genesis of ideologies. 
All extensive and highly articulated ideologies root in the doctrines 
of some branch of the philosophical tradition and tend to borrow 
prestige from it. 

This relation is particularly important because of the central 
position of the subject matter of the social sciences in the content 
of modern ideologies. The social sciences have not so far been as 
well articulated as the natural sciences, nor as firmly grounded in 
empirically established knowledge. This situation, combined with 
the inherent involvement in evaluative problems, has helped ac- 
count for the prominent place of philosophical ideas in ideological 
movements. Indeed, it is only recently, if now, that it has come to 
be no longer possible to say in social science circles that "it all 
depends on your conception of human nature. "^^ The meaning of 
such a statement traditionally has been that a philosophical inter- 
pretation of the nature of man, independent of scientific evidence, 
a "philosophical anthropology," is the ultimate determinant of ideo- 
logical beliefs in the social field. 

The sense in which there is often dubiously legitimate "intru- 
sion" of philosophical considerations into the proper field of science, 
particularly social science, in relation to ideologies, should not be 
allowed to obscure the positive functions of philosophy in this con- 
nection. It can rather generally be said that given the state of social 
science knowledge, in many fields up to the present, and certainly 
for the past, philosophical articulation of many problem areas has 
been the only alternative to either traditionalization or authoritarian 
enforcement as a stabilizing mechanism. A relatively high intellec- 
tual level of the philosophical tradition may thus in this connection 
have played a very important part as a protection of the "liberal" 
tradition in Western culture. The essential point is that the in- 
herent nature of the problems leads into high levels of complexity. 

^^ This was a favorite statement of the late Professor H. J. Laski. 



[ 366 ] Belief Systems 

It is quite beyond the powers of the "man in the street" to deal 
with such complex cognitive problems in any orderly way which 
has a semblance of rationality. The social sciences have not yet 
contributed nearly as much as they are intrinsically capable of. 
Philosophy has filled the gap which would otherwise have had to 
be filled by one or the other of the predominantly non-cognitive 
mechanisms.^" 

These considerations are extremely important to an under- 
standing of the place of the "intellectuals" within the social system. 
Their presence is, of course, possible and important only when 
there is a highly elaborated cultural system in the belief area. 
Science, applied science, ideology, philosophy and religious beliefs 
are all necessarily articulated with one another, and in certain 
respects shade off into each other. The institutionalization of any 
one of these types of cognitive interest, in relatively specialized roles, 
is possible only with the presence of a "penumbra" of beliefs and 
persons holding them and/or interested in them, who do not quite 
belong to the core of the role type. There are the "core" professional 
scientists, the amateur scientists, and the public "interested in scien- 
tific ideas." There is established scientific knowledge, tentative ideas 
at the forefront of scientific growth and the fringe of pseudo- 
scientific beliefs, some of them held by scientists themselves. Simi- 
larly there are "ideologists" closely identified with the revelant 
scientific fields, and others who are only "spokesmen" for partisan 
interest groups. There are highly technical professional philosophers 
and an immense welter of people who talk the language of philos- 
ophy with greatly varying degrees of competence and cognitive 

^° Competent observers seem to be of the opinion that in the recent Com- 
munist movement there has been a marked dechne in the intellectual level of 
Marxist thought as compared with the days of the revolutionary ferment, before 
and shortly after the Russian Revolution. It may be suggested that this is 
probably partly at least a result of the extent to which the Communist parties have 
resorted to authoritarian enforcement of doctrinal orthodoxy, relatively regardless 
of cognitive considerations. This is a loss to the "liberal" tradition of Western 
thought even though the Marxists who have been "squelched" would have written 
far more which was properly considered philosophical rather than scientific. The 
point is the cutting off of the opportunity and the social conditions for cognitively 
interested activity in any form. To the present-day Communist the relevant ques- 
tion about a proposition's "rightness" is not, can it be defended on intellectual 
grounds, but is it in accord with the official party line? The belief in Stalin's 
infallible intellectual superiority may be regarded as a compensatory mechanism. 



Religious Belief Systems [ 3^7 ] 

disinterestedness. Over against the mass of the population who have 
only secondary symbolic and instrumental interests in cognitive 
problems this whole group should, in certain respects, be classed 
together. Many of the features of their belief systems are not in 
strict accord with the cognitive standards of the core professional 
groups. Nevertheless it is probable that the currency of such pseudo- 
scientific and pseudo-philosophical beliefs, and of a class of people 
who more or less specialize in purveying them, generally has posi- 
tive functional significance for the type of social system in which 
science and philosophy are institutionalized. They help to absorb 
and channel the strains which are inevitably involved in the exist- 
ence of specialized and esoteric cognitive activities in a society. It 
is also, of course, evident that they can constitute the principal 
sources of ideological legitimation of deviant movements. 

Religious Belief Systevis 

RELIGIOUS beliefs may here be characterized as the non- 
empirical homologue of ideological beliefs. By contrast with science 
or philosophy the cognitive interest is no longer primary, but gives 
way to the evaluative interest. Acceptance of a religious belief is 
then a commitment to its implementation in action in a sense in 
which acceptance of a philosophical belief is not. Or, to put it 
more accurately, a philosophical belief becomes religious in so far 
as it is made the basis of a commitment in action. This seems to be 
the primary meaning of Durkheim's dictum about religion "c'est 
de la vie serieuse." Religious ideas may be speculative in the philo- 
sophical sense, but the attitude toward them is not speculative in 
the sense that "well, I wonder if it would make sense to look at it 
this way?" 

Religious ideas, then, may be conceived as answers to the 
"problems of meaning" in hoth of the senses discussed above. On 
the one hand they concern the cognitive definition of the situation 
for action as a whole, including the cathectic and evaluative levels 
of interest in the situation. This they share with ideological beliefs. 
On the other hand, however, they also must include the problems 
of "meaning" in the larger philosophical sense, of the meaning of 
the objects of empirical cognition, of nature, human nature, so- 
ciety, the vicissitudes of human life, etc. From the point of view 



[ 368 ] Belief Systems 

of integration of the social system, therefore, rehgious behefs con- 
stitute the paramount focus of the integration of the cognitive 
orientation system in its imphcations for action. 

Evaluative orientation has been treated throughout this volume 
as the synthesis of the cognitive and the cathectic interests of actors. 
In relation to a total system of action, a personality or a social sys- 
tem, we have spoken of this as the moral aspect of orientation 
interest. Religious beliefs then are those which are concerned 
with moral problems of human action, and the features of the 
human situation, and the place of man and society in the cosmos, 
which are most relevant to his moral attitudes, and value-orienta- 
tion patterns. 

It is this connection with the moral aspect of integration of the 
system of action, in its social system rather than its personality ap- 
plication, which constitutes the basic insight of Durkheim's analysis 
of the sociology of religion in the Elementary Forms of the Religious 
Life. The same thing was clearly seen, though not made quite so 
explicit, by Max Weber. Religious beliefs, then, are systems of 
cognitive orientation relative to problems of meaning in the double 
sense noted above, and acceptance of which is treated as a moral 
obligation by the actor. This m,ay be a purely personal obligation, 
but the case of interest at present is that where it is a part of social 
morality, that is, the belief system is institutionalized as part of 
the role-system of the collectivity, whether it be a sub-collectivity or 
a total society. 

It is apparently the combination of the moral-evaluative aspect 
of religious orientations, with certain features of the philosophical 
nature of non-empirical belief systems, which underlies the place in 
religions of the conception of the "supernatural." Put very briefly, 
the moral aspect yields what Durkheim called the sacred character 
of entities with a specifically religious significance. These are, as 
he said, entities toward which men show the same fundamental 
attitude of respect which they show toward moral obligations. In 
so far as these entities have cognitive significance then, they must 
be connected with the cognitive legitimation of moral norms and 
sentiments. They must be concerned with the explanation of the 
meaning of these norms and obligations. By virtue of their sacred- 
ness these entities are assimilated to moral norms, and sharply dis- 



Religious Belief Systems [ 369 ] 

tinguished from instrumental facilities toward which a very dif- 
ferent attitude is held. 

As Durkheim pointed out, many empirical entities like material 
goods, buildings, places, clothing, and certain individuals at least 
under certain conditions are objects of this attitude of respect for 
the sacred. But in so far as this attitude is cognitively rationalized, 
it does not tend to be in terms of their empirical properties in the 
context of the "order of nature" in the sense of the range of ideas 
from empirical lore to science. It is rather in terms of a "world" of 
entities distinct from the empirical, or at least of "principles" which 
are not directly involved in the conception of an empirical world. 
These entities serve somehow to explain the "meaning" of the 
sacredness of sacred things, and their relation to ordinary human 
interests. Since philosophy very generally conceives of non-empirical 
entities and forces which are different from the empirical order of 
nature, the "reality" underlying and explaining the sacredness of 
sacred things is located in this "area." These two circumstances 
taken together seem to constitute the principal basis for the genesis 
of the conception of a "supernatural" order, which is in some sense 
distinguished from or set over against the "order of nature." The 
supernatural order thus gives cognitive meaning to the moral- 
evaluative sentiments and norms of an action system, not in the 
sense that either the sentiments or the cognitive beliefs have causal 
priority but that they tend to be integrated with one another, and 
that this integration is importantly related to the stabilization of 
the system. 

This is only the simplest and most elementary account of the 
factors in this aspect of the situation of the social system. It does 
not in the least imply that only when there is a sophisticated con- 
ception of the "order of nature," in the sense in which that has 
developed within Western science and philosophy, does this anal- 
ysis apply- It means only that the distinction between the order of 
nature and the supernatural in Western thought is a kind of 
methodological prototype of the relationship, an analytical model. 
On both sides there may be a low level of cognitive organization, as 
would be true of many if not most non-literate societies. Also, of 
course, the conceptions on the two sides and that of their relation 
to each other may be very different from that in Western thought. 



[ 370 ] Belief Systems 

In most Oriental philosophies, for example, the "supernatural" is 
held to be immanent rather than transcendental in our sense. Philo- 
sophically the duality then applies to realms or phases of "manifes- 
tation" rather than to the philosophical conception of more ultimate 
"reality." But the duality on this manifestation level still needs to be 
rationalized in cognitive terms. There may even, as in Marxist 
thought, be an attempt to fuse the two, projecting the "supernat- 
ural" into a conception of the "dialectic" process of history. The 
fundamental criteria embodied in the conception of a system of 
entities, which are not strictly "scientifically" knowable and which 
serve as the cognitive rationalization of moral sentiments of a col- 
lectivity, still apply. In this sense there is a component of religious 
belief, as well as of ideology, in Marxism, as to be sure there is 
also in liberal individualism. In so far as ideology ranges into 
philosophical problem areas, where beliefs cannot be directly de- 
rived from the empirical beliefs of the culture, it merges into reli- 
gious belief. The conception of religious belief put forward here is 
thus by no means identical with what is traditionally called religion 
in our own culture. 

A further set of circumstances important to the understanding 
of the place of religious beliefs concerns what Max Weber called 
the moral "irrationality" of the situation of human life. The con- 
ceptual scheme developed in this volume, with the broad empirical 
verification it receives in many directions, tends to confirm his view 
that in terms of any pattern-consistent value-orientation system 
there are bound to be situations and circumstances which make 
complete realization of the expectations developed, when that value 
system is internalized and institutionalized, impossible. This prob- 
lem has been extensively analyzed in Chapter III of Values, Motives 
and Systems of Action, and at various points in the present volume 
and the main reasons for the above statement need not be repeated 
here. The consequence is that in any case there are considerable 
elements of frustration and conflict left over relative to any given 
institutionalized value system. Perhaps to our optimistic mentality 
the most difficult thing to realize is that this is esfecially true if the 
value system is consistent and highly institutionalized— though it 
is, of course, also true of "disorganized" societies. But clearly the 
"optimum" situation for human adjustment, if indeed such an 



Religious Belief Systems [ 37i 1 

optimum can be defined at all, does not lie at the pole of maximum 
institutionalization of a rigorously consistent value-system. 

There is always a complex variety of mechanisms in the social 
system which mitigate the severity of these frustrations and con- 
flicts. Some of them have been briefly touched upon in analyzing 
the mechanisms of social control. Thus premature death, if not the 
mortality of men in general, is surely a frustrating phenomenon, 
not only prospectively for the victim but for the survivors who have 
been attached to him. It is a situation calling for an emotional re- 
adjustment, and a cognitive rationalization. Similarly discrepancies 
between effort and reward, the fact that conformists with normative 
expectations do not always fare better than those who do not con- 
form, and many other types of cases. Above all the "problem of evil" 
and the problem of "meaningless" suffering are focal points in this 
situation of strain. 

If this general analysis be accepted, then it seems to follow that 
man's knowledge of the empirical world, and the expectations 
oriented to and by his knowledge, cannot alone constitute adequate 
mechanisms of adjustment. Any other adjustment patterns, how- 
ever, must involve a cognitive component, as well as an evaluative, 
in that it is precisely the failures of the actual situation to conform 
with evaluative sentiments which constitute the focus of the adjust- 
ment problem. 

The pressure in such a case is to a cognitive-evaluative orienta- 
tion scheme, which can comprise both the successfully institutional- 
ized and expectation-fulfilling aspects of the value-system, and the 
"irrational" discrepancies. It seems almost inevitable that such an 
inclusive orientation scheme must include reference to supernat- 
ural entities in the above sense. Just what the place of this reference 
may be, how related to the conception of the order of nature, and 
just what the structure of attitudes toward institutionalized social 
obligations will be, is subject to wide variations, only a few of 
which can be briefly mentioned here. 

For sociological purposes it is, as so often, convenient to take 
the orientation to the given institutionalized order of things as the 
major point of reference, realizing of course that this orientation 
may in turn be in part a result of prior religious orientations. The 



[ 372' ] Belief Systems 

complications arising from this fact will be dealt with briefly below. 

In these terms the system of institutionalized values may be 
basically accepted or rejected. In the former case the problem is that 
of how the discrepancies between expectations in terms of the insti- 
tutionalized value-system and the actual course of events are handled 
in the belief system. There seem to be two primary possibilities. In 
the first case the conception of a supernatural order is utilized in 
order to delineate a "compensatory" re-equilibration, an Ausgleich 
in a transcendental sphere, in the commonest case, in a life after 
death. Then it is possible to conceive that unmerited good fortune 
and undeserved suffering will be compensated somewhere. The 
popular conceptions of Heaven and Hell obviously fit into this pat- 
tern. By this means the moral economy of human society is rounded 
out, and the sources of strain involved in "meaningless" discrep- 
ancies between what the institutionalized system through its ideol- 
ogy says ought to happen to people, and what in fact does, are 
ironed out. 

In such a case, of course, the question remains open of how solid 
the basis of credibility in this compensatory balancing out may be. 
This type of pattern also probably tends to be associated with a rela- 
tive traditionalized stabilization of the social system, the institu- 
tionalized expectations of which are fundamentally accepted. TTiis 
pattern seems to be the fundamental one of institutionalized Catholic 
Christianity, in so far, that is, as the given institutional order really 
is accepted. In the earlier phases of Catholicism, and in sectarian 
movements within the church from time to time, the balance has 
tended to shift to radical rejection of the institutionalized order, 
making the earning of salvation the overwhelmingly dominant 
orientation, and treating conformity with institutionalized expecta- 
tions as altogether secondary if not reprehensible. A similar pattern 
with certain differences has also existed within Lutheran Chris- 
tianitv. 

The second possibility is that where the institutionalized system 
itself is conceived as containing the potentiality of improvement in 
such a way as progressively to reduce the area of such discrepancies. 
This is in general the solution of the modem Western "progressive" 
orientation. It tends to project the compensation of the discrepancies, 
not into a transcendental sphere, but into a future state of the social 



Religious Belief Systems [ 373 ] 

system itself. Since, however, this future state almost inevitably 
must wait for full realization until after the lifetime of the current 
generation, the question of the personal compensation of living indi- 
viduals remains imperfectly solved. It somehow has to take the 
direction of the internalization of norms in such a way that gratifica- 
tion is derived from the feeling of contributing to the realization of 
a "worth-while" goal, even though the individual actor himself wall 
not experience its realization. Hence, though usually submerged, 
there tends in fact to be a non-empirical element in the cognitive 
rationalization of such an orientation, a belief in the "supernatural" 
possibilities of social development itself. 

It is important to note that the above two orientations are in a 
kind of direct competition with each other, in that projection of 
compensation for discrepancies into a transcendental sphere or state 
can readily be interpreted to mean that any attempt realistically to 
reduce the discrepancies themselves is either superfluous or some- 
how contrary to a sacred order of things. Thus, for example, in many 
of the more conservative Catholic societies high mortality in the 
earlier years of life tends to be accepted as "God's will," which it 
either is not possible to attempt to do anything about or, even, it is 
held, might be contrary to religion to do so. The "progressive" atti- 
tude that premature death is a problem to be solved by medical or 
other measures is clearly in conflict with this resigned acceptance. 
At the same time the discrepancy problem is sufficiently serious so 
that it cannot be assumed that the "progressive" orientation is always 
adequate to achieve a general minimization of tension. It is, how- 
ever, intimately associated with the levels of rationality found in the 
cultural belief system generally, notably in the place given to sci- 
ence and to its technological applications. 

There is, empirically, a gradual shading off from either of the 
above two types of acceptance of the institutionalized value system, 
into its rejection. This is in the nature of the case since the problem 
of discrepancy is the starting point of the present discussion, and 
while value patterns may be accepted, not everything which em- 
pirically happens within the system where they are institutionalized 
can be. Rejection, when it begins to predominate, may, like accept- 
ance, be oriented in either one of the two major directions which 
have been discussed. In the one case rejection of the institution- 



[ 374 ] Belief Systems 

alized value system may be rationalized in terms of transcendental 
considerations, in the sense that man's relation to the "supernatural" 
world takes evaluative priority over his relation to the empirical in- 
cluding the social situation, and the two are held to he in funda- 
mental, irreconcilahle conflict. In the most usual senses this is the 
case where "salvation" from the "world" is conceived to be the 
essential goal of human life, and the "world" is held to be, not 
merely of secondary value, but positively "evil." This is the defini- 
tion of the situation for the radical religions of salvation. In its most 
radical form this position would, of course, if taken literally, elimi- 
nate all motivation for the fulfillment of role-expectations in the 
secular social community. It has most frequently appeared as the 
ideal orientation for a select religious elite rather than for the "laity." 

The other basic type of orientation is to project the alternative 
to the rejected institutionalized order into the empirical social world 
itself. In the nature of the case this must be a future social order, 
since by definition the orientation is in conflict with the existing 
society. It may or may not coincide with an actual or alleged previous 
state. This is the "revolutionary" solution. 

In this case, as in that of "progressivism," the question arises of 
how far this "utopian" future state is cognitively rationalized in 
terms of empirical considerations. Precisely because, in the Western 
World, revolutionary utopianism has arisen in a cultural milieu in 
conscious opposition to the transcendentalism of traditional Chris- 
tianity, it has tended to be in the "positivistic" tradition itself, and 
claim to state a position demonstrable by the methods of empirical 
science. It seems, however, legitimate to suggest that in fact a 
supernatural order in the above sense plays a central role in this type 
of orientation, that the "dialectic" and other such entities are more 
like "providence" than the proponents of "scientific socialism" are 
wont to admit. Certainly by the criterion we have set forth above, 
the attitude of respect, they qualify as sacred entities. 

The supernatural element may, of course, be explicit. This was 
the case with Calvinism, in the aspects to which Max Weber called 
attention. The essential cognitive pattern is the belief in a Divine 
mission of man, to work for the establishment of the Kingdom of 
God on Earth. Though the conception of salvation is very much 
part of Calvinist theology, it is pushed out of the position of con- 



Religious Belief Systems [ 375 ] 

stituting a direct goal of action. As decided by God through Pre- 
destination it becomes the badge of membership in the appointed 
company of saints who share the responsibihty for implementing the 
Divine will. The field of action, then, is exclusively oriented in 
"this world" with the sole exception of the very scant Calvinistic 
forms of religious observance of which teaching the true doctrine is 
the central focus, though prayer plays a certain part. 

The existence of conceptions of a supernatural order raises the 
question of what types of action exist in relation to it. The general 
integration of cognitive orientation and the goal-directedness of 
action is such that beliefs in a supernatural order could not very well 
have the importance which is here being attributed to them, unless 
they figured in goal-directed action. 

What type of action will "make sense" depends of course on 
what the nature of the supernatural order itself is believed to be. 
There seem to be three principal types of such "techniques" of 
directly putting the actor into relation to supernatural entities. The 
first is ritual, which depends on the conception of the relevant 
aspects of the supernatural as constituting an order the "laws" of 
which can be understood and adapted to, in a way which is essen- 
tially analogous to instrumental manipulation of the empirical 
world. Then, the problem is to "do the right thing" in order to bring 
about the desired goal-state. If the right thing is done this will come 
about automatically through the operation of the mechanisms and 
processes of the supernatural order. Ritual may be classed as religious 
in so far as the goal sought is non-empirical, magical, so far as it 
is empirical. 

The second type of action may be called suf plication. It depends 
on the conception of the relevant supernatural entity as itself an 
actor who must make a decision about what to do in relation to ego. 
Ego's "technique" then is to try to influence the decision in a direc- 
tion favorable to the realization of his goal. Prayer in the Christian 
sense obviously falls in this category, but so does most "sacrifice." 
For this to make sense the supernatural must be conceived as a 
"personal," decision-making entity. 

Finally the third type, "contemplation" operates on the actor's 
own state of mind in such a way as to make him "receptive" to the 
supernatural influence. It may have more of a cognitive emphasis in 



[ 37^ ] Belief Systems 

the direction oi coming to "understand," or more of an expressive 
emphasis on a state of feehng. This type tends to be associated with 
the conception of the supernatural as impersonal and diffuse, not as 
operating according either to the pattern of decision-making of actors 
or to "laws" on the analogy of empirical nature, but as something 
qualitatively diflferent from either action or nature. It is the concep- 
tion most conspicuously found in the "mystical" religions such as 
early Buddhism and Taoism. 

Closely related to all three of these techniques, but particularly 
important in relation to contemplation, is the whole field of tech- 
niques of control, which in the most general way may be said to be 
oriented to the prevention of "interference" from the personality, 
from the body and from others, with the proper relation to the 
supernatural. These techniques may take the form of deliberate 
frustration of major gratification needs. Only when they go beyond 
the point of imposing disciplines, to that of inflicting mortification," 
should they properly be called "asceticism." Admittedly the line is 
exceeding difficult to draw, empirically at least. 

All belief systems naturally consist of symbols. However, the 
question arises of whether there may not be certain special features 
of the place of symbolism in systems of religious belief, which 
require at least calling attention to. 

For this purpose we may return to the methodological canons of 
science as our major point of reference for the analysis of belief 
systems in general. The stricter doctrines of scientific methodology 
would seem to hold that 07ily the observational results of very strictly 
defined operational procedures could legitimately claim to consti- 
tute "reality" references as such. Everything else is "construction" 
on the part of the scientist, most of which of course comes from the 
cultural tradition in which he works. This everything else, of course, 
includes the logical framework of "conceptual schemes" within 
which observations are made and interpreted. But very generally in 
the history of science it contains much more; it contains whole 
systems of "models" of "what the empirical entities are like." 
Thus protons and electrons have been conceived as miniature 
spherical particles, the atom as a miniature solar system. The intro- 
duction of such "realistic" models is psychologically the essential 
aspect of the "reification" of scientific theories, and the models con- 



Religious Belief Systems [ 377 1 

stitute in practice an essential element of the belief systems which 
in a cultural sense we call science. These reified "models" of aspects 
of the empirical world may be said to constitute "intermediate sym- 
bolism." They are not the methodologically purified minimum 
verified content of scientific knowledge, but something in addition 
which aids in "grasping" that minimum content, which makes the 
ideas of science "credible." Once established in a scientific tradition 
such intermediate symbolism may on occasion constitute a serious 
barrier to further scientific progress. 

That these models have been in some sense "believed in" by 
scientists of the highest levels of professional respectability is 
beyond question. In all probability the strict observance of the 
canons of the methodological purists is, as a standard for the actual 
belief systems of working scientists, psychologically impossible. But 
in any case if such models play an important part in science itself, 
it is quite clear that this part is greatly enhanced in the popular 
belief systems about the empirical world. Even within the sphere 
of those popular beliefs most nearly sanctioned by science certainly 
there is an enormous amount of such intermediate symbolism. Thus 
presumably the man in the street does not really "believe" that most 
"solid" objects contain far more "empty space" than they do 
matter. 

The symbolism which is so prolifically developed in religious 
belief systems should in its cognitive references be considered as 
intermediate symbolism in this sense. "Anthropomorphism" and 
"animism" are obvious examples. The psychological functions of 
believing that God is "an old man with a long white beard" or that 
the "devil" has horns and a tail are altogether similar to those of 
believing that an electron is a spherical solid particle of "matter," 
that is, a little round ball. It makes it possible to have a concrete 
image to fill an essential place in the cognitive orientation system. 

However, intermediate symbolism seems to be more extensively 
proliferated in the religious field than in the empirical, for two sets 
of reasons. In the first place, the imposition of strictly cognitive 
standards of the acceptability of concrete images is more difficult in 
the non-empirical field than in the empirical. Logical reasoning is 
available as a cognitive controlling device, but direct observation in 
the scientific sense by definition is not. In the second place, religious 



[ 378 ] Belief Systems 

beliefs are evaluative in orientation as well as cognitive. They are 
a way of ordering the whole action system in certain respects, and 
hence the kind of cognitive primacy which might maximize control 
in terms of cognitive standards is seldom present. 

Nevertheless, in the religious traditions where there has de- 
veloped a philosophical tradition of a sophistication at all comparable 
vdth that of modem science, much at least of this intermediate 
symbolism has dropped away. Thus Plato no longer believed in the 
existence of the Homeric Gods in a literal sense, and certainly not 
in all the tales that were told about them in the mythological tradi- 
tion. Similarly in sophisticated Christian theology anthropomor- 
phism has been pretty well eliminated, though not, of course, in 
popular belief. In general it may be said that in religious systems 
which have reached sophisticated philosophical levels, there is an 
inevitable tension between the philosophical objections to elaborate 
intermediate symbolism and the popular need for it. More will have 
to be said about this subject in connection with expressive sym- 
bolism below. 

Before discussing such symbolism, however, a final word must 
be said about the other side of the "causal chain" as between re- 
ligious beliefs and the institutionalized social order. The starting 
points which we took in analyzing the problems of religious belief 
systems were, following Max Weber, the inevitable discrepancies 
between the expectations institutionalized in a social value system, 
and certain features of the actual course of events. The relation 
between them is such that the religious belief system not only 
"rationalizes" an existing and independendy given set of institu- 
tionalized value-orientations, it must to a greater or less degree be 
itself constitutive of it. This much follows directly from the tend- 
ency to pattern-consistency in the cultural tradition as a whole. 

There is, however, as we have seen, always more or less tension 
involved in such actual relationships within the social system. This 
tension may, under certain circumstances, work out so that a system 
of religious beliefs, for example one oriented to radical salvation, 
becomes the cultural focus of an important movement of social 
change. In so far as such a movement becomes a collectivity and 
wins converts there immediately arises the question of the conse- 
quences of the institutionalization of these beliefs and the value- 



Belief Systems and Value-Orientations [ 379 ] 

orientations implied in them for the collectivity and for the social 
system beyond it. In so far as the belief system becomes institu- 
tionalized, belief in the transcendental locus of values and goals 
becomes itself part of the social situation, and, therefore, para- 
doxically it would seem, part of the eynyirical world. Members of 
the society face the very practical fact that conformity with the 
expectations defined by the transcendentally oriented religious be- 
liefs is institutionally expected and all the principal elements of 
the sanction system come to be mobilized about the upholding of 
this conformity. "Worldly interests," are thereby inevitably enlisted 
in the motivation of religious conformity, but by the same token, 
the pursuit of religious values inevitably becomes implicated in 
worldly affairs, for example, if religion is taken seriously enough, 
the "church," or its functional equivalent, inevitably acquires pres- 
tige and power in a "worldly" as well as a "spiritual" sense. The 
outcome is likely to be a highly unstable equilibrium in which it is 
unlikely that the religious orientation itself will remain entirely 
unchanged for long. This "paradox of institutionalization" applies 
equally to radically Utopian belief systems and the corresponding 
value-orientations. The problems of this area will be somewhat 
further discussed below in connection with social change, but in the 
main they must be relegated to the more specialized study of the 
sociology of religion. 

§ THE INDEPENDENCE AND INTERDEPENDENCE 
OF BELIEF SYSTEMS AND VALUE-ORIENTATIONS 

BELIEF systems and systems of value-orientation are both 
parts of the cultural tradition and, as such, there is pressure for 
them to form a consistent system of patterns. They are, however, 
anchored as it were in different foci of the action system. Belief sys- 
tems involve an independent orientation to a "reality" which has 
properties independent of the actor who attempts to understand it 
cognitively. He cannot by willing or wishing make it what he would 
like it to be but must, in the structure of his beliefs, in some sense 
"adapt" himself to it. Patterns of value-orientation, on the other 
hand, formulate the directions of choice in the dilemmas of action. 
They are "guided" by beliefs, but only partially determined by them 
since they are ways of organizing the totality of interests involved 



[ 380 ] Belief Systems 

in the system of action, interests which are cathectic and evaluative 
as well as cognitive. The commitment involved in a value-orienta- 
tion is not only a commitment to accept cognitively die logical con- 
sequences of a set of cognitive beliefs, though it may and almost 
alwavs will include this, but it is also a commitment to a selection 
among the opportunities for gratification possible in the situation, 
the striving for some but equally the sacrifice of others which, with 
a different value-orientation, might have been possible. Value- 
orientation patterns are, as we have seen, points at which organiza- 
tion relative to all the dominant factors of the action system come 
to focus, adaptation to "reality" through cognition, the gratification- 
interests of the actor, the commitment to patterns of expressive sym- 
bolism, and the functional exigencies of the social interrelationship 
system. 

In judging the mutual interdependence of beliefs and value- 
patterns it is, however, important to distinguish two fundamental 
types of "reality," that is, classes of object, to which the beliefs are 
oriented, namely, physical objects and social objects or systems of 
action. The essential point is, of course, that in the case of physical 
objects what the objects are at any given moment is not in any sense 
a function of beliefs. In so far as they have been modified by pre- 
vious action, are, that is, to some extent, "artifacts," this modifica- 
tion process has, of course, been a function of action, and hence of 
the beliefs of the agent of this modification as one element of action. 
Social objects, on the other hand, are at a given moment partly a 
function of their beliefs (not those of the observer). In the case of 
the individual actor it is his beliefs, in that of a social system, those 
shared by its constituent actors. This difference in turn defines a 
fundamental difference in possibilities of influence of the two 
classes of objects. A physical object may be modified by the action 
of a human being upon it, and this action may be influenced by his 
beliefs. But it cannot be modified by attempting to alter the object's 
beliefs, since it has none. A social object may, however, be modified 
not only by a process involving the beliefs of the actor attempting 
to modify it, but by his attempting to alter its beliefs since these con- 
stitute one critical aspect of what the social object is. 

In relation to physical objects, then, human beliefs can basically 
vary only with reference to two sets of considerations. The first of 



Belief Systems and Value-Orientations [ 381 ] 

these is the cognitive vahdity of the behefs, the second their "mean- 
ing" for human interests. The cognitive processes are, as we know, 
interdependent with the other elements of motivational process so 
that concrete beliefs about physical objects may, as we have seen, 
be distorted by the influence of the non-cognitive components of 
action. Thus, whether external nature is or is not "controllable," and 
to what degree in the interest of human goals, is a purely cognitive 
problem, and beliefs about it are correct or incorrect. However, as 
a function of other than cognitive interests there may be "biases" 
introduced into cognitive belief systems in this sphere, including 
those which are a result of value-orientations. Thus, a universalistic 
achievement value-orientation will tend to maximize if not exagger- 
ate belief in the controllability of external nature because of the 
interest in achievement. On the other hand, a particularistic-ascrip- 
tive value-orientation will tend to lack interest in such controlla- 
bility and may well be combined with a belief system which under- 
rates the degree to which this is possible. The case is similar with 
the problem of "human nature" in the sense of the organism, e.g., 
as to how far its impulses or other processes are understandable and 
controllable and by what means. Modem medicine is a dramatic 
example of the maximization of belief in controllability of organic 
processes. 

The dimension of belief in whether nature or human nature is 
basically favorable to human interests, is "good" or "evil," introduces 
the evaluative factor in the sense of the above discussion. Such a 
question is not answerable only in cognitive terms but only by re- 
ferring a cognitive belief to an evaluative context, namely by assess- 
ing the probable consequences of the state of affairs formulated in 
the belief system for certain non-cognitive interests, cathectic and/or 
evaluative. 

When we turn to beliefs about social objects a further compli- 
cation is introduced, by the fact already noted that its beliefs are 
partly constitutive of the social object itself. Here also, however, the 
same fundamental discrimination must be made. There are purely 
cognitive elements in such belief systems, which are beliefs relative 
to the nature and functioning of action systems. In a social ideology 
there is always a system of explicit or implicit sociological proposi- 
tions which must be assessed by standards of cognitive validity. In 



[ 382 ] Belief Systems 

terms of the analysis in previous chapters we may say that these 
concern the adaptive problems of the social system relative to a given 
pattern of value-orientation. How far and under what conditions is 
it possible to institutionalize the values in question? 

But we cannot say that the cognitive element in the concrete 
evaluative belief system is simply "determined" by or identical with 
the value-orientation patterns, in this case any more than in that of 
physical objects. In such a case there would be no possible basis for 
a distinction between Utopian patterns of ideology and realistic pat- 
terns. Because, however, of the place of culture in action systems 
the value-orientation element may in this case have a more promi- 
nent part in the determination of the total orientation to social 
objects than in the case of physical objects. In fundamental theo- 
retical principle, however, the relation between the independence 
and the interdependence of the two components of culture is the 
same in both cases.^^ 

Finally, a further word may be said about certain relations of 
selective "affinity" between types of evaluative belief systems and 
particular patterns of value-orientation. We may illustrate in terms 
of the ways in which belief systems have handled the problems of 
discrepancy between institutionalized expectations and the actual 
outcome of events. In the first place we may say that, as argued 
above, the decision whether or not the Ausgleich can be "projected" 
into a transcendental sphere clearly is a function of the belief sys- 
tem, of the status of the supernatural world in that system. However 
much belief in such a supernatural world may involve "wishful 
thinking," the two phases must be considered interdependent, not 
the beliefs purely a "projection" of gratification interests or vice 
versa. Such a belief system, firmly entrenched, would, however, seem 
necessarily to lead to a lessening of incentive to the "progressive" 
direction of solution of the dilemma of discrepancy. In general we 
may say it will tend to lessen the emphasis on the value of achieve- 
ment in secular social action. In fact we do find a correlation be- 

-^ The problems just discussed are important to the position taken by 
Florence Kluckhohn in her paper, "Dominant and Variant Profiles of Cultural 
Orientation," Social Forces, May, 1950. We feel that in certain respects Dr. 
Kluckhohn's very suggestive analysis suffers from her failure to discriminate belief 
systems and value-orientation patterns and to make allowance for their inde- 
pendent variability. 



Belief Systems and Value-Orientations [ 383 ] 

tween a finiily institutionalized belief in supernatural compensation 
and an ascriptive emphasis in the institutionalized value-system. 
Thus mediaeval European society elevated the hereditary principle 
to a very high level in its secular value-system. The progressivism 
of the modem Western world seems to be dependent on, as well as 
a determinant of, the "this-worldliness" of our belief systems. 

Similarly, where radical rejection of an institutionalized order is 
involved, we may suppose that value-orientations and cathectic con- 
siderations in certain cases have a certain primacy over the belief 
system itself. The circumstances in which such a movement arises at 
least strongly conduce to an element of cognitive distortion because 
of the prominent part played by ambivalent motivations. However, 
the strong tendency of such a movement is in its belief system to 
define an ideal state as drastically contrasting with the institution- 
alized order which has been rejected. This conception of an ideal 
state in turn, as embodied in the ideology of a revolutionary move- 
ment, strongly tends to favor a universalistic-ascriptive value-pattern, 
with all the implications for its institutionalization which we have 
reviewed above. 

Hence we must conclude that the belief system element of the 
cultural tradition has a "strain to consistency" with the value-orien- 
tation element. It is obviously impossible for them to vary at random 
relative to each other. But value-orientations are anchored in interest 
complexes in a different way and on a different level from belief 
systems so that it is equally impossible to derive the belief system 
of a society by treating it as a simple "projection" of its value-orien- 
tation patterns on "reality" or vice versa to deduce the value-orienta- 
tion patterns from the belief system without regard to the function 
of the latter in integrating the other components of the system of 
action. 



IX 



EXPRESSIVE SYMBOLS AND 
THE SOCIAL SYSTEM: THE COMMUNICATION OF 
AFFECT 



THE field of expressive symbolism is, in a theoretical 
sense, one of the least developed parts of the theory of action. It 
will not, therefore, be possible to present as well worked-out an 
analysis of its place in relation to the social system as has been done 
for belief systems. 

Expressive symbols constitute that part of the cultural tradition 
relative to which expressive interests in the sense defined in Chap- 
ter II have primacy. In the "purest" form they constitute the cul- 
tural patterning of action of the expressive type where the interest 
in immediate gratifications is primary and neither instrumental nor 
evaluative considerations have primacy. It should immediately be 
pointed out that this does not in the least imply that such expressive 
interests are in any sense crudely "hedonistic." They consist in the 
primacy of the interest in immediate gratification of whatever need- 
dispositions are relevant in the action context in question. These 
may be need-dispositions to care for others, or to "create" highly 
abstract ideas or cultural forms. The essential point is the primacy 
of "acting out" the need-disposition itself rather than subordinating 
gratification to a goal outside the immediate situation or to a restric- 
tive norm. The "quality" of the need-disposition is not at issue. 

Expressive action, in our central paradigm, as a type of action, 
occupies a place parallel with that of the instrumental type. Like all 
action it is culturally patterned or formed. Expressive symbols then 

384 



Ex'pressive Symbols [ 3^5 ] 

are the symbol-systems through which expressive action is oriented 
to the situation. Again hke all of culture it has a normative aspect. 
As this has been stated above, there are appreciative standards in 
the cultural tradition by which expressive interests and actions are 
judged. These standards constitute the essential ordering principles 
of systems of expressive symbols. 

In expressive action as such, systems of expressive symbols, in- 
cluding the relevant appreciative standards, have a place homol- 
ogous to that of belief systems in instrumentally oriented action. 
They constitute the cultural element which has primacy in the pat- 
terning of the concrete action processes. Cognitive patterns, or 
beliefs, may themselves become the focus of a special type of instru- 
mental activity which we have called investigation. Similarly, ex- 
pressive symbol systems may themselves be developed as the goal of 
a type of instrumentally oriented activity, which may be called 
"artistic creation." This must be clearly distinguished from expres- 
sive action itself, which is "acting out" in terms of a pattern of 
expressive symbolism, not the process of deliberately creating such 
a pattern. 

Of course only a sm.all part of the expressive symbolism of a 
culture is the product of deliberate artistic creation just as very much 
of its cognitive orientation patterning is not the result of scientific 
or philosophical investigation, but has grown up "spontaneously" in 
the course of action processes where other interests have had 
primacy. 

Finally, just as cognitive and evaluative interests may be fused 
in ideological and religious belief systems, so expressive and evalua- 
tive interests may be fused in relation to systems of expressive sym- 
bols. Where this evaluative interest involves symbolic references to 
a supernatural order we will speak of religious symbolism. Where 
it does not, we shall speak simply of evaluative symbolism, as in the 
case of symbolic acts of solidarity with the other members of a col- 
lectivity or the symbolization of an attachment to a social object. 

As we have stated, expressive symbolism is the primary cultural 
component in any form of expressive action, and is involved in some 
way in all types of action. But in attempting to analyze the most 
important modes of relation of systems of expressive symbolism to 
the social system, it seems best to start, once more, with the paradigm 



[ 386 ] Expressive Symbols 

of social interaction. In this connection we have pointed out re- 
peatedly that specific actions and expectations tend to become or- 
ganized and generalized around the reciprocal attitudes of ego and 
alter toward each other, and toward the common cultural patterns 
which define the situation for the interaction process. 

Expressive symbolism is that part of the cultural tradition most 
directly integrated with the cathectic interests of the actor. In so far 
as it is the reciprocity of attitude which becomes the primary focus 
of these cathectic interests, it follows that expressive symbolism will 
tend to be organized relative to these attitudes as a point of 
reference. 

From this point of view the concrete expressive symbols which 
are part of the process of interaction serve a threefold function, as 
do all elements of culture: i) they aid in communication between 
the interacting parties, in this case the communication of cathectic 
"meanings"; 2) they organize the interaction process through norma- 
tive regulation, through imposing appreciative standards on it; and 
3) they serve as direct objects for the gratification of the relevant 
need-dispositions. The special feature of this aspect of culture is 
the differentiation of a system of symbols with respect to all of these 
functions, from other elements of culture through the primacy of 
the expressive interest. 

The most important starting point of our analysis is the recogni- 
tion that the organization of orientations within the interactive 
relationship about reciprocity of attitudes already and in itself, con- 
stitutes the development of an expressive symbol-system. This is be- 
cause the particular discrete act acquires a meaning which in some 
way involves a reference beyond the "intrinsic" significance of the 
particular act itself. It is fitted into a context of association in such 
a way that the whole complex of associated acts is invested with a 
cathectic significance. Once this has happened it is no longer pos- 
sible to isolate the specific act from the complex in which it has 
become embedded; it has acquired a meaning which is added to its 
immediate intrinsic significance.^ Thus the response of the mother 
to the crying of a child comes, apparently very early, to be felt as 

^ It thus fulfills Durkheim's main criterion of a symbol, that its meaning is 
"superadded" to its intrinsic properties. 



Expressive Symbols [ 3^7 ] 

"symbolic" of her attitude toward the child, not merely as an instru- 
mental measure of relieving the particular distress which occasioned 
the crying. We may say, then, that the prototype of the expressive 
symbol, within the context of interaction, is the symbolic act. It also 
follows that in a stabilized interaction system all acts have this 
symbolic quality to some degree, all serve as expressive symbols. 
They are the modes of gratification of ego's need-dispositions and at 
the same time signs to alter of what ego's attitudes toward him are. 

In order to understand the significance of this it is exceedingly 
important to see the problem in the context of the reciprocal sym- 
metry of interactive relationships. It is an unreal abstraction to con- 
sider only that the symbolic act is of gratificatory significance to ego 
and symbolic significance to alter, because in the nature of the inter- 
active process it must acquire both types of significance for both ego 
and alter. We may speak of this as the internalization of the expres- 
sive symbolism in a sense directly parallel to that in which we have 
spoken of the internalization of moral norms. Ego's act has an 
acquired gratificatory significance to alter, because in addition to 
whatever intrinsic significance it may possess, it has the meaning of 
a manifestation of ego's attitudes toward alter, and hence shares the 
affective significance which the whole complex of these attitudes 
and their manifestation have. By a process of "association," then, 
ego's symbolic act is a focus of gratification, if it indicates the atti- 
tude for which alter "hopes," and it is deprivational if it frustrates 
his hopes. Similarly such acts become the focus of anxieties. Thus 
the fact that the act is an expressive act for ego, that is that it grati- 
fies a need disposition of his, and that it is also oriented toward alter, 
means that in a stabilized interaction relationship it must acquire an 
expressive significance for alter. It must be cathected and its per- 
formance on ego's part become directly either gratifying or depriva- 
tional to alter. 

If we regard symbolic acts occurring within the interaction 
process as the focus of the genesis of expressive symbolism, we can 
then proceed to analyze the generalization of this symbolic sig- 
nificance, that is of symbolization of the relevant attitudes, to objects 
other than acts. Such objects, it is evident, come to be drawn into 
the associational complex which is organized about the reciprocal 
attitudes of ego and alter. Our classification of the objects in the 



[ 388 ] Ex'pressive Symbols 

situation gives us the basis for such an analysis of generalization. 
In the first place ego and alter themselves, as objects to each other, 
come to be drawn in. In so far as they are treated as actors, it is their 
acts which are the symbols. But these acts may be "interpreted" as 
manifestations of action-relevant qualities. The feeling, then, that 
alter is an "honest man" or a "very friendly person" may be gen- 
eralized in this direction. 

Secondly, the bodies of ego and alter as a special class of physical 
objects are obviously so closely associated with their action that their 
features inevitably acquire symbolic significance and come to be 
cathected. Physical traits such as stature, body shape, hair color, 
facial features and the like are involved. Fundamental aspects of the 
significance of the anatomical differences of the sexes also fit into 
this context. This is in all probability the case with the basic erotic 
symbolism which has played such a prominent part in psycho- 
analytic theory. The penis, for example, is a feature of the body 
around which a whole complex of sentiments may cluster, both in 
relation to ego's own attitudes toward himself, and to those of alter. 
Thus the insistence in Freudian theory that many other objects 
should be treated as symbols of the penis is correct but is only one 
side of the picture. There is every reason to believe that the penis 
is itself a symbolic object to a high degree and that a substantial part 
of its psychological significance is to be interpreted in the light of 
this fact. In more general terms it may perhaps be said that "one 
way" symbolic significance, as exemplified in the case of Freudian 
sexual symbolism, constitutes a limiting case. The more general case 
is the symbolic or associational comflex in which in some sense and 
to some degree every item symbolizes every other. Thus elongated 
objects may symbolize the penis but in turn the penis symbolizes 
the "masculinity" of its possessor and the whole complex of qualities 
and attitudes comprised under this term. 

Third, there is the whole realm of physical objects besides the 
organisms of ego and of the relevant alters. These are the physical 
objects which constitute the immediate physical environment of the 
interaction process and which are involved in it, instrumentally or 
otherwise. One of the most obvious examples is clothing. Because 
of its direct relation to the body, and the fact that visual impressions 
of the body include clothing, clothing becomes one of the main foci 



Ex'pressive Symhols [ 3^9 ] 

of sentiments associated with the body. In addition clothing is con- 
siderably more subject to manipulative modification than are most 
of the features of the body itself, and hence presents a highly suit- 
able medium for expressive purposes. Very similar considerations 
apply to the premises in which important activities take place, such 
as the home, and to its furnishings and utensils and the like. 

Finally cultural objects themselves are of course also drawn into 
the association complex. The type of case of particular relevance 
here is that of the symbolic creations which have no "use" beyond 
their expressive significance. The ideal type is that of "works of art." 
There is always a physical aspect of a concrete work of art, but the 
more essential one is the cultural. In the pure type of the work of 
art the physical object, or even the concrete action process, e.g., in 
the case of "playing" a musical composition, would not be cathected 
but for its significance in the context of expressive symbolism. 

If this approach to the problem of expressive symbolism is ac- 
cepted, then there should be two primary bases of classification of 
types of such symbolism which cross-cut each other. The first has 
just been reviewed, namely, the classes of objects to which such 
symbolic significance has become or may become attached. The 
second is in terms of the fundamental types of attitudinal orienta- 
tion around which the interaction process itself comes to be organ- 
ized. In so far as alters are the direct objects of orientation we have 
called these the types of attachment and classified them in terms of 
the two pattern variables of affectivity-neutrality and specificity- 
diffuseness. The four major types, then, are receptiveness-response, 
love, approval and esteem. 

We may, then, speak of any symbolic entity, an act, a quality 
of personality or of the organism, a physical object or a cultural 
pattern, as symbolic of any one of these four basic attitude types. 
This may be illustrated for two types of relationship, an erotic love 
relationship and one organized about attitudes of esteem. 

The love relationship is defined as diffuse and affective. The 
affectivity specifically includes, though in such a case it cannot be 
confined to, mutuality of erotic gratifications. Erotic gratifications 
here specifically involve certain types of somatic stimulations and 
processes. Hence in the erotic aspect of the relationship the bodies 
of the parties have particular significances. The first aspect, then, of 



[ 39° ] Ex-pressive Symbols 

the expressive symbolism is the organization of the erotically sig- 
nificant features of the body of each around the "genital" level of 
erotic gratification. This means a certain symbolic priority of genital 
intercourse over other possibilities of mutual erotic gratification; 
rather generally these are standards of taste with respect to the ex- 
pression of this relative to other elements of the total erotic complex. 
Some other practices such as kissing, and some other elements of 
"foreplay" may be allowable, but only in the proper manner and on 
the proper occasions. Others, what are usually called the "perver- 
sions," tend to be tabooed. 

There is further, most emphatically a complex of expressive 
symbolism in terms of the regulation of occasions and the physical 
setting and associated physical objects for erotic activities. Privacy 
for all the specifically erotic activities is felt in our society to be ex- 
tremely important. "Aesthetically" attractive surroundings are also 
generally involved. Clothing acquires high significance, including 
just the proper occasions and manner for its removal. 

But quite clearly if the relationship is a love relationship, the 
associated expressive symbolism will not be confined to acts and 
occasions of immediate erotic gratification. It will include such sym- 
bolic acts as aflfectionate or endearing speech, exchange of gifts of 
various sorts, sharing of gratificatory activities in other connections, 
such as entertainment, acting and dressing to "please" the other and 
a whole variety of other symbolic acts and their associated contexts. 

In its involvement in the social system in a larger way the erotic 
love relationship is universally associated with marriage, reproduc- 
tion, and parenthood. The complex of expressive symbolism, there- 
fore, extends beyond the context more immediately relevant to erotic 
gratification or even individual mutuality of diffuse love-gratifica- 
tions. The erotic love relationship becomes a major nucleus of the 
kinship system with all that that implies. The erotic relationship 
itself is thus tied in with the acceptance of the parental roles and 
their responsibilities. 

With this step, the expressive symbolism of the particular erotic 
relationship merges into that integrated with and part of the culture 
of a larger collectivity, the kinship unit. The orientation to "romantic 
love" is only partially isolable. As a part of our culture its symbolism 
is thus part of the larger complex of the symbolism of the sex roles 



Expressive Symhols [ 39^ ] 

generally and of the kinship system. In part this attitude of romantic 
love constitutes a field of partial and sometimes radical deviance 
from the completeness of that integration, for example in the youth 
culture aspects, which attempt a kind of "artificial" isolation from 
the possible implications for marriage and later parenthood. This 
relative isolation is to be analyzed in the general terms used in the 
analysis of structured strains in the social system and of tendencies 
to deviance. 

It is not necessary to follow these problems further here. The 
important point is to show the organization of the system of expres- 
sive symbols about the attitudinal structure of the relationship and 
the cathectic interests involved in it. From this point of view the 
erotic activities themselves, in addition to their significance as direct 
sources of gratification, constitute an integral part of the system of 
expressive symbolism. This is indeed the main sense in which they 
must be said to be a function of something other than "primary 
drives." Essentially the same can be said about the erotically relevant 
features of the organism. The penis, the breast, etc., are expressive 
symbols and a large part of their erotic significance derives from this 
fact. They can, of course, be the referents for further elaborations 
of symbolization, as is well known. But these primarily erotic refer- 
ences of the system of expressive symbolization, are continuous with 
a much more widely ramifying complex, which extends to all aspects 
of the behavior relevant to the interaction and to all classes of objects 
involved in the behavior. 

Essentially similar considerations apply, with the appropriate 
differences, to the cases where an attitude of approval or esteem is 
the primary basis of organization of the interactive relationship. A 
good example is the relation between teacher and student, let us say 
in a technical field of professional training. In so far as the relation- 
ship is one of a particularized attachment, it focuses, on the stu- 
dent's part, on "admiration" for the teacher's competence and per- 
formances in the field. The counterpart on the teacher's part is 
"respect" for the student's ability and "promise," and for his per- 
formances in the course of training. Here, though in another con- 
text the actions may be of primarily instrumental significance, they 
also have an aspect as expressive symbols. 

This is essentially what is implied in the affectively neutral 



[ 392- ] Expressive Symhols 

aspect of the attachment pattern. In other words, the expressive 
symbohsm in this case belongs to the evaluative category, not the 
ca thee tic or pure-type expressive. This fusion of evaluative and 
cathectic elements is the fundamental basis of the motivational inte- 
gration involved in the institutionalization of affectively neutral pat- 
terns, as has several times been pointed out. The relevant symboliza- 
tion has the same fundamental characteristics. 

Given this framework, however, the essential structure of the 
complex of expressive symbolism is the same as in the case of the 
erotic love relationship. Particular acts acquire symbolic significance 
relative to the cathectic elements of the attachment. In the first in- 
stance we may say these will consist in acts of valued professional 
achievement. These acts may be directly experienced by the stu- 
dent, as in hearing a lecture, watching and participating in the 
conduct of a seminar discussion, or watching the actual operation of 
a bit of research technique. It may then extend to the appreciation 
of the symbolic products of such activity, notably of course reading 
what the teacher has written. 

Again, the complex will tend to be extended to other objects in 
the context of the teacher's activity, to the organizational setting in 
which he works and his role in it, to premises, the buildings, rooms 
and their contents. How far this will extend will depend both on the 
intensity of the cathexis and on how far it is limited to approval in 
the specifically professional context, or becomes a diffuse attitude of 
esteem, which will therefore mean admiration not only for the 
teacher's professional competence and achievement, but for him 
more generally as a man. In that case there is very likely to be a 
cathexis of a variety of aspects of the teacher's general style of life, 
his tastes in clothing or in literature or hobbies, a predisposition to 
think well of his wife and many other things. 

In such a case the student will tend to become sensitized to the 
attitudes of the teacher toward him, and to interpret acts of atten- 
tion to him personally as expressions of this attitude, or of course 
lack of attention where it might have occurred as expression of a 
negative attitude. This will in the first place center in acts which 
may be interpreted as direct recognition of his own achievements 
or qualities, such as a high grade on a paper, or praise for a piece of 
work. But it may extend to other objects not intrinsically connected 



Expressive Symhols [ 393 ] 

with professional achievement, such as an act of kindness or con- 
sideration. The dynamic relations of the sentiments of approval and 
esteem and those of friendliness are so close that it is difficult for 
them not to occur together to an important degree. 

In both types of relationship context there is a process of selec- 
tion of appropriate symbolization of the relevant attitudes from 
among the possibilities available in the situation. This selection 
process ranges from the lending of symbolic significance at the 
"core" to the intrinsically strategic acts and objects, to the cathexis 
of more and more "arbitrarily" associated parts of the context. In 
the affectively positive case the "intrinsic" elements are those which, 
apart from special processes of symbolic association, are features of 
the object's and of ego's relation to them which are the focus of their 
capacity to produce direct gratifications for him. This capacity may, 
as is certainly true in the erotic case, be the consequence in im- 
portant part of previous symbolic associations; this is what was 
meant by saying above that the erotically significant parts of the 
body and the acts of erotic gratification themselves constitute ex- 
pressive symbols. But at any given stage of the development of an 
action system, certain gratification-opportunities will have particu- 
larly strategic significance in the relationship context in question, 
and there will be more and more shading off from these to the in- 
creasingly "arbitrary" fringes of the association complex. 

In the affectively neutral case, similarly, the core will be the 
endowment with cathectically symbolic significance, of the acts and 
objects which are intrinsically essential to the fulfillment of the 
relevant role-expectations. In the case discussed above, that con- 
sisted essentially in professional performances themselves and the 
objects instrumentally essential to them, or produced by them. From 
this core there is again a shading off into more and more remote 
ranges of an associational complex, until the cathexis, for example, 
of the teacher's taste in neckties has very little intrinsically to do 
with the admiration of his professional competence, but may yet 
come to be of considerable symbolic significance. 

The status of the selectively cathected acts and objects as ex- 
pressive symbols has, as in the case of the other elements of culture, 
a tendency to become institutionalized. Whatever the complicated 
balance of psychological forces involved, the confining of approved 



[ 394 ] Expressive Symbols 

erotic gratification to "normal heterosexual" activities may be re- 
garded as primarily a case of the institutionalization of a pattern of 
expressive symbolism in this area, which is nonetheless learned and 
institutionalized for the fact that it is so nearly universal as the norm 
in human societies. Similarly the admiration of competent profes- 
sional achievement is again in one aspect a pattern of institution- 
alized expressive symbolism where the professional role itself is 
institutionalized. 

Institutionalization, however, does not apply only to the core of 
the association complex. Various elements of context are also in- 
volved. A good example in the erotic case is the imperative of 
privacy for sexual activities. For the professional case, that a teacher 
should dress in accord with the "dignity" of his position is an 
example. 

With institutionalization there is always an evaluative element 
introduced into the orientation of the actor to and through the ex- 
pressive symbolism, in addition to that involved in the symboliza- 
tion of affectively neutral patterns. Thus a student may, through 
his previous socialization, have acquired an affectively neutral need- 
disposition to admire competent professional performance in a field. 
But if he enters into an institutionalized relationship to a teacher 
he assumes an additional obligation to respect his teacher's profes- 
sional "authority." The respect for competence becomes an institu- 
tionalized common value of the collectivity to which they both 
belong. This should, therefore, not be confused with the evaluative 
element involved in the discipline necessary to accept an affectively 
neutral orientation at all. Institutionalization, however, is of course 
the mechanism of stabilization of the symbol system on a cultural 
basis, so it can be transmitted as an organized entity. 

§ EXPRESSIVE SYMBOLISM AND COLLECTIVITIES 

INTERACTIVE relationships and the reciprocal roles of the 
parties constitute, on the relevant level, the units of which all social 
systems are composed. But certain further considerations come to be 
involved on the higher levels of organization of collectivities. With 
extension of the role system beyond the particular interactive rela- 
tionship, the problem arises of the extent to which expressive sym- 
bolism is commonly shared within the wider role system. There is 



Expressive Symholisni and Collectivities [ 395 ] 

further the question of whether or not the symbohsm is directly 
integrated with the common values which are constitutive of the 
collectivity and may, therefore, be considered to be symbols of the 
solidarity of the collectivity. On these two bases three major types of 
expressive symbolism extending beyond the diadic relationship need 
to be distinguished. First are those symbols which are shared by the 
different sub-units of the social system, individual actors or sub- 
collectivities, without implying the existence of a bond of solidarity 
between them. These may be said to constitute the "common style" 
of these units within what in this respect is a common culture. Thus 
there may be common elements of style in the house furnishings of 
many different households, without this in any direct way sym- 
bolizing the solidarity of these households as members of the same 
collectivity. 

Secondly, there may be symbolism which is essentially sym- 
bolism of the collectivity as such, not merely the common symbolism 
of its sub-units. This, however, needs to be subdivided into two 
classes, according to whether it is "purely expressive" or is evaluative 
in emphasis, according that is, to the affectivity-neutrality variable. 
The purely expressive type then would constitute the "acting out" 
of the need-dispositions constitutive of the collectivity, the "feeling 
of solidarity" of its members, but without direct involvement of 
morally evaluative considerations, except in that, through institu- 
tionalization, participation, i.e., acceptance of such symbolism be- 
comes an obligation of collectivity membership. Family "observ- 
ances" as of Thanksgiving and Christmas would be a good example 
of this type. These occasions may have other, namely religious, con- 
notations in the cultural tradition, but in contemporary society much 
of the strictly religious connotation is subordinated to this direct 
familial expressionalism. This is also a prominent aspect of birthday 
celebrations and other anniversaries. They are thus ways of affirm- 
ing the solidarity of the collectivity, but belong in the category of 
"recreation" not of Durkheim's vie serieuse. 

From these types of observance must be distinguished collective 
"rituals" where the attitude of moral respect is predominant, which 
are therefore marked by "solemnity." These types of expressive 
symbols may be considered as manifesting and regulating the com- 
mon moral sentiments or need-dispositions of the members of the 



[ 39^ ] Expressive Symbols 

collectivity. It is this type which Durkheim so clearly illuminated in 
his analysis of religious ritual in its symbolic aspects. However, from 
the present point of view by no means all collectively moral expres- 
sions of solidarity should be called religious. In order to differentiate 
what does and does not belong in the religious category it is neces- 
sary to carry the analysis of possible relations of expressive symbolism 
to the collectivity a step farther. 

In discussing belief systems in the previous chapter the distinc- 
tion was made between ideologies and religious belief systems. Both 
were, to be sure, characterized by the fusion of cognitive and evalua- 
tive interests, and thus distinguished from scientific and philosophi- 
cal beliefs as such. However, religious beliefs were distinguished 
from ideological by the non-empirical cognitive references involv- 
ing relation to a supernatural order. This supernatural order in turn 
was related to the "rationalization," that is, the cognitive legitima- 
tion, of those phases of human experience which did not fully fit 
with the institutionalized expectations embodying the dominant 
value system. 

Parallel with the cognitive problems of meaning involved in 
these areas of experience run a series of cathectic or emotional prob- 
lems of "adjustment." These experiences are difficult to "take" pre- 
cisely because they involve the frustration of established and legiti- 
mized expectations. But from the expressive point of view these 
phenomena must be placed in a still wider context. 

It is inherent in the view of social action taken here that all such 
action involves tensions and the necessity of the imposition of frus- 
trations and disciplines of the most various sorts. This fact underlies 
the occurrence of a variety of rhythmic cycles of effort and rest, of 
discipline and permissive release and the like. Sleep is clearly one of 
the most fundamental of these tension release phenomena, which 
though it has biological foundations is nevertheless profoundly in- 
fluenced by interaction on socio-cultural levels. 

Affective primacy is characteristic of the above phenomena. Like 
all the fundamentals of behavior orientation, these rhythms colne 
to be built into the structure of social systems, so that certain of these 
predominantly affective release phenomena come to be collectively 
shared, and the requisite expressive symbolism institutionalized on 



Expressive Symbolism and Collectivities [ 397 ] 

the bases discussed above. There are, however, areas where the ad- 
justment problems are particularly crucial from the point of view of 
the stability of the social system, and where the emotional adjust- 
ment aspect is particularly intimately connected with the belief 
system in the area of the "supernatural." It is this sphere of fusion of 
religious beliefs and the expressive symbolism of affective adjust- 
ment which is the religious sphere of expressive symbolism as such. 

This religious sphere was defined in the last chapter as involving 
the legitimation of orientations, on occasion, both within the sphere 
of institutionalized value-orientations which constitute the frame- 
work of the main social structure, and in the areas of discrepancy 
relative to the institutionalized expectations. We may, therefore, 
have religious symbolism expressive of the solidarity of the main 
institutionalized collectivities. We also have religious symbolism 
which serves as an institutionalized channel for the adjustment of 
emotional strains in the discrepancy areas. 

The first was what Durkheim regarded as the core type of re- 
ligious ritual, the symbolic expression of the solidarity of the group. 
The second was the type especially emphasized by Malinowski, the 
type case being the funeral ceremonial. In this case it is not pri- 
marily an expression of the common moral sentiments of the col- 
lectivity, though that is also generally involved, but an expression 
of the adjustment of individuals under strain in such a way that 
their orientation is kept in line with an institutionalized pattern. 
Solidarity, however, as we have seen provides the element of sup- 
port in this process of social control. The religious type of expression 
of group solidarity is to be distinguished from collective solidarity 
symbolism which is evaluative in emphasis, but not religious in that 
there is no reference to legitimation in terms of a supernatural order. 
Examples would be a patriotic observance, such as that of the Fourth 
of July in this country, or the ceremonial of a university Com- 
mencement. 

In all of these cases, as in that of the diadic interactive rela- 
tionship, we may regard the symbolic act as the core phenomenon. 
The essential point is that the need-dispositions which are being 
symbolically manifested are those which involve the institutionalized 
and internalized common value-orientations which constitute the 



[ 39^ ] Expressive Symbols 

collectivity. This gives a strong premium on performance of these 
symbolic acts in common, so that the sharing aspect is itself directly 
symbolized. 

But as in the diadic case, the associational complex extends 
beyond the symbolic acts themselves. First it should, of course, be 
noted that cognitive orientation patterns are an integral part of con- 
crete acts. Hence the beliefs in terms of which the acts are given 
meaning are themselves, in one aspect, also expressive symbols; they 
must be cathected as part of the total complex. This is particularly 
important in the case of many religious beliefs because of the promi- 
nence of what we have above called "intermediate" symbolism in 
that field.^ Indeed it is frequently the case in this field that for a 
particular belief pattern its significance as a complex of expressive 
symbols has primacy over the strictly cognitive aspect. Broadly 
speaking this may be said to be true of "mythology" in the religious 
field as distinguished from "dogma." When it is said that a myth 
"explains" the meaning of a ritual, for instance, frequently the ritual 
activity consists in dramatic portrayal of certain mythological char- 
acters and their activities. The mythological personages themselves 
are to a high degree expressive symbols on which certain need- 
dispositions of the members of the collectivity are "projected." Their 
significance lies in their appropriateness in this context rather than 
in the strictly cognitive validity of any propositions. 

As in the diadic cases analyzed above, the complex of symbolic 
association then extends to other aspects of the total action complex, 
to places, buildings, occasions, and physical objects which, for in- 
stance, serve as ritual paraphernalia. The whole associated complex 
comes to be cathected and the appropriate attitudes applied to all 
the objects within it. It is essentially by this process that physical 
objects, vestments, edifices, etc., come to be treated as sacred objects 
in a religious sense. 

We find, then, that the collective aspect of expressive symbolism 
involves a whole series of differentiations of types. There is the uni- 
formity of style within a collectivity. Then there are the modes of 
expression of collective sentiments, which are subdivided into the 
directly and primarily expressive, and the evaluative or moral. The 
latter in turn may or may not be primarily religious, and both may 

^ See above. Chapter VIII, pp. 376-378. 



Role Differentiation and Expressive Symbolism [ 399 ] 

be oriented more to the expression of sentiments relative to estab- 
lished routine orientations, or to adjustment to the discrepancies 
from institutionalized expectations. 

§ ROLE DIFFERENTIATION WITH RESPECT 
TO EXPRESSIVE SYMBOLISM 

THE above treatment of the most general relation of ex- 
pressive symbolism to collectivities was confined to the "common" 
aspects, to the respects in which symbolic acts and the other sym- 
bolic objects are shared by all members of a given collectivity. But 
in this as in other respects there tend to be internal differentiations 
of interest and hence of role as between different members and 
classes of members of any given collectivity. There are two types of 
such differentiation which will be briefly treated here. The first 
concerns the respects in which the acts and other elements of the 
associated symbolic complex, which have special symbolic sig- 
nificance in the collectivity in question, come to be allocated to spe- 
cialized roles, and to the actors who perform them. With respect 
then to symbolic as well as to instrumental significance to the col- 
lectivity, there is a "division of labor" which underlies the structure 
of the system of expressive symbolism itself. Secondly, expressive 
symbolism generally is "embedded" in concrete action, and is ancil- 
lary to whatever interests may be dominant in that concrete activity. 
But just as there may be a specialization of interest in cognitive 
problems as such, so "aesthetic" or appreciative problems may be- 
come the focus of a specialized interest. This interest becomes that 
in creating new patterns of expressive symbolism, and in evaluating 
those which exist or are in process of creation. Like cognitive spe- 
cialization in turn the aesthetic interest may come to be the primary 
determinative focus of a class of specialized roles. At this point we 
may speak of the emergence of the "artist" as a specialized role type 
homologous with the specialists in cognitive interests, the scientist 
or the philosopher. 

To some significant degree every role which is intrinsically dif- 
ferentiated from other roles is by the same token a specialized sym- 
bolic role. This follows from the fact that the role is a crucial unit 
in the action; it and the incumbent are objects which as such 
acquire symbolic significances in the expressive "economy." Here as 



[ 400 ] Expressive Symbols 

elsewhere there is a complex relation between the symbolic sig- 
nificance of the role, and of the actor who plays it as a personality. 

Since the role is from one point of view the principal focus of 
expectations in the interaction process, the considerations about the 
relation of expressive symbolism outlined above apply directly here. 
From this point of view the role is an organized complex of particu- 
lar acts, organized in such a way that reciprocal attitudes can become 
significant. Indeed the organization of particular acts relative to 
other actors, the emergence of attitudes as crucial, and the symbolic 
significance of roles are all part of the same complex, and are in- 
separable from one another. 

Then the analysis of symbolic roles as foci for the organization 
of expressive symbol systems, must follow the general analysis of the 
bases of role-differentiation within social systems, as these have been 
set forth above. Within this it is the paradigm of cathectic or ex- 
pressive orientations which should form the focus. 

In current psychological terminology, roles, and their incum- 
bents as persons, become the objects of "projection" from the need- 
disposition systems of other actors. The phenomenon has been 
classically demonstrated in the case of the "transference" which 
occurs in the relation of patient to psychotherapist. In this case, 
however, the projected role of the therapist is in sharp contrast to his 
institutionalized role, and this duality forms a principal "lever" for 
the psychotherapeutic process. 

The projections in question may or may not be integrated with 
the institutionalized role structure, and there may be more or less 
well-marked duality phenomena as in the case of psychotherapy. 
But in any case the tendency will be for the expressive symbolic 
significance of roles to follow the main lines of diflferentiation which 
are inherent in the differentiations of the social structure generally. 

The first type of case we may call attention to is the expressive 
aspect of leadership roles. In the ideal type the common value senti- 
ments which constitute the collectivity are projected upon the leader 
as a symbolic embodiment of these values. In so far as this symbolic 
complex is well integrated, loyalty to these values, to the collectivity, 
and to the leader in his role become indistinguishable. 

The degrees and ways in which symbolic leadership is combined 
in the same role with instrumental executive functions can vary 



Role Differentiation and Expressive Symbolism [ 401 ] 

considerably. But even the instrumental leader will tend to have at 
least some directly expressive functions. Most generally his presence, 
and his performing of symbolic acts will be an essential part of all col- 
lective symbolic action, e.g., celebrations or ceremonials. In general 
the symbolization connected with these activities will be organized 
around a symbolic role or system of them as a focus. The leader will 
"preside," he will say the symbolically crucial things, his physical 
position will be symbolic as, e.g., seated at the center of the "head 
table," and a whole variety of other symbolic associations will be 
organized around his role. 

It is furthermore significant that this expressive element of lead- 
ership, as in the case of the instrumental aspect of the executive 
role, has both an internal and an external-representative aspect. The 
position and the actions in his role of an expressive leader serve to 
symbolize to outsiders the nature and the solidary sentiments of the 
collectivity he represents, and to organize its relations to other col- 
lectivities. All of this is of course clearly evident in various aspects of 
international relations. Certain symbolic acts can only be performed 
by a "chief of state," regardless of the question of who holds the 
"real power." Protocol in international gatherings is indispensable 
because it is impossible to avoid having almost any accidental hap- 
pening come to be interpreted as "significant" when the persons 
involved are playing to such a high degree symbolic representative 
roles. The only alternative to exposure to possibly deleterious con- 
sequences in such a situation is careful regulation of the symbolic 
aspects themselves, as in setting the order of precedence. 

It is possible for the symbolic aspect of a role to become rather 
highly differentiated from the instrumental aspects. The "toast- 
master" at a dinner, which is essentially a demonstration of collective 
solidarity in the recreational context, may not be a "leader" in any 
of the other principal respects, but may be able to organize and 
canalize collective symbolism in the appropriate context very suc- 
cessfully—he may for example command certain types of humor as 
a technique of tension release. It is also possible for specialized ex- 
pressive leadership roles to develop in relation to the solemn affirma- 
tion of solidarity. It is common for example for "elder statesmen," 
who are no longer actively influential in instrumental ways, to be 
brought forward on such occasions. The British monarch is, of 



[402] Expressive Symbols 

course, a stock example of this differentiation of the expressive 
aspect. The distinction between "reigning" and "governing" is 
essentially that between expressive leadership and the executive role 
in the instrumental complex. Similarly religious leadership may be 
relatively segregated from the other aspects of group solidarity 
except for the solidarity of the religious collectivity itself. An ex- 
treme instance of this was the position of the "official" Shinto priest 
in Japan, for example, on the village level. He was apparently de- 
prived of almost all influence in general collective affairs, his role 
being defined as almost purely "ceremonial." In any other connec- 
tion he was not even a particularly respected figure. 

These extreme segregations are, however, exceptional. At the 
very least we can say that executive leadership must carry with it a 
very significant expressive aspect. The strains and tensions involved 
in complex organization are such that the expressive aspect must be 
organized. The existence of a well-integrated system of expressive 
symbolism is a highly important mechanism of social control in that 
it "channels" the directly cathectic elements relative to action in 
the collectivity. 

This functional imperative, however, does not preclude that 
there should be a relatively elaborate differentiation of sub-systems 
of expressive symbolism, including several symbolically significant 
roles relative to the same collectivity-organization context. The case 
of the Prime Minister and the King in England is merely one case 
in point. 

Max Weber's famous category of charismatic leadership belongs 
directly in the present context. The charismatic leader plays an ex- 
pressive leadership role where moral authority is claimed, that is, 
where the symbolization is evaluative and not only expressive. 
Whether this role is that of leadership in a deviant sub-culture in 
conscious opposition to the institutionalized value-system, or in a 
collectivity within the institutionalized system, is secondary. But the 
primacy of charisma means that the immediate expressive sig- 
nificance of the role takes precedence over its instrumental func- 
tions in the collective division of labor. This may be interpreted as 
the main significance of such religious maxims as "take no thought 
for the morrow." To do so would take the orientation off the purely 



Role Differentiation and Expressive Symbolism [ 403 ] 

expressive plane and introduce instrumental considerations into it, 
considerations which are felt to be inappropriate. The "routinization 
of charisma," then, is the process by which a primarily expressive 
orientation comes to be adjusted to the exigencies of a continu- 
ing situation which must in the nature of the case involve instru- 
mental considerations. In such a case the pattern of charismatic 
leadership must give way to one in which executive aspects play 
a critical role. If a purely symbolic-role type survives, it must be 
segregated from the executive and "neutralized" as it were. This has 
often happened in the "ritualization" of religious movements. 

With respect to symbolic roles as in other contexts of expressive 
symbolism the problem of "duality" is of fundamental significance. 
On the one hand expressive symbolism constitutes the cultural pat- 
tern system around which institutionalized gratification interests are 
organized, and which gives these interests a certain stability. At the 
same time, on the other hand, the need-disposition systems of per- 
sonalities are imperfectly integrated. The elements of these systems 
which are not fully in accord with the institutionalized patterns 
hence also seek expression. Sometimes they do so in explicitly 
deviant forms, sometimes interstitially to the main institutionalized 
system of expressive symbolism. But sometimes such elements come 
to be "superimposed" on the institutionalized meanings of estab- 
lished symbols. This is perhaps peculiarly important in the case of 
symbolic roles. 

Insecurity in the psychological sense is one of the persistent and 
ubiquitous aspects of the malintegration of social systems. Put a 
little differently we may say that in most social systems there are 
incompletely gratified needs to feel that "everything will be all 
right." It is very natural indeed that these needs should be projected 
on persons who occupy expressive leadership roles. There is, then, 
very generally an exaggerated trust or expectation that the leader 
will "take care of everything" in such cases. He becomes, even if 
not in a strictly religious sense, a kind of "savior." In such a case the 
question of whether or not the leader "delivers" may become acute. 
As was noted in the discussion of ideologies in the last chapter, the 
strains involved in such expectations may be lessened by displacing 
the fulfillment of the expectations outside the immediate field of 



[ 404 ] Ex'pressive Symhols 

action, either into the future, as in the case of the leader of a move- 
ment for reform, or into a transcendental sphere, as in the case of 
many religious movements. 

The obverse of this romantic-utopian element^ in expressive 
symbolism is what may be called "scapegoat" symbolism. In this case 
it is the negative affect, which is not fully institutionalized, which is 
projected onto a symbolic object. Persons performing differentiated 
roles, particularly those carrying responsibility, are often appropriate 
targets for such projection. 

It is necessary to distinguish, relatively to any given collectivity, 
internal and external scapegoats. Solidarity is an essential common 
denominator of all collectivities. Hence the type case of internal 
threat is that from the member who breaks the solidarity. There is 
therefore a focus of negative affect on the "traitor," the "disloyal" 
member of the collectivity. Sanctions against disloyalty on an in- 
stitutionalized and realistic level will be found in all stable col- 
lectivities though their exact nature varies over a very wide range. 
But just as insecurity in the above sense tends to motivate to exag- 
gerated trust in and adulation of leaders, it also motivates to the 
search for scapegoats on whom actual troubles can be blamed, and 
anxiety about future troubles justified and legitimized. We are so 
familiar with these phenomena as in the case of "witch-hunts" that 
further comment seems to be unnecessary. 

In the light of the analysis of compulsive ambivalent motivation 
in Chapter VII above, the mechanisms operating in these cases of 
romantization and scapegoating of expressive leaders can be gen- 
eralized. For the person acting under what we have called strain, 
whether it be that directly imposed by the failure of fulfillment of 
his expectations or compounded by the internal conflict of ambiva- 
lence, expectations become "skewed" from the normal, which in this 
case we may define as the institutionalized pattern. There is always 
the dual aspect of this, the need to express the resentment or hostility 
which frustration arouses, and the need to protect by defensive- 
adjustive measures the cathectic investment in the disturbed orien- 
tation pattern and relationship. Since this orientation is most funda- 
mentally organized in terms of the complementarity of expectations, 

^ This element, it will be remembered from Chapter VII, is associated with 
patterns of compulsive motivation. 



Role Differentiation and Expressive Symbolism [ 405 ] 

ego in response to strain attempts to redefine his expectations of 
alter. There will, then, be both a compulsively alienative component 
in this definition, and a compulsively conformative one. In the 
alienative context ego will tend to express hostility toward alter and 
expect to be reciprocated, while in the conformative context he will 
compulsively skew his conformity with what he defines as alter's 
expectations and expect this to be reciprocated by positive attitude 
sanctions on alter's part. 

It seems correct to say that what is usually meant by the mech- 
anism of "projection,"^ as a mechanism of defense, consists essen- 
tially of such an expectation of alter's behavior which, because it is 
inappropriate to alter's orientation system and to the situation, is 
not in fact acted upon by alter, that is, is not reciprocated. Alter is 
always, in an established interaction system, a symbolic figure to 
ego. What projection in this case does is to shift the symbolic mean- 
ing of alter and his attitudes, to redefine the symbolism. Alter be- 
comes the source of the disturbance on which ego's resentment 
focuses, and/or the person who expects and should reward ego's 
skewing of his conformative orientation. It was, in ego's distorted 
definition of the situation, alter who, because he was angry at ego, 
placed the strain upon him and disturbed his expectations. It is 
because alter expects the value patterns to be lived up to in com- 
pulsively literal form, that ego must distort the normal patterning of 
his action in a compulsive direction. From this point of view the 
primary factor in projection is the failure of ego's expectations to be 
reciprocated. Then the gap in meaning between the expectation 
and the actual behavior of alter is filled by the imputation of 
behavior to alter (including attitudes and intentions), which he does 
not actually perform or have. 

Further complications are of course introduced by the operation 
of the mechanisms of repression and displacement. The object of 
ego's projection need not be the actual and immediate agent of the 
imposition of strain on him. Indeed it is almost impossible to keep 
the balance of expressing both the conformative and the alienative 
orientation components equally toward the same object. One, then, 
must be repressed. Repression, however, is seldom complete, and 

* This interpretation of the concept of projection was called to my attention 
by Professor R. F. Bales. 



[ 4o6 ] Expressive Symhols 

one of the obvious possible outcomes is the displacement of the 
repressed affect on a substituted object. Hence the tendency, as 
we noted, for symbolically prominent figures to function as "light- 
ning rods," catching much of the displaced and hence relatively 
free-floating affect which is present in the social system. 

We may add one further consideration. Though much repressed 
affect may be relatively free floating, it does not follow that just any 
object can function equally well as an object of displacement. There 
must be a certain symbolic appropriateness. Relatively little is 
known about the laws of symbolic association which define the vari- 
ous categories of appropriateness, that is the gradients of symbolic 
generalization. However, certain types of generalization in this field 
are relatively well known on a concrete level. Thus for example it 
is well known that hostility tends to be displaced from parents to 
authority figures generally. Especially relative to socialization in cer- 
tain types of kinship system, in a 'projective sense it may be true 
that all masculine authority roles are held by "father figures." But 
it is extremely important to distinguish the truth of such a statement 
as applying to the projective symbolic significance of such roles for 
large parts of a population, and the actual institutional structure of 
such roles. Thus it is quite impossible for an executive in a modern 
occupational organization to have a role which is in fact structurally 
identical with the father role in the kinship system in the same 
society.^ 

Projective symbolism in this sense is by no means confined to 
what can readily and clearly be defined as "pathological" phe- 
nomena, such as the adulation of heroes and scapegoating. Much of 
it comes to be built into the actual social structure, especially in 
those patternings of activity which are especially significant as ex- 
pressions of strain in rituals and what we have called "secondary 
institutions." The significance of family relationships in early sociali- 
zation is such that the projective symbolization of family members 
is particularly likely to appear in such a case. 

One example in the field of secondary institutions is that of the 
American youth culture. Here it is not without significance that 
the most prominent class of undergraduate college social clubs are 

^ In general what may loosely be called "psychoanalytic sociology" has tended 
to pass over this extremely important distinction. 



Role Differentiation and Expressive Symholism [ 407 ] 

called fraternities and sororities. Members address each other as 
"brother" and "sister," especially on ceremonial occasions. It is cer- 
tainly significant that these are symbolized as groups of "siblings" 
without the participation of parent-symbols. The "old grads" are not 
referred to as "fathers" but are "older brothers." There is to be sure, 
sometimes the vaguely benevolent figure of the "house mother," but 
emphatically never a "house father." In the light of the functions of 
the youth culture in the process of emancipation from dependence 
on the conjugal family, particularly the parents, this symbolization 
is clearly appropriate and significant. 

In some other cultures, familial symbolism is very much more 
integrally built into the social structure. The case of the Roman 
Catholic Church is a particularly noteworthy one. Secular prestige 
figures are, in Catholic societies, generally not endowed with the 
projective status of family figures; and kings are not fathers and 
queens are not mothers in general. The church, however, is organ- 
izationally separated from secular society, and by its own symboliza- 
tion it is a family "writ large." God of course is the Father, but the 
priest as his vicar is also explicitly called Father. The Virgin assumes 
the Mother role,^ and religious orders consist of Brothers and Sisters. 
There is an interesting sense in which it may be said that Cathol- 
icism, while recognizing that in secular life the individual must 
become emancipated from his childhood role in the family and 
assume both non-familial roles and parental roles within the family 
permits, indeed enjoins, that, in his religious capacity as a member 
of the church, the lay Catholic symbolically remains a child. 

Closely related to this religious extension of the symbolic familial 
role to other relationships is the provision of symbolic families. This 
is a feature of monarchical regimes generally. In England a very 
important place is occupied, not merely by the King, but by the 
Royal Family as a whole. It is a kind of prototype of what a family 
should be, especially perhaps since the reign of Victoria. All the 
crucial events vidthin the Royal Family are followed with the 
strongest interest by the general public; indeed, there is a vicarious 
participation in its life by the whole nation. It is not surprising that 
the selection of a Queen should be treated as a matter of legitimate 
public concern, and not merely the private affair of the royal suitor. 

* There is also the Mother Superior of a Convent. 



[ 4o8 ] Expressive Symbols 

§ THE ROLE OF THE ARTIST 

IN THE above treatment one type of differentiation of 
roles with respect to expressive symbolism was discussed, namely, 
that in which the role itself was an integral part of the general 
system of expressive symbolism of the culture. We must now turn 
to the second type noted above, that where the incumbent of a 
differentiated role becomes not so much himself a symbol, as a 
specialist in the creation and manipulation (application) of expres- 
sive symbols. We find here a direct parallel to the creation and 
application of beliefs by the scientist or philosopher and the applied 
scientist. The term artist is generally used to designate both types, 
but differentiated as the "creative" artist and the "performer." 

As we have noted above, expressive symbolism like cognitive 
beliefs is "originally" and "normally" embedded in the ordinary 
processes of action. The ordinary person who acts, and surrounds 
his action with objects in accord with a definite expressive "style" 
is no more an artist in the present sense than is the peasant who 
possesses knowledge about his soil, seed, fertilizer and crop pests 
and uses this knowledge in a practical way, a scientist. In both 
cases the use of the cultural pattern may be very skillful and 
"sound," but this is not the criterion. The criterion is rather spe- 
cialization of role with respect to the relevant aspects of the cul- 
tural tradition itself. In a strict sense then the creative artist is the 
person who specializes in the production of new 'patterns of expres- 
sive symbolism, and the performing artist is the person who special- 
izes in the skilled implementation of such symbolism in an action 
context. Both are "experts" with respect to a particular phase of the 
cultural tradition. 

As is the case with any other type of specialty, this artistic type 
arises through differentiation relative to the other components of 
the total action complex. Once differentiated, furthermore, there 
is the same order of problem of the relation between the technical 
function of the role and its relational context which exists with 
respect to other differentiated roles. 

Placing the problem in this frame of reference at once directs 
our attention to the problems of disposal and of remuneration, as 
well as to the provision of facilities. There are two primary aspects 



The Role of the Artist [ 409 ] 

of the disposal-remuneration problem of exchange relations. The 
first is the question of disposal on terms which will enable the 
artist to acquire the means for meeting his other wants, which is a 
condition of his being able to specialize. This aspect is of course to 
be analyzed in the same theoretical terms as apply to any other 
specialized role, though of course the concrete conditions involve 
many special features in this case. 

The second aspect is that of the appreciative or expressive side 
of the disposal and remuneration relationships. This is the problem 
of the relation of the artist to his "public." It is a very striking fact 
that in spite of the notorious "individualism" of artists, at least in 
the modem Western world, there is among them a very deep con- 
cern with communicating, with making an impression on a public. 
The expressive symbolism of art is not a "private" matter at all but 
is part of a culture. When it does become purely private and the 
individual ceases to try to communicate, he is a schizophrenic, not 
an artist, which is a very different type of social role, though one 
may shade into the other. 

Though there are many different variations, in broad terms this 
is the basis of the institutionalization of the role of the artist. He 
supplies a want or meets a need in his public, and on the expressive 
level he receives "appreciation" and admiration in return. He is 
highly sensitive to the attitudes of the significant others among his 
public. He has a responsibility for the maintenance of the standards 
which have been established, both to other persons and to himself, 
because these are institutionalized standards. The same basic mobil- 
ization of motivational elements which applies to other institution- 
alized roles also applies to this one. There are, of course, many 
specific differences, but they are not relevant at this level. 

There is a particular combination of expressive and instrumen- 
tal elements of orientation in the role of the artist which is im- 
portant to understanding some of the peculiarities of the role. For 
himself and for his public the artist is engaged in creating expressive 
symbols. But it is precisely the difference in one respect between 
sophisticated art and purely "spontaneous" expressive activity that 
there is a "technical" aspect of the artist's work which is directly 
comparable with other techniques. This aspect of his activity is 
instrumental. It depends on knowledge and skill in exactly the 



[410] Exjfressive Symbols 

same fundamental sense as does industrial technology, or the tech- 
nology of scientific research. The artist must accept severe disci- 
plines, must spend much time in study and practicing his skills. 
But his goal is to produce appropriate patterns for the expression 
of affect, to "stir up" his audience or public. There seems to be an 
inherent tension between these two aspects of the role, which is not 
present for the scientist, because the content of the latter's goal is 
not of the same order of direct cathectic significance. How much 
certain aspects of the situation in the Western world are culture 
bound it is difficult without careful comparative study to say. How- 
ever, the well-known association of art with "Bohemianism," with 
the repudiation of many of the main institutionalized patterns of 
ordinary life, is clearly very much less marked in the case of science. 
It may at least be suggested that in a society where affectively neu- 
tral patterns are institutionalized to such a high degree, the ex- 
pressive interests of the artist come more drastically into conflict 
with the main institutional structure than do the interests of the 
scientist. In more expressively oriented societies the conflict is pre- 
sumably not so acute, but conversely the opportunity for the scientist 
is less well developed. 

The parallel between the role of the artist and of the scientist 
extends to the structure of the continuum between the "pure" 
creative artist and the corresponding types of application. Corre- 
sponding to the professions in which science is applied, like medicine 
or engineering, we may distinguish the performer of sophisticated 
works of art, who is himself a trained "professional." Of course only 
some among the media of artistic expression admit of specialized 
performance. The principal examples in our culture are music, the 
theater and the dance whereas some forms of literature, painting, 
sculpture and architecture do not admit of a separate role of per- 
formance. In their essentials the specialized roles of performers in 
these fields are similar in structure to that of the creative artist him- 
self. There are, of course, often transitional types between the two 
as well. Thus a great concert musician or conductor is certainly 
"creative," but in a sense parallel to that in which a great surgeon is. 

"Pure" art, whether as practiced by the creative artist or the 
performer, is parallel to specialization relative to non-evaluative 
cognitive orientation, to belief systems. As we have seen evaluative 



The Role of the Artist [411] 

symbolism, religious or not, is not "purely" expressive. We can, 
however, have specialization in the creation and performance of 
evaluative symbolism as well as of "pure art." The core of Greek 
art seems in these terms to have been evaluative in its original set- 
ting, to have been both civic and religious in different contexts. 
Similarly religious art has played a very prominent part in Western 
culture. A distinction should, however, be made between artistic 
creation which is itself an act of religious devotion, as in the build- 
ing of cathedrals, and the use of religious symbolic content in artistic 
creations, as is the case with so much of Renaissance art. A good 
deal of the latter should not be called religious art in a full sense. 
It shades over into "pure" art. 

In the above sense, the actual conduct of collective ceremonials 
may in certain cases be treated as artistic performance of a special 
type. Much of the "embellishment" of religious ritual is clearly art 
in this sense. Thus the singing of a Bach mass as part of the religious 
service itself is an integral part of the religious expression. But the 
singing of the same mass in a secular concert hall may be an act of 
a quite different order. Similarly, Lincoln's Gettysburg address as 
originally delivered was not "literature," it was an act of expressive 
symbolization of the collective need dispositions of the nation, or at 
least the North; it was part of a collectivity ceremonial. It has, how- 
ever, to a certain degree become divorced from this context and 
come to be treated as "art." 

Thus in addition to the creative artist and the artistic performer 
we may speak of the ceremonial performer, who manipulates artistic 
symbolism in an evaluative context, where its meaning in terms of 
explicit common values is directly symbolized. 

The distinction is paralleled by that between modes of partici- 
pation of the public or audience. The standards of pure art in this 
sense are institutionalized only in "acceptance" terms. As we ordi- 
narily put it, we are "pleased" or "moved" by a work of art or its 
performance. But this attitude does not have specifically binding 
implications for our action beyond this specific context. In general, 
attendance at performances, or paying attention to art as such, is 
treated as voluntary. 

The most essential modification of this occurs when adherence 
to a set of artistic standards becomes itself the primary symbol of 



[ 412 ] Expressive Symbols 

belonging to a sub-cultural group. This tends to be true of the 
"coteries" of the art world, the schools and the "little revues." This 
is the elevation of what in terms of the general cultural tradition 
is a secondary basis of institutionalization into a primary basis for 
a special sub-culture, one which, however, in the nature of the case 
could not become a primary basis of institutionalization of a society. 
It is directly paralleled by the "sects" of intellectuals who share a 
common belief system differing from the diffuser general ideology 
of the society. 

Where, however, expressive symbols become an integral part 
of the primary orientation system of a collectivity, the mode of 
institutionalization is that of commitment, not of acceptance only. 
A far severer set of sanctions is mobilized for conformity and against 
deviance, and there is pressure for a far closer integration of the 
expressive symbolism with the major value-orientations of the col- 
lectivity. Thus, characteristically in the Soviet Union, literature, 
which merely tries to portray human beings, their feelings and con- 
flicts, is distinctly frowned upon. Art must be "proletarian," it must 
serve the cause of the Revolution directly. Anything which does 
not have such a direct relation to the major values of the society is 
"frivolous" or possibly counter revolutionary. 

There is a whole class of phenomena which fall in between the 
attribution of symbolic significance to roles which are not primarily 
expressive in their functions, and the primarily expressive role- 
system comprising the artist and his public. Perhaps the most con- 
spicuous of these is the role of the propagandist, who is consciously 
using available expressive symbolism or creating new symbols, in 
order to manipulate the attitudes of a public. Whenever a leader- 
ship or executive role is performed in such a way that the symbolic 
aspects of the role are not merely accepted, but explicitly arranged 
for and manipulated, the leader is in some degree in this sense a 
propagandist. He is appealing to the sentiments of his constituency 
by to some degree redefining the situation in symbolic terms. The 
"pure" artist on the other hand, we may say, is not oriented to the 
influencing of the attitudes of his public in other than expressive 
terms, but only to giving "form" to their expressive interests. The 
symbol systems with which the artist operates are, however, deeply 
involved in the equilibrium of the whole attitude system. It is an 



The Role of the Artist [ 413 ] 

easy transition from pure art to their use in such a way as to attempt 
to influence attitudes in a direction favorable to particular courses 
of action in other than purely expressive contexts. 

Thus both expressive leadership and artistic roles tend to be- 
come involved in "propaganda" activities. Frequently the expressive 
leader provides the principal legitimation of the propaganda, it is 
for instance promulgated in his name, while the artist contributes to 
the "technique." Thus the practice of a political figure, e.g., the late 
President Roosevelt, having key speeches at least partly written by 
a literary artist (Robert E. Sherwood) is a case in point. Propa- 
ganda in this sense may, of course, have the most varied expressive 
content and may serve the most varied ends. A class of great signifi- 
cance in our own society is that of advertising appeal. But of greater 
significance is the proselytization of orientations where evaluative 
symbolism and beliefs are involved, in the political and religious 
movements which have a strong "charismatic" tinge. 

It should be clear from the whole of the foregoing analysis that 
at many points a very intimate fusion occurs between cognitive 
orientation patterns, i.e., belief systems, and expressive symbols. 
Indeed there is always both a cognitive and an expressive aspect to 
any set of symbols. Only in some types of "ideas" do the cognitive 
interests and value-standards have clear primacy, so that the criteria 
of cognitive adequacy, clarity, logical consistency and respect for 
evidence are prominently involved. In all of what have been called 
evaluative beliefs, this aspect is not clearly primary, but yet it may 
have considerable significance. However, starting with evaluative 
beliefs, the expressive interest acquires great significance, and in 
many ideological and religious belief systems the specific symbols 
become to a very great extent expressive symbols. This is particu- 
larly true where intermediate symbolism in the sense discussed in 
the last chapter is prominently involved, but it may also be true of 
highly abstract concepts or generalizations, such as the concept of 
Divine Grace, or of the Dialectic. Where such abstract entities are 
treated as expressive symbols, however, there is almost certain to be 
a "vulgar" concretization of them so that more tangible symbolic 
entities enter in. Thus in popular Catholicism the conception of 
intercession by a Saint is common, the saint being a greatly human- 
ized and concretized figure. Similarly in vulgar Marxism, the con- 



[ 414 ] Expressive Symbols 

ception of the "imperialist circles" who are responsible for opposing 
the course of the revolution contrary to the will of the "people" is 
such a concretized symbol, as indeed is that of the "people" itself. 

Toward the pole of mythology, however, as was noted in the 
last chapter, cognitive criteria as such tend to be subordinated and 
the expressive elements to take precedence. The very common 
situation in non-literate cultures where certain institutions are "ex- 
plained" by the "fact" that a certain mythological figure did so and 
so in the remote past certainly belong in this category. 

It is also, however, possible for expressive symbolism to develop 
certain types of refinement and "abstraction" so that rather than 
concretization taking place as in the creation of personal figures, 
certain rather abstract symbolic patterns become a primary orienting 
framework. One of the principal examples of this appears to be the 
traditional Chinese system of symbolic orientations. The "concep- 
tions" of Tao, Yang and Yin are certainly not anthropomorphic or 
otherwise concretized. But Granet^ seems to be quite correct in his 
contention that these are not "concepts" in the sense of Western 
philosophy. We may call them highly abstract expressive symbols, 
and speak of the Chinese orientation as one in which, in the pri- 
mary evaluative symbol system, the expressive element has primacy 
over the cognitive. This interpretation fits with the particularism, 
traditionalism, and "ritualization" of traditional Chinese society. 

§ EXPRESSIVE SYMBOLISM AND THE 
REWARD SYSTEM 

IN CHAPTER IV abovc the concepts of facilities and of 
rewards were treated, along with the conception of the allocation 
of personnel among roles, as the primary foci of the allocative proc- 
esses of the social system. Both belong to the category of "posses- 
sions," that is, of entities, rights in which are transferable from one 
actor to another through the process of "exchange." Possessions are 
facilities in so far as their primary significance to actors lies in their 
instrumental uses, while possessions are rewards in so far as theii 
significance is expressive, that is, so far as they constitute objects of 
direct gratification without regard to their instrumental uses. It goes 
without saying that the same concrete objects may be, and very 

"^ La pensee chinoise. He uses the term emhUmes. 



Ex'pressive Symbolism and the Reward System [415] 

generally are, both facilities and rewards. The distinction is analyti- 
cal, not concretely classificatory. 

It was argued above that the "core" of the reward system in a 
social system is to be found in the attitudes of actors toward each 
other. These attitudes were called "relational possessions" in that 
ego can "give" or "withhold" a favorable attitude from alter, he can 
make it contingent on alter's performance in a variety of respects 
and he can choose objects on which to bestow it. He can also con- 
trol his unfavorable attitudes, he can "get mad" or blame alter for 
actions— or qualities— which he dislikes. Attitudes are thus contin- 
gently controllable. They are also as we have seen the core of the 
system of mutually oriented expectations in the interaction process. 
Hence so far as ego entertains a legitimized expectation of alter's 
attitudes toward him we may speak of his having a "right" to that 
attitude. The conditions on which alter may legitimately change 
his attitude toward ego are institutionally defined just as are the 
conditions on which he may legitimately dispose of a physical 
object in his possession. Hence we may say that the conditions of 
holding and of transfer of relational possessions are institutionally 
regulated, and hence the allocation of such possessions is so regu- 
lated. 

Finally, it was further argued that all other rewards must tend 
to become symbolically integrated with relational possessions. This 
is not in the least to say that many objects other than actors do not 
have cathectic significance which can vary independently relative 
to that of the attitudes of actors. It is only to say that the significance 
of other actors, and the cultural patterns directly integrated wdth 
their attitudes, is so great that the cathectic significance of these 
other objects, e.g., food objects, cannot be independent of the sys- 
tem of relational possessions without also being interdependent 
with it. The attitudes of persons from whom one receives food, to 
whom one gives food, and with whom one eats food, are an integral 
part of the symbolic complex relative to food habits. It is, for in- 
stance, well known to how great an extent commensality serves as a 
symbol of solidarity, and its denial as a symbol of the lack of 
solidarity. 

The initial treatment of expressive symbolism in the present 
chapter took its departure from essentially these considerations. It 



[416] Expressive Symhols 

will be remembered that it was held that the focus of the whole 
system of expressive symbolism is the symbolic act relative to one 
or more alters, and that the primary symbolic reference of the sym- 
bolic act is the attitude of the actor performing it. Other symbols, 
physical or cultural, become organized into an associated complex 
relative to this attitudinal core of the symbolic system. We may 
say, then, that one major element of the value of a reward may 
always be traced back to the ways in which it symbolizes the atti- 
tudes of significant actors, alter or ego himself, individual or col- 
lective. 

But this is not merely one major element in the value of the 
reward. It is quite clearly that element which is most crucial to 
the structure of the social system. For it is elements of stability in 
the mutuality of orientation of interactive relationships which es- 
sentially constitute the structure of the social system. Its stability 
depends on the integration of the interests of actors with the pat- 
terning of the interaction process. If interests in objects other than 
the attitudes of actors cannot be integrated with this mutual attitude 
system, such interests must constitute threats to the stability of the 
social system. This is simply an aspect of the fundamental theorem 
of the institutional integration of motivation which was developed 
above in Chapter II. 

Mutually oriented attitudes, in the social system are, as we have 
seen, extremely complex and varied. We have found, however, that 
the main types may be classified in terms of the two pattern vari- 
ables of affectivity-neutrality and specificity-diffuseness, yielding the 
four familiar types of receptiveness-response, love, approval and 
esteem. We may, then, classify expressive symbols as patterns of 
the reward system according to which of the four attitude types 
they symbolize, as was developed above. 

Every social system must be characterized by some ordering of 
its reward system, that is, of allocation of the possession of expressive 
symbols relative to positive and negative attitudes. At the core, that 
is, with relation to the attitudes themselves, this involves coordina- 
tion of the criteria of legitimate claim to a positive attitude, and of 
legitimation of changes in the attitudinal system. There are two 
main types of these changes, first, transfer of an attachment from 
one object to another, for instance, of love where the attitude is of 
such a character as to preclude it being held toward an indefinite 



Ex'pressive Symholistn and the Reward System [417] 

plurality of objects at the same time. The second type is the shift 
from positive to negative attitudes toward the same object— through 
a point of balance between the positive and the negative com- 
ponents, of course. 

Beyond the core there must be an ordering of the symbolic sig- 
nificances of other objects relative to the attitudinal focus. Since 
almost all objects associated with action acquire symbolic signifi- 
cance to some degree, there must be common symbolic meanings 
of these objects relative to the attitudinal system. 

This imperative may first be applied to the category of purely 
expressive as distinguished from evaluative symbolism. This in turn 
falls into the two sub-classes of attitudes of affective attachment and 
style pattern symbolism. 

The positively affective as distinguished from the affectively 
neutral attitudes toward actors have a strong tendency to be asso- 
ciated with particularism. Hence the problems of order in relation 
to them tend to be concerned with three foci. The first is the defini- 
tion of the legitimate content of such symbolism itself, the second 
of the legitimate objects of attachment, the processes of their selec- 
tion, degrees of exclusiveness, etc., and the third the limits on the 
expressive interests and obligations thus assumed. One of the most 
conspicuous examples of this ordering is to be found in the institu- 
tionalization of kinship relationships, and the associated fields of 
the regulation of courtship and erotic relationships generally. The 
strong sanction of legitimacy on marriage, and at most permission 
of a secondary status to other bases of erotic relationship, the taboo 
on homosexuality, and the institutionalization of affectional rela- 
tionships between parents and children, and between siblings all 
belong in this category. 

One of the most important facts in this field is that most societies 
do not permit that expressive symbolism in the erotic, or even the 
affectional sphere, should be purely expressive except within quite 
narrow limits, it becomes evaluative, and even frequently directly 
religious in reference. In other words, this is a doubly strong insti- 
tutionalized sphere. This strongly suggests that the allocation of 
this class of rewards is of great functional significance to the social 
system, a suggestion which is confirmed by such facts as the ubiquity 
of sexual jealousy. 

What is true of individual actors as objects of attachment and 



[418] Ex'pressive Symbols 

the expressive symbolism focusing on such an attachment is also 
true of collectivities. Here the focal problem for the social system is 
the allocation of loyalties among the different collectivities in which 
the component individual actors have roles, and the symbolization 
of these loyalties. For example, a society focused on kinship soli- 
darity to the extent of that of classical China, is not, without drastic 
reorganization of its reward system, able to develop strong loyalties 
to other types of collectivity which differ greatly in their structure, 
particularly those institutionalizing universalistic standards. So long 
as the kinship symbol system remains intact, and its expressive sig- 
nificance untouched, it is not possible to reward individuals ade- 
quately to motivate loyalty to other types of collectivity. 

An obverse type of situation is found in our own society. Par- 
ticularly between men, we institutionalize a diffuse "friendliness" 
among occupational associates, to a markedly higher degree than 
is the case, for example, in most European countries. This is sym- 
bolized in such ways as the use of first names, various informal 
social relationships such as "having a drink" together, and often a 
"kidding" relationship. But such expressive orientations are not 
permitted to go too far in particularistic exclusiveness; there is an 
obligation to manifest them relatively impartially toward all asso- 
ciates or colleagues, and the corresponding expressive symbols and 
rewards are organized in this way. The conspicuous thing about 
this pattern is the limit placed on its particularism and hence its 
integration with the universalism of the occupational system. It 
readily becomes evident how breaking through these limits could 
be threatening by providing occasions for "favoritism" in the instru- 
mental aspects of the same concrete relationships. 

Tlie allocation of the symbolism of attachment to individuals 
and to collectivities shades off into that to physical and cultural 
objects. Here, of course, the significance of the allocation problem 
depends very heavily on the scarcity factor. This aspect calls atten- 
tion to a very important dimension of the reward system, namely, 
the differential distribution of valued expressive symbols. 

The case of the erotic attachment is a good point of departure 
for discussing this. The approximate equality of numbers of the 
sexes means that if the main basis of erotic rewards is institutional- 
ized in monogamous marriage there can be a presumption of equal 



Expressive Symholism and the Reward System [419] 

distribution of these rewards through the allocation to each person 
of one mate. This does not, of course, mean that there will not be 
any diflFerentiations of desirability, but that with respect to the fun- 
damental difference between having and not having access to a 
spouse there will tend not to be a major differentiation. In a society, 
on the other hand, where polygyny is institutionalized, probably 
universally plurality of wives tends to become a status symbol, and 
the poorer and less influential elements are excluded from this 
reward, and by a still further consequence a certain proportion of 
low status men are excluded from marriage altogether. It may also 
be noted that such a situation would tend to skew the internal struc- 
ture of the kinship unit in a "patriarchal" direction, because on the 
one hand in the upper groups wives could be played off against 
each other while in the lower, the draining off of desirable women 
would create a tendency for men to seek waves from lower statuses 
than their own. 

It is clear that in this context, as well as those discussed in a 
previous section, the symbolic structure may become skewed as a 
consequence of projective needs resulting from strain and ambiva- 
lence. One of the most obvious cases is that of the place of symbol- 
ism in sexual jealousy. Here the primary focus is, of course, on the 
loyalty of the partner. Compulsiveness is manifested in the insistent 
demand for proof of that loyalty, and the demands tend to become 
such that unless alter is himself submissively oriented, it is not 
possible for him to satisfy them, if then. Ambivalence explains the 
readiness with which love can alternate with aggression toward the 
object. But the most essential point for the present context is that 
the normal expressive symbolism of the love attitude is shifted so 
that excessive acts of devotion are required to prove loyalty, and 
their omission is projectively interpreted as showing the absence of 
the expected loyalty. Where such motivation exists there may be an 
extra drive for some persons to attempt to control a larger sector of 
the relational reward system than by their institutionalized status 
they are entitled to. This may, as in the case of jealousy just dis- 
cussed, take the form of monopolizing more of the devotion of a 
single love object than is legitimate, or it may take the form of 
attempting to establish such relations with a larger number of ob- 
jects than the actor is legitimately entitled to. The latter type of 



[ 420 ] Ex'pressive Symbols 

factor is involved in "Don Juanism" and in die needs of the "preda- 
tory" glamor girl type to command the devotion of whole coteries 
of men. 

The second type of purely expressive symbolism with respect 
to which the allocative problem arises is composed of physical and 
cultural objects in their "style pattern" significance, both the style 
of the object itself and the symbolic significance of possessing that 
object, in certain quantities and qualities, as part of the style of life 
of the actor in question. The ordering of this aspect of the reward 
system involves some rather complex considerations. 

In the first place, as is true of relational rewards as such, access 
to non-relational expressive symbols is a function of power. The 
most obvious aspect of this in a society like our own is access 
through purchasing power. Hence so far as purchasing power is, for 
whatever reasons, differentially distributed, it must result in dif- 
ferential access to valued expressive symbols. The differential access 
in turn introduces an inevitable status-comparative dimension into 
the organization of this aspect of the reward system. Other things 
being equal having greater access to the possession of expressive 
symbols means that one has a more highly valued and privileged 
position with respect to the reward system, one can acquire more 
and "better" things. What is true of purchasing power is also true 
with certain modifications of political power. Here the style factor 
appears in access to elements of the style of life which are differen- 
tially accessible to persons at different power levels. Thus the sym- 
bolization of occupying the top executive's office with its better 
furnishings and the like would fit here. 

In both respects, by virtue of this comparative dimension, style 
symbolism necessarily becomes in one aspect status symbolism in 
the hierarchical sense. This is in the nature of the case since the 
person higher up in the scale, since he has command of more pur- 
chasing power, or more political power, is by definition in a "better" 
position than the one lower down. Hence obviously it is imperative 
that such style symbolism should, in access terms at least, be legiti- 
matized and institutionalized. The actor in question must "have a 
right" to live the way he does. 

This hierarchical aspect of the style system is always present, 
but "other things" are at best only approximately equal, so this 



Ex'pressive Symbolism and the Reward System [ 421 ] 

factor is cross cut by another set of considerations. Given differen- 
tial access to expressively symbolic objects, how this access is used 
is subject to performance criteria and contingent sanctions in terms 
of appreciative standards, that is, in terms of canons of "taste." So 
far as expressive orientation is concerned, the level of access through 
power may be treated as an ascribed base, but how this access is 
used is subject to achievement by the individual actor. Therefore 
there tends in every reward system, relative to the levels of access 
to style-objects, to be independent variability with respect to stand- 
ards of taste. In this way the nouveau riche may be guilty of "vul- 
garity," while the impoverished aristocrat, with his gready inferior 
resources, displays "exquisite taste," and thereby symbolizes a su- 
periority which is not fully impugned by the greater power of the 
other. 

Style symbolism thus permeates the whole social structure. It 
has a pronounced element of desirability and its objects are inher- 
ently scarce. Hence their allocation must be institutionally regulated 
in the social system. However, regulation in terms of power of 
access is only one form of regulation. That in terms of realization 
of standards of taste is another which cross cuts the first. It can in 
certain respects serve to oflFset the prestige-implications of differen- 
tial access, and thereby serve as an independent balancing force in 
the system of social stratification. 

Both, of course, are subject to projective distortion of the main 
institutionalized values. On the one hand this projective distortion 
relative to well-established standards of taste is the main feature of 
the vulgarity of the 'parvenu. He does not yet feel secure in his 
enhanced status position and therefore tends to distort style sym- 
bols from their more intrinsic expressive significance in relation to 
disciplined appreciative norms, into predominantly status symbols. 
Since his need to S5aTibolize his status is compulsive, he is apt to 
be somewhat undiscriminating in his choices of ways to do it, to go 
in for "extremes" and for quantity rather than quality. Persistence 
of a residue of lower status style patterns is also common. On the 
other hand, especially for groups with an ascribed status position 
in a society where achievement criteria are strongly institutional- 
ized, it is common for the projective distortion of style symbolism to 
operate in the obverse way. In this case the actor tends to compen- 



[ 422 ] Ex'pressive Symbols 

sate for the dubious legitimacy of his ascribed position by empha- 
sizing his superiority of taste to the vulgar multitude who are 
engaged in achievement activities. Since at the top of the scale of 
stratification in an achievement system, there must be a modifica- 
tion of the incidence of achievement values, it is suggestive that 
patronage of the arts, which is a prominent interest of such groups, 
constitutes an important mechanism for legitimatizing the status of 
the elite groups. 

We may now turn to the affectively neutral components of the 
reward system which focus on the attitudes of approval and esteem. 
Attention has been called a number of times to the fact that these 
are more directly relevant to the institutionalization of the larger 
structures of the social system than are the affective attitudes, 
mainly because of the inherent limitations on securing immediate 
gratification from the cathexis of generalized patterns, and of the 
necessity for certain types of discipline in acting in accord with 
those patterns, notably but by no means exclusively perhaps uni- 
versalism and achievement-orientations. We have also called atten- 
tion to the great importance of the development of sensitivity to 
these attitudes in the course of the socialization process. 

The attitude of approval is relevant wherever the contingency 
element operates in social interaction, wherever there is a question 
of conformity with an expectation, where that is, there is a possi- 
bility of failing to conform. Then alter can reward ego for con- 
formity with his expectation by his approval, and punish him 
for non-conformity by his disapproval. The place of the normative 
pattern comes in essentially as the generalization of these expecta- 
tions. Clearly, then, the institutionalization of attitudes of approval- 
disapproval is in certain respects the focus of the institutionalization 
of the reward system generally. It is the sine qua non of social 
stability. 

In this most general sense the relevance of approval rewards 
applies to conformity with the expectations of any role in any social 
system. Anotlier aspect emerges, however, with extension of the 
range within which opportunities for performance and its valuation 
open up. The crucial transition is that between living up to the 
norms defining specific traditionalized expectations of the given 
role in which ego happens to be placed, and having his status itself 



Expressive Symbolism and the Reward System [ 423 ] 

become contingent on his performance. Then the incidence of 
approval rewards is no longer confined to symbolizing that ego is a 
"good" whatever it is, a good boy, a good servant or peasant or 
what not. Approval then becomes the symbolic focus of reward for 
having achieved beyond what was ascribed to an initial status. It is 
here that the peculiar dynamics of the reward system of an achieve- 
ment-oriented social structure open out. 

We may focus the consideration of these problems on the con- 
cept of "success."^ Success is, in a situation where achievement 
goals are paramount, the measure of the degree of attainment of 
the valued goals. These may of course be of the most varying con- 
tent. Our concern here, however, is not with this content, but with 
certain generalized aspects of the organization of such goal-striving 
in social systems. Since, we are assuming, achievement goal-striving 
takes place in the context of social relationships, we must first make 
clear that the valuation of the attainment of the goals is a common 
valuation not peculiar to ego. This is the basis of the relevance of 
alters approval, and indeed only this gives much of the force to 
ego's own self-approval and hence his motivation to achievement, 
in that, namely, his success is measured by himself in terms of an 
internalized common value-pattern. Hence we may say that the 
source of gratification is never the attainment of the goal alone but 
the achievement as measured in terms of a value-standard, which 
gives both ego's and alters approval its relevance as a reward. The 
striving for goal achievement and the striving for approval are thus 
inseparable in an integrated social structure. 

In the pursuit of achievement-goals and of approval there is an 
inherent comparative "better or worse" dimension. Ego can and 
does measure his achievement by intrinsic standards without refer- 
ence to the achievement of an alter, but if many are striving for 
the same goals, it is inevitable that in some sense they should be 
judged as doing better or worse by the same standards, ego that is 
should excel alter or vice versa. Thus approval as a reward has an 
inherent dimension of diflFerential distribution; it cannot be dis- 
tributed equally to all performers in an achievement system without 
vitiating the whole meaning of the system. 

* It will be remembered from Chapter VI that success is a "situationaUy 
generalized goal." 



[ 424 ] Ex'pressive Symbols 

Finally, if a system of approval rewards is to be integrated in a 
social system, this comparative dimension implies that it will be a 
source of strain if to some degree different lines of achievement are 
not reduced to a common denominator. The very fact that actors 
are sensitive to approval and disapproval means that for those in 
different lines of goal-striving it cannot be indifferent whether 
attainment in one line is or is not more highly approved than in 
another. It is inherent in a social system with a developed division 
of labor that there should be a wide variety of concrete goal striving 
activities. These must be ordered into some sort of a system, includ- 
ing an ordering of their precedence in the approval scale. There 
must be higher and lower achievements. 

Actual intrinsic achievement, or lack of it, and the approval or 
disapproval of actors do not, however, stand alone in the symbolic 
complex of which achievement values are the center. In the nature 
of the case other entities of possible symbolic significance are in- 
volved. In the type of case with which we are concerned a system of 
monetary exchange is generally involved, and, as part of it, money 
remuneration in occupational roles. It seems almost inevitable that 
the level of money remuneration should become a symbol in this 
complex. Money has the one particularly striking property of un- 
ambiguous quantitative measurability. Therefore, precisely in the 
hierarchical aspect of an achievement system, comparative level of 
money remuneration very readily becomes a major symbol of suc- 
cess. This symbolic association is further encouraged by the fact 
that money remuneration is a necessary common denominator as be- 
tween different classes of concrete achievement goals. Hence, it can 
at least be said that where there is an at all well integrated system of 
the valuation of different achievements, it is highly important for the 
differentiation of monetary rewards to be integrated with it. In so 
far as money income is treated as a symbol of success, it is clearly 
a source of strain if the relation is reversed, the higher the achieve- 
ment the less the money income. 

There are other "auxiliary" symbols of success than money in- 
come. Clearly in a differentiated achievement system organization 
occupies a prominent place. Hence status in organizations is certain 
to acquire symbolic significance in this context. The connection 
between income and status in organization, which in one aspect is 



Ex'pressive Symbolism, and the Reward System. [ 42-5 ] 

position in the power system, with power as a basis of access to 
symbols of the style of life, is obvious. Other types of "informal" 
power status may also have a comparable significance, though they 
are generally not so highly visible, a factor of great significance for 
symbolization. 

The attitude of approval must have visible signs to which to 
attach itself, since in the nature of the case it is a contingent atti- 
tude. Often actual intrinsic achievement is difficult for alter to 
judge, because of communication difficulties, lack of technical com- 
petence, inaccessibility for observation and such factors. Hence es- 
pecially for purposes of the broader comparisons, it is very easy and 
to some degree essential, for alter's attitudes of approval— and to 
some degree ego's own— to be made contingent on ego's acquisition 
of symbols of achievement as well as achievement itself. This fact 
automatically makes the acquisition of such symbols in some sense 
a meaningful goal for ego. 

In an institutionally integrated system of action achievement, 
approval of achievement, and the principal symbols of achievement 
should be integrated together in an inseparable complex. Above all 
acquisition of the symbols of achievement should be possible only 
by the appropriate achievement. But short of this level of integra- 
tion there is the possibility of a rift between them. It becomes 
realistically possible to acquire money without a requisite level of 
valued achievement, and also to acquire status in organizations, etc. 
We do not need to go into the various features of the social system 
which make the occurrence of such opportunities possible and to 
some degree inevitable. 

At this point there is a particularly important opening for the 
operation of projective distortions. The actor with compulsive moti- 
vations, above all when they center on the adequacy problem as it 
was called in Chapter VII, may have a compulsive need for ap- 
proval, including self-approval. This need is not likely to be satisfied 
by direct achievement alone. The tendency is to distort the defini- 
tion of the situation by making doubly sure that one is approved. 
The opportunity to accumulate more than a due measure of the 
symbols of achievement presents a very ready outlet for this com- 
pulsive motivation. We may surmise that in such an achieve- 
ment system, the persons who are unduly concerned with money 



[ 426 ] Expressive Symbols 

rewards^ and with their power position have a prominent com- 
ponent of this type of compulsive motivation. 

This would above all be true of those with active motivation to 
compulsive confonnity witli the success goal. Where there is a 
trend to passivity, it takes the form of a striving for undue "security" 
in the common-sense meaning of the term. This for instance can 
be found in trying to be over-certain of the stability of even a modest 
income, as well as in the perfectionism of detail which sacrifices 
the central achievement goals for assurance of immunity from active 
disapproval. 

Thus the attitude of approval and its negative constitute another 
primary focus of the expressive-symbolic reward system. It is the 
center of a symbolic complex which includes money income and 
power position and which has to be integrated with the symbolism 
of the style of life. The whole complex must be organized and 
ordered as a central part of the integration of the social system. In 
this ordering the dimension of differential reward relative to the 
value system occupies a central place. 

Finally, the attitude of esteem diflFers from that of approval by 
its diffuseness. For this reason it is the paramount focus of the scale 
of prestige in a society which is the core of the system of stratifica- 
tion. Attitudes of approval can be segregated by context. It is possible 
to approve one act of ego and disapprove another, to consider him 
to be a highly competent technician and a bad administrator at the 
same time. But in the social system there is a functional problem 
comparable to that of reducing particular achievements to a com- 
mon denominator which was just mentioned. To some degree, as 
measured by the dominant value system, there must be an over-all 
judgment of a human being; it is this which we mean by the esteem 
in which he is held. Far less than in any other of the cases of rela- 
tional rewards can the bases of the attitude of esteem be left unin- 
stitutionalized in a society. This fact is the main functional basis 
for the existence of social stratification as an essential feature of 
every social system. 

The diffuse breadth of the factors which must be integrated in 

^It is, we may surmise, essentially this phenomenon to which Elton Mayo 
referred when he spoke of "the acquisitiveness of a sick society." Cf. Human 
PToblems of an Industrial Civili2uition. 



Ex'pressive Symholism and the Reward System [ 427 ] 

a judgment of esteem is such that stratification is inevitably an 
important focus of strain in a social system. It will suffice to men- 
tion, for our own society, the problem of integrating the individ- 
ualistic achievement aspects of the occupational system, and the 
solidarity of the kinship system, as that problem was discussed in 
Chapter V. It is this sort of functional problem which makes the 
phenomena of social class such an important field for sociological 
study. 

As in the case of approval rewards, those of esteem are obvi- 
ously linked with a symbolic complex which extends well beyond 
the central value-foci which provide the direct standards of esteem. 
This is particularly true of style symbolism because of its visibility 
and its relative controllability by the individual or the small sub- 
collectivity. 

It would be possible to go much farther into detail in the theory 
of social stratification, especially in analyzing the ramifications of 
the complex of esteem-symbolism, and in analyzing the types of 
malintegration to be found in systems of stratification, the factors 
involved in them and the adaptive structures which are for under- 
standable reasons particularly prominent in this area. These prob- 
lems, important as they are, will have to be left to the more special- 
ized theory of stratification, which is one principal branch of the 
theory of social systems. 

More generally, the present chapter has been a sketch. As it was 
noted at its beginning, the theory of expressive symbolism is one of 
the least satisfactorily developed parts of the theory of action gener- 
ally, and of social systems in particular. The reader will note, how- 
ever, that we have been able to contribute more to the problems of 
the relations of certain known types of expressive symbolism to the 
social system, than to the systematization of the field on the cul- 
tural level itself. Indeed there is an urgent need for more work, 
which is only very partially the province of the sociologist, on the 
laws and types of symbolic patterning and association. The contrast 
with the cognitive field is striking. We have a very well-developed 
knowledge of the structure of belief systems as such, but a very 
fragmentary one of the structure of systems of expressive symbols. 
It may be safely predicted that advances in this field will contribute 
very greatly to the advance of the sciences of action. 



X 



SOCIAL STRUCTURE AND DY- 
NAMIC PROCESS: THE CASE OF MODERN MEDICAL 
PRACTICE^ 



WE HAVE followed a long and complicated course in 
working dirough the derivation of the major structural outlines 
of the social system from the action frame of reference, in the analy- 
sis of the central place of patterns of value-orientation in this struc- 
ture, in the analysis of the motivational mechanisms of social 
process, and that of the involvement of cultural patterns other than 
those of value-orientation in the social system. It will perhaps help 
the reader to appreciate the empirical relevance of the abstract 
analysis we have developed if, in addition to the illustrative material 
which has been introduced bearing on many particular points, we 
attempt to bring together many if not most of the threads of the 
foregoing discussion in a more extensive analysis of some strategic 
features of an important sub-system of modem Western society. 

For this purpose we have chosen modem medical practice. This 
field has been a subject of long-standing interest^ on the author's 

^ For general comparison with this chapter the reader may be referred to 
L. J. Henderson, "Physician and Patient as a Social System," New England 
Journal of Medicine, Vol. 212, May 2, 1935, 819-23. 

^ The most important phase of this interest was concerned with a field study 
of medical practice which was carried out mainly in the Boston area several years 
ago. A variety of circvmistances prevented the completion of that study and its 
publication in the intended form. Hence the opportunity has been taken for the 
formulation of some of the most important of the results in the context of their 
relevance to the present work. Of course the earlier interpretations have been 
considerably modified by subsequent theoretical development and by other ex- 

428 



The Functional Setting [ 429 ] 

part as a result of which he has a greater command of the empirical 
material in this field than in most others. But it also provides an 
excellent opportunity to illustrate some of the interrelations of the 
principal elements of the social system which have been reviewed 
in more abstract terms. A highly distinctive cultural tradition, cer- 
tain parts of modem science, provides a central focus for the activi- 
ties of the medical profession. We have already seen that there are 
important problems of the modes of institutionalization of such a 
cultural tradition. This institutionalization fits into the functional 
context of a ubiquitous practical problem in all societies, that of 
health, and is specially organized relative to distinctive role pat- 
terns and value-orientations in our own society. Finally, as has 
already been brought out briefly, the bearing of the therapeutic 
process on the problems of deviance and social control is such that 
adequate analysis of the motivational processes involved has impli- 
cations reaching far beyond the particular field to throw a great 
deal of light on the general motivational balance of the social 



system. 



§ THE FUNCTIONAL SETTING OF MEDICAL 
PRACTICE AND THE CULTURAL TRADITION 



IN THE most general terms medical practice may be said 
to be oriented to coping with disturbances to the "health" of the 
individual, with "illness" or "sickness." Traditionally the principal 
emphasis has been on "treatment" or "therapy," that is, on dealing 
with cases which have already developed a pathological state, and 
attempting to restore them to health or normality. Recently there 
has been increasing emphasis on "preventive medicine," that is, 
controlling the conditions which produce illness. For our purposes, 

perience, notably training in psychoanalysis. It is, however, of considerable in- 
terest that it was in connection with the earlier study of medical practice that 
the beginnings of the pattern variable scheme were first worked out. 

There has been fragmentary previous publication of results in three places, 
the papers "The Professions and Social Structure" and "Propaganda and Social 
Control," Essays, Chapters VIII and XIII, and "Education and the Professions," 
Ethics, Vol. 47, 365-369. 

The original study was assisted financially by a grant from the Harvard 
Committee on Research in the Social Sciences. This assistance is hereby gratefully 
acknowledged. 



[ 430 ] '^^^ Case of Modern Medical Practice 

however, the therapeutic functional context will present sufficient 

problems. 

A little reflection will show immediately that the problem of 
health is intimately involved in the functional prerequisites of the 
social system as defined above. Certainly by almost any definition 
health is included in the functional needs of the individual member 
of the societ) so that from the point of view of functioning of the 
social system, too low a general level of health, too high an inci- 
dence of illness, is dysfunctional. This is in the first instance because 
illness incapacitates for the effective performance of social roles. It 
could of course be that this incidence was completely uncontrollable 
by social action, an independently given condition of social life. 
But in so far as it is controllable, through rational action or other- 
wise, it is clear that there is a functional interest of the society in its 
control, broadly in the minimization of illness. As one special aspect 
of this, attention may be called to premature death. From a variety 
of points of view, the birth and rearing of a child constitute a "cost" 
to the society, through pregnancy, child care, socialization, formal 
training and many other channels. Premature death, before the 
individual has had the opportunity to play out his full quota of 
social roles, means that only a partial "return" for this cost has been 
received. 

All this would be true were illness purely a "natural phenome- 
non" in the sense that, like the vagaries of the weather, it was not, 
to our knowledge, reciprocally involved in the motivated interac- 
tions of human beings. In this case illness would be something 
which merely "happened to" people, which involved consequences 
which had to be dealt with and conditions which might or might 
not be controllable but was in no way an expression of motivated 
behavior. 

This is in fact the case for a very important part of illness, but 
it has become increasingly clear, by no means for all. In a variety 
of ways motivational factors accessible to analysis in action terms 
are involved in the etiology of many illnesses, and conversely, 
though without exact correspondence, many conditions are open 
to therapeutic influence through motivational channels. To take the 
simplest kind of case, diff'erential exposure, to injuries or to infec- 
tion, is certainly motivated, and the role of unconscious wishes to 



The Functional Setting [431] 

be injured or to fall ill in such cases has been clearly demonstrated. 
Then there is the whole range of "psycho-somatic" illness about 
which knowledge has been rapidly accumulating in recent years. 
Finally, there is the field of "mental disease," the symptoms of 
which occur mainly on the behavioral level. Of course somatic 
states which are not motivationally determined may play a larger 
or smaller part in any or all of them, in some like syphilitic paresis 
they may be overwhelmingly predominant, but over the field as a 
whole there can be no doubt of the relevance of illness to the func- 
tional needs of the social system, in the further sense of its involve- 
ment in the motivated processes of interaction. At one time most 
medical opinion inclined to the "reduction" of all illness to a physio- 
logical and biological level in both the sense that etiology was always 
to be found on that level, and that only through such channels was 
effective therapy possible. This is certainly not the predominant med- 
ical view today. If it ever becomes possible to remove the hyphen 
from the term "psycho-somatic" and subsume all of "medical science" 
under a single conceptual scheme, it can be regarded as certain that 
it will not be the conceptual scheme of the biological science of the 
late nineteenth and early twentieth centuries. It is also certain that 
this conceptual scheme will prove applicable to a great deal of the 
range of social action in areas which extend well beyond what has 
conventionally been defined as the sphere of medical interests. 

The fact that the relevance of illness is not confined to the non- 
motivated purely situational aspect of social action greatly increases 
its significance for the social system. It becomes not merely an 
"external" danger to be "warded off" but an integral part of the 
social equilibrium itself. Illness may be treated as one mode of re- 
sponse to social pressures, among other things, as one way of evad- 
ing social responsibilities. But it may also, as will appear, have some 
possible positive functional significance. 

Summing up, we may say that illness is a state of disturbance 
in the "normal" functioning of the total human individual, includ- 
ing both the state of the organism as a biological system and of his 
personal and social adjustments. It is thus partly biologically and 
partly socially defined. Participation in the social system is always 
potentially relevant to the state of illness, to its etiology and to the 
conditions of successful therapy, as well as to other things. 



[ 432- ] The Case of Modern Medical Practice 

J Medical practice as above defined is a "mechanism" in the social 
system for coping with the illnesses of its members. It involves a 
set of institutionalized roles which will be analyzed later. But this 
^j also involves a specialized relation to certain aspects of the general 
cultural tradition of modern society. Modern medical practice is 
organized about the application of scientific knowledge to the 
problems of illness and health, to the control of "disease." Science 
is of course a very special type of cultural phenomenon and a really 
highly developed scientific level in any field is rare among known 
cultures, with the modem West in a completely unique position. It 
may also be noted that scientific advance beyond the level to which 
the Greeks brought it is, in the medical field, a recent phenomenon, 
as a broad cultural stream not much more than a century old. 

We have dealt at some length in Chapter VIII with science as 
a general feature of the cultural tradition, and with some of the 
conditions of its application to practical affairs. This need not be 
repeated here. We need only note a few points particularly relevant 
to the medical field. First, it should be quite clear that the treat- 
ment of illness as a problem for applied science must be considered 
problematical and not taken for granted as "common sense." The 
comparative evidence is overwhelming that illness, even a very 
large part of what to us is obviously somatic illness, has been inter- 
preted in supernatural terms, and magical treatment has been con- 
sidered, to be the appropriate method of coping with it. In non- 
literate societies there is an element of empirical lore which may be 
regarded as proto-scientific, with respect to the treatment of frac- 
tures for instance. But the prominence of magic in this field is 
overwhelmingly great. 

This, however, is by no means confined to non-literate cultures. 
The examples of traditional China and our own Middle Ages will 
suffice. Where other features of the cultural tradition are not favor- 
able to the traditionalized stereotyping which we think of as charac- 
teristic of magic in the full sense, we find a great deal, and some- 
times predominance, of health "superstition in the sense of pseudo 
rational or pseudo scientific beliefs and practices. 

In the light of these considerations it is not surprising that in 
a society in which scientific medicine has come to be highly insti- 
tutionalized, popular orientations toward the health problem are by 



The Social Structure [ 433 I 

no means confined to the scientific level. There is much popular ^ 
health superstition, as evidenced by such things as the "patent 
medicines," for example the widely advertised "Dr. Pierce's Golden 
Medical Discovery," and many traditional "home remedies." Fur- 
thermore in the health field there is a considerable fringe of what 
are sometimes called "cults." Some religious denominations, of 
which Christian Science is perhaps the most conspicuous example, 
include a religious approach to health as an integral part of their 
general doctrine. Then there is a variety of groups which offer 
health treatments outside the medical profession and the profes- 
sions auxiliary to it like dentistry and nursing. These are apt to 
include complex and bewildering mixtures of scientifically veri- 
fiable elements and various grades and varieties of pseudo-science.^ 

Finally the institutionalization of science is, as the analysis of 
Chapter VIII would lead us to expect, far from complete within t 
the profession itself. There are many kinds of evidence of this, but 
for present purposes it is sufficient to cite the strong, often bitter 
resistance from within the profession itself to the acceptance of 
what have turned out to be critically important scientific advances 
in their own field. One of the classic cases is the opposition of the 
French Academy of Medicine to Pasteur, and for some time the 
complete failure to appreciate the importance of his discoveries. A 
closely related one is the opposition of the majority of the surgeons 
of the day to Lister's introduction of surgical asepsis. The concep- 
tion of "laudable pus" is an excellent example of a medical "super- 
stition." 

It goes without saying that there is also an important involve- 
ment of expressive symbolism in medical practice. Rather, however, 
than attempting to review it at this point it will be better to call 
attention to certain aspects of it as we go along. 

§ THE SOCIAL STRUCTURE 

THE immediately relevant social structures consist in the 
patterning of the role of the medical practitioner himself and, 

^ An excellent and very detailed analysis of one of these border-line groups is 
given in the study by Walter I. Wardwell, Social Strain and Social Adjustment 
in the Marginal Role of the ChiropractoT, unpubhshed Ph.D. dissertation, Har- 
vard University, i95i. 



[ 434 ] ^^^ C^^ ^f Modern Medical Practice 

though to common sense it may seem superfluous to analyze it, that 
of the "sick person" himself. There is also a range of important 
impingements of both roles on other aspects of the total structure 
of the social system which will have to be mentioned at the appro- 
priate points. 

The role of the medical practitioner belongs to the general class 
of "professional" roles, a sub-class of the larger group of occupa- 
tional roles. Caring for the sick is thus not an incidental activity of 
other roles— though for example mothers do a good deal of it— but 
has become functionally specialized as a full-time "job." This, of 
course, is by no means true of all societies. As an occupational role 
it is institutionalized about the technical content of the function 
which is given a high degree of primacy relative to other status- 
determinants. It is thus inevitable both that incumbency of the role 
should be achieved and that performance criteria by standards of 
technical competence should be prominent. Selection for it and the 
context of its performance are to a high degree segregated from 
other bases of social status and solidarities. In common with the 
predominant patterns of occupational roles generally in our society 
it is therefore in addition to its incorporation of achievement values, 
universalistic, functionally specific, and affectively neutral. Unlike 
the role of the businessman, however, it is collectivity-oriented not 
self-oriented. 

The importance of this patterning is, in one context, strongly 
emphasized by its relation to the cultural tradition. One basis for 
the division of labor is the specialization of technical competence. 
The role of physician is far along the continuum of increasingly 
high levels of technical competence required for performance. Be- 
cause of the complexity and subtlety of the knowledge and skill 
required and the consequent length and intensity of training, it is 
difficult to see how the functions could, under modem conditions, 
be ascribed to people occupying a prior status as one of their activi- 
ties in that status, following the pattern by which, to a degree, 
responsibility for the health of her children is ascribed to the mother- 
status. There is an intrinsic connection between achieved statuses 
and the requirements of high technical competence, as well as 
universalism and competence. In addition, of course, there is pres- 



The Social Structure [ 435 ] 

sure in the society to assimilate the medical role to others of similar 
character in the total occupational system. 

High technical competence also implies specificity of function. 
Such intensive devotion to expertness in matters of health and 
disease precludes comparable expertness in other fields. The physi- 
cian is not, by virtue of his modem role, a generalized "wise man" 
or sage— though there is considerable folklore to that effect— but a 
specialist whose superiority to his fellows is confined to the specific 
sphere of his technical training and experience. For example one 
does not expect the physician as such to have better judgment about 
foreign policy or tax legislation than any other comparably intelli- 
gent and well-educated citizen. There are of course elaborate sub- 
divisions of specialization within the profession. 

Affective neutrality is also involved in the physician's role as an ' 
applied scientist. The physician is expected to treat an objective 
problem in objective, scientifically justifiable terms. For example 
whether he likes or dislikes the particular patient as a person is 
supposed to be irrelevant, as indeed it is to most purely objective 
problems of how to handle a particular disease. 

With regard to the pattern variable, self vs. collectivity-orien- 
tation, the physician's role clearly belongs to what, in our occu- 
pational system, is the "minority" group, strongly insisting on 
collectivity-orientation. The "ideology" of the profession lays great 
emphasis on the obligation of the physician to put the "welfare of 
the patient" above his personal interests, and regards "commercial- 
ism" as the most serious and insidious evil with which it has to 
contend. The line, therefore, is drawn primarily vis-a-vis "business." 
The "profit motive" is supposed to be drastically excluded from the 
medical world. This attitude is, of course, shared with the other 
professions, but it is perhaps more pronounced in the medical case 
than in any single one except perhaps the clergy. 

In terms of the relation of the physician's occupational role to 
the total instrumental complex there is an important distinction 
between two types of physicians. One of the "private practitioner," 
the other the one who works within the context of organization. 
The important thing about the former is that he must not only care 
for sick people in a technical sense, but must take responsibility for 



[ 43^ ] T^^ Cose of Modern Medical Practice 

settlement of the terms of exchange with them because of his direct 
dependence on them for payment for his services, and must to a 
high degree also provide his own facilities for carrying on his func- 
tion. It is a crucially important fact that expertness in caring for 
the sick does not imply any special competence one way or another 
in the settlement of terms of exchange. It may or may not be a 
good social policy to have the costs of medical care, the means of 
payment for it and so on settled by the members of the medical 
profession, as individuals or through organizations, but such a 
policy cannot be justified on the ground that their special training 
gives them as physicians a technical competence in these matters 
which others do not have. 
) An increasing proportion of medical practice is now taking 

^ place in the context of organization. To a large extent this is neces- 
sitated by the technological development of medicine itself, above 
all the need for technical facilities beyond the reach of the indi- 
vidual practitioner, and the fact that treating the same case often 
involves the complex cooperation of several different kinds of physi- 
cians as well as of auxiliary personnel. This greatly alters the 
relation of the physician to the rest of the instrumental complex. 
He tends to be relieved of much responsibility and hence neces- 
sarily of freedom, in relation to his patients other than in his tech- 
nical role. Even if a hospital executive is a physician himself he is 
not in the usual sense engaged in the "practice of medicine" in 
performing his functions any more than the president of the Miners' 
Union is engaged in mining coal. 

As was noted, for common sense there may be some question of 
whether "being sick" constitutes a social role at all— isn't it simply 
a state of fact, a "condition"? Things are not quite so simple as this. 
The test is the existence of a set of institutionalized expectations 
and the corresponding sentiments and sanctions. 

^ There seem to be four aspects of the institutionalized expecta- 
tion system relative to the sick role. First, is the exemption from 
normal social role responsibilties, which of course is relative to the 
nature and severity of the illness. This exemption requires legitima- 
tion by and to the various alters involved and the physician often 
serves as a court of appeal as well as a direct legitimatizing agent. It 
is noteworthy that like all institutionalized patterns the legitimation 



; I 



The Social Structure t 437 ] 

of being sick enough to avoid obligations can not only be a right of 
the sick person but an obligation upon him. People are often resist- 
ant to admitting they are sick and it is not uncommon for others to 
tell them that they ought to stay in bed. The word generally has a 
moral connotation. It goes almost without saying that this legitima- 
tion has the social function of protection against "malingering." 

The second closely related aspect is the institutionalized defini- 
tion that the sick person cannot be expected by "pulling himself 
together" to get well by an act of decision or will. In this sense also 
he is exempted from responsibility— he is in a condition that must 
'^be taken care of." His "condition" must be changed, not merely his 
"attitude." Of course the process of recovery may be spontaneous but 
while the illness lasts he can't "help it." This element in the defini- 
tion of the state of illness is obviously crucial as a bridge to the 
acceptance of "help." 

The third element is the definition of the state of being ill as j 
itself undesirable with its obligation to want to "get well." The first 
two elements of legitimation of the sick role thus are conditional in 
a highly important sense. It is a relative legitimation so long as he is 
in this unfortunate state which both he and alter hope he can get out 
of as expeditiously as possible. 

Finally, the fourth closely related element is the obligation— in \^ 
proportion to the severity of the condition, of course— to seek techni- 
cally competent help, namely, in the most usual case, that of a 
physician and to cooperate with him in the process of trying to get 
well. It is here, of course, that the role of the sick person as patient / 
becomes articulated with that of the physician in a complementary 
role structure. 

It is evident from the above that the role of motivational factors , 
in illness immensely broadens the scope and increases the impor- '^ 
tance of the institutionalized role aspect of being sick. For then the 
problem of social control becomes much more than one of ascer- 
taining facts and drawing lines. The privileges and exemptions of 
the sick role may become objects of a "secondary gain" which the 
patient is positively motivated, usually unconsciously, to secure or to / 
retain. The problem, therefore, of the balance of motivations to re- 
cover, becomes of first importance. In general motivational balances 
of great functional significance to the social system are institutionally 



[ 43^ ] ^^^ Case of Modern Medical Practice 

controlled, and it should, therefore, not be surprising that this is no 
exception. 

A few further points may be made about the specific patterning 
of the sick role and its relation to social structure. It is, in the first 
place, a "contingent" role into which anyone, regardless of his status 
in other respects, may come. It is, furthermore, in the type case 
temporary. One may say that it is in a certain sense a "negatively 
achieved" role, through failure to "keep well," though, of course, 
positive motivations also operate, which by that very token must be 
motivations to deviance. 

It is inherently universalistic, in that generalized objective 
criteria determine whether one is or is not sick, how sick, and with 
what kind of sickness; its focus is thus classificatory not relational. 
It is also functionally specific, confined to the sphere of health, and 
particular "complaints" and disabilities within that sphere. It is 
furthermore affectively neutral in orientation in that the expected 
behavior, "trying to get well," is focused on an objective problem 
not on the cathectic significance of persons,'* or orientations to an 
emotionally disturbing problem, though this may be instrumentally 
and otherwise involved. 

The orientation of the sick role vis-a-vis the physician is also de- 
fined as collectively-oriented. It is true that the patient has a very 
obvious self-interest in getting well in most cases, though this point 
may not always be so simple. But once he has called in a physician 
the attitude is clearly marked, that he has assumed the obligation to 
cooperate with that physician in what is regarded as a common task. 
\ The obverse of the physician's obligation to be guided by the welfare 
of the patient is the latter's obligation to "do his part" to the best 
of his ability. This point is clearly brought out, for example, in the 
attitudes of the profession toward what is called "shopping around." 
By that is meant the practice of a patient "checking" the advice of 
one physician against that of another without telling physician A 
that he intends to consult physician B, or if he comes back to A thaf 
he has done so or who B is. The medical view is that if the patient is 

* This it will appear later is particularly important to the therapeutic process. 
It is not to be interpreted either that the cathectic significance of persons has no 
part in the etiology of illness or that cathexis of the physician as an object does 
not occur — but it is controlled. 



The Situation of Medical Practice [ 439 1 

not satisfied with the advice his physician gives him he may properly 
do one of two things, first he may request a consultation, even nam- 
ing the physician he wishes called in, but in that case it is physician 
A not the patient who must call B in, the patient may not see B in- 
dependently, and above all not without A's knowledge. The other 
proper recourse is to terminate the relation with A and become "B's 
patient." The notable fact here is that a pattern of behavior on the 
part not only of the physician, but also of the patient, is expected 
which is in sharp contrast to perfectly legitimate behavior in a com- 
mercial relationship. If he is buying a car there is no objection to the 
customer going to a number of dealers before making up his mind, 
and there is no obligation for him to inform any one dealer what 
others he is consulting, to say nothing of approaching the Chevrolet 
dealer only through the Ford dealer. 

The doctor-patient relationship is thus focused on these pattern 
elements. The patient has a need for technical services because he 
doesn't— nor do his lay associates, family members, etc.— "know" 
what is the matter or what to do about it, nor does he control the 
necessary facilities. The physician is a technical expert who by 
special training and experience, and by an institutionally validated 
status, is qualified to "help" the patient in a situation institutionally 
defined as legitimate in a relative sense but as needing help. The 
intricacy of the social forces operating on this superficially simple 
sub-system of social relations will be brought out in the following 
analysis. 

§ THE SITUATION OF MEDICAL PRACTICE 

A. The Situation of the Patient 

THE first step is to go more in detail into the analysis of 
relevant aspects of the situation in which the doctor and the patient 
find themselves. This will provide the setting in which the impor- 
tance of the broad patterning of both physician's and patient's role 
can be interpreted, and will enable us to identify a series of 
mechanisms which, in addition to the physician's deliberate appli- 
cation of his technical knowledge, operate to facilitate his manifest 
functions in the control of disease, and to promote other, latent func- 
tions which are important to the social system. 



[ 44° ] rhe Case of Modern Medical Practice 

First, it must be remembered that there is an enormous range of 
different types of illness, and of degrees of severity. Hence a certain 
abstraction is inevitable in any such general account as the present 
one. There is also a range of different types of physician. It will, 
therefore, be necessary to concentrate on what can be considered 
-certain strategic and typical features of the situation of both. 

It will be convenient first to take up the salient features of the 
situation of the patient and his "lay" associates, particularly mem- 
y bers of his family. These may be classified under the three headings 
'^ of helplessness and need of help, technical incompetence, and emo- 
tional involvement. 

By institutional definition of the sick role the sick person is help- 
less and therefore in need of help. If being sick is to be regarded as 
^'deviant" as certainly in important respects it must, it is as we have 
noted distinguished from other deviant roles precisely by the fact 
that the sick person is not regarded as "responsible" for his condition, 
"he can't help it." He may, of course, have carelessly exposed him- 
self to danger of accident, but then once injured he cannot, for 
instance, mend a fractured leg by "will power." The exhortation to 
"try" has importance at many peripheral points in the handling of 
illness, but the core definition is that of a "condition" that either 
lias to "right itself" or to be "acted upon," and usually the patient got 
into that condition through processes which are socially defined as 
"not his fault." 

The urgency of the need of help will vary with the severity of 
the disability, suffering, and risk of death or serious, lengthy or per- 
manent disablement. It will also vary inversely with the prospect, as 
defined in the culture, of spontaneous recovery in terms of certainty 
and duration. But a sufficient proportion of cases is severe in one or 
more of these senses, and unlikely to recover spontaneously, at least 
soon enough, so that the feeling of helplessness and the need of help 
are very real. 

The sick person is, therefore, in a state where he is suffering or 
j disabled or both, and possibly facing risks of worsening, which is 
I socially defined as either "not his fault" or something from which he 
cannot be expected to extricate himself by his own effort, or gen- 
erally both. He is also likely to be anxious about his state and the 
future. This is a very different kind of "need" from that of a person 



The Situation of Medical Practice [ 44 1 ] 

who merely "wants" something that he can be permitted to have if 
he can "swing" it independently, such as a new car, or even if he 
"needs something," such as adequate food, if he can reasonably be 
expected to procure it by his own efforts, as by working for it, and 
not being lazy or shifdess. In a special sense, the sick person is "en- / 
tided" to help. 

By the same institutional definition the sick person is not, of 
course competent to help himself, or what he can do is, except for 
trivial illness, not adequate. But in our culture there is a special defi- 
nition of the kind of help he needs, namely, professional, technically 
competent help. The nature of this help imposes a further disability 
or handicap upon him. He is not only generally not in a position to 
do what needs to be done, but he does not "know" what needs to be 
done or how to do it. It is not merely that he, being bedridden, can- 
not go down to the drug store to get what is needed, but that he 
would, even if well, not be qualified to do what is needed, and to 
judge what needs to be done. There is, that is to say, a "communi- 
cation gap." 

Only a technically trained person has that qualification. And 
one of the most serious disabilities of the layman is that he is not 
qualified to judge technical qualifications, in general or in detail. 
Two physicians may very well give conflicting diagnoses of the same 
case, indeed often do. In general the layman is not qualified to 
choose between them. Nor is he qualified to choose the "best" 
physician among a panel. If he were fully rational he would have to 
rely on professional authority, on the advice of the professionally 
qualified or on institutional validation. 

This disqualification is, of course, not absolute. Laymen do know 
something in the field, and have some objective bases of judgment. 
But the evidence is overwhelming that this knowledge is highly 
limited and that most laymen think they know more, and have 
better bases of judgment than is actually the case. For example the 
great majority of laymen think that their physician is either the best 
or one of the few best in his field in the community. It is manifesdy 
impossible for the majority of such judgments to be objectively cor- 
rect. Another type of evidence is the patterning of choice of phy- 
sician. A very large proportion of people choose their physicians on 
the basis of the recommendations of friends or neighbors who "like 



[ 44^ J ^^^ Case of Modern Medical Practice 

Dr. X so much," without any sort of inquiry beyond that as to 
technical quahfications, even as to the medical school from which 
he holds a degree or the hospital at which he interned.^ There must 
be some mechanisms to bridge this "gap-" There must be some way 
of defining the situation to the patient and his family, as to what is 
"the matter with him" and why, what his prognosis is, what burdens 
will have to be assumed in recovery. There must be some mechanism 
for validating the "authority" of the physician, who only in special 
cases like the military services has any coercive sanctions at his com- 
mand. 

In this connection it should be noted that the burdens the 
physician asks his patients and their families to assume on his advice 
are often very severe. They include suffering— you "have to get 
worse before you can get better" as for instance in the case of a major 
surgical operation. They include risk of death, permanent or lengthy 
disablement, severe financial costs and various others. In terms of 
common sense it can always be said that the patient has the obvious 
interest in getting well and hence should be ready to accept any 
measures which may prove necessary. But there is always the ques- 
tion, implicit or explicit, "How do I know this will do any good?" 
The one thing certain seems to be that the layman's answer to this 
cannot, in the majority of severe and complex cases, i.e., the "strate- 
gic" ones, be based primarily on his own rational understanding of 
the factors involved and a fully rational weighing of them. The 
difference from the physician in this respect is often a matter of de- 
gree, but it is a crucially important difference of degree. 

Finally, third, the situation of illness very generally presents the 
patient and those close to him with complex problems of emotional 
adjustment. It is, that is to say, a situation of strain. Even if there 
is no question of a "physic" factor in his condition, suffering, help- 
lessness, disablement and the risk of death, or sometimes its cer- 
tainty, constitute fundamental disturbances of the expectations by 
which men live. They cannot in general be emotionally "accepted" 
without the accompaniments of strain with which we are familiat 
and hence without difficult adjustments unless the patient happens 

" One physician, a suburban general practitioner, told that in several years 
of practice only one patient had asked him from what medical school he had 
graduated. 



The Situation of Medical Practice [ 443 ] 

to find positive satisfactions in them, in which case there is also a 
social problem. The significance of this emotional factor is magnified 
and complicated in so far as defensive and adjustive mechanisms are 
deeply involved in the pathological condition itself. 

The range of possible complexities in this sphere is very great. 
The problems are, however, structured by the nature of the situation 
in certain relatively definite ways. Perhaps the most definite point 
is that for the "normal" person illness, the more so the greater its 
severity, constitutes a frustration of expectancies of his normal life 
pattern. He is cut off from his normal spheres of activity, and many 
of his normal enjoyments. He is often humiliated by his incapacity 
to function normally. His social relationships are disrupted to a 
greater or a less degree. He may have to bear discomfort or pain 
which is hard to bear, and he may have to face serious alterations of 
his prospects for the future, in the extreme but by no means uncom- 
mon case the termination of his life. 

For the normal person the direction of these alterations is un- 
desirable, they are frustrations. Therefore it is to be expected that 
two types of reaction should be prominent, a kind of emotional 
"shock" at the beginning of illness, and anxiety about the future. In 
both cases there is reason to believe that most normal persons have 
an unrealistic bias in the direction of confidence that "everything 
will be all right," that is they are motivated to underestimate the 
chances of their falling ill, especially seriously ill (the minority of 
hypochondriacs is the obverse), and if they do they tend to over- 
estimate the chances of a quick and complete recovery. Therefore 
even the necessary degree of emotional acceptance of the reality is 
difficult. One very possible reaction is to attempt to deny illness or 
various aspects of it, to refuse to "give in" to it. Another may be 
exaggerted self-pity and whining, a complaining demand for more 
help than is necessary or feasible, especially for incessant personal 
attention. In any case this factor reinforces the others. It makes it 
doubly difficult for the patient to have an objective judgment about 
his situation and what is needed. Whether they pay explicit atten- 
tion to it in any technical sense or not, what physicians do in- 
evitably influences the emotional states of their patients, and often 
this may have a most important influence on the state of their cases. 

In this connection perhaps a few words may be said about the 



[ 444 ] ^^^ Case of Modern Medical Practice 

relation of the medical situation to death. As was noted in Chapter 
VIII death, and particularly premature death, is one of the most im- 
portant situations in all societies, demanding complex emotional ad- 
justments on the part of the dying person, if the probability is 
known to him in advance, and on the part of the survivors. This is 
so important that in no society is there an absence of both cultural 
and social structuring of ideas about death, attitudes toward it, or 
behavior in the presence of imminent death or its recent occurrence. 
^ ] Moreover the "death complex" is never purely instrumental in its 
I patterning. It is a central focusing point for expressive symbolism. 
American culture in general seems to have a strong "optimistic 
bias," one aspect of which is the "playing down" of death, the avoid- 
ance of too much concern with its prospect or its implications, and, 
when it must be faced, "getting it over with" as rapidly as possible. 
For example, we have relatively slight and probably decreasing 
emphasis on mourning. Our tendency is to "get on with living" as 
nearly in the usual pattern as possible. In the light of psychological 
knowledge and the evidence from comparative cultures it seems 
highly likely that this attitude is maintained only by virtue of strong 
disciplines which repress preoccupation with and anxiety about 
death. It may also mean that "grief reactions" are more frequently 
repressed than in other societies. 

In a society normally at peace, death in most cases is preceded 
by illness, which links it very closely with the sick role. This is hence 
a point at which more or less free-floating anxieties about death have 
an opportunity to focus. Moreover, the physician is brought very 
closely into contact with death. He is often present at a death bed, 
and he is the first one to whom people look for structuring the situ- 
ation in relation to their anxieties about the possibility of death; if 
the clergyman comes in it is usually later than the physician. It is 
striking that the medical is one of the few occupational groups which 
in our society have regular, expected contact with death in the 
course of their occupational roles, the clergyman, the undertaker, 
and in certain ways the police, being the other principal ones. The 
military in our society are a special, though sociologically extremely 
interesting case, because for us war is an exceptional "crisis" situ- 
ation, not part of the normal life of the society. 

It is to be presumed that this association with death is a very 



The Situation of Medical Practice [ 445 ] 

important factor in the emotional toning of the role of the physician. 
If he is not in general tending in our society to take the place 
formerly occupied by the clergy, an assertion often made, but subject 
to considerable qualifications, he at least has very important associa- 
tions with the realm of the sacred. In this connection it is interesting 
to note that the dissection of a cadaver is included in the very first 
stage of formal medical training, and that it tends to be made both 
something of a solemn ritual, especially the first day, on the part of 
the medical school authorities, and medical students often have quite 
violent emotional reactions to the experience. It may hence be con- 
cluded that dissection is not only an instrumental means to the 
learning of anatomy, but is a symbolic act, highly charged w^ith 
affective significance. It is in a sense the initiatory rite of the phy- 
sician-to-be into his intimate association with death and the dead. 

Indeed, this is confirmed by the fact that historically the medi- 
cal profession had to wage a long and sometimes bitter struggle to 
secure the right to dissect cadavers as a regular part of medical train- 
ing—at one time they secretly raided cemeteries for the purpose.' 
Even today some religious bodies strongly oppose autopsies except 
when they are required by the law of the state where there is sus- 
picion of foul play. 

To come back to the main theme. There are two particularly im- 
portant broad consequences of the features of the situation of the 
sick person for the problem of the institutional structuring of medi- 
cal practice. One is that the combination of helplessness, lack of 
technical competence, and emotional disturbance make him a 
peculiarly vulnerable object for exploitation. It may be said that the 
exploitation of the helpless sick is "unthinkable." That happens to 
be a very strong sentiment in our society, but for the sociologist the 
existence of this sentiment or that of other mechanisms for the pre- 
vention of exploitation must not be taken for granted. There is in 
fact a very real problem of how, in such a situation, the very possible 
exploitation is at least minimized.^ 

^ Cf . Shryock, Richard Harrison, The Develo'pment of Modem Medicine. 

"^ It is interesting to note that even leftist propaganda against the evils of 
our capitalistic society, in which exploitation is a major keynote, tends to spare 
the physician. The American Medical Association tends to be attacked, but in 
general not the ideal-typical physician. This is significant of the general public 
reputation for collectivity-orientation of the medical profession. 



[ 44^ J ^^^ Case of Modern Medical Practice 

The other general point is the related one that the situation of 
A the patient is such as to make a high level of rationality of judgment 
f ' peculiarly difficult. He is therefore open to, and peculiarly liable to, 
a whole series of irr- and non-rational beliefs and practices. The 
world over the rational approach to health through applied science 
is, as we have noted, the exception rather than the rule, and in our 
society there is, even today, a very large volume of "superstition" and 
other non- or irrational beliefs and practices in the health field. This 
is not to say that the medical profession either has a monopoly of 
rational knowledge and techniques, or is free of the other type of 
elements, but the volume of such phenomena outside the framework 
of regular medical practice is a rough measure of this factor. This set 
of facts then makes problematical the degree to which the treat- 
ment of health problems by applied science has in fact come to be 
possible. It can by no means be taken for granted as the course which 
"reasonable men," i.e., the normal citizen of our society will "natu- 
rally" adopt. 

The above discussion has been concerned primarily with the sick 
person himself. But in some cases, e.g., when he is an infant or is in 
a coma, the patient himself has nothing whatever to say about what 
is done to him. But short of this, the patient tends to be buttressed 
by family members and sometimes friends who are not sick. Does 
this not vitiate the whole argument of the above discussion? Defi- 
nitely not. It may mitigate the severity of the impact of some of the 
features of the patient's situation, in fact, it often does. But in the 
first place laymen, sick or well, are no more technically competent 
in medical matters in one case than the other. The need of help is 
also just as strong because the solidarity of the family imposes a 
very strong pressure on the healthy members to see that the sick one 
gets the best possible care. It is, indeed, very common if not usual 
for the pressure of family members to tip the balance in the ad- 
mission of being sick enough to go to bed or call a doctor, when the 
patient himself would tend to stand out longer. Furthermore the 
emotional relationships within the family are of such a character 
that the illness of one of its members creates somewhat different 
emotional problems from the patient's own to be sure, but neverthe- 
less often very severe ones, and sometimes more severe, or more 
difficult for the physician to cope with. It is not, for instance, for 



The Situation of Medical Practice [ 447 ] 

nothing that pediatricians habitually mean the mother, not the sick 
child, when they say "my patient." To anyone schooled in modern 
psychology the emotional significance of a child's illness for the 
mother in our society scarcely needs further comment. Hence we 
may conclude that the basic problems of the role of the patient him- 
self are shared by the others in his personal circle with whom the 
physician comes into contact in his practice. Sometimes the role of 
these others is to facilitate the work of the physician very signifi- 
cantly. But it would be rash to assert that this was true very much 
more often than the reverse. In any case it is quite clear that the role 
of family members does not invalidate the significance of the situ- 
ation of the patient for the character of medical practice, as outlined 
above. 

B. The Situation of the Physician 

THE role of the physician centers on his responsibility for 
the welfare of the patient in the sense of facilitating his recovery 
from illness to the best of the physician's ability. In meeting this iq- 
sponsibility he is expected to acquire and use high technical com- 
petence in "medical science" and the techniques based upon it. The 
first question to ask about his situation, therefore, concerns the rela- 
tion of these technical tools to the tasks he is called upon to perform 
and the responsibilities he is expected to live up to. 

In a certain proportion of cases the doctor has what may be called 
a perfectly straightforward technological job. His knowledge and 
skill give him quite adequate tools for accomplishment of his ends, 
it is only necessary to exercise sufficient patience, and to work 
steadily and competently at the task. This would, it is true, leave the 
"penumbra" of emotional reactions of patients and their families for 
him to deal with, and his own emotional reactions to such things as 
severe suffering and imminence of death might well pose certain 
problems of emotional adjustment to him. But vdth these qualifica- 
tions it would be much like any other high level technical job. 

But in common with some and not other technical jobs there is 
in this case a shading off into cases with respect to which knowledge, 
skill and resources are not adequate, with hard, competent work, to 
solve the problem. There are two main aspects to this inadequacy. 
On the one hand there are cases, a good many of them, where the 



[ 44^ ] The Case of Modern Medical Practice 

upshot of a competent diagnosis is to expose a condition which is 
known, in the given state of medical knowledge and technique, to 
be essentially uncontrollable. This is true both in the individual 
case and generally. Though there is a fundamental relationship be- 
tween knowledge and control, this is a general and not a point-for- 
point relationship. Optimistic biases are very general and funda- 
mental in human social orientations, perhaps particularly in our 
society and certainly in relation to health. It is, therefore, very com- 
mon that the initial effect of a given advance in knowledge is to 
demonstrate the impossibility of controlling things which were 
thought to be readily controllable, to expose unfavorable factors in 
the situation which were not previously appreciated, and to show the 
fruitlessness of control measures in which people had previously 
had faith. 

This has been the case with many advances of medical science. 
For example, about in the 1870's many people, both in the medical 
profession and outside it, had a strong faith in the efficacy of various 
drugs in the treatment of pneumonia. Sir William Osier, one of the 
most eminent physicians of his day, undertook against strong opposi- 
tion in the profession to show that this faith was not well founded. 
He claimed, and his claim has been scientifically validated, that 
there was not a single case of the use of drugs in this connection 
which was— apart from psychological considerations, we would now 
add— not either useless or positively harmful. It must of course be 
remembered that serum treatment, sulfa drugs and penicillin had 
not been discovered at that time. Hence the net effect of Osier's 
"campaign" was to reduce what had been thought to be the area of 
rational control of disease, yet it represented definite scientific 
advance.® 

The same can be true in the individual case. The patient and his 
family may know only that he has abdominal discomfort, has been 
losing weight and lacks energy. Diagnostic procedure reveals an 
advanced, inoperable cancer of the stomach with a hopeless prog- 
nosis. "More" is definitely known than before, but hope has been 
destroyed. The remarkable advances of medicine in the past two 
generations have significandy narrowed the range of cases of this 
sort. But they are very far from having eliminated them, and it 

8 Cf. Harvey Gushing, The Life of Sir William Osier. 



The Situation of Medical Practice [ 449 ] 

seems quite definite that there is no early prospect of their eUmina- 
tion. 

These inherent frustrations of the technical expert acquire 
special significance because of the magnitude and character of the 
interests at stake. The patient and his family have the deepest emo- 
tional involvements in what the physician can and cannot do, and 
in the way his diagnosis and prognosis will define the situation for 
them. He himself, carrying as he does responsibility for the outcome, 
cannot help but be exposed to important emotional strains by these 
facts. 

The absolute limits of the physician's control— which of course 
are relative to the state of medical science at the time and his own 
assimilation of it— are not the only source of frustration and strain. 
Within these limits there is a very important area of uncertainty. As 
in so many practical situations, some of the factors bearing on this 
one may be well understood, but others are not. The exact relation 
of the known to the unknown elements cannot be determined; the 
unknown may operate at any time to invalidate expectations built 
up on analysis of the known. Sometimes it may be known that cer- 
tain factors operate significantly, but it is unpredictable whether, 
when and how they vidll operate in the particular case. Sometimes 
virtually nothing is knowni of these factors, only that the best laid 
plans mysteriously go wrong. In general the line between the spon- 
taneous forces tending to recovery— what used to be called the vis 
medicatrix naturae— and the effects of the physician's "intervention" 
is impossible to draw with precision in a very large proportion of 
cases. 

The great importance of the uncertainty element is evident even 
if attention is confined to the physiological-biochemical levels of 
analysis of medical problems. In the first great era of modem scien- 
tific medicine explicit attention was almost in principle confined to 
this level. In the light of subsequently acquired knowledge of the 
psychic factor in disease, a very substantial proportion of the uncer- 
tainty factor when attention was thus narrowed must have consisted 
in the impingement of psychological elements on the disease process, 
which at that stage were not understood at all. Taking explicit 
account of these, to the extent that this has so far become possible, 
helps to reduce the range, but again by no means eliminates it. One 



[ 45° ] ^^^ Case of Modern Medical Practice 

of its effects, like that of all scientific advance, is to increase aware- 
ness of the vast extent of human ignorance, even in the most sophis- 
ticated fields of applied science. 

The primary definition of the physician's responsibility is to "do 
everything possible" to forward the complete, early and painless re- 
covery of his patients. The general effect of the existence of large 
factors of known impossibility and of uncertainty in the situation 
viith which he has to cope is to impose strain upon him, to make it 
more difficult for him to have a "purely rational" orientation to his 
job than if his orientation were such as to guarantee success vdth 
competent work. This is true of his own orientation without taking 
account of reciprocal interactions with his patients and their in- 
timates. 

But the function of "doing everything possible" is institutional- 
ized in terms of expectations, and these expectations are most vividly 
and immediately embodied, besides in the physician's own attitude 
system, in the attitudes of precisely this group of people. But com- 
pared to most such groups their involvement is, because of the con- 
siderations analyzed above, peculiarly intensive, immediate, and 
likely to contain elements of emotional disturbance which are by 
definition, tendencies to deviant behavior. Hence the elements of 
strain on the physician by virtue of these impossibility and uncer- 
tainty components of his situation are particularly great. Non- and 
irrational mechanisms were noted as prominent in the reactions of 
sick people to their situations, and those of their families. In spite of 
the discipline of his scientific training and competence, it would be 
strange if, in view of the situation, physicians as a group were alto- 
gether exempted from corresponding tendencies. In fact that magic 
frequently appears in situations of uncertainty is suggestive. In a 
later section the problem of the functional equivalents of magic in 
actual medical practice will be taken up briefly. However, it is clear 
from the above that quite apart from the operation of so-called 
psychic factors in the disease process itself, the strains existing on 
both sides of doctor-patient relationship are such that we must 
expect to find, not merely institutionalization of the roles, but spe- 
cial mechanisms of social control in operation. 

Factors of impossibility, and uncertainty in situations where 



The Situation of Medical Practice [451] 

there is a strong emotional interest in success, are common in many 
other fields of applied science— the military field is an outstandingly 
important example. There are, however, certain other features of 
the situation of the physician which are not common to many other 
fields which share those so far discussed. The engineer, for example, 
deals primarily with non-human impersonal materials which do not 
have "emotional" reactions to what he does with them. But the phy- 
sician deals with human beings, and does so in situations which 
often involve "intimacies," that is, in contexts which are strongly 
charged with emotional and expressively symbolic significance, and 
which are often considered peculiarly "private" to the individual 
himself, or to especially intimate relations with others. 

One whole class of these concerns the body. For reasons which 
undoubtedly go very deep psychologically, certain of the sentiments 
relative to what Pareto called the "integrity of the individual" are 
focused on the "inviolability" of the body. Their structuring will 
vary greatly according to the society and culture. But the amounts 
and occasions of bodily exposure and of bodily contact are carefully 
regulated in all societies, and very much so in ours. To see a person 
naked in a context where this is not usual, and to touch and manipu- 
late their body, is a "privilege" which calls for explanation in view 
of these considerations. The case of exposure and contact when the 
patient is of opposite sex is, it should be clearly kept in mind, only 
one case in a wider category, though it is a pecuharly dramatic one. 
In our society there is no doubt that there are also very strong senti- 
ments regulating physical contact between men, and between 
women as well. Furthermore, as to exposure, it may not, for in- 
stance, be "shameful" for a man to appear in public without his 
trousers, as it might be for a woman without either skirt or slacks, 
but it would certainly expose him to ridicule, and this also is cer- 
tainly an expression of important sentiments. It is clear, in the light 
of the discussion in the last chapter, that both the parts of the body 
themselves, and acts of exposure and of bodily contact are expressive 
symbols of highly strategic significance. 

It is essential for the physician to have access to the body of his 
patient in order to perform his function. Indeed, some of his con- 
tacts, as in the case of a rectal or a vaginal examination, would not 



[ 452- ] T^he Case of Modern Medical Practice 

be permitted to any other person by most normal individuals, even to 
a sexual partner. Various others would be permitted only to special 
intimates. 

Along with all this goes the problem of sentiments toward "in- 
jury" of the body. Certainly many complex anxieties center about 
this in many respects. It is, for example, noteworthy how many 
people have really severe anxieties about the insertion of a hypo- 
dermic needle even when this has become such a commonplace in 
our society. Obviously the problem of securing consent to surgical 
procedures and many types of diagnostic procedures— such as the use 
of a gastroscope or a bronchoscope— is not to be too easily taken for 
granted. The essential point in all this is that these are no simple 
matters of weighing a rationally understood "need" against an 
equally rationally assessed "cost" in the form of discomfort or incon- 
venience, but very complex non- and irrational reactions are in- 
evitably involved with the typical, not only the "abnormal" patient. 
The fact that these elements are organized and controlled does not 
make them unproblematical. On the contrary, in the light of the 
'potentialities of disturbance, the fact of successful control presents 
peculiarly important sociological problems. 

Similar considerations apply to the physician's need of access to 
confidential information about his patient's private life. For reasons 
among which their place in the system of expressive symbolism is 
prominent, many facts which are relevant to people's problems of 
health fall into the realm of the private or confidential about which 
people are unwilling to talk to the ordinary friend or acquaintance. 
Some of these concern only "reticences" about himself which are not 
specially bound up with intimate relations to others. A man will 
often, for example, hesitate to tell even his wife— even if he is on 
excellent terms with her— about many things which might well be 
of symptomatic significance to a physician. Others concern the 
privacies of intimate personal relationships, not only, but perhaps 
particularly those with sexual partners. Such information, however, 
is often essential to the performance of the physician's function. His 
access to it presents the same order of problems as does access to 
the body. 

Modem developments in psychology, particularly psycho- 
analysis, have made us aware that in addition to resistances to access 



The Sittmtion of Medical Practice [ 453 ] 

to the body, and to confidential information, anyone taking a role 
like that of the physician toward his patients is exposed to another 
sort of situational adjustment problem. That is, through processes 
which are mostly unconscious the physician tends to acquire vari- 
ous types of projective significance as a person which may not be 
direcdy relevant to his specifically technical functions, though they 
may become of the first importance in connection with psychother- 
apy. The generally accepted name for this phenomenon in psychi- 
atric circles is "transference," the attribution to the physician of 
significances to the patient which are not "appropriate" in the 
realistic situation, but which derive from the psychological needs 
of the patient. For understandable reasons a particularly important 
class of these involves the attributes of parental roles as experienced 
by the patient in childhood. Transference is most conspicuous in 
"psychiatric" cases, but there is every reason to believe that it is 
always a factor in doctor-patient relationships, the more so the longer 
their duration and the greater the emotional importance of the 
health problem and hence the relation to the physician. 

If all these factors be taken together it becomes clear that, in 
ways which are not true of most other professiosnal functions, the 
situation of medical practice is such as inevitably to "involve" the 
physician in the psychologically significant "private" affairs of his 
patients. Some of these may not otherwise be accessible to others in 
any ordinary situation, others only in the context of specifically 
intimate and personal relationships. What the relation of the phy- 
sician's role to these other relationships is to be, is one of the 
principal functional problems which underly the structuring of his 
professional role. 

If the features of the situation of the patient, the sick person, his 
intimates, and the physician, which have been reviewed, are taken 
together, they seem to present a very considerable set of complica- 
tions of the functioning of medical practice on the level of human 
adjustment. These complications are not ordinarily taken account 
of in the simple common-sense view of the obviousness of the ex-pec- 
tation that knowledge of how to cope with situations which are dis- 
tressing to human beings will be applied to the limit of the avail- 
ability of trained personnel and other necessary resources. They 
present another order of functional problems to the social system. 



[ 454 ] ^^^ Case of Modern Medical Practice 

The severity of these functional problems is such that it can con- 
fidently be expected that a whole series of specific mechanisms has 
developed which can be understood as "ways" of meeting the strains 
and overcoming the obstacles to the eflFective practice of scientific 
medicine which would exist if these mechanisms did not operate. 
We must now turn to the analysis of a variety of these mechanisms. 

§ THE FUNCTIONAL SIGNIFICANCE OF 
THE INSTITUTIONAL PATTERN OF 
MEDICAL PRACTICE 

THE analysis of this problem may be centered about the 
pattern variables and the particular combination of their values 
which characterizes the "professional" pattern in our society, 
namely, achievement, universalism, functional specificity, affective 
neutrality and collectivity-orientation, in that order. 

The most fundamental basis for the necessity of a universalistic- 
achievement and not a particularistic-ascribed structuring of the 
physician's role lies in the fact that modem medical practice is or- 
ganized about the application of scientific knowledge by technically 
competent, trained personnel. A whole range of sociologically vali- 
dated knowledge tends to show that the high levels of technical 
training and competence which this requires would not be possible 
in a relationship system which was structured primarily in particu- 
laristic terms or which was ascribed to incumbents of a status with- 
out the possibility of selection by performance criteria. This would 
drastically alter the bases of selection for the personnel of the pro- 
fession, the focusing of their ambitions and loyalties and many 
other things. The tendency would be toward nepotism, the 
hereditary principle, etc.^ It is furthermore of the first importance 

® This is not to say that relatively high levels of technical competence cannot 
ever be attained or maintained in a context of particularistically ascribed role 
patterns. A notable example is that none of the Roman Generals who won her 
empire was a professional soldier in our sense. All were aristocrats to whom 
military activity was ascribed, and who held military command as part of a largely 
ascribed political career. But even Roman conquest was not applied science in 
quite the sense or degree that modern medicine is. Certainly no society is known 
with the high general level of institutionalization of very high technical com- 
petences of the applied science type in which they were usually structured in 
particularistic-ascribed patterns. 



The Functional Significance of the Pattern [ 455 ] 

that only this patterning is congruent with the structuring of the rest 
of the occupational world in modem Western society, particularly 
with the general world of science in the universities, and its appli- 
cation in other professional roles. 

This last is a particularly important point. The tendency of par- 
ticularistic structuring is to develop solidarities which, through con- 
tributing to the integration of the social situation within the 
solidary group, tend to do so at the cost of deepening the separations 
between such groups, even generating, or contributing to, antago- 
nism and conflict. 

A basic fact about science is that the structure of "pure" scien- 
tific disciplines cuts across the structure of the fields of application 
of science to practical affairs. The term "medical science" is thus a 
somewhat equivocal one, it is not the designation of a single theo- 
retically integrated discipline, but of a field of application. Many 
different sciences find applications in the medical or health field, 
physics, chemistry, the whole gamut of biological sciences, psy- 
chology and, we can now see, sociology, though the latter is little 
recognized as yet. A particularistic structuring of the medical pro- 
fession would almost certainly operate to emphasize and institu- 
tionalize the distinction between the medical and the non-medical 
even more than has actually been the case. Pasteur was initially 
repudiated by the medical profession in considerable part because he 
was not a physician but "only" a chemist— how could anything 
medically important come from anyone who was not a member of 
the "fraternity"? This repudiation of Pasteur is rightly regarded 
by modem physicians as a very unfortunate aberration, a refusal to 
recognize the "intrinsic" merits of a contribution regardless of its 
source. But particularistic bases of status-ascription, of solidarity, 
etc., inherently cut across the intrinsic structure of science. If they 
were the predominant institutional focus of the physician's role it is 
hard to see how the Pasteur case could fail to become the rule, which 
would come to be ideologically glorified in the profession as a proper 
protection of its "purity" against gratuitous interference by "out- 
siders." 

The universalism of the medical role has, however, also another 
type of functional significance. In the light of the considerations 
brought forward in the last section it is clear that there is strong 



[ 45^ ] ^^^ Case of Modern Medical Practice 

pressure to assimilate the physician to the nexus of personal rela- 
tionships in which the patient is placed, quite apart from the specific 
technical content of the job he is called upon to perform. In so far 
as his role can be defined in unequivocally universalistic terms, this 
serves as a protection against such assimilation, because personal 
friendships, love relationships and family relationships are over- 
whelmingly particularistic. However, this aspect of the functional 
significance of universalism is closely bound up with that of func- 
tional specificity and affective neutrality. Its significance will be 
more advantageously discussed when the bearing of these two 
pattern elements has been made clear. 

In its relation to technical competence, universalism is, as has 
been noted, linked to functional specificity. A generalized "wisdom" 
which is genuinely universalistic but not specialized for any par- 
ticular context is conceivable, but it is certainly not the basis of the 
competence of the physician who is a specialized expert in a specifi- 
cally defined, if broad and complicated field. But the definition of 
the physician's role in this respect is not relevant only with relation 
to the specificity of his competence, but also of his legitimate scope 
of concern. Specificity of competence has primarily the function of 
delimiting a field so that it is relatively manageable, so that com- 
petence will not be destroyed by "spreading too thin." Specificity of 
the scope of concern, on the other hand, has the function of de- 
fining the relationship to patients so that it can be regulated in cer- 
tain ways and certain potential alternatives of definition, which 
might be disruptive, can be excluded or adequately controlled. 

In terms of the features of the situation discussed above, func- 
tional specificity is an important element in overcoming potential 
resistances to the physician, in that through it the limits of his 
legitimate claims on the patient are defined, and thereby anxieties 
about the consequences of the special privileges accorded to him 
are allayed. The role conforms strictly to the criterion of the burden 
of proof being on the side of exclusion. If the patient asks why he 
should answer a question his doctor puts to him, or why he should 
submit to a given procedure, the answer is in terms of the relevance 
of his health problem— "if you want to get well, you have to give me 
the information I need to do my job," etc. If it cannot be justified 
by the relevance to the health problem it is "none of the doctor's 
business." 



The Functional Significance of the Pattern [ 457 ] 

The obverse of permissions on the basis of positive relevance to 
the health problem is some sort of assurance that information or 
other privileges will not be used for other purposes, or that access to 
the body will not be used to exploit the patient, or to distort the 
relation in another direction, e.g., in the direction of mutual sexual 
attraction. 

One of the most prominent mechanisms by which this is brought 
about is the segregation of the context of professional practice from 
other contexts. The doctrine of privileged communications is one of 
the best examples. That what the doctor learns about his patient's 
private affairs in the course of his duties is confidential and not to be 
divulged is not only one of the strongest tenets of professional ethics, 
but is protected by law against the claim to testify in court. Another- 
significant example is the rule that physicians do not care for mem- 
bers of their own families except in essentially trivial illnesses. Not 
only might their emotional involvements distort their judgment, but 
they might well come to know things about which it is just as well 
for them not to know. 

Even where there is both a professional and a non-professional 
aspect of the relationship of the physician to the same persons, there 
is a definite tendency to segregate the two aspects. For example one 
physician expressed a strong dislike of being asked for professional 
advice on social occasions, e.g., the lady sitting next to him at dinner 
asking what she should do about some illness of her child. His usual 
response was to ask her to come to his office and discuss it. It might 
be argued that his interest was in the fee, but the same thing is to 
be observed where no fee is involved. 

One of the most conspicuous cases of the operation of segrega- 
tion is where a potential sexual element enters in. For example a 
general practitioner whose office was in his home, and who had no 
office nurse or dressing room, reported that he habitually stepped 
out of the office to allow a female patient to get ready for a physical 
examination. When, as occasionally happened, the patient started 
to disrobe before he had time to get out of the room, he found it 
definitely embarrassing, though the same patient disrobed on the 
examining table did not embarrass him at all. The essential point is 
that for most men "woman in the same room undressing" usually 
means potential sexual relations, for the physician "woman on the 
examining table" means a professional job to do. Naturally, ensuring 



[ 45^ ] The Case of Modern Medical Practice 

the right behavior in each context requires a learning process and a 
system of control mechanisms. ^*^ 

These examples show that segregation operates not only to main- 
tain functional specificity, but also affective neutrality by defining 
situations which might potentially arouse various emotional re- 
actions as "professional" and thereby mobilizing a system of sanc- 
tions against "inappropriate" reactions. The importance of func- 
tional specificity is to define, in situations where potential 
illegitimate involvements might develop, the limits of the 
"privileges" in the "dangerous" area which the physician may claim. 
The pattern of affective neutrality then defines his expected atti- 
tudes within those limits. 

The case of situations which might easily arouse sexual attrac- 
tions is a particularly vivid one in our society. It should be noted that 
breakdown of the controls insuring affective neutrality in that con- 
nection is important not only to the doctor and the patient, but 
would often also involve the interests of a variety of third parties, 
since each tends to be involved in erotic relations with others whose 
interests would in turn be affected. In other words the toleration by 
a husband of his wife privately seeing a doctor and the lack of 
jealousy of their husband's female patients on the part of the doc- 
tors' wives are important conditions of medical practice. Occasionally 
disturbances in this area do occur, but their relative infrequency and 
the quickness with which they are stigmatized as "pathological" is 
indicative of the effectiveness of the control system. -^^ 

^° The testimony of a considerable number of physicians interviewed is 
that in the early stages of medical education sexual arousal to some degree is 
not uncommon, but that the relevant occasions soon become "part of the day's 
work." Also by no means the only problem of control is the "protection" of the 
woman patient from the physician's "taking advantage" of her. Quite frequendy 
it is the other way around, including the possibility of his susceptibility being 
used for blackmail. One of the prominent hospitals justified the policy of having 
a nurse present on such occasions by saying "it is at least as much for the pro- 
tection of the doctor as of the patient." This nurse is graphically referred to as a 
"nurse-chaperone . ' ' 

^^ One particular case has been reported to the author of a husband who 
would not allow his wife to go to a male obstetrician. The physician reporting it 
assumed this attitude to be pathological. But it is pertinent to note that it was 
not very long ago when attendance at childbirth by a male physician was not 
tolerated in most of Western society. 

There is a good deal of folklore current in such places as the pulp magazine 
literature and burlesque stage humor about the special opportunities of the 



The Functional Significance of the Pattern [ 459 ] 

This problem of emotional involvements is not, however, con- 
fined to the sexual aspect. It also includes likes and dislikes on an- 
other level. An eminent surgeon, for instance, was acutely aware of 
the emotional reaction provoked in himself by seeing a patient 
through a long and difl5cult convalescence from a severe and dan- 
gerous operation— one case was a nine-year-old boy. He said he 
would distrust his own judgment if he had to decide to operate a 
second time on such a case: He was afraid he would lean over 
backwards to spare the patient the suffering he knew would be in- 
volved, even in a case where he also knew the operation would prob- 
ably be best for the patient in the long run. It is also important that 
doctors should not let their personal dislikes of particular patients 
be expressed in a poorer level of treatment or even positive "punish- 
ment." And doctors would scarcely be human if they did not take 
a dislike to some of their patients. 

The argument of the last few pages may be summed up in the 
proposition that one principal set of functional significances of the 
combination universalism, functional specificity, and affective neu- 
trality, is to enable the physician to "penetrate" sufficiently into the 
private affairs, or the "particular nexus" of his patients to perform 
his function. By defining his role in this way it is possible to over- 
come or minimize resistances which might well otherwise prove fatal 
to the possibility of doing the job at all.^^ 

This importance is not, however, confined to the overcoming of 
potential resistances. It is also evident that these pattern elements 
are "for the protection of the physician" in a broader sense than in 
the case of the "nurse-chaperone" as she is sometimes actually called. 
The obverse functional danger to that of refusal to admit to the 
sphere of private affairs is that this admission should be too thor- 
ough, that the role of the doctor should be assimilated to that of 
other "significant persons" in the situation of the patient, that he 
really should become a personal intimate, a lover, a parent, or a per- 

doctor for sexual gratification. It might be that "where there is smoke there is 
fire." But the available evidence points to the probability that this expresses a 
wish-fulfillment projected on the physician's role, rather than a shrewd guess 
as to what actually happens. 

^^ It is interesting to note that the social or psychological research worker 
faces similar problems in his relations to people he wishes to interview or observe. 
The cognate features of his role have the same order of functional significance. 



[ 460 ] The Case of Modern Medical Practice 

sonal enemy. All these roles are, it will be noted, defined in terms 
of the opposite combination of the values of the pattern-variables 
being discussed from that which characterizes the professional 
pattern. 

A good many instances were collected by the author in which 
physicians had been put in positions where there was a "pull" to 
assimilate their roles to patterns of this type, particularly that of a 
"personal friend" of the patient. There are various complicating 
factors but in general it can be said that there was a marked tendency 
for the physician to feel uncomfortable. Asked why it was unde- 
sirable to allow the assimilation to take place, the usual answer ran 
in terms of the difficulty of maintaining "objectivity" and "good 
judgment" in relation to the job. There is every reason to believe 
that there was an element of correct insight in the testimony of these 
doctors, none of whom incidentally was a psychiatrist or psychi- 
atrically trained. It is, however, difficult to judge how far this is a 
rational appraisal of the situation and how far a rationalization of 
other factors of which the respondent was not explicitly aware. 

The enormous recent development of psychotherapy, and in- 
crease of our knowledge of the psychological aspects of human re- 
lations relative to it, calls attention to another most important aspect 
of this whole situation. Through the mechanisms of transference 
the patient, usually without knowing what he is doing, not only 
has certain resistances, but he actively attempts by projection to 
assimilate his physician to a pattern of particularistic personal rela- 
tionship to himself. He attempts to elicit the reaction which is 
appropriate to his own need-dispositions. Though this is most con- 
spicuous in psychiatric cases, as noted, there can be no doubt that 
it is also of the greatest importance throughout the field of doctor- 
patient relationships. 

In the first place it is necessary for the physician to be protected 
against this emotional pressure, because for a variety of reasons in- 
herent in his own situation it is not possible for him to "enter in" to 
the kind of relationship the patient, usually unconsciously, wants. 
Above all this functional specificity which permits the physician to 
confine the relationship to a certain content field, indeed enjoins 
it on him, and affective neutrality which permits him to avoid enter- 
ing into reciprocities on the emotional level, serve to bring about 



The Functional Significance of the Pattern [ 46 1 J 

this protection. The upshot is that he refuses to be "drawn in" and 
has institutional backing in his refusals of reciprocity.^^ 

But, in addition to this, our knowledge of the processes of psy- 
chotherapy reveals another important dimension of the situation. 
That is, the same features of the physician's role, which are so 
important as protection of the physician himself, are also crucially 
important conditions of successful psychotherapy. Psychotherapy, 
as we have seen, becomes necessary when the control mechanisms 
inherent in the reciprocities of ordinary human relationships break 
down. One of the most important features of neurotic behavior in 
this sense is of course the involvement in vicious circles, so that the 
social pressures which ordinarily serve to keep people "in line" and 
bring them back if they start to deviate, serve only to intensify the 
recalcitrant reaction and to drive the individual farther from satis- 
factory behavior. If these vicious circles are to be dealt with there 
must be an "Archimedean place to stand" outside the reciprocities of 
ordinary social intercourse. This is precisely what the patterning of 
the physician's role provides. Whether it is love or hate which the 
patient projects upon him, he fails to reciprocate in the expected 
terms. He remains objective and affectively neutral.-^* The patient 
tries to involve him in his personal affairs outside the health field and 
he refuses to see his patient except at the stated hours in his office, 
he keeps out of his sight so as to avoid opportunities for reciprocal 
reactions. ^^ Finally, the discrepancy between the transference re- 
actions and the realistic role of the physician provides one of the 
most important occasions for interpretations which can bring the 
patient to new levels of insight as part of the process of emotional 
readjustment. 

An essential part of what the psychiatrist does is to apply direct 
knowledge of the mechanisms of neurotic behavior to the manipula- 

^* The fact that his role is collectively-oriented, on the other hand, tends to 
draw him in and has to be counteracted by these other factors. 

^* "Countertransference" of course occurs, but the therapist is expected to 
minimize and control it, not just "let himself go." 

^^ Many specific points in the details of psychotherapeutic and psychoanalytic 
technique are controversial within the relevant professional groups. The present 
discussion is not meant to take a position on such questions as to whether it 
might or might not under certain circumstances be better to get the patient off 
the couch into a face-to-face position. It is meant only to call attention to certain 
general features of the psychotherapeutic situation. 



[ 462 ] The Case of Modern Medical Practice 

tion of his patient. Increasingly, however, psychiatrists are becoming 
aware of the importance of the structuring of their own roles as part 
of the therapeutic process. But it is quite clear that the basic struc- 
turing of the physician's role in our society did not come ahout 
through the af plication of theories of the ideal situation for fsycho- 
therafy. It was a spontaneous, unplanned development of social 
structure which psychiatry has been able to utilize and develop, but 
which originated independently of its influence. 

There is a most important implication of all this. Psychiatry is 
much more recent than organic medicine, and today constitutes only 
a fraction of the total of medical practice. But the continuity be- 
tween them in function must be, and historically has been, much 
greater than the usual explicit interpretations allow for. If the 
structure of the physician's role has the kind of functional signifi- 
cance for deliberate psychotherapy which has been outlined here, it 
must have some effect on the mental state of the patient whether it is 
used for deliberate psychotherapy or not. And there is every 
evidence that it does. Psychotherapy to the militantly anti- 
psychiatric organic physician is like theory to the militantly anti- 
theoretical empirical scientist. In both cases he practices it whether 
he knows it or wants to or not. He may indeed do it very effectively 
just as one can use a language well without even knowing it has a 
grammatical structure.^® But the general conclusion is that a very 
important part of non- and prepsychiatric medical practice is in 
fact "unconscious psychotherapy" and that this could not be true if 
the institutional structure of the physician's role were not approxi- 
mately what it has here been shown to be.^''^ 

•^^ This has somerimes been called the "art of medicine." 

•"^ Two formulae are more or less current among physicians which show an 
inadequate understanding of the situation. One is that the doctor is the patient's 
"best friend." He is, in terms of willingness to help him. But a relationship of 
friendship is not confined to a functionally specific context, nor is it affectively 
neutral. A friend does not have the "place to stand" outside certain reciprocities. 
The other is current among certain psychoanalysts, "the doctor is the father." It 
is true that the father role is perhaps the most immediately appropriate trans- 
ference role to a male analyst, especially if there is a considerable age differential. 
But when a son misbehaves a father reacts with anger and punishment, not 
affectively neutral "understanding." A father can also be called upon to help 
where a physician can legitimately refuse. It is precisely the differences from 
friendship and familial roles which are the most important levers for the psycho- 
therapeutic process. 



The Functional Significance of the Pattern [ 463 ] 

This brings us to the last pattern element, collectivity-orienta- 
tion. It is this which is distinctive of professional roles within the 
upper reaches of our occupational system, especially in the contrast 
with business. Indeed one of the author's principal motivations in 
embarking on a study of the medical profession lay in the desire to 
understand a high-level occupational role which deviated from that 
of the businessman who, according to certain theorists, represented 
the one strategically crucial type of such role in modern "capitalistic" 
society.^^ 

It was noted above that the sick person is peculiarly vulnerable 
to exploitation and at the same time peculiarly handicapped in ar- 
riving at a rationally objective appraisal of his situation. In addition, 
the physician is a technically competent person whose competence 
and specific judgments and measures cannot be competently judged 
by the layman. The latter must therefore take these judgments and 
measures "on authority." But in the type case there is no system of 
coercive sanctions to back up this authority. All the physician can 
say to the patient who refuses to heed his advice is "well, it's your 
ovim funeral"— which it may be literally. All this of course is true of 
a situation which includes the potential resistances which have been 
discussed above. 

These different factors seem to indicate that the situation is such 
that it would be particularly difficult to implement the pattern of the 
business world, where each party to the situation is expected to be 
oriented to the rational pursuit of his own self-interests, and where 
there is an approach to the idea of "caveat emptor." In a broad sense 
it is surely clear that society would not tolerate the privileges which 
have been vested in the medical profession on such terms. The pro- 
tection of the patient against the exploitation of his helplessness, his 
technical incompetence and his irrationality thus constitutes the 
most obvious functional significance of the pattern. In this whole 
connection it is noteworthy how strongly the main reliance for con- 
trol is placed on "informal" mechanisms. The law of the state in- 
cludes severe penalties for "malpractice" and medical associations 
have relatively elaborate disciplinary procedures, but these quite 

^® See "the Professions and Social Structure," Essays in Sociological Theory, 
Chapter VIII, for a general analysis of the relations between business and the 
professions in our social structure. 



[ 464 ] The Case of Modern Medical Practice 

definitely are not the principal mechanisms which operate to ensure 
the control of self -orientation tendencies. The significance of this 
will be discussed below. 

Here it may be noted that the collectivity-orientation of the 
physician is protected by a series of symbolically significant prac- 
tices which serve to differentiate him sharply from the business- 
man. He cannot advertise— he can only modestly announce by his 
"shingle" and the use of his M.D. in telephone directories and 
classified sections, that he is available to provide medical service. He 
cannot bargain over fees with his patients— a "take it or leave it" 
attitude is enjoined upon him. He cannot refuse patients on the 
ground that they are poor "credit risks." He is given the privilege 
of charging according to the "sliding scale," that is, in proportion to 
the income of the patient or his family— a drastic difference from 
the usual pricing mechanism of the business world. The general 
picture is one of sharp segregation from the market and price prac- 
tices of the business world, in ways which for the most part cut off 
the physician from many immediate opportunities for financial gain 
which are treated as legitimately open to the businessman. The 
motivational significance of this difference will have to be discussed 
below. 

It is also interesting to note, following up the earlier remarks 
about "shopping around," that the definition in terms of collectivity- 
orientation is expected to be reciprocal. The most usual formulation 
for this is that the patient is expected to "have confidence" in his 
physician, and if this confidence breaks down, to seek another 
physician. 

This may be interpreted to mean that the relationship is expected 
to be one of mutual "trust," of the belief that the physician is trying 
his best to help the patient and that conversely the patient is 
"cooperating" with him to the best of his ability. It is significant for 
instance that this constitutes a reinforcement of one of the principal 
institutional features of the sick role, the expectation of a desire to 
get well. It makes the patient, in a special sense, responsible to his 
physician. But more generally, it has been pointed out before that 
collectivity-orientation is involved in all cases of institutionalized 
authority, that is authority is an attribute of a status in a collectivity. 
In a ver)' special and informal sense the doctor-patient relationship 



The Jr-mictional Significance of the Pattern [ 465 ] 

has to be one involving an element of authority— we often speak of 
"doctor's orders." This authority cannot be legitimized without 
reciprocal collectivity-orientation in the relationship. To the doctor's 
obligation to use his authority "responsibly" in the interest of the 
patient, corresponds the patient's obligation faithfully to accept the 
implications of the fact that he is "Dr. X's patient" and so long as he 
remains in that status must "do his part" in the common enterprise. 
He is free, of course, to terminate the relationship at any time. But 
the essential point is the sharp line which tends to be drawn between 
being X's patient, and no longer being in that position. In the ideal 
type of commercial relationship one is not A's customer to the ex- 
clusion of other sources of supply for the same needs. 

Finally, there is a most important relationship between collec- 
tivity-orientation and psychotherapy, conscious or unconscious. 
There are differences of opinion among psychiatrists on many sub- 
jects, but so far as the author knows, none on this point— that thera- 
peutic success is not possible unless the patient can be brought to 
trust his physician. This is particularly important because it can 
safely be said that there is no important class of psychological dis- 
turbances which do not have, as one important component, an im- 
pairment of the capacity to trust others, essentially what, in Chapter 
VII, we called a sense of insecurity. This element of distrust then 
tends to be projected onto the physician in the transference rela- 
tionship. If the role of the physician were defined in self-orientation 
terms it could hardly fail to invite deepening of the vicious circle, 
because the patient would tend to see his own neurotic definition 
of the situation confirmed by the institutional expectation that the 
physician was "out to get everything he could for himself." In this 
as in other contexts it is of the first importance that the institu- 
tionalized definition of the role is such as to counteract these trans- 
ference tendencies of the patient, thus to set up a discrepancy be- 
tween his neurotic expectations and reality which is as difficult as 
possible for him to avoid understanding. In view of the immense 
importance of what has here been called the element of unconscious 
psychotherapy in non-psychiatric medical practice, the element of 
collectivity-orientation is certainly one of the keystones of the insti- 
tutional arch in this respect. 



[ 466 ] The Case of Modern Medical Practice 

§ SOME SPECIAL PROBLEMS 

A FEW special problems may now be taken up which illus- 
trate in still other contexts connected with medical practice the 
usefulness of the type of analysis which is here being employed. The 
ones which will each be briefly discussed here are, the part played 
by certain pseudo-scientific elements even within the profession 
itself, the predominance of informal internal controls and the re- 
sistance to outside and to formal control, and the problem of the 
comparative motivational patterns of the medical and business 
world. 

We may go back to the discussion of the element of uncertainty 
which looms so large in medical practice. This element, and that of 
impossibility, the border lines between them often being indistinct, 
places serious strains on a well-integrated balance of need, skill, 
effort, and expectations of result.^^ Within this situation there is a 
variety of motivational factors operating to drive action in one direc- 
tion, namely, "success" of the therapeutic enterprise. The physician 
himself is trained and expected to act, not merely to be a passive 
observer of what goes on. The patient and his family are also under 
strong emotional pressures to "get something done." There is on 
both sides, in Pareto's terms, a "need to manifest sentiments by 
external acts." 

One of the best types of examples of this situation is that where 
a decision to perform a surgical operation is in the balance, and 
where, from a technical point of view, there is a genuine uncertainty 
element involved. The surgeon must weigh the risks of operation 
against the risks of delaying operation or deciding not to operate at 
all. In general it is clear that there tends to be a bias in favor of 
operating. After all the surgeon is trained to operate, he feels active, 
useful, eff^ective when he is operating. For the patient and his 
family, in their state of anxiety and tension also, inactivity, just 

^® Durl<heiin, in his classic interpretation of the nature of anomie in Suicide, 
was one of the first to analyze correctly the nature of the strains involved in 
upsetting a normal balance in the relation between effort, skill, and expectation 
of result. His analysis is further generalized by our treatment of the complemen- 
tarity of expectations in interactive relationships and the motivational consequences 
of disturbances of this complementarity. 



Some Special Prohlems [ 4^7 ] 

waiting to see how things develop is particularly hard to bear. A de- 
cision to operate will, in such a situation, almost certainly "clear the 
air" and make everybody "feel better." At least "something is being 
done." It is also probable that American culture predisposes more to 
this pattern of activity than most others, and that this has much to 
do with our tendency to glorify the surgeon, who is indeed a kind 
of culture hero. 

This problem of the bias in favor of active intervention, of giving 
the benefit of the doubt to operating in surgical cases, underlies the 
problem of "unnecessary operations" about which there has been a 
good deal of discussion in medical circles. It is true that, in the situa- 
tion of individual fee-for-service practice, the surgeon has a direct 
financial incentive to be biased in favor of operating. In the folklore 
of the subject, however, whatever tendency to unnecessary opera- 
tions there may be, tends too immediately to be ascribed to this 
financial incentive. It is forgotten that there are other powerful 
motives operating in the same direction. In such a situation it would 
take far more refined research methods than have yet been applied 
to the problem to discriminate the effects of the two factors. One 
may thus be warned against glib, easy interpretations of the "obvi- 
ous" motivation of a pattern of action, where it can be shown that 
one motivational factor operates in the right direction. 

It is suggested that the situation of surgical practice, where the 
uncertainty factor is almost inevitably great, predisposes to a bias in 
favor of active intervention. Since the motivation for this bias tends 
to be strongly shared by patients and their families, its existence is 
obscured since there is no conspicuous group whose conscious inter- 
ests are injured by it to protest. But this particular version of the bias 
is by no means isolated. A second conspicuous phenomenon is the 
existence of a pattern of "fashion change," even within the medical 
profession as such, which, however, is far less conspicuous than the 
related health "faddism" current among the general public. ^*^ 

This phenomenon is easy to observe only in temporal perspec- 

2° An excellent place to study the latter is in the field of health advertising. 
For an analysis of one such "fad," cf. L. J. Henderson, "Aphorisms on the 
Advertising of Alkalis," Harvard Business Review, Autumn, 1937, Vol. 16, 
pp. 17-23. 



[ 4^8 ] The Case of Modern Medical Practice 

tive. A technical innovation in the medical field will for a time be 
slow in "catching on." When, however, it begins to be accepted, it 
will spread very rapidly and be utilized on almost every possible 
occasion where an at all plausible case for it can be made. This con- 
tinues until the point is reached where it becomes "oversold" and a 
reaction sets in. Its use will then fall off, probably to a level below 
its intrinsic merits, and after a series of narrowing fluctuations it will 
tend to settle down to a well-established place in the professional 
repertoire. 

The phenomenon was perfectly described, without the slightest 
awareness of its sociological implications, by two surgeons wnriting 
in a medical journal, discussing a new operative technique for the 
removal of the prostate gland. But the same tendency can be ob- 
served in many cases, e.g., "focal infection," the use of the sulfa 
drugs recently, psycho-somatic interpretations in many fields. The 
important point is that the "irrational" element in the belief in the 
efiicacy of any one technique or diagnostic idea, which we see must 
be interpreted as a reaction to strain, is only temporary, but at any 
given time, there is always a group of such ideas current in the pro- 
fession. By the time that rational criticism and experience have 
succeeded in "finding the proper level" for one, another has arisen 
to take its place. 

The general phenomenon then is an "optimistic bias" in favor 
of the soundness of ideas or efficacy of procedures. Since the basic 
normative pattern by which such ideas are measured is that of sci- 
ence, there are strong pressures toward the elimination of the bias 
in any particular case. But as a general phenomenon it persists— it is 
a pseudo-scientific element in the technical competence of the medi- 
cal profession which is more than simply an expression of the rela- 
tive lack of scientific development of the field; it is positively 
motivated. 

The question arises of whether it has positive functions, or as 
the "rationalistic" tendency of thought goes, is simply an "imperfec- 
tion" to be eliminated. Comparative perspective is very helpful in 
answering this question. Malinowski among others has shown that 
magical beliefs and practices tend to cluster about situations where 
there is an important uncertainty factor and where there are strong 



Some Special Prohlems [ 469 ] 

emotional interests in the success of action. ^^ Gardening and deep- 
sea fishing are examples he analyzes. It is suggestive that pseudo- 
science is the functional equivalent of magic in the modern medical 
field. The health situation is a classic one of the combination of un- 
certainty and strong emotional interests which produce a situation of 
strain and is very frequently a prominent focus of magic. But the 
fact that the basic cultural tradition of modem medicine is science 
precludes outright magic, which is explicitly non-scientific. The 
result is a "bias." 

It may be safely inferred that there is an important element of 
positive functional significance in this. The basic function of 
magic, according to Malinowski, is to bolster the self-confidence 
of actors in situations where energy and skill do make a difference 
but where because of uncertainty factors, outcomes cannot be guar- 
anteed. This fits the situation of the doctor, but in addition on the 
side of the patient it may be argued that helief in the possibility of 
recovery is an important factor in it. If from purely a technical point 
of view both the individual doctor and the general tradition are 
optimistically biased it ought to help, through a "ritual" demonstra- 
tion of the will to recover and that there is a chance.^^ Of course 
this argument must not be pressed too far. Too many conspicuous 
failures of optimism to be justified by events could have a shatter- 
ing effect on just this confidence. The functional needs of society 
call for a delicate balance in this as in many other fields. 

Modem medical practice is, as has so frequently been pointed 
out, overwhelmingly oriented to science. Science in turn attempts 
to make the state of its knowledge as clear and rationally explicit as 
possible. One would think that this type of pattern would run 
through the whole social complex of medical practice. There is a 
certain formal precision and clarity about the existence of a system 
of formal rules of behavior and formal mechanisms for their enforce- 
ment which seems to bear a certain relationship to scientific pre- 
cision, so that on the basis of "cultural congruence" one might expect 

^ See B. Malinowski, Magic, Science and Religion. Kroeber, Anthropology, 
1948 Ed., pp. 604, questions the universality of this relationship, but not that it 
exists in many cases. 

^ It may be suggested that reference to this context constitutes a significant, 
if not well understood undertone, in the physician's so frequent insistence that 
his patients should have "confidence" in him. 



[ 470 ] ^^^^ Case of Modern Medical Practice 

a system of bureaucratic-legalistic social organization to be particu- 
larly congenial to a scientifically trained profession. 

Broadly the facts do not bear out this expectation. A certain 
jealous guarding of their independence from outsiders might be 
expected from such a professional group, indeed they do tend to do 
so vis-a-vis the state and, ideologically at least, vis-a-vis any other 
potential source of "lay control."-^ But perhaps the most conspicuous 
fact is that even their own professional associations do not play a 
really important part in the control of medical practice and its 
potential abuses through formal channels. It is true that medical 
associations do have committees on ethics and disciplinary pro- 
cedures. But it is exceedingly rare for cases to be brought into that 
formal disciplinary procedure. Thus the w^ell-known reluctance of 
physicians to testify against other physicians in cases of malpractice, 
in the courts, has its parallel in the reluctance of physicians to resort 
to the formal disciplinary procedures of their own associations, 
which do not involve "washing their dirty linen" before laymen. 

It is suggested that behind this conspicuous tendency lie factors 
which are common throughout the occupational world, but perhaps 
in certain respects especially prominent here. The general tendency 
is to fall considerably short of living up to the full "logical" impli- 
cations of the dominant culture pattern in certain crucial respects. 
It is suggested that this derives from the fact that it is not possible 
to "apply" the dominant cultural pattern literally and without re- 
striction and not generate strains which in turn would produce 
responses which would be more disruptive than certain "mitiga- 
tions" of the rigorous applications of the pattern itself. This devia- 
tion from the dominant pattern is what we have called an adaptive 
structure. 

The physician is expected to act responsibly in a situation where 
the interests of others are very vitally affected, and in ways where 

^ The qualification "ideologically" is necessary here. Almost all medical edu- 
cation, by explicit sanction of the organized profession, is now in the hands of 
Universities. Ultimate legal control of the university is usually in the hands of 
boards of trustees, not one of which is composed of a majority of medical men. 
Much the same is true of the government of hospitals. Yet many medical men, 
who never think of protesting against this situation, roundly assert that any 
change which will subject medical men to the authority of laymen in any respect 
is "in principle" intolerable. 



Some Special Problems [ 471 ] 

it is not by any means always probable that the reaction of these 
others to things going wrong will be "reasonable." The resources he 
has available to do his job are by no means fully adequate. He 
inevitably makes mistakes, and his mistakes may on occasion have 
very serious consequences. Moreover, it may be peculiarly difficult 
to explain many situations where things go wrong to people not 
technically competent or familiar with the peculiar circumstances 
of medical work and whose emotions are wrought up. Even within 
a medical society formal procedures necessarily abstract from the 
subtleties of the particular situation. 

It may therefore be suggested that reliance on informal controls, 
even though greater formalization would be more "logical," may 
have its functional significance. As one physician put it, "Who is 
going to throw the first stone? We are all vulnerable. We have all 
been in situations where what we did could be made to look very 
bad." Formalization inevitably gives a prominent role to "techni- 
calities" of definition. It always opens the door for the "clever 
lawyer" whether he be a District Attorney or merely the "prosecutor" 
of the medical society's own Committee on Ethics. Undoubtedly 
a certain amount of abuse does "get by" in the present situation 
which "ought not to" and would not in a well-run formal system of 
control. But it is at least possible that the strong reliance on informal 
controls helps to give the physician confidence, and a certain daring 
in using risky though well-advised procedures, which he would not 
be so ready to do in a more thoroughly bureaucratized situation. ^^ 

Finally, a brief discussion may be devoted to the problem of the 
sociological interpretations of the motivation of the physician in his 
professional role which can supplement the discussion of the "profit 

2* In this connection it should be noted that some branches of medicine show 
a wilHngness to have their work exposed to professional criticism which is rarely 
matched in other professions. The practice of surgery is, within the profession, 
essentially public, and has the further check of the pathological laboratory and 
the autopsy. But it is interesting that it is only professionally public, laymen are 
generally excluded from the operating room. The author's observations suggest 
one possible factor in this. The families of patients undergoing an operation are 
generally emotionally "wrought up" to a high degree. The atmosphere of the 
operating room, on the other hand, is in general a "work-a-day" atmosphere, 
vdth calm technical comment and discussion, and often a good deal of joking. 
Much of this could not fail to appear to the emotionally disturbed relative as 
frivolity or callousness — the doctors "don't care what happens to my wife." 



[ 472- ] T^h^ Case of Modern Medical Practice 

motive" in Chapter VI. Because of the prominence in their own 
ideology of the difference between "professionaHsm" and "com- 
mercialism," and the general popular tendency to think of all busi- 
nessmen as "heartless egoists" and medical men as "altruists," the 
discussion may center on this issue. This tendency is deeply 
grounded in the total "ideology" of our society with its roots in the 
utilitarian pattern of thought. It can be shown to be quite definitely 
wrong in this case. 

It is quite true, as has been pointed out in the discussion of the 
pattern of collectivity-orientation above, that the medical man is 
expected to place the welfare of the patient above his own self- 
interest, financial or otherwise. He is also explicitly debarred, in the 
code of medical ethics, from a whole series of practices which are 
taken for granted as quite legitimate for the honest and upright 
businessman, such as advertising, price-competition, refusing to 
take patients on the ground that they are not good "credit risks," 
etc. Thus the physician is both debarred from a variety of immediate 
opportunities for financial gain which are open to the businessman, 
and is positively enjoined to promote the welfare of his patients. It 
is not these facts which are at issue, but the interpretation of their 
meaning for motivation and the mechanisms of social control. 

It is quite possible that a selective process operates so that a 
career in medicine appeals to a more "service oriented" type of per- 
sonality than does a career in business. But even if this is a factor of 
considerable significance it is certainly not the only or even the 
principal one. For the question arises, would it really be to the self- 
interest of the normal physician to ignore the code of his profession 
and to gamer the financial rewards from advertising, from increas- 
ing his practice by undercutting the rates of his colleagues, and 
from excluding the bad credit risks. In general, assuming that the 
situation is institutionally well integrated, this would not be to his 
jnterest. For such action would impinge on both the interests and 
the sentiments of others in the situation. The consequences would 
take the form of a loss of professional standing which in turn would, 
if it went far enough, begin to show in quite tangible forms. Desir- 
able connections from financial, as well as other points of view, 
would become more difficult to form, or be endangered, such as 
hospital staff appointments or referrals of patients from other phy- 



Theoretical Conclusions [ 473 ] 

sicians. A staff appointment might be terminated, or not renewed. 
In the extreme case there might be the threat of disciphnary action 
on the part of the medical society. All along there would be a 
jeopardizing of the easy informal "belongingness" to a group who 
understand each other as to proper conduct. 

In other words, the collectivity-orientation of the professional 
pattern has become built into a set of institutionalized expectations 
of behavior and attitude. In conformity with the basic theorem of 
the institutional integration of motivation discussed in Chapter II, 
both self-interested and "altruistic" elements of motivation have 
thereby become channeled into the path of conformity with these 
expectations. Therefore the seeming paradox is realized that it is to 
a physician's self-interest to act contrary to his own self-interest— in 
an immediate situation, of course, not "in the long run." 

The difference between the professional pattern and that of the 
business world in this respect, which turns primarily on the variable 
of self- vs. collectivity-orientation, is thus in the first instance insti- 
tutional and not motivational. Whatever differences there may be 
from a psychological point of view between the typical motives of 
physicians and of businessmen, must be analyzed with this in mind, 
taking it as a starting point. It is a particularly vivid example of the 
importance of the sociological analysis of the social system for formu- 
lation of the problem of the analysis of motivation when the gen- 
eralization of the implications of that analysis is to be extended 
beyond the single individual to problems of significance to the 
social system.^^ 

§ SOME THEORETICAL CONCLUSIONS 

IN THE foregoing discussion we have not attempted to 
give anything like a full coverage of the facts relevant to the analysis 
of medical practice as a social system, and its place in the larger 
social system. We have, for example, not dealt with the processes of 
recruitment and training of the profession. We have not more than 
hinted at its very complex internal differentiations, or the large field 
of professional organization. Above all we have dealt only with a 

^^ This problem is somewhat further discussed in the two papers, "The Pro- 
fessions and Social Structure" and "The Motivation of Economic Activities," 
Essays in Sociological Theory, Chapters VIII and IX. 



[ 474 ] The Case of Modern Medical Practice 

kind of ideal type of the situation in a way which has ignored a 
whole range of what, relative to the technical and ethical standards 
of the best of tlie profession, are sub-standard and deviant practices. 
We have, however, presented enough material to justify certain 
conclusions which are of central significance to the present work. 
Our object was not to give a complete empirical review but only the 
facts most directly relevant to some of our main theoretical interests. 

The case selected for presentation was that of an occupational 
role. We are accustomed in the common sense of our culture to 
think of such a role in terms of the instrumental division of labor, 
a view which is correct and sound enough. We are accustomed to 
think of the incumbent of the role as "having something to sell," in 
this case a service, to people who have a need and know how to go 
about meeting that need. The place of technical competence based 
on scientific training is also in a broad way understood on a common- 
sense basis. 

In common-sense terms, however, it is far from possible to give 
an adequate account of how these functions of purveying a service 
to those who need it can in fact be effectively carried out under the 
actual conditions of the concrete social system. We have seen that 
with respect to the problems of health, as to many others, the treat- 
ment of practical problems in terms of applied science is not to be 
taken for granted, but is subject to special conditions in the cultural 
and social systems. We have seen that medical practice must be a 
part of the general institutionalization of scientific investigation and 
of the application of science to practical problems, which is a char- 
acteristic feature of modem Western society. 

In general in the instrumental division of labor, on the grounds 
we have adduced throughout this work, the institutionalization of 
all the roles in ways of which common sense is not at all or only very 
vaguely aware, is a functional requirement of the effective perform- 
ance of the role. We have not taken space to demonstrate that the 
role of physician, simply as one of the general class of occupational 
roles, is institutionalized, and what this institutionalization consists 
in; that can be taken for granted. 

We have, rather, concentrated on certain special features of the 
roles of both parties to the doctor-patient relationship, and their rela- 
tion to certain special features of the conditions in which the per- 



Theoretical Conclusions [ 475 ] 

formance of medical service takes place. There are perhaps two 
most general conclusions from consideration of these special fea- 
tures in terms of the conceptual scheme of this work. The first of 
these is that successful performance of those functions of medical 
practice, which are obvious to common sense, depends on a whole 
series of conditions, the necessity for which is not obvious. The 
second conclusion is that the ways in which both roles are institu- 
tionalized are related to aspects of the motivational balances of the 
social system, both in direct relation to health and in broader re- 
spects, in ways which are altogether inaccessible to common sense, 
and which admirably illustrate the general analysis of that motiva- 
tional balance of social processes which was presented in Chapters 
VI and VII above. 

With respect to the first context, the role of being sick as an 
institutionalized role may be said to constitute a set of conditions 
necessary to enable the physician to bring his competence to bear on 
the situation. It is not only that the patient has a need to be helped, 
but that this need is institutionally categorized, that the nature and 
implications of this need are socially recognized, and the kind of 
help, the appropriate general pattern of action in relation to the 
source of help, are defined. It is not only the sick person's own con- 
dition and personal reactions to what should be done about it which 
are involved, but he is placed in an institutionally defined frame- 
work which mobilizes others in his situation in support of the same 
patterns which are imputed to him, which is such an important fea- 
ture of his role. The fact that others than the patient himself often 
define that he is sick, or sick enough for certain measures to be 
taken, is significant. 

On the other side of the relationship, the collectivity-orientation 
of the physician, and its universalism, neutrality and specificity, 
make it possible for the things he has to do to perform his function 
to be made acceptable to the patient and his family. These include 
validation of his professional authority and justification of the 
"privileges" he must be accorded. 

A central aspect of this phase of the problem is that certain of 
the features of the role structure on both sides of the relationship 
are essential to bringing together the cultural and the situational 
elements of the action complex. It is possible to have a sick role, and 



[ 47^ ] ^^^ ^^^ ^f ^^odern Medical Practice 

to have treatment of illness institutionalized, where the role of 
therapist is not of the modem professional type. Treatment by kins- 
men is a common example. But if, as in our society, the primary 
cultural tradition defined as relevant to health is science, it is not 
possible to have the role of therapist institutionalized in the same 
pattern terms as those of kinship. Hence in addition to the sick role 
we may distinguish the role of -patient as the recipient of the services 
of a scientifically trained ■professional physician. The definition of 
the sick role as that of potential patient is one of its principal char- 
acteristics in our society. 

Finally, on this level we have shown that certain deviations from 
the ideal type of institutionalization of science and of rational action 
are found in the field of medical practice. These deviations are of 
two types: first, a deviation from the ideal t\^e of the institutional- 
ized belief system in the form of the prevalence of an element of 
pseudo-scientific belief in the eflBcacy of measures, a deviation which 
is continuous with the wider deviations to be found among the lay 
public. The second type of deviation is on the level of social organ- 
ization, and was illustrated by the case of the conspicuous reliance 
within the profession on informal sanction systems where from a 
"rational" point of view formal disciplinary machinery would be 
more appropriate. Both of these are to be regarded as adaptive 
phenomena of the general t\^e we have often spoken of. 

We may express the second main conclusion by saying that the 
sick role, including its aspect as patient, and the role of physician, 
both have latent functions with respect to the motivational balance 
of the social system which are of considerable significance. Some of 
the most important keys to the understanding of these latent func- 
tions are to be found in the psychiatrist's own analyses of the proc- 
esses of psychotherapy, but the significance even of these for the 
social system is only brought out when they are seen in their more 
general setting in the theory of the social system. Other elements 
necessary to the understanding of these functions are derived from 
the analysis of institutional structure, in its application to these roles 
and their interaction, and from bringing out the common elements 
as between the processes of the interaction of physician and patient, 
and those operating in a variety of other types of situation. 

The essential assumption in this connection is that illness is, in 



Theoretical Conclusions [ 477 ] 

one of its major aspects, to be defined as a form of deviant behavior, 
and that the elements of motivation to deviance which are expressed 
in the sick role are continuous with those expressed in a variety of 
other channels, including types of compulsive conformity which are 
not socially defined as deviant. Because of the element of fluidity in 
so much of the motivation to deviance, or more generally the reac- 
tions to strain, it is possible to regard illness as belonging to a system 
of alternative channels for the "acting out" of such motivational 
elements, hence as an integral part of a larger dynamic system of 
motivational balance. 

Seen in this perspective, both the sick role and that of the phy- 
sician assume significance as mechanisms of social control, not only 
within the bounds of the common-sense definition of the traditional 
functions of the physician, but much more broadly, including inti- 
mate relations to many phenomena which are not ordinarily thought 
to have any connection with health. 

The sick role is, as we have seen, in these terms a mechanism 
which in the first instance channels deviance so that the two most 
dangerous potentialities, namely, group formation and successful 
establishment of the claim to legitimacy, are avoided. The sick are 
tied up, not with other deviants to form a "sub-culture" of the sick, 
but each with a group of non-sick, his personal circle and, above all, 
physicians. The sick thus become a statistical status class and are 
deprived of the possibility of forming a solidary collectivity. Fur- 
thermore, to be sick is by definition to be in an undesirable state, 
so that it simply does not "make sense" to assert a claim that the 
way to deal with the frustrating aspects of the social system is "for 
everybody to get sick." 

These two functions of the sick role operate even if no thera- 
peutic influence is exerted, and their importance to the social system 
should not be underestimated. On this ground alone it is legitimate 
to question the adequacy of the common assertion that the increase 
in the proportion of mental illness is necessarily an index of increas- 
ing social disorganization. The fact may be provisionally granted, 
though because of shortcomings of the statistical information and 
of the fact that many conditions are now diagnosed as mental illness, 
which would not have been a generation ago, it might be ques- 
tioned. In any case such an increase need not, as is verv commonly 



[ 47^ ] The Case of Modern Medical Practice 

asserted, be a direct index of increasing general social disorganiza- 
tion. It is quite possible that it constitutes the diversion into the sick 
role of elements of deviant motivation which might have been ex- 
pressed in alternative roles. From the point of view of the stability 
of the social system the sick role may be less dangerous than some 
of the alternatives. 

However, obviously in addition to this insulating function of the 
sick role, there is its reintegrative influence. The significance of this 
is greatly enhanced by two factors. The first is that deliberate 
psychotherapy is, even within the role of the physician, not an iso- 
lated phenomenon, but may be regarded as the specialization of 
features of that role which are present in what has sometimes been 
called the "art of medicine." All good medical practice therefore, 
we have maintained, has been and is to some degree psychotherapy. 
Psychotherapy as a mechanism of social control, therefore, builds 
on and extends what must be regarded as an "automatic" or latent 
set of mechanisms which have been built into the role of physician 
independent of an application of theories as to what psychotherapy, 
or social control processes, should be. Deliberate psychotherapy is, 
to use a graphic metaphor, only the part of the iceberg which ex- 
tends above the water. The considerably larger part is that below 
the surface of the water. Even its existence has been largely un- 
known to most psychiatrists, to say nothing of laymen. It consists in 
certain institutional features of the physician's role in its particular 
form of meshing with the sick role. 

But even more important is the second fact, the continuity of 
the fundamental processes of psychotherapy with the general proc- 
esses of "coping" successfully with the psychological consequences 
of the exposure of people to strain in social relationships. This 
means not only that, as just stated, the motivational materials which 
enter into illness are continuous with those expressed in many other 
forms of deviance, but also that the mechanism of control of psycho- 
therapy is one of a much larger class of such mechanisms. In turn, a 
clue to what these are is provided by the element of unconscious 
psychotherapy we have shown to be present in the doctor-patient 
role relationship. The elements involved have been discussed with 
examples in the latter part of Chapter VII and need not be re- 
peated here. 



Theoretical Conclusions [ 479 ] 

A very important set of problems arises, however, with respect to 
the generality of that analysis. The modern physician's role con- 
stitutes a very distinctive type of social structure. It is far too dis- 
tinctive alone to form the basis for the generalizations about the 
relations between motivation to deviance and ihe mechanisms of 
social control which we have set forth. But we have shown that it is 
possible to modify our analysis of the factors involved in the moti- 
vational processes to take account of variations of role structure. In 
other types of roles some of the things which happen in psycho- 
therapy are clearly not possible; thus in general parental roles are 
not capable of reintegrating the deviant once the vicious circle of 
alienation has reached the neurotic stage of elaboration. But in spite 
of this fact the fundamental processes involved in normal socializa- 
tion and those involved in psychotherapy have crucially important 
elements in common, along with the obvious differences. Focusing 
attention on these common elements thus makes it possible to pose 
in a sharply meaningful way such questions as that of the sig- 
nificance of the existence of two parents, whereas there is normallv 
only one psychotherapist. Similarly we have tried to show that in 
much magical and religious ritual, in secondary institutions, and in 
much of the wider institutional patterning of the social system, there 
are latent functions of social control, the operation of which must 
be understood to an important degree in the same fundamental 
terms as are involved in the operation of psychotherapy. 

Thus the analysis of modem medical practice has not only given 
us a "case study" of a type of social structure which is interesting 
and significant in itself, and as a way of applying a theoretical 
paradigm for the analysis of social structure. More than that it has 
opened a "window" which can be used for the observation of balanc- 
ing processes within the social system, which have generalized sig- 
nificance far beyond the "room" within the larger edifice of society 
into which this particular window opens. 



YT 

J. \_X THE PROCESSES OF 
CHANGE OF SOCIAL SYSTEMS 



IN THE foregoing chapters of this work we have been 
concerned with two fundamental areas of theoretical problems. The 
list of these has been the attempt to work out a conceptual scheme 
n which the major structural components of the social system could 
be identified, described ^and their interrelations in systems, both as 
ntemally differentiated and as variable from case to case, worked 
out. The second major problem area of our concern has been the 
analysis of motivational processes within the system. In order to 
nake our treatment logically complete, we must now turn briefly to 
a third set of problems, those concerned with processes of change of 
the system itself, that is, processes resulting in changes in the struc- 
ture of the system. 

For reasons which we must now try to make clear, the treatment 
of this third set of problems comes in the present scheme logically 
last, and presupposes some level of theoretical solution of the other 
two. This is true so far as the central point of reference is, as we 
have consistently attempted to make it, the concept of system. It is, 
of course, entirely possible and appropriate to theorize about many 
funicular processes of change within social systems, without at- 
tempting to build up a theory of the processes of change of social 
systems as systems. It is this latter task which logically presupposes 
a theory of social structure and a theory of motivational process 
within the system. 

480 



The Problem of the Theory of Change [ 481 ] 

§ THE PROBLEM OF THE THEORY OF CHANGE 

BEFORE clarifying this statement further it is necessary to 
distinguish clearly between the processes within the system and 
processes of change of the system. It is very common to confuse these 
two things under the term "dynamic." For the purposes of our con- 
ceptual scheme the distinction derives from the concept of equilib- 
rium and the way in which this has been used in the present work. 
Beyond the most general meaning of the concept of equilibrium, the 
meaning which is most directly applicable here is that applying to 
what we have called a "boundary-maintaining" system. 

It has been clearly and repeatedly brought out that it is essen- 
tial to the conception of the interaction process put forward in this 
work, and of the theorem of the institutional integration of motiva- 
tion which was directly derived from that conception, that the sta- 
bilization of the processes of mutual orientation within comple- 
mentary roles is a fundamental "tendency" of interaction. We have 
used the conception of such a stabilized interaction process through- 
out as the major point of reference for the analysis of motivational 
process. This is another way of stating that we have treated the con- 
tinuation of such a stabilized process without change in the struc- 
ture of the roles, as not problematical for the theory of social systems. 
It was clearly recognized in Chapter VI, where this proposition was 
first stated, that this was a theoretical assumption, not an emfirical 
generalization. But as such it is one of the central strategic elements 
of the present conceptual scheme. It was, however, also recognized 
that the equilibrium formulated in these terms could be a moving 
equilibrium where certain orderly processes of empirical change 
were going on. 

Seen from this point of view, the theory of motivational process 
within the system is built about the processes of maintenance of 
equilibrium. Besides the unproblematical continuance of interaction 
which was assumed to go on, this maintenance of equilibrium, as we 
have seen, revolves about two fundamental types of process. The 
first of these are the processes of socialization by which actors acquire 
the orientations necessary to the performance of their roles in the 
social system, when they have not previously possessed them; the 
second type are the processes involved in the balance between the 



[ 482 ] The Processes of Change of Social Systejns 

generation of motivations to deviant behavior and the counterbal- 
ancing motivations to restoration of the stabihzed interactive process 
which we have called the mechanisms of social control. 

The special methodological significance of this approach to the 
analysis of motivational process, i.e., of "dynamics," lies in two inter- 
related sets of considerations. The first of these is the implication of 
the fact that we are dealing with the boundary-maintaining type of 
system. The definition of a system as boundary-maintaining is a way 
of saying that, relative to its environment, that is to fluctuations in 
the factors of the environment, it maintains certain constancies of 
pattern, whether this constancy be static or moving. These elements 
of the constancy of pattern must constitute a fundamental point of 
reference for the analysis of process in the system. From a certain 
point of view these processes are to be defined as the processes of 
maintenance of the constant patterns. But of course these are em- 
pirical constancies, so we do not assume any inherent reason why 
they have to be maintained. It is simply a fact that, as described in 
terms of a given frame of reference, these constancies are often 
found to exist, and theory can thus be focused on the problems 
presented by their existence. They may cease to exist, by the dis- 
solution of the distinctive boundary-maintaining system and its 
assimilation to the environment, or by transformation into other 
patterns. But the fact that they do exist, at given times and places, 
still serves as the theoretical focus for analysis. 

Theory, relative to such systems, is directed to the analysis of 
the conditions under which such a given constant system pattern 
will be maintained and conversely, the conditions under which it 
will be altered in determinate ways. This, we may surmise, is the 
fundamental basis of the assumption of our "law of inertia" of social 
process.^ What this theorem does is to state the fundamental point 
of reference for the theoretical analysis of process in the social 
system. The analysis of the conditions or factors affecting motiva- 
tional process is always stated in terms relative to this point of refer- 
ence. The frohlem is always some version of the problem why, given 
a certain change in the relevant conditions, the constant pattern 
which is the point of reference is altered in a certain way or, con- 
versely, why it fails to be altered in the face of certain alterations in 

^ This conception is similar to that of homeostasis in physiology. 



The Problem of the Theory of Change [ 483 ] 

the conditions. The latter question is always implicit in the problem 
structure, the problems of theory, that is, revolve about the condi- 
tions of maintenance and alteration of equilibria which are defined 
as the empirically observed pattern-constancies of a boundary-main- 
taining system. The essential point is that for there to be a theory of 
change of pattern, under these methodological assumptions, there 
must be an initial and a terminal pattern to be used as points of 
reference. We have given an example of processes of change in this 
sense in our analysis of the socialization of the child. Clear defini- 
tion of the patterns into which he is being socialized is, within our 
conceptual scheme, a logical prerequisite of successful analysis of 
the process by which the necessary conditions of action within that 
pattern come to be established. 

The second set of considerations constitute implications of the 
fact that we are operating on the level of theory which we have 
called "structural-functional." The two are interdependent in that 
for such theory to have relevance it must apply to a boundary- 
maintaining type of system, because only in this way can the system 
to which such a theory is applied be delimited. But, in addition to 
this fact, the crucial characteristic of structural-functional theory is 
its use of the concept system without a com-plete knowledge of the 
laws which determine 'processes within the system.. 

The gap produced by our fragmentary knowledge of laws is 
filled, or better, bridged, in two ways. The first is the use of struc- 
tural categories. By their use we are enabled to achieve a systematic 
and precise description of the states of systems, of the variations in 
the state of the same system through time and of the similarities and 
differences between different systems. Such description is couched 
in terms which we have excellent reason to believe will connect 
directly with, if not incorporate, the values of the most significant 
variables of the theory of action. This, along with the possibility of 
taxonomic systemization, is the fundamental reason why it has been 
so important to derive our categories of the structure of the social 
system from the essential features of the frame of reference of action 
itself. As the case of the classical mechanics so clearly shows, it is in 
terms of the logical requirements of the frame of reference that the 
fundamental variables of the theoretical system are defined. 

Structural categories can, however, in combination vdth certain 



[ 484 ] The Processes of Change of Social Systems 

other things, carry us beycnd description as such. If they describe 
the structure of an empirical system in generaHzed terms, we can, 
by going back to the relevant aspects of the frame of reference, say 
something about what we have called the "functional prerequisites" 
of empirical systems, and developing further from there, about what, 
in Chapter V we have called the "imperatives" of the particular type 
of empirical system. If, then, we can regard certain structural fea- 
tures of the system as empirically given, the relevant facts are not 
merely of descriptive significance. We can make inferences from 
them, at least to the extent of saying that if these facts are given the 
range of variation of other facts about the same system must be 
limited in certain respects. It is this type of reasoning which we em- 
ployed in Chapter V to approach the orderly analysis of types of 
social system. It should be clear that when we say that a structure 
in the social system is empirically given, e.g., the "conjugal" type 
of kinship structure, we mean that the processes within the relevant 
sub-system of the society may be assumed to be in a sufficiendy 
stable state of equilibrium so that within a defined range of varia- 
tion in other respects this structure, i.e., this "system pattern," can 
be assumed to be constant. Obviously the use of structural cate- 
gories for explanatory purposes in this way is dependent on the 
assumption that the constancy of pattern to which we have referred 
has some empirical significance. But if this were not true we clearly 
would not be dealing with a boundary-maintaining type of system 
at all. 

In our two chapters dealing with motivational process we were 
able to go an important step beyond reliance on structural impera- 
tives alone for explanatory generalization. We used the analysis of 
structure in the interactive process, notably the structure of roles, 
and the institutionalization and internalization of patterns of value- 
orientation in the definition of role-expectations, to define the prob- 
lems of motivational process in interactive relationships in such ways 
that the orientation variables of the theory of action enter both into 
the motivational process in the personalities of individual actors and 
into the social structure in definable ways. Above all, using these pat- 
terns of value-orientation as our major point of reference, their 
acquisition for the analysis of socialization, and conformity with 
them as the major axis of variation for that of deviance and social 



The Prohlem of the Theory of Change [ 485 ] 

control, we were able to work out a substantially complete 'paradigm 
of motivational process within the social system. 

It is extremely important to be clear that what we have presented 
in these two chapters is a paradigm and not a theory, in the usual 
sense of the latter term as a system of laws. This is almost another 
way of saying that we have had to formulate the concepts of moti- 
vational process as mechanisms, not as laws. 

It is indeed the use of the concept of mechanism with its con- 
sistent reference to relevance to the system, which has enabled us 
to achieve systematization in this field on the paradigmatic level. 

To say that we have achieved a paradigm and not a theory is not 
to say that no knowledge of laws is involved. For example, the 
statements to the effect that strain, defined as some combination of 
one or more of the factors of withdrawal of support, interference 
with permissiveness, contravention of internalized norms and refusal 
of approval for valued performance, results in such reactions as 
anxiety, phantasy, hostile impulses and resort to the defensive- 
adjustive mechanisms, are definitely statements of laws of motiva- 
tional process. Without a good deal of such knowledge the paradigm 
would not be possible. But this knowledge is, relative to the empirical 
problems to be solved, fragmentary and incomplete. The paradigm 
primarily accomplishes two things. First, it serves to mobilize such 
knowledge of laws as we have in terms of its relevance to the 
problems of the explanation of processes in the social system. 
Secondly, it gives us canons for the significant statement of problems 
for research so that knowledge of laws can be extended. Thus for a 
complete account of the processes of socialization of the child we 
need to know much more of the relations between certain variations 
in the character of the parental roles, and the processes of determina- 
tion of alternative outcomes in the personality structure of the 
child. To state the problem in terms of specific characteristics of 
the roles of the parents as conceptualized in the terms set forth in 
this work is a very different thing from merely inquiring, "what 
kinds of influences of parents are important?" as so much of psychi- 
atric theory has done. In so far as it does not directly incorporate 
knowledge of laws, then, a paradigm is a set of canons for the 
statement of problems, in such terms as to ensure that the answers 
to the questions asked will prove to be of generalized significance. 



[ 486 ] The Processes of Change of Social Systems 

because they will state or imply definite relations between the 
fundamental variables of a system. 

It is of the greatest importance to note that the paradigm of 
motivational process we have set forth is independent of the 'particu- 
lar structure of roles in an interaction process. It is a generalized 
paradigm which can be used to analyze any motivational process in 
any role system. It is this generality which makes it possible to 
incorporate what knowledge of laws in the field of motivational 
process we have, and to state problems of research— the answers to 
which should be capable of incorporation into a general body of 
laws. At the same time, however, the system of structural categories 
in terms of which the particular roles are analyzed has a comparable 
order of generality and the two elements of theory are parts of the 
same more general system, the theory of action. It is this which 
makes it possible to think that the present work constitutes a step 
toward the development of a generalized theoretical system. 

It is a necessary inference from the above considerations that 
a general theory of the processes of change of social systems is not 
possible in the present state of knowledge. The reason is very simply 
that such a theory would imply complete knowledge of the laws of 
process of the system and this knowledge we do not possess. The 
theory of change in the structure of social systems must, therefore, 
be a theory of particular sub-processes of change within such sys- 
tems, not of the over-all processes of change of the systems as 
systems. 

But by the same token it should be clear, that so far as our 
knowledge goes beyond description and sheer empirical generaliza- 
tion it is always to some degree knowledge of processes of change. 
It is not possible to segregate theoretical knowledge of the laws of 
the processes within systems, and of their processes of change. They 
are both different contexts of application of our knowledge of the 
relations between variations of conditions and the outcomes of proc- 
esses going forward under the conditions in question. When, there- 
fore, we combine our knowledge of structural imperatives in the 
above sense, our paradigmatic knowledge of motivational process, 
and our fragmentary knowledge of laws, we do in fact have con- 
siderable knowledge of many processes of change, and the progress 
of research will steadily increase it. 



The Problem of the Theory of Change [ 487 ] 

We have been speaking of theoretical knowledge of processes of 
change within the theory of social systems in the sense of this work. 
There are two other types of knowledge which have a bearing on 
the empirical understanding of such processes in the concrete which 
must be mentioned to avoid possible confusion. 

The first of these is sheer empirical generalization. It is quite 
possible, indeed common, to know that certain processes of change 
do in fact typically take place under certain conditions without being 
able to deduce the pattern of the processes and of their outcome 
from knowledge of the laws of a system. It is also possible to have 
considerable knowledge about variations in conditions and a variety 
of specific consequences of such variations for the system. A familiar 
example of this type of knowledge is knowledge of the oudine of 
the biological life cycle. There is, in biological science, no general 
theory of the life cycle, by which growth, its cessation at maturity, 
senescence and finally death can be systematically explained in 
terms of general laws. But it is known that organisms go through 
this typical cycle, and its broad division into phases is established 
on the level of empirical generalization. There is much theoretical 
knowledge of various processes within the organism, some of which 
bears on the shift from one phase of the cycle to another, for in- 
stance regarding the effects of sex hormones on the organism, fol- 
lowing the maturation of the gonads. There is also considerable 
knowledge of the consequences of disturbances of the normal cycle, 
as through various kinds of malnutrition. But a general theory of 
the life cycle is still lacking. 

Though it has frequently been claimed by such authors as 
Spengler, or the older evolutionists, to exist, the present evidence 
indicates that there is no over-all simple empirical pattern of the 
development of social systems generally through a series of phases 
which is comparable to the biological life cycle. At least one major 
reason for this would seem to be the part played in social systems 
by culture, and the facts, first, that culture does not develop in a 
single linear pattern, and, second, that it can be acquired by dif- 
fusion so that any internal developmental process can be profoundly 
influenced from outside in ways to which organisms are not sus- 
ceptible of influence. 

There are, however, typical processes of change from given 



[ 488 j The Processes of Change of Social Systems 

starting points in social systems which can be identified by em- 
pirical generalization. We have made use of these in our discussion 
of the empirical clusterings of the elements of social structure in 
Chapter V, and will comment on some of them further below. 

The second type of knowledge, and hence of explanatory hy- 
potheses which can bear on the concrete problems of change in 
social systems, derives from the analysis of the empirical significance 
of variables which are not part of the theoretical system with which 
vie have been working. There are two classes of such variables. 
These are the variables which concern the constitution of the 
organism so far as it is independent of the factors of orientation of 
action, and those which concern the physical environment. It is 
clear that they are logically independent of the theory of action, but 
equally clear that their impingement on concrete systems of action is 
of the first order of empirical significance. A third set of variables, 
those involved in the cultural factor, is in a different status. The 
theory of culture is an integral part of the theory of action. But there 
are phases of it which should not be regarded as parts of the theory 
of the social system, but as data for that theory. This concerns the 
existence and possible influence of inherent "configurations" of the 
development of culture pattern systems, as this process has been 
analyzed by Kroeber.^ 

It should be quite clear that throughout this work we have 
deliberately refrained from attempting to deal with the influence 
on concrete social phenomena of the variables of genetics or physi- 
ology or of the variables of the physical aspects of the situation. 
We have been exceedingly careful to keep the place for dealing with 
their empirical influence open, and at many points have clearly 
delineated this place. Above all various fundamental aspects of 
these two categories have found a place in our system of points 
of reference for the analysis of the orientation of action. But quite 
clearly we have advanced no theory of the interdependence of social 
action processes and the biological and physical factors of their de- 
termination. This would be an exceedingly important task for social 
science, and the failure to attempt it here is in no way meant to 
imply a suggestion that it is not important. The only remark in order 
is that it is much more likely to be done successfully if the theory of 

2 Cf. ConfiguTations of Culture Growth. 



The Problem of the Theory of Change [ 489 ] 

action itself is well developed, so that the nature of articulation can 
be precisely formulated, than if, as has been the rule in the past, 
such theories are motivated largely by a conviction that these non- 
action variables are "very important" and therefore the person in- 
terested in them chooses to deal exclusively with them without 
explicit reference to the categories of the theory of action. 

It should be made very clear, then, that the theory of action, 
so far as it is in any sense a logically closed system, which is an 
open question, can be so only on an analytical level, most definitely 
not as a system of empirical generalizations. 

It is a notable fact, which may be mentioned here, that where 
attempts have been made to formulate generalized theories of the 
processes of change in concrete social systems, they have very fre- 
quently laid the primary emphasis on these variables outside the 
system of action orientation. It is inevitable in view of the logical 
structure of these outside variables that these theories should be 
built about the variables included in the two categories of heredity 
and environment in the biological sense. In this class should above 
all be placed the whole class of theories sometimes called those of 
"Social Darwinism," which attempted to treat the development of 
societies in terms of the application of the law of natural selection. 
The difHculties which these theories as general theories of social 
process have encountered are so well known that they need not de- 
tain us further here.^ The environmental emphasis is found, for 
example, in the case of the climatological explanations of social 
change. 

Quite clearly, unless the analysis of social systems in terms of the 
theory of action is fundamentally wrong or purely epiphenomenal 
so as to be of no independent empirical relevance, such theories 
of social process, exclusively formulated in terms of biological vari- 
ables or those of the physical environment, could not be empirically 
satisfactory. But this fact should not blind us to the importance of 
the variables themselves. Particularly the field of population is un- 
doubtedly of great significance as a field of articulation of the theory 
of action and that of the genetic constitution of human organisms, 
and the variations and distribution of variations of this constitution 

^ The problem is analyzed in The Structure of Social Action, Chapter III 
and passim. 



[ 49° ] ^^^ Processes of Change of Social Systems 

in terms of interdependence with the processes of the social system 
as formulated in action terms. Somewhat similarly the field of hu- 
man geography may be conceived as the primary field for the for- 
mulation of the interdependences between social action and the 
physical environment. 

The case of cultural factors is, as we have noted, somewhat dif- 
ferent. Culture is an integral part of action as here conceived. The 
essential point here, however, is that the theory of the social system, 
as a branch of the theory of action, is not directly concerned with 
the dynamics of culture any more than it is with the theory of per- 
sonality as such. It assumes certain facts about culture as given and 
investigates the significance of these facts for the processes of the so- 
cial system. It is not a theory of culture in the sense in which that 
will be discussed in the next chapter. But we have given ample 
proof of the importance of very detailed and explicit concern udth 
many of the problems of culture for the theory of the social system. 

There is a certain parallel with respect to generalization about 
social change in the concrete sense between heredity and environ- 
ment theories on the one hand and cultural theories on the other. 
It is logically possible, that is, to escape certain implications of our 
imperfect knowledge of the laws of social process, if one assumes 
explicitly or implicitly, that, subject to certain pre-action conditions 
in the environment and the organism, 'process of change in the so- 
cial system is exclusively determined by its culture and the con- 
figurational processes of culture development. This was indeed the 
primary logical basis of the seeming adequacy of most evolutionary 
theories of social development, in that the essential factor was held 
to be the cumulative development of empirical knowledge. Some- 
what similar tendencies with emphasis on other elements of the 
cultural tradition have appeared, diflFering greatly among them- 
selves, in the theories of such diverse authors as Leslie White, Soro- 
kin and Ruth Benedict. 

§ THE GENERAL NATURE OF CHANGE IN 
SOCIAL SYSTEMS 

WE MAY take for granted, then, that when we discuss the 
theory of change in social systems, for our purposes we are abstract- 
ing from the influence of variability in biological constitution or in 



The General Nature of Change in Social Systems [ 491 ] 

the physical environment. Though in a strict sense even within these 
hmitations we have asserted that a general theory of the change 
of social systems is not possible, we can still say a number of em- 
pirically relevant things about the general nature of such processes, 
which derive from the fact that they are processes occurring within 
the social system. These general considerations can serve as a back- 
ground for the discussion of a few selected empirical processes in 
the latter part of the chapter. 

The first consideration involves what we may call the phenome- 
non of vested interests. This derives from the nature of the processes 
of equilibrium in a boundary-maintaining type of system. The spe- 
cific application of the idea of equilibrium which is of concern to 
us is one aspect of the phenomenon of institutionalization. Institu- 
tionalization produces, as we have seen, a form of the integration of 
the need-dispositions of the relevant actors with a set of culture 
patterns which always include in one sense patterns of value- 
orientation. We have defined strain in the technical sense of our 
discussion as disturbance of the expectation system which is an es- 
sential part of this integration. Strain in this sense always, i.e., by 
definition, sets up re-equilibrating processes. In terms of personality 
as a system this is precisely what is meant by the mechanisms of 
defense and of adjustment. It is thus in the nature of this type of 
integration of the action system that it should be resistant to change 
in certain respects. So far as it impinges on institutionalized patterns 
of action and relationship, therefore, change is never just "alteration 
of pattern" but alteration hy the overcoming of resistance. 

There is one apparent exception to this. Certain processes of 
empirical change are themselves institutionalized. There are in turn 
two types of cases of this. One of these is exemplified by the insti- 
tutionalization of scientific investigation as this has already been 
analyzed and will be further below. Here the institutionalized value 
patterns will allow for and directly promote change in the cognitive 
content of the relevant part of the culture. Hence the resistance to 
change of which we are speaking would in this case focus on any 
attempt to stop the equilibrated process of change by stabilizing not 
the action process but the cultural content. We shall discuss some 
further implications of this case in a later section. It is one we pri- 



[ 49^ ] ^^^^ Processes of Change of Social Systems 

marily had in mind in saying diat the equihbration of social proc- 
esses could take the form of a moving, not a static equilibrium. 

Though it is not as such a process of change in the structure of 
the larger social system, the second type can be exemplified by so- 
cialization. We have assumed, that at various stages the child 
does reach a relatively stabilized pattern of interaction with the par- 
ents, for example, in the early love-attachment to the mother. For 
the process of socialization to proceed further, however, this equi- 
librium must be upset. Strain, that is, must be imposed, and a new 
equilibrium signifying the internalization of new value patterns, 
attained. Here we find in the social system specific mechanisms 
which first impose the strain, that is, "pry" the child loose from his 
equilibrated orientation, and secondly, provide ways of "coping" 
with the strain so that neurotic motivational structures are not built 
up— in the "normal" case, of course. In the sub-system of the family 
this is, of course, a process of social change, and similar processes 
operate in the wider system. 

The term vested interests seems appropriate to designate this 
general resistance to change which is inherent in the institutionaliza- 
tion of roles in the social system. The term interest in this usage 
must, of course, be interpreted in the broad sense in which we used 
it in Chapter II. It is not confined to "economic" or "material" in- 
terests though it may include them. It is fundamentally the interest 
in maintaining the gratifications involved in an established system 
of role-expectations, which are, be it noted, gratifications of need- 
dispositions, not of "drives" in the simple hedonistic sense. It clearly 
includes the interest in conformity with institutionalized expecta- 
tions, of the affectively neutral and often the moral type. Of course 
it also includes the interest in the relational rewards of love, ap- 
proval and esteem. The phenomenon of vested interests, then, may 
be treated as always lying in the background of the problem of 
social change. With the exception of processes of institutionalized 
change, change in the social system is possible only by the opera- 
tion of mechanisms which overcome the resistance of vested in- 
terests. It is, therefore, always essential explicitly to analyze the struc- 
ture of the relevant vested interest complex before coming to any 
judgment of the probable outcome of the incidence of forces making 
for change. These considerations will often yield the answer to the 



The General Nature of Change in Social Systems [ 493 ] 

questions of why processes of change either fail to occur altogether 
or fail to have the outcomes which would be predicted on a common- 
sense basis. 

The next main consideration is that on general grounds we are 
able to say that there are no one or two inherently primary sources 
of impetus to change in social systems. This is true both in general 
and with reference to particular types of social system. The "dom- 
inant factor" theories, which were so popular a generation ago, that 
is, with reference to the priority of economic factors, of the genetic 
constitution, of organisms or of "ideas," have no generalized basis 
in the theory of the social system. 

The impetus to a process of change may perfectly well originate 
in the development of a cultural configuration, such as a develop- 
ment of science, or of religious ideas. It may also perfectly well 
originate in a change in the genetic constitution of the population, 
or a shift in the physical environment such as the exhaustion of a 
strategic resource. If a primary origin lies in the field of techno- 
logical applications of scientific knowledge there is likely to be a 
development of science itself in the background, though certainly 
the process of invention is in important respects independent of that 
of science. Another very important possibility lies in the progressive 
increase of strains in one strategic area of the social structure which 
are finally resolved by a structural reorganization of the system. The 
conception of strain developed in this study is such that strain is not 
itself a "prime-mover," it is a mode of the impingement of other 
factors on an interaction system. But a structured strain may well 
be the point at which the balance between forces tending toward re- 
equilibration of the previous structure and toward transition to a 
new structure may be most evident. 

As our knowledge of the laws of social process develops we will 
be able to say more and more about the conditions under which 
certain types of states of affairs in various parts of social systems, 
and in the external variables impinging on them, tend to lead to 
various types of change. But the view that there is no simple in- 
trinsic priority in the factors of the initiation of change is inherent 
in the conception of the social system which we have advanced 
here. The central methodological principle of our theory is that of 
the interdependence of a plurality of variables. At a variety of points 



[ 494 ] ^^^^ Processes of Change of Social Systems 

empirical relationships between these variables can be demonstrated 
which, as in the case of the empirical clusterings we have reviewed, 
limit the range of logically possible variability. But these limitations 
must be empirically demonstrated. To lay down a general theory 
of the priority of factors in social change is, in the present state of 
knowledge, to beg the question of the empirical interdependences 
which have yet to be demonstrated. We, therefore, put forward 
what we may call the conception of the plurality of possible origins 
of change with the understanding that change may originate in 
any part of the social system described in structural terms or in 
terms of variables, and that restrictions on the generality of this 
statement may be introduced only as the outcome of empirical dem- 
onstration that relations of interdependence are such that certain 
parts cannot be independent sources of the impetus to change. 

Probably considerably more important than the problems of the 
initiating factors of processes of social change, are those concerned 
with tracing the repercussions of a change once initiated through- 
out the social system, including the "backwash" of modification of 
the original direction of change. It is here above all that the concep- 
tion of the social system as a system is crucial. The combination of 
our scheme for the analysis of the structure of the system with the 
paradigm of motivational process gives us a genuinely technical 
basis for tackling such a problem, for asserting some propositions 
about such repercussions and for locating the problems which can- 
not be solved without further empirical investigation. 

In addition to the arbitrariness of the assumptions as to what 
were the most important prime movers of change made in so many 
of the early generalized theories of social change, such theories have 
almost unifoimly committed the error of postulating the continuance 
of a trend without taking account of the interdependence of the 
factors involved in the trend with the other variables in the social 
system. This has been particularly conspicuous in the case of the 
theories which have placed primary emphasis on the development 
of empirical knowledge as a linear evolutionary process. 

It is, of course, evident and important that such general theories 
of social change have had a strong ideological character and that 
the motivations for their acceptance have not been organized ac- 



The General Nature of Change in Social Systems [ 495 ] 

cording to the highest levels of the discipline of scientific investiga- 
tion. It is furtlier true that the theorists at the time did not have at 
their disposal anything like the resources for analysis of social sys- 
tems which we now have, so that many features of such theories 
which are unacceptable to the contemporary social scientist are 
quite understandable in the light of the historical circumstances at 
the time. But these facts do not alter the great importance of making 
the fullest possible use of our own available resources for refinement 
of the analysis of such processes.^ Rather than attempting to develop 
this very fundamental point further in abstract terms, we shall pres- 
endy analyze a few examples of types of process of change which 
can illustrate how the analysis of repercussions can be carried out. 

For such an analysis we have certain resources which we can 
utilize. First, we can describe the initial state of the system, into 
which the process of change enters, in precise and technical terms, 
which among other things can clearly reveal whether the empirical 
evidence is adequate. Secondly, in the same terms, those describing 
the structure of a social system, we can specify what has changed 
into what and through what intermediate stages. If the process has 
only begun we can specify its direction relative to the various parts 
of the system. 

Third, we can invoke our knowledge of the two classes of struc- 
tural imperatives of social systems, the general ones and those pe- 
culiar to the specific type of system. In these terms we can ask 
whether the change tends to violate any of these imperatives, to 
jeopardize the motivational needs of important groups in the popu- 
lation, to weaken the controls over important parts of the power sys- 
tem, to upset the balance in the reward system in specific ways, or 
to introduce a structure which is incompatible in certain respects 
with other concrete structures in the system. When any of these 

* Of course shift in the character of ideologies, which in turn is in part, 
though only in part, a function of the development of scientific knowledge, has 
played an important part in shifting the climate of opinion of social science in 
the past two generations. On the technical side the statement of Pareto in The 
Mind and Society is probably still the best statement in general methodological 
terms of the significance of interdependence of variables in a system for analysis 
of the problems of change. Pareto's views on these subjects are summarized in the 
Structure of Social Action, Chapters V-VIII, especially VII. 



[ 49^ ] '^^^ Processes of Change of Social Systems 

"problems" can be precisely identified and stated we can then pro- 
ceed to analyze the processes of adaptation and adjustment which 
ensue from the introduction of a change. 

For this purpose the paradigm of motivational process is funda- 
mental. Because of the phenomenon of vested interests, as we have 
called it, we may assume that the introduction of the change in the 
relevant part of the system imposes strains on the actors in those 
other parts on which the change impinges. The reactions to these 
strains constitute the tendencies to re-equilibration of the system, 
that is, to the elimination of the change and the restoration of the 
state of the system before its introduction. But these forces may 
be "coped with" so that the change becomes consolidated and per- 
haps extended. But unless the system is in the relevant respects 
exceedingly loosely integrated, this consolidation will mean that the 
other parts of the system than the original area of change have also 
been changed, so that eventually what is reached is a new state of 
the system as a whole. It may also, of course, mean that the strains 
are only partially coped with so that chronic states of tension come 
to be institutionalized and more or less stabilized. 

§ THE DIRECTION OF CHANGE IN 
SOCIAL SYSTEMS 

BEFORE going on to the analysis of a few concrete types of 
process of change, we may discuss briefly the problem of whether 
on general theoretical grounds we can say anything at all about 
directions of change in social systems. Though obviously this sub- 
ject must be treated with great caution, there are certain implica- 
tions of the general nature of action and of social systems which can 
be brought to bear on it. In so far as the theory of action is able 
to demonstrate its empirical validity at all, these considerations must 
be of some empirical significance. 

Action is, as we have seen, a set of oriented processes. The con- 
cept of orientation is inherently a directional concept. There are 
furthermore, it seems, two fundamental aspects of the orientation 
of action, two major vectors of its directionality, namely, that of 
gratification and that of patterning, or organization, of value-realiza- 
tion as we might put it. 

The first of these we have conceptualized as the trend to the 



The Direction of Change in Social Systems [ 497 ] 

optimization of gratification.^ By definition, in the theory oF action 
it does not make sense for an actor to seek deprivation and avoid 
gratification. What in common-sense terms is interpreted to be ac- 
tion not oriented to gratification or positively seeking deprivations 
must be interpreted in one of two ways. It may be simply a matter 
of terminology, as when in certain religious patterns of thought 
"spiritual" needs are set over against worldly gratifications. But in 
action terms we have no hesitation in speaking of the gratification 
of "spiritual" need-dispositions, provided we are able to give a satis- 
factory account of the sense in which these are need-dispositions. 
The second interpretation is that in terms of strains and conflicts 
within a system of action. In this sense an act of suicide would not 
be interpreted as motivated by a simple wish to die, but as what was 
felt by the actor to be the least intolerable resolution of an intoler- 
able conflict situation, therefore, as in some sense a minimization 
of relative deprivation. We may presume that most such conflicts 
are internal to the personality, but in principle the action of the 
suicide is similar to that of the man who would face certain death 
or bring it on himself rather than face the certainty of prolonged 
torture. The situation of the suicide is in that sense to him desperate. 
There is one fundamental reason, however, why the trend to the 
optimization of gratification cannot serve as a canon for defining a 
fundamental directionality of change for social systems generally.* 
This reason is that the social system transcends the life span of the 
individual actor and is in certain other respects independent of par- 
ticular individual actors, whereas gratification is inherently a state of 
the individual actor, of his personality as a system. This is in fact 
the old dilemma of hedonism. There is literally no way of making 
the transition in gratification-deprivation terms from the individual 
actor to the social system. There is such a thing as integration of a 
social system, but most specifically and definitely there is no such 
thing as a state of gratification of social systems. If there is no such 
thing as such a state, obviously there can be no trend to quantitative 

^ Most fully discussed in Values, Motives and Systems of Action, Chapter 11. 

^ This reason was clearly understood by Durkheim, probably for the first time 
within what may broadly be called the "utilitarian" and biological orientations of 
modem social thought. He stated it in the Division of Labor in his analyses of 
the reasons why the desire to increase "happiness" could not account for the de- 
velopment of the division of labor. 



[ 49^ ] ^^^ Processes of Change of Social Systems 

increase in it. The state of gratification of individuals on the other 
hand is a function of their integration in a particular social system, 
hence this cannot be made a canon of the direction of change of 
social systems generally, of the transition from one type to another. 

There is, however, one important inference from this position 
which should be explicitly stated. This is that the point of reference 
for the analysis of "cultural relativity" must be the institutionally 
integrated social system as an ideal type, not any empirical social 
system. Where the actual social system deviates from this ideal type 
of integration, the trend to the optimization of gratification can and 
does operate as a factor of change, because of the discrepancy be- 
tween what, in that particular social system, are the ideal patterns 
for given groups in the population, and the actuality. Analysis of 
this aspect of the process must, of course, take full account of the 
immense complications of the motivational process with which mod- 
em psychopathology among other things has made us familiar. But 
the general principle is clear. The drive toward the optimization 
of gratification is, because of its significance to motivational process, 
a fundamental aspect of the tendencies to change from one particu- 
lar type of social system to another. But it cannot be the source 
of the general directions involved in the succession of patterns of 
change over a series of type changes. For the understanding of this 
latter aspect it is necessary to turn to other features of the total 
system of action. 

The only alternative lies in the cultural component of orienta- 
tion. It is after all one of the critical properties of culture that it is 
transmissible without loss. Whereas the state of gratification of an 
individual actor cannot be transmitted to his successors, his culture, 
his knowledge, his moral standards and his expressive symbols can 
be transmitted. Thus a change in the cultural tradition can be per- 
petuated and can serve as a base for further changes. There is, as 
has long been recognized, in culture the possibility of indefinite 
cumulative development. 

We have classified the content of the cultural tradition under 
the three headings of belief systems, systems of expressive symbols 
and systems of value-orientation. Of these three, in cultural terms 
as such it is clear that systems of value-orientation are the least 
independent, because they are the patterns of articulation between 



The Direction of Change in Social Systems [ 499 ] 

the cultural orientation system and the other components of action. 
This is particularly true of moral value-patterns on the social level 
because of their special involvement in the structure of social sys- 
tems. It is often for this reason convenient for the sociologist to take 
moral value-patterns as his primary point of reference in the cultural 
tradition for many purposes, but in terms of the longer run per- 
spectives of change it seems more important to consider the signifi- 
cance of the possibilities of cumulative development of belief sys- 
tems and systems of expressive symbols. It will, of course, be 
understood that the implications of these developments cannot be 
fully institutionalized in social systems without articulation with the 
exigencies of social systems through the appropriate patterns of 
moral value-orientation. 

Of the two, by far the more obvious case is that of belief sys- 
tems. Here there seems to be no doubt that there is an inherent 
factor of the directionality of change in social systems, a direc- 
tionality which was classically formulated by Max Weber in what 
he called the "process of rationalization." In Chapter VIII above we 
have shown the principal ingredients which must be taken into 
account in formulating such a conception. The older evolutionary 
theories erred in confining their attention to empirical science, and 
in failing to take account of the complex interdependences of the 
development of science itself with the rest of the social system. But 
there was undoubtedly an element of substantial truth in their 
views. 

In addition to science itself, however, the non-empirical ele- 
ments of cognitive orientation must be taken into account. There is 
indeed an ultimate strain to consistency in the total system of cog- 
nitive orientation in a society, and developments in science wrill 
have their long-run repercusions on philosophy, ideologies, and 
religious beliefs as well as vice versa. But this does not mean that 
science is the only significant reference point for the analysis of 
cognitive orientations and that it is safe to treat the other com- 
ponents of a total system of cognitive orientation simply as depend- 
ent variables relative to science. 

Making allowance for this factor, however, we may speak of 
the process of rationalization with considerable confidence as a gen- 
eral directional factor in the change of social systems. We have 



[ 500 ] The Processes of Change of Social Systems 

repeatedly shown that there can be no simple general Hnearity of 
the empirical developmental process in these terms. Above all the 
vested interest phenomena in this field are very powerful and seri- 
ously inhibit the development of belief systems. But this does not in- 
validate the very great importance of this directional principle. 

The question of the significance of systems of expressive sym- 
bols as a source of directionality of change must be answered very 
much more tentatively. As elements of the cultural tradition ex- 
pressive symbols share the fundamental property of transmissibihty. 
There are, however, reasons for believing that the empirical ob- 
stacles to cumulative development are more serious than in the 
case of belief systems. This is essentially because of their funda- 
mental functions in shaping the expressive interests of actors, and 
therefore their intimate connection with the specific cathectic ori- 
entations of actors. We have several times called attention to the 
connection between expressive primacy and particularism, hence in- 
volvement in a particular relational system. It would seem that 
there was connected with this, a whole complex of factors making 
for stabilization through traditionalization, which did not operate 
so strongly in the case of beliefs. 

This empirical aspect of the question is not, however, the main 
one. That concerns, rather, the question of whether and how far 
in the inherent cultural character of expressive symbolism there is 
a basis for cumulative development. The answer would seem to be 
that there must be. But we know too little about the principles of 
symbolic organization to be able to say with any confidence just 
what the pattern of such cumulation may be. 

Two questions may be raised. The first is that of whether and/ 
or how far cognitive processes of rationalization themselves operate 
within the complex of expressive symbolism, so that in certain re- 
spects the fundamental processes of cumulation in this field are an 
aspect of those in the cognitive field. Such studies as that of Max 
Weber in the sociology of music^ would suggest that there is some- 
thing in this possibility. The second question is whether, independ- 
ently of cognitive rationalization, there is any unitary process in 
the expressive field, or whether it must be understood to be in- 

^ Printed in the second German edition of Wirtschaft und Gesellschaft. 



The Direction of Change in Social Systems [ 501 ] 

herently pluralistic. To this question there does not seem to be a 
satisfactory answer available in the present state of knowledge. It 
may very well be, however, that the recent emphasis on the plu- 
ralism of expressive orientations is related to a phase of develop- 
ment of our own culture and of the social sciences within it, and 
will prove in the long run to be untenable. Such attempts as that 
of Northrop^ suggest the possibility of working toward the introduc- 
tion of a more coherent order into this field. 

We have, then, the virtual certainty that there is an inherent 
factor of the general directionality of change in the process of ra- 
tionalization, and the probability that there is an at least partially 
independent one involved in the processes of development of sys- 
tems of expressive symbolism. One of the most important questions 
about the latter is whether the higher developments in that direc- 
tion are in conflict with the higher reaches of rationalization or can 
in certain respects be fused with them. This, along with the ques- 
tions of internal differentiation of each type of trend, must be left 
to much further analytical and empirical work. 

Finally, we should be quite clear that when we speak of such 
a directional trend of change in social systems, we are not directly 
stating an empirical generalization. Perhaps the best model we have 
is that or entropy in classical mechanics. Entropy, like rationaliza- 
tion, is an inherent trend of change, so far as the system is isolated 
and so far as certain obstacles to development of the process do not 
operate. We have seen repeatedly that in social systems a very 
large class of obstacles may operate to block the process of rationaliza- 
tion. Directly in the field of beliefs themselves we have spoken of 
traditionalization and authoritarian enforcement. More indirectly 
we are aware of the operation of the mechanism of rationalization 
in the psychological sense and the analogous mechanisms involved 
in the formation of ideologies on the social system level. In other 
words, the statement of such a trend in itself says nothing about 
the empirical process by which it may work out, or fail to do so. 

It not only says nothing directly about the empirical process, but 
it in no way says that the trend may not under certain circum- 
stances be reversed. In physics it is by no means impossible for the 

® The Meeting of East and West. 



[ 502 ] The Processes of Change of Social Systems 

entropy of a system to be reduced instead of being increased. But 
this reduction of entropy must be accounted for by the introduc- 
tion of new energy into the system from outside. Similarly if the 
level of rationalization of a social system is reduced, which is em- 
pirically entirely possible, a problem is posed. It is necessary, we may 
say, that new, relatively unrationalized orientation "material" should 
be introduced into the system from outside.® By thus reducing the 
general level of rationalization of the system, the process of rational- 
ization could, as it were, get a new start. Indeed in Weber's view 
this was the primary reason why, in spite of the place he gave to 
the process of rationalization, a generally linear conception of the 
evolution of social systems could not be upheld. Of course similar 
considerations will apply to an independent directional trend in the 
field of expressive symbolism, so far as this can be demonstrated. 
In spite of the fact that such directional trends cannot be in- 
terpreted as simple empirical generalizations, their theoretical sig- 
nificance should not be underrated. They give to the theory of 
change in social systems a logical framework which would not 
otherwise be present. Indeed, some such logical construct as this 
seems to be essential to a conceptual scheme which points toward 
the development of a theoretical system. Process, as conceived in 
such a system, cannot be simply random change from one state of 
the system to another. It must, through time, have direction, and 
what we are attempting to do is to say something about that direc- 
tion. The fact that we have had to look on the cultural level and 
not in the narrower sense the motivational level for that direction 
for the social system is a fact of the first importance. That person- 
alities are above all oriented to the optimization of gratification as 
their fundamental directional principle, while social systems are 
oriented to cultural change, is an inference from, and a way of 
stating, the mutual independence of the two classes of system. It 
is a further validation of the importance of the symmetrical asym- 
metry of the pattern variable scheme on which we have laid so 

® In Max Weber's scheme this, we may infer, was one of the theoretical 
functions of the concept of charisma, to serve as the conceptuahzation of the 
source of new orientations on which the process of rationahzation was then con- 
ceived to operate. 



Some Processes of Social Change [ 503 ] 

much stress from time to time. The difference goes to the deepest 
roots of the theory of action. 

§ SOME SPECIFIC EXAMPLES OF PROCESSES 
OF SOCIAL CHANGE 

THE main part of this final section will be concerned with 
a sketch of the analysis of three types of process of large scale 
change in societies as a whole, in order to illustrate the nature of 
the problems faced by the sociologist in attempting to carry out 
such an analysis. Before entering upon these, however, it will be 
useful to call attention to the fact that even in a relatively stabilized 
society, processes of structural change are continually going on in 
many sub-systems of the society, many of which are institutionalized. 
In other words stabilization and change are relative to the problems 
on which the observer focuses his attention; a complex social sys- 
tem is not either stabilized or changing as a whole, but in different 
parts and different respects, always both. 

A good example of a changing sub-system within a larger system 
is the conjugal family. A fundamental part of this process of change 
is imposed by non-action variables, through the unfolding of the 
biological life cycle, thus though biological factors do not alone 
account for the birth of children, once bom and accepted, their 
biological maturation proceeds inexorably. Thus because the par- 
ents are continually growing older and children are growing up, 
the family cannot be a statically stabilized system. 

The feature of the family as a changing system on which we have 
focused attention is the process of socialization. Tliis process must 
quite strictly be considered as orderly process of change, one which 
is largely institutionalized, in the family as a system, not only in 
the personality of the child. As the child grows older and becomes 
more socialized, obviously his roles in the family change. It is 
further an obvious inference from the complementarity of role- 
expectations that if the child's role changes, that of the parents must 
also change in complementary fashion, if the family as a system is 
not to be disorganized. 

All the fundamental ingredients of the theory of change in social 
systems are thus involved in the analysis of what is now sometimes 



[ 504 ] T^^^ Processes of Change of Social Systems 

called the family cycle. In the discussion of the socialization of the 
child in Chapter VI above we focused attention on the process 
as one of changing the role of the child. We saw that there are 
resistances to this change on his part, that is, he develops a vested 
interest in a given stabilized pattern of interaction and has to be 
"pried" out of it. We saw that this involved strain, and that the 
child tended to react to this strain with anxiety, with phantasies, 
with hostility and with defensive-adjustive mechanisms. We saw 
that a certain combination of treatment, deliberate and otherwise, 
on the part of the parents could overcome these resistances and 
create a situation favorable for identification and thus for the ac- 
quisition of the requisite value-patterns. The main ingredients of 
this treatment were support, permissiveness, denial of certain reci- 
procities and manipulation of sanctions through conditional ap- 
proval and disapproval for performance. 

In its fundamentals the same set of considerations also applies to 
the parents. They too acquire vested interests in the maintenance 
of their own roles in the early stages of socialization; the parent who 
is reluctant to let his or her child "grow up" is a well-known phe- 
nomenon. Growing up of the child thus imposes strains on the par- 
ents too, with the typical manifestations of strain. There must be 
mechanisms of social control operating on the parents as well as on 
the child. Misfiring of the process of socialization may very well 
be accounted for by compulsive motivation on the part of the par- 
ents which accentuates their vested interests and makes them in- 
sensitive to the normal mechanisms of control. 

Thus we see that the normal conjugal family should be regarded 
as undergoing a process of institutionalized change as a system, not, 
except for certain limited perspectives, as a statically equilibrated 
system. This is, of course, true of many other sub-systems in larger 
societies. A society like our own is, for example, full of continually 
rising and declining organizations. Such organizations are, inde- 
pendently of larger processes of change in the society as a whole, 
often involved in processes of growth or decline. The same funda- 
mental considerations which apply to the family as a changing 
system also apply to such organizations. Rather than developing 
further examples on this level, however, it seems best to turn to the 



Some Processes of Social Change [ 5^5 1 

problems presented by change in the society as a whole considered 
as a social system. 

I. InstiUitionalized Rationalization and "Cultural hag 

In Chapter VIII above we discussed at some length the in- 
stitutionalization of scientific investigation itself and of the applica- 
tion of scientific knowledge in technical fields. This was more fully 
elaborated in Chapter X for the particular field of medical practice. 
Obviously one fundamental feature of the institutionalization of 
science and its application is the introduction of a continual stream 
of factors of change into the social system. The present problem is 
how this stream of innovation affects parts of the social system 
which are not directly involved in the process of its introduction. 

In the above discussions we have stressed the fact that the 
institutionalization of both types of process creates strains in their 
immediate environments. It is by no means to be taken for granted 
that because in terms of our dominant value system, scientific 
advance is a "good thing," either the processes by which this is 
accomplished or the application of the results will be easily and 
"automatically" accepted. On the contrary there are many strains 
and resistances. Some of these are associated with the communica- 
tion gap between the specialist and the "laity," some with the special 
"privileges" required by the investigator or the applied scientist, 
some with his interference with established ways of doing things 
or thinking, and some with the fact that he introduces changes 
which if adopted require the abandonment of established ways in 
which there is a vested interest. All of this is compounded by the 
fact that what this type of specialist does is very generally asso- 
ciated with situations in which the non-specialists are themselves 
under strains which predispose them even less to "rational" accept- 
ance than would otherwise be the case. This was particularly vividly 
illustrated in the case of illness. 

The repercussions of the changes introduced by scientific and 
technological advance can be followed through two principal chan- 
nels. The first of these starts with the structure of the economy of 
instrumental orientations within which the role in which the 
changes originate and receive their first applications is located. The 



[ 5o6 ] The Processes of Change of Social Systems 

second concerns the cultural aspects, the belief systems and the 
systems of expressive symbolism, and hence the rewards, with which 
the earlier phases of the process of rationalization were integrated. 
We shall discuss each one of these in turn. 

We may distinguish three principal types of repercussion in the 
instrumental complex. The first is the restructuring of occupational 
roles themselves. This has a positive aspect in that by virtue of the 
new knowledge and techniques new roles are created, or old roles 
are redefined with respect to technical content. For example in the 
scientific field, only in fairly recent years did such a thing as a 
"nuclear physicist" exist. William Welch was the first professional 
"pathologist" in the history of American medicine, and only about 
the turn of the last century did the role of "sociologist" emerge. 
Similarly in technological fields the role of I.B.M. operator had to 
await the invention and production of the machines he operates and 
obviously before the days of the typewriter there was no such thing 
as a typist. 

The tendency, of course, is for these new technical roles to de- 
velop by extension of familiar roles. The role of professor, of course, 
existed long before there were any professors of sociology, and the 
latter was assimilated to the wider role category. But the interde- 
pendence between the technical function of a role and the definition 
of role-expectations in value-orientation terms is sufficiently close so 
that very considerable adaptations and adjustments are necessary 
with changes in technical content. There are many different respects 
in which the role of a professor of sociology must differ from that of 
a professor of classics even in the same university with the same basic 
social structure and cultural traditions. Both his teaching and his 
research must be different. 

The obverse of the creation of new roles is the rendering of old 
roles and role-content obsolete. Tliis is obviously the well-known 
phenomenon of technological unemployment. For a variety of rea- 
sons it is difficult for the same personnel to take over the new knowl- 
edge and techniques, and very frequendy they are superseded before 
the normal turnover through superannuation solves the problem. 
Obviously they have a strong vested interest in their ways of doing 
things, in their status and in its remuneration, so that there is a 
strong tendency for the incumbents of the roles which are super- 



Some Processes of Social Change I Soy] 

seded, or are threatened with supersession, to resist the introduction 
of such changes. A society where rapid technological change is going 
on would be expected to show many signs of strain centering about 
this process, and of defensive behavior on the part of groups which 
are threatened with supersession or less drastic upsetting of their es- 
tablished ways. This may indeed be interpreted as one of the pri- 
mary sources of the "security mindedness" which is so prominent in 
certain sectors of our society.^^ 

Of course it follows from our general analysis that these re- 
actions to the threat of change will vary greatly, both as a function 
of the impact of the change, and of the ways in which it is handled. 
Where care is taken that communication is adequate, where support 
is given in the form of reassurance that fundamental securities are 
not threatened, and where alternatives are opened, the resistance can 
often be successfully overcome. But in any case such change imposes 
strains on important groups in the population which may have more 
or less serious consequences. 

The second type of repercussion in the instrumental complex 
consists in the impact of technological change on the character of 
organizations rather than of particular roles. There are many pos- 
sible phases of such impact, but one particularly important one may 
be singled out. This is the fact that, though with many individual 
exceptions, technological advance almost always leads to increasingly 
elaborate division of labor and the concomitant requirement of in- 
creasingly elaborate organization.^^ 

The fundamental reason for this is, of course, that with elaborate 
differentiation of functions the need for minute coordination of the 
different functions develops at the same time. An excellent example 
is the minuteness of specifications which must be followed in the 
production of complicated machinery, such as an airplane engine. 

^° An excellent analysis in detail of the repercussions of technological change 
in stimulating restriction of production and the consolidation of informal organi- 
zation resisting change is given in Roethlisberger and Dickson, Management and 
the Worker, especially the study of the "bank-wiring" room. 

^^ In this as in other respects Durkheim's insight was far in advance of that 
of the utilitarian individualists. For example, he correctly argued that far from 
the growth in the functions of the state being in some sense in conflict with an 
increasing "individuahstic" division of labor, it was a necessary concomitant of 
this development. We may merely add that what is true of the state is also true 
of the development of organization in the sphere of private enterprise. 



[508] The Processes of Change of Social Systems 

Quite clearly adherence to such minute specifications cannot in gen- 
eral be left to the unregulated and voluntary "self-interest" of the 
incumbents of the various roles. There must be a complex organiza- 
tion of supervision to make quite sure that exactly the right thing is 
done. Almost as important is the temporal coordination of the many 
functions. Feeding the various parts into the process in such a way 
that a modern assembly line can operate smoothly requires very com- 
plex organization to see that they are available in just the right quan- 
tities at the right times and places. 

Change in the structure of organizations, like change in the con- 
tent of particular roles, imposes strains. There are complex vested 
interests in the maintenance of an organization as it is which must 
be overcome. One of the most important phases of this process of 
change is concerned with the necessity of formalization when certain 
points of complexity are reached. Smaller and simpler organizations 
are typically managed with a high degree of particularism in the re- 
lations of persons in authority to their subordinates. But when the 
"distance" between points of decision and of operation increases, and 
the number of operating units affected by decisions with it, uni- 
formity and coordination can be attained only by a high degree of 
formalization which requires profound changes in the structure of 
the organization itself, that is, of the roles within it. Again there is 
the problem of the processes by which these changes are introduced 
and the attendant strains coped with. Failure of the mechanisms of 
control to operate properly may mean that the process of develop- 
ment itself comes to be blocked. 

Finally, the third type of repercussion of technological change on 
the instrumental economy is that on the composition of the system 
of facilities and through it on the power structure. The introduction 
of new physical facilities, in the form of equipment and machinery 
and the like, is obvious. Another phase is change in the physical re- 
sources which are strategic. Thus the internal combustion engine 
made liquid fuels, especially oil, of a strategic significance which 
they had altogether lacked before, and today uranium deposits h^e 
become a strategic resource whereas quite recently they were of no 
significance except to a very few scientists. 

But for the social system still more important is the shift in the 
significance of types of skill and competence, and in the control of 



Some Processes of Social Change [ 5^9 ] 

certain types of organization. It is probably not too much to say that 
one of the most fundamental social changes in the United States in 
the past two generations concerns the repercussions of this process 
on the power system and through it the system of social stratification. 
In what might be called the "independent business" era of our 
national development, which roughly closed with World War I, 
the individual owner-manager entrepreneur was perhaps the most 
strategic figure in the instrumental economy. Capital and enterprise 
were more important than high technical competence, and organi- 
zations were simple enough to be created and managed almost ad 
hoc by the entrepreneur himself. 

The development of technology and its repercussions have, how- 
ever, led to a great change in this situation, which has two primary 
aspects. The first of these is the fact that the highly trained and 
specialized technician has acquired a strategic place in the structure 
of industry, which is far different from that of the ad hoc "inventor" 
of earlier days whose invention was more or less complete at one 
stroke. Not the least important aspect of this is the fact that the pure 
scientist has more and more been drawn into the sphere of practical 
affairs. In this sense we may say that the instrumental system has 
become "professionalized" to a degree which was not foreseen by 
the businessmen of the turn of the century. 

Secondly, organization itself has become enormously elaborated 
and formalized, with the "executive" or "manager" taking the place 
of the earlier "entrepreneur." The latter was the classical "capitalist" 
not the former. In this sense, then, we may say that the instrumental 
system has tended to become "bureaucratized." 

These two processes mean that the center of gravity of power 
has shifted drastically. This shift has a great deal to do with the fact 
that the "business elite" of the great era of capitalistic expansion 
during the period following the Civil War failed to become consoli- 
dated as anything closely approaching a "ruling class" in American 
society. 

We see, then, that the institutionalization of science and tech- 
nological change has led to a complex series of repercussions within 
the instrumental complex itself which have fundamentally altered 
its structure; however much other processes may have been con- 
cretely involved in the historical changes, these certainly were. We 



[510] ^^^ Processes of Change of Social Systems 

may now speak briefly of the repercussions on the adaptive struc- 
tures outside the instrumental complex. The most important of these 
probably is kinship. Here the broad lines of the process of repercus- 
sion are well known. 

Only a few highlights can, however, be mentioned. In the 
broadest terms it would seem that the development has strongly ac- 
centuated the general trend to isolation of the conjugal family, above 
all because professionalization and bureaucratization have both 
operated to accentuate the universalistic-specific-achievement pat- 
terning of an increasingly large proportion of occupational roles. The 
mere decline of the proportion of the gainfully employed engaged 
in agriculture to well below 20% (compared with India's 85% or 
more) is sufficient indication of this, but it has also operated in many 
other occupational fields. This obviously means that family and 
occupational unit must be sharply segregated, and that the processes 
of allocation of personnel within the occupational system must be 
relatively independent of kinship solidarities. 

TTiis segregation and isolation of the conjugal family in turn has 
had repercussions on the feminine role; on the whole, at least tempo- 
rarily, probably increasing the sharpness of sex role segregation and 
having much to do with the emergence of such phenomena as the 
glamor pattern. It has increased strains on the feminine role and 
hence produced or accentuated certain strain-reaction patterns. It 
certainly had much to do with the precipitate decline of birth rates 
until quite recently. These factors in turn have presumably had 
further repercussions on the processes of socialization of children 
which cannot be very well followed out in the present state of 
knowledge. 

Another well-known aspect, of course, is the alteration in house- 
hold technology, through the utilization of technological innova- 
tions to make operation of the household easier. With respect to the 
higher income groups this partly at least balances the decline in the 
availability and quality and the greatly increased cost of domestic 
service, which is probably itself to an important degree a conse- 
quence of the changes in the labor role which have resulted largely 
from the technological revolution. 

Repercussions of technological change on religious organization 



Some Processes of Social Change [511] 

or other non-instrumental features of the social structure are more 
difficult to trace and we shall not attempt to do so here. It may 
merely be mentioned that with greatly increased spatial mobility the 
structure of communities has greatly altered. Furthermore it would 
seem probable that the maintenance of relative ethnic separateness 
is becoming more difficult. 

We may now turn to a few of the cultural aspects of the process 
of repercussion. We may start with the style of life aspects of the 
system of expressive symbolism. The very mechanical gadgets which 
the development of technology has made available in quantity of 
course become expressive symbols and play their part in the prestige 
system. The family car or cars, the refrigerator, the washing ma- 
chine, and now the television set of course all have this aspect to 
their significance. Associated with this is the fact that, except per- 
haps at the very top, numbers of domestic servants have lost their 
significance as symbols of status. 

In certain respects, however, there are interesting phenomena 
which are associated with the strain incident to change. A social 
system undergoing such change is presumably subject to consider- 
able mobility so that the upper groups contain a considerable num- 
ber of parvenus who do not have well settled standards of taste. 
There appears to be an interesting dichotomy in this field in that on 
the one hand there is a strong demand for "antiques," that is, for 
style-objects the acceptability of which is unequivocally validated in 
traditional terms, and on the other hand, a demand to be "up to the 
minute" in following the latest new styles, for example, in house 
furnishings. Such a dichotomy is suggestive of insecurity. 

Another interesting phenomenon is the clinging to expressive 
symbols in a prestige context which once had an instrumental use 
but no longer do so. The cult of the horse is an outstanding example. 
While the horse has been almost eliminated from our technology, 
interest in horses, in racing and even in fox hunting is still a symbol 
of considerable importance in certain circles. Fox hunting is par- 
ticularly interesting in the United States because of its association 
with British aristocracy, which as a social structure can have no 
place in the American system of stratification, but can as it were 
serve only as a v^sh-fulfillment symbol for those who have certain 



[512] The Processes of Change of Social Systems 

dissatisfactions with their place in the system, perhaps because hav- 
ing reached what is in a certain sense the top there is nowhere 

further to go. 

Expressive symbohsm of this type really includes the patterns of 
entertainment in the society. Here technological change has made 
many things possible which earlier were not, such as the movies, 
radio and television. But there are other orders of repercussions as 
well. Here it may merely be suggested that a certain trend toward 
"hedonistic" forms of entertainment, especially perhaps in the spec- 
tator role, have something to do with the impact of the severe dis- 
ciplines of a highly technological and bureaucratic occupational 
system where above all affective neutrality is rigorously enforced. 
Also, we have noted, such entertainments may be less threatening to 
the system tlian would be affective outlets which entail the forma- 
tion of diffuse attachments. 

Another exceedingly important aspect of the expressive sym- 
bolism of the entertainment field lies in the ways in which entertain- 
ment provides outlets for the phantasy life of the population. It is 
well known that phantasy is one of the most important features of 
psychological reaction to strain. Certainly much of the outlet that 
children find in the "comics," and in radio programs especially de- 
signed for them, concerns vicarious gratification of the phantasies 
produced in the process of socialization. But fundamentally the same 
considerations apply in the adult world. The movies and a good deal 
of magazine literature and the novel, as well as the notorious soap 
opera, are cases in point. A substantial part of the strain, which is 
expressed in this sometimes bizarre phantasy life, is presumably the 
product of the processes of change which are necessitated by tech- 
nological development. 

The discussion of deviance and social control above should make 
it clear that it is dangerous to pass a functional judgment on these 
phenomena without giving consideration to their relations to strain. 
The essential problem probably is that of how far they fall within 
the range of permissiveness which should be considered normal to 
people under certain strains, and how far they lead into a vicious 
circle of gratification of deviant wishes, and hence to undermining 
of the main value system. The judgment of the "view with alarm" 



Some Processes of Social Change L 5 1 3 ] 

school is almost certainly not to be accepted literally without 
discount. 

It is also clear that such phenomena as the scapegoating involved 
in much of "group prejudice" and in the tendencies to "witch- 
hunting" for "disloyal" elements are related to the strains produced 
by such processes of change. Problems of the determination of the 
incidence of such phenomena, of just how threatening they are to 
the stability of the system, and of what mechanisms of control oper- 
ate and how effective they are, are obviously very complex and 
cannot be gone into here. 

Turning to the relational reward aspect of expressive symbolism 
it is clear that the process of technological change inevitably results 
in a continual reorganization of this system. The changes in the 
instrumental complex which have been outlined themselves con- 
stitute, in one aspect, changes in the fundamental reward system of 
the society. New types of technical role-content and of role patterns 
acquire strategic significance in the system, and old ones become 
obsolete or are lowered in relative significance. Organizations are 
continually restructured, old ones die out or decline while new ones 
rise, and the role structure within those which continue is altered. 
Finally, new types of facilities acquire significance and hence their 
possessors power and prestige. The fact of the integration of all these 
things in the reward system constitutes one major facet of the vested 
interests structure and hence of the strain occasioned by the proc- 
esses of change. 

It is probable that the strains imposed by these processes much 
more than any inherent "conflict of interest" is the primary factor 
in the genesis of so-called "class-conflicts" in modern Western so- 
ciety. In England it was the agricultural laborers who felt their 
livelihood threatened by machinery who constituted the spearhead 
of radical movements rather than the "proletariat" as such. 

These phenomena are, however, exceedingly complex and above 
all are relative to the particular social structure in which the process 
of change occurs. Frustration, we must remember, is always relative 
to expectations. It is this circumstance which serves to explain why 
movements for radical change have so often centered in relatively 
privileged groups who by common sense standards are "well off." 



[514] ^^^^ Processes of Change of Social Systems 
They have become accustomed to rising levels of expectation, and 
certain features of the established order have seemed to stand in the 
way. Thus the French Bourgeoisie in the Revolution had not been 
in a declining situation with respect either to standard of living or 
to power before 1789, on the contrary. The continuance of the old 
regime interfered with the projections of the line of their rise rather 
than with their current status. Similarly, labor organization has ordi- 
narily been spear-headed by the "aristocracy" of labor, not by die 
most "exploited" groups. The pattern is essentially, "since so much 
has already proved possible, why can we not go farther?"^^ 

It is a striking fact that in the United States the reactions to the 
strains of technological development have not tended to become 
organized about class conflict, contrary to the Marxist predictions. 
The first factor in the explanation of this fact is the relative weak- 
ness of a pre-industrial status elite— except in the South— which 
could identify its interests with resistance to any further change. In 
Europe the tendency has been for the threatened elements of the 
"capitalist" class to form an alliance with the pre-industrial elite 
groups which stood over against the "people." In this country the 
threatened elements have not had this group to ally with, and this 
circumstance has left the door open to a successful transition within 
the industrial elite. In very schematic terms we may say that the 
"technicians" and the "managers" have taken over from the entre- 
preneurs without the struggle erupting into violence. 

At the other end of the scale there have also been factors which 
prevented the consolidation of the "proletarian" elements into a solid 
opposition to the "interests." The open frontier, the scarcity of 
human as opposed to natural resources, etc., have been very im- 
portant. In addition the influx of immigrants at the bottom of the 
scale has, by giving ethnic differences a certain priority over class 
solidarity, served to prevent such a structure of conflict. These cir- 
cumstances, combined with the very rapidity of technological de- 

^ This phenomenon may be interpreted as a case of "relative deprivation" 
as that concept was developed by Stouffer and his colleagues in The American 
Soldier and further refined by Merton in his paper in Continuities in Social Re- 
search (Edited by Merton and Lazarsfeld). For example, Stouffer et al. found 
that there was more dissatisfaction about promotion opportunities in the Air Force 
than any other branch of the armed services, but at the same time the Air Force 
had by far the highest actual rate of promotion. 



Some Processes of Social Change [5^5] 

velopment itself and the fact that there was not the same structure 
of "interests" to combine against, have served to maintain American 
labor as essentially part of the relatively integrated system rather 
than having it become a tightly organized "interest group" stand- 
ing over against "the system." 

If this interpretation has any validity, the supreme importance 
of this situation for the position of the United States in world affairs 
scarcely needs further comment. 

To bring up these considerations, however, is to run somewhat 
ahead of die more rigorous analysis. Whatever the outcome in these 
specific respects, it is clear that technological change of the sort just 
sketched must have considerable repercussions on the structure of 
the reward system, and thus on the system of stratification of the 
society. It would above all appear to be extremely clear that if the 
United States is to remain a highly dynamic technologically chang- 
ing society, as it has been for several generations, it must retain a 
"loose" system of social stratification. It seems to be a justified con- 
clusion that a "tightening" of this system very far in either a "con- 
servative" direction which would deny the opportunity for newly 
rising elements to "take their place" in the reward system, or in the 
"radical" direction which would drastically cut down the rewards 
open to any elite elements, would be likely to have a seriously dis- 
turbing effect. Similarly the extreme rigidities of Soviet society 
would seem, if long combined with rapid technological develop- 
ment, to be likely to develop very high tensions which might result 
in a "blow-up," or in a suppression of the technological develop 
ment itself. 

We may now turn to the repercussions of the processes of change 
we are considering through the channels of the belief system. In the 
first place technological development and science are, particularly 
in the present phase of their development, inherently linked to- 
gether. In earlier times there has been a great deal of technological 
development which was essentially independent of science, but for 
present purposes we may confine our attention to the integrated 
complex. It is the "ideas" of science which constitute the primary 
source of initiation of change in the more general belief system of 
the society. There are in turn two primary directions in which 



[516] The Processes of Change of Social Systems 

their repercussions may be traced, that of reHgious ideas and of 

ideologies. 

It is hardly too much to say that the "warfare of science and 
religion" has been the dominant note of the relevant part of the 
intellectual history of the Western world since the emergence of 
theoretical science to high maturity in the seventeenth century. The 
relations between them have of course been by no means simple. 
But the combination of the fact that religion belongs to the vie 
serietise, that it is, that is to say, evaluative, and that what we have 
called intermediate symbolism has played such a prominent part in 
religious orientations, has made it inevitable that a really large scale 
development of science and the diffusion of its orientations into 
popular thinking, should have profound repercussions on religious 
belief and should encounter formidable resistances in religious 
quarters. 

Analyzed in terms of the theory of action, the relationships have 
been far from simple. TTiere has inevitably been much strain on 
both sides, with the typical manifestations of strain in the form of 
compulsive attachment to certain symbols. Thus "fundamentalism" 
has been a persistent feature of one major wing of religious opinion, 
and militant "positivism" the complementary feature of one wing of 
scientifically oriented opinion. There has in these terms been both 
much "pseudo-religion" and much "pseudo-science" promulgated in 
the name of each body of cultural belief. 

Though by no means all of the cognitive justification can be 
found on one side, the profundity of the contributions of modem 
science to man's cognitive orientation to his world in general is such 
that it can scarcely be entertained as a serious possibility that re- 
ligious belief systems formulated in the first three centuries A.D., or 
even in the thirteenth century, could be cognitively tenable without 
the slightest modification in the twentieth. The attempt to maintain 
them unchanged must, therefore, in an important measure be a 
phenomenon of "fundamentalism" that is of the defensive primacy 
of vested interests, in this case expressive-evaluative in primary con- 
tent, over the institutionalized cognitive standards of the society. In 
simpler words, anxiety about the consequences of altering religious 
belief prevents unbiased consideration of the arguments for any 
j>articular current formula which purports to "reconcile" science and 



Some Processes of Social Change [5^7] 

religion, including that of declaring religious belief in general to be 
"tender-minded nonsense." 

The consequence of this process of repercussion along with the 
others has necessarily been to alter the position of religious orienta- 
tions, and of the cognate collectivity organizations in the society. 
It is, for example, extremely difficult to see how the dynamic of 
technological-scientific development of our society could possibly be 
reconciled with the dominance of a religious ethic and organization 
which was, like the Catholic or Lutheran churches, oriented to safe- 
guarding the spiritual interests of the population according to a com- 
pletely stabilized system of religious belief. Cases where such a 
situation approximately prevailed, as in rural Ireland or French 
Canada, or in rural Prussia, could only subsist by virtue of elaborate 
insulation from the main currents of social change in the Western 
world. Broadly, even in these islands, the maintenance of such insu- 
lation has proved in the long run impossible. 

It may be noted that the vulnerability of traditional religious be- 
lief systems to the repercussions of the development of science has 
been a major factor in setting the stage for the major ideological 
structuring of Western society, the polarization of the "progressive" 
or "rationalistic" wing and the "conservative" or "traditionalistic" 
wing. This polarization has had a different incidence within the 
different sub-societies vdthin the Western world. It has been less 
pronounced in the United States than in most of Europe, to an 
important degree because American sectarian Protestantism has 
relative to both Lutheranism and Catholicism carried many of the 
seeds of the process of rationalization within itself, and because its 
organization relatively to the rest of the social structure has made it 
impossible, as for instance in Catholic countries, for "religion" to 
present a united front against the "progressive" forces. We have no 
counterpart, for instance, of the inherent assumption of most conti- 
nental Europeans that, to be in any sense "on the left" must mean 
to be anti-religious on principle. 

Finally, the repercussions of the process of rationalization on 
ideology have certainly been profound in the Western world. It 
would seem in the first place that the differentiation of secular 
ideology from religious belief systems, which had barely begun by 
the sixteenth century and really gathered force only in the eight- 



[518] The Processes of Change of Social Systems 

eenth, should be regarded as part of the fundamental process we are 
concerned with. 

The general tendency to line "science" and its implications, 
real or alleged, up with the "progressive" cause, is perhaps the most 
important broad generalization which can be made. In general this 
has been associated with espousal of the groups in the social system 
which were struggling for enhancement of their positions in the 
prestige and power systems, the bourgeoisie at one phase, the "pro- 
letariat" at another, and not least important perhaps the scientists 
and technologists themselves. 

The linking with the interests of various groups within the 
social system and the strains which they were under has, of course, 
meant that reactions to strain have played a prominent part in the 
progressive as well as the conservative ideologies. This fact has had 
much to do with the prominence of Utopian elements in these 
ideologies, and with the part played by varying degrees and modes 
of alienation from the institutionalized system itself. They have of 
course ranged from mild progressivism to radical revolutionism with 
a definite gradualness of transition between the various gradations. 

A word may be said about one particularly interesting phase of 
this development which was briefly mentioned in Chapter VIII, 
namely, its association with the development of social science. In a 
very schematic sense, it may be said that the secularization of social 
thought made some cognitive stabilization of ideological beliefs from 
other than religious sources urgent, and we have seen that philoso- 
phy has played a very important part in this respect. But the general 
prestige of science in secular thought has been such that the 
attempt to extend it to the field of human behavior was inevitable. ^^ 
The fact of its being rooted in ideological interests to this extent, 
to the sociologists of knowledge, explains many of the complex 
vicissitudes to which social science has been subjected in the course 
of its development. It is both needed and demanded as an inevitable 
extension of an established cognitive orientation pattern, but at the 
same time it encounters serious resistances. Some of these are par- 

^' The common German methodological doctrine of a generation and more 
ago, that human behavior and culture were not subject to "laws" in the sense of 
the natural sciences, but were uniquely individuated phenomena may, in part, be 
regarded as a defensive rationahzation against this pressure. It was drasticaUy 
disposed of by Max Weber. 



Some Processes of Social Change [519] 

ticularly frustrating because they come from the "friends" of social 
science who have acquired a vested interest in ideological pseudo- 
science. It is not surprising that these difficulties have not been 
confined to the acceptance of social science by those outside the pro- 
fession but have, for reasons with which we are familiar, deeply 
penetrated the profession itself. A certain proportion of these diffi- 
culties have, however, been overcome. So far as this is the case, the 
definite establishment of results of social science is bound to have 
complex further repercussions on the social system in other respects. 
One set of these repercussions concerns the implementation of so- 
cial science knowledge in its appropriate technology through the 
type of channels which were analyzed above. But perhaps not less 
important is the effect on the structure of the belief systems of the 
society as such, particularly through "taking the wind out of the 
sails" of an important part of the ideological pseudo-science which 
is inevitably current. The case of medical knowledge in its organic 
aspects should serve to warn us that it is highly improbable that 
pseudo-scientific beliefs in the fields of competence of the social 
sciences will quickly or completely disappear from the society, even 
where much genuinely validated social science knowledge exists. 
But by the same token, it is equally highly improbable that this 
development will be without significant effect on ideological belief 
systems. 

The foregoing is an exceedingly sketchy outline of a very com- 
plex subject. It makes no pretense to completeness or technical pre- 
cision. It is introduced merely to illustrate that the conceptual 
scheme of the present volume, which has been developed primarily 
in terms of its bearing on the equilibrating processes of the social 
system, can readily be applied to the analysis of the processes 
of change. Because a system is encompassed in a process of insti- 
tutionalized change, it does not cease to be a system. The scientific- 
technological "core" of the process of change we have attempted to 
trace is interdependent with all the other parts of the society in 
which it takes place. If any approach to solution of the problem of 
how it will affect the total society over a long period is to be attained, 
the only way to proceed outside of sheer "intuition" is to attempt 
to trace meticulously the repercussions of the changes through the 
various parts of the system, and back again to the locus of the 



[ 520 ] The Processes of Change of Social Systems 

original changes. We are in a position to do that only in the most 
fragmentary fashion in the present state of knowledge. But at least 
we have a theoretical canon of what needs to be done and some 
fairly detailed standards for a judgment of how far what we can do 
falls short of these needs. 

If one broad generalization about the type of process which 
we have attempted to trace can be hazarded, it is that the society 
in which it has become institutionalized is in a relatively precarious 
state of moving equilibrium with respect to the process. This equi- 
librium can break down in either of two main directions, both of 
which if they occur should be interpreted as consequences of the 
fact that strain in certain parts of the system has mounted to 
points which cannot be coped with short of major alterations of the 
moving equilibrium state. One of these centers on the mounting 
resistance of the "vested interest" elements to further change, so 
that the essential process itself is finally choked off and the so- 
ciety stabilized on a traditionalistic basis. This, fundamentally, seems 
to be what happened in the society of later Mediterranean Antiquity 
partly at least under the influence of Christianity. The other direc- 
tion is that of mounting strain in "progressive" sectors so that a 
radically alienated revolutionary movement develops. Though pro- 
claimed and threatened for a long time this has not yet happened 
in any major industrialized country of the Western world, least 
of all in the most highly industrialized, the United States. But 
what some of the processes involved in that alternative are and 
what some of their consequences might be will be developed in 
the final sections of this chapter. However, both types of deviation 
are continually occurring in sub-sectors of our society. The question 
is whether they are likely to come to dominate the society as a whole. 

2. The Ascendancy of the Charismatic Revolutionary 
Movement 

TThe other two t}^es of process of change which we intend 
to discuss can be treated considerably more briefly. The first is the 
sudden alteration in the major balance of equilibrium of the social 
system by the ascendancy of a "revolutionary" movement which 
organizes a set of alienative motivational orientations relative to 
the main institutionalized order. The second is the process bv which 



Some Processes of Social Change [ 521 ] 

such a movement, once in the ascendancy, comes to be adapted to 
the exigencies of long-run continuance as "setting the tone" for the 
society. These are, of course, fundamentally phases of the same 
process. Furthermore certain of the main outlines of the process in 
both phases are the same whether the movement in question be a 
"political" movement to reorganize secular society, as in the cases 
of the Nazi and Communist movements in our own time, or a move- 
ment for religious salvation in terms of a transcendental religious 
value system, as in the case of early Christianity. 

We may lay down four major broad sets of conditions which 
must be present if such a movement is to spread widely and gain 
ascendancy in the social system, and then illustrate briefly by the 
case of the Nazi movement in Germany. All of the conditions are 
familiar from our previous analysis and we need only to bring them 
together in their relevance to the present context. 

The first condition is the presence in the population of suf- 
ficiently intense, widely spread and properly distributed alienative 
motivational elements. These will, as we have seen, be manifesta- 
tions of strain, the possible origins of which are various and cannot 
concern us here. Such strain and its manifestations will, however, 
we have made clear, not be random relative to the structure of 
the social system in which they occur, but will constitute alienation 
from particular institutionalized patterns, and from symbols as- 
sociated with those patterns. It will, therefore, not be randomly dis- 
tributed in the social system, but the alienative motivation will 
cluster about particular points of strain. The implications of its 
existence for the stability of the social system will depend on this 
distribution. It will specifically depend on how significant with- 
drawal of support from institutionalized values at these particular 
points will be. 

Such alienative motivation is a prerequisite of the development 
of a revolutionary movement. But as such it is only a potentiality 
for change and its "force" may be dissipated in a variety of ways, 
through phantasies, through crime, mental disease and psycho- 
somatic illness to mention only a few possibilities. Obviously "cop- 
ing" with it is a primary function of the mechanisms of social con- 
trol. But if these fail the second prerequisite of such a movement 
may develop, namely, the organization of a deviant sub-cultural 



[ 522 ] The Processes of Change of Social Systems 

group or movement. Such a development greatly strengthens such 
a tendency and may make it possible to exploit latent alienative 
motivation oF the requisite types in other sectors of the population. 
Combining in a solidary group, we will remember, enables the 
deviandy motivated to evade a large proportion of the sanctions 
of normal social interaction, since they associate so largely with 
each other. They reinforce each other's deviance by providing an 
alter for ego's expectations, who will reciprocate them in the positive 
direction. Moreover, they make it possible to split the ambivalent 
motivational structure, expressing the negative, alienative side vis- 
^-vis the institutionalized structure, and the positive within the sub- 
cultural group in the form of compulsive conformity with the 
claims of the group. Solidarity will be further enhanced if expres- 
sive leadership can be developed so that the solidarity is directly 
symbolized and organized. The frequency with which the compul- 
sive conformist element includes dependency and hence probably 
submissiveness to authority facilitates this. 

If, however, the culture of the deviant group, like that of the 
delinquent gang, remains merely a "counter-culture" it is difficult 
to find the bridges by which it can acquire influence over wider 
circles. This bridge is above all furnished by the third element, the 
development of an ideology— or set of religious beliefs— which can 
successfully put forward a claim to legitimacy in terms of at least 
some of the symbols of the main institutionalized ideology. The 
features of the ideologies of complex societies which present an 
opening for this have already been discussed. Ideological formulae 
are often highly general and susceptible to "appropriation" by a 
not too drastically deviant movement. TTiere are serious strains and 
inconsistencies in the value-implementation of any complex social 
system; therefore, it is always possible to take advantage of the in- 
evitable phenomena which do not square with the dominant values. 
Sentiments in favor of "social justice" thus have a hard time to 
defend the treatment of the Negro in the United States, or the 
"exploitation" of colonial territories by "imperialist" powers. The 
derivation of the ideologies of the revolutionary left from that of 
"democratic liberalism" in the Western world is obvious, and can be 
followed out in detail. The possession of such an ideology which 
incorporates symbols of wide appeal in the population, and with 



Some Processes of Social Change [ 52-3 ] 

respect to which the going system is vulnerable, is an essential con- 
dition of the deviant sub-culture becoming a movement which can 
hope to attain ascendancy in the society as a whole. 

The fourth set of conditions concerns the stability of the aspects 
of the social system on which the movement impinges, and their 
relation to the equilibrium balance of the society. For obvious rea- 
sons the focal point here is the organization of the power system, 
with particular reference to the state. One suspects that the funda- 
mental reasons why the revolution of the left has not yet succeeded 
in any highly industrialized country lies in this set of circumstances 
more than any of the other three. For example, in pre-revolutionary 
Russia, and in China there was a very small governing group set 
over against an enormous mass of politically "inert" peasants, inert, 
that is, except for their susceptibility to being swept up in a protest 
movement against the existing state of affairs. In such a state the 
power structure is peculiarly unstable, and can be "pushed over" 
by what is virtually a coup d'etat, especially when it is under such 
strains as result from defeat in war and hence shaken loyalty of the 
masses of an armed force. 

The political case is not, however, the only one. The "conquest" 
of the Roman Empire by Christianity was by a quite different proc- 
ess where it may be held the primary part was played by the need 
of a dictatorial regime for legitimation in a situation of general 
disorganization. 

To turn to the case of Germany. To account for the existence 
of widespread alienative motivation is scarcely a problem in any 
society which has been undergoing a very rapid process of indus- 
trialization. Probably it was more intense and widespread in Ger- 
many than elsewhere because of the relatively rigid status-structure 
of German society which had greater difficulties in adapting to 
change. At any rate because there had been no "bourgeois revolu- 
tion" in Germany and the pre-industrial elites were in a particularly 
strong position there, they were a focus of strain, as witnessed by 
their susceptibility to "anti-capitalistic" symbolic appeals. Because 
of the presence of these upper groups the "industrialists" were in a 
far more equivocal position than in the United States, and tended 
to "team up," e.g., the common German formula of the "feudaliza- 
tion of the bourgeoisie." Another focus of strain was certainly in 



[ 524 ] T/je Processes of Change of Social Syste^ns 

the lower middle class which had had traditionalized status and 
vested interests unknown to us. Of course there were obvious 
complementary strains in the labor groups, which were expressed 
in the formation of a political labor movement which could be ex- 
ploited as a "threat" by the conservative groups under strain. 

The German soil after the first world war was highly receptive 
to the organization of "patriotic" agitational groups with a national- 
istic orientation. The defeat, the militaristic tradition, and the pos- 
sibility of serving as a patriotic underground vis-a-vis the occupying 
powers gave them their opening. There were in the beginning 
many of these semi-underground groups, some engaged in political 
assassination. Because of the displacement of the older ruling groups 
from power their activities had partial legitimation in internal poli- 
tics as well as in the context of defiance of the enemy. The Nazi 
movement then spread especially by bringing in all sorts of idle 
and dissident groups. 

Resting partly on German military and authoritarian traditions, 
the movement developed a very tight internal organization and 
soon there emerged a highly efficacious expressive leader in the 
person of Hitler, who was a "little man," a war veteran and in other 
respects a suitable spokesman, not excepting his great capacity for 
propaganda activity and for organization on certain levels. 

The ideological basis was provided by a highly ingenious com- 
bination of the appeals of nationalism and of "socialism," which had 
hitherto been defined as antithetical, the former belonging to the 
"right" the latter to the "left." At the very least we may say that the 
inclusion of socialism in the ideological formula served to neutralize 
the left and to mobilize the immense reservior of anti-capitalistic 
sentiment from the right and large parts of the left behind the 
single movement. For a variety of reasons "liberalism" had been con- 
siderably weaker in Germany than in the rest of the Western world, 
and this, plus the existence of a strong Communist movement as 
a foil, created a highly favorable situation from the propaganda 
point of view. 

Finally, the power structure in post-war Germany was certainly 
highly unstable. Not only was there the presumption against the 
elements in power because they had collaborated with the enemy 
and even more had adopted his formula for government, but the 



Some Processes of Social Change [ 5^5 ] 

class system was out of balance with government. This is because 
the top elements had been excluded from government, but their 
position in society left essentially unshaken. 

Severe economic depression, especially because it came after 
substantial economic recovery from the chaos of post-war inflation, 
added to the general strain. Finally, the treatment of Germany by 
the victorious allies was notably indecisive and vacillating. It is 
highly probable diat this was more important than either severity 
or generosity; it created a situation where agitation for revisionism 
had an excellent chance in Germany, and the elements in power 
were highly vulnerable to such agitation. 

In any case we all know the outcome, the accession of Hitler 
to power in 1933 and his consolidation of that power until the 
Party had complete control. The process we wish to try to trace in 
the next section had no opportunity to go far in Germany because 
its extreme of military expansionism led to the blownjp and extinc- 
tion of the movement by military defeat. Whatever new combina- 
tion of the ingredients which went into the Nazi movement may 
come about in the future, it is unlikely that just the same kind of 
movement will arise in Germany again. 

The above has been an exceedingly bare sketch, but it is suf- 
ficient to indicate some of the principal ways in which the factors 
abstractly dealt with in this work operated to make the ascendancy 
of the Nazi movement possible.^* 

3. The Adaptive Transformation of a Revolutionary 

Movement^'' 

We will follow the same procedure used under (2) above 
and first lay down a series of conditions which generally must oper- 
ate in the course of such a process, and then illustrate it briefly from 
one case. Since the revelant development in Nazi Germany was cut 

^* The analysis of this process is carried into somewhat further empirical 
detail in Talcott Parsons, "Democracy and Social Structure in Pre-Nazi Germany," 
Journal of Legal and Political Sociology, Vol. I, 96-114. 

^^ Much the most sophisticated treatment of this problem in generalized 
terms in the sociological literature is still Max Weber's discussion of the "routini- 
zation of charisma" at various places in his works, but especially Wirtschaft und 
Gesellschaft, Part III, Chapter X. Only a brief resum^ is included in the part 
translated as The Theory of Social and Economic Organization, Chapter 3, 
Sects 10-12. 



[ 526 ] The Processes of Change of Social Systems 

off short, we shall take the case of Soviet Russia since in the thirty- 
fours years since the Revolution it has gone far enough for certain 
things to emerge clearly. 

The first set of conditions concerns the fact that, since the 
revolutionary (or religious) belief system always to an important 
degree contains Utopian elements, there must, in general, be a proc- 
ess of "concession" to the development of "adaptive structures." 
Exactly what these will be, in what order and through what proc- 
esses, will vary a great deal, as a function of the content of the 
ideology, and of the degree to which it is Utopian. Even where that 
degree is not extreme, however, the tendency is strongly, because 
the dominant motivational pattern of a revolutionary movement is 
compulsive, for its leaders to be oriented to "principles" and thus 
to be reluctant to make the "normal" concessions to the exigencies 
of an operating social system, which are always necessary. For a 
religious movement which has not gained ascendancy in the so- 
ciety as a whole, and for a revolutionary movement out of power 
this problem can, of course, be postponed. Thus in early Christianity 
it was possible for St. Paul to counsel simply "remain in that state 
in which you were called" because Christians as such had no con- 
trol over the larger affairs of the society. In the middle ages the 
Church, however, could not avoid responsibility for those affairs, 
it was a "power" whether it liked it or not. 

The points at which we are most certain that such adaptive 
processes must take place are those of the principal empirical cluster- 
ings of social structure which we discussed in Chapter V. We were 
careful not to exaggerate the degree of rigidity within such spheres 
but it is still true that probably most if not all radical movements 
in the Western world have contained a strong Utopian element 
relative to some of them as their limits can be judged by the avail- 
able evidence. Certainly the equivalent of the Marxist treatment of 
the family as a "bourgeois prejudice" has appeared many times. So 
also has radical egalitarianism which denies the legitimacy of any 
differential reward, and often also of institutionalization of property 
at all. Similarly organization of the power system, especially relative 
to the use of force, has often been declared to be radically evil and 
acquiescence in any kind of authority backed by coercive sanctions 
radically unacceptable. The problem of the paramount focus of 



Some Processes of Social Change [ 52.7 ] 

value-integration raises special difficulties which will be mentioned 
presently. This involves what happens to the ideology itself in the 
long run. 

A second set of conditions is closely related but should be dis- 
tinguished. It concerns the consequences of the fact that the mo- 
tivational composition of a revolutionary movement is always to an 
important degree ambivalent in structure. We have seen that 
participation in the movement itself permits a certain easing of the 
conflict by splitting of the components. But this is clearly only a par- 
tial resolution and is generally attended by clear evidence of opera- 
tion of the mechanisms of defense and adjustment, for example in 
the compulsive cognitive distortion of the reality of the institution- 
alized order against which the movement is in revolt, which we have 
discussed. Thus to the early Christians the "world" was as such 
radically evil. 

Ascendancy of the movement necessitates, for the participants 
who come over from the "opposition" phase to that of control, a 
reorganization. The "system" is no longer "theirs" but "ours." It has 
to be made to work, but above all in the present context, the pres- 
sure of not giving way to certain older established conformative 
needs, because of their incompatibility with uncompromising hos- 
tility to the established order, is relaxed. The sparse conformity- 
opportunities of the opposition movement are now broadened out 
to include the possibilities of a whole society which, since it is 
controlled by the movement, is to a degree legitimized. In a sense, 
then, the basic conflict comes to be transferred from the form, the 
movement vs. the society, to that between the "principles" of the 
movement and the temptation of its members to use their control 
of the society to gratify their repressed need-dispositions some of 
which are precisely needs of conformity with the patterns of the 
old society which they have tried to abolish. This process of the 
re-emergence of needs to reinstate elements of the old order under 
the guise of the revolutionary regime is one of the main sources 
of the tendency to "mitigate" the radicality of the revolution. It is 
particularly facilitated by another very common feature of the 
situation of a revolutionary regime, namely, that of finding itself 
in conflict with the outside world, so that the old dissociation be- 
tween movement and patriotism is reversed, and often "restoration" 



[ 528 ] The Processes of Change of Social Systems 

can occur under the guise of patriotism. It may be that this trans- 
formation will be sufficient to destroy the ascendancy of the revolu- 
tionary ideology, at least partially, but more often it is not if there 
is continuity of regime. 

There is a problem complementary to that of the re-emergence 
of repressed conformity needs in the revolutionary group, namely, 
that of the "disciplining," in terms of the revolutionary values, of 
the population over which the movement has gained ascendancy 
but which did not participate in the movement. This accounts in 
large part for the extreme concern of revolutionary regimes with 
"education." 

But it also is very much involved with the reasons why one 
phase of Utopian belief is almost always bound to be abandoned in 
the very earlv stages of a revolutionary regime, namely, the belief in 
the illegitimacy of coercion. Sometimes, as in the case of Com- 
munism, this belief is projected into the indefinitely future state 
of "communism" itself and a great show made of legitimizing co- 
ercion in order to reach this goal, with the allegation that it will 
no longer be necessary when the goal is reached, but it is hardly 
to be supposed that this attitude can be maintained without con- 
siderable strain. At any rate both in the interests of controlling its 
own following in their tendency to "backslide" and in the interest 
of "domesticating" the non-revolutionary population, it is typical 
of such regimes that they resort to coercive measures to a far higher 
degree than in most normally stabilized societies. 

The necessity of coping with these aspects of the situation, plus 
the fact that the main problem of the movement is no longer "propa- 
ganda" to secure voluntary support, probably has much to do with 
the well-known fact that the old leaders of the movement tend to be 
supplanted during the phase of consolidation of the movement and 
altogether different types to emerge. Parallels can be only very ap- 
proximate, of course, but perhaps it is not merely sacrilegious to 
suggest a parallel between Marx and Jesus, Lenin and St. Paul and 
Stalin and Constantine. The same doubts as to how far ConstanHne 
was "really a Christian" may be and have been voiced as to whether 
Stalin is "really a communist." 

This whole set of circumstances may be summed up by saying 
that there is a sense in which gaining ascendancy over a society 



Some Processes of Social Change [ 529 ] 

has the effect of "turning the tables" on the revolutionary move- 
ment. The process of its consolidation as a regime is indeed in a 
sense the obverse of its genesis as a movement; it is a process of re- 
equilibration of the society; very likely to a state greatly different 
from what it would have been had the movement not arisen, but 
not so greatly as literal interpretation of the movement's ideology 
would suggest.^" 

There is one final phase of the process which may briefly be 
mentioned. The type of motivational structure which is involved in 
attraction to and participation in a revolutionary movement over 
against an institutionalized system, obviously cannot be that which 
the "new society" tends to develop in its members through socializa- 
tion. The revolutionary values necessarily become those of an "or- 
thodoxy," and the tendency will be to socialize to conformity with 
them in the same fundamental sense as is true of any stabilized 
society. Thus to be a Christian in the first century A.D. and in 
Mediaeval France meant two quite different things, just as to be 
a communist in the United States and in Soviet Russia todav are 
different things. Quite clearly it would be utterly impossible for a 
society to become stabilized on the basis that a fundamentally 
ambivalent motivational structure toward its central values, and 
ideology became the norm. Just how the founders become role 
models for identification on the new basis and how other phases of 
the process work out are highly problematical. But in this case as in 
many other respects a revolutionary movement must pay the price 
of success. It cannot both have the cake of the motivational advan- 
tages of revolt, and eat it by being the focus of institutionalization of 
an orthodoxy too. In sum, it ceases to be a revolutionary movement. 

Stress on these re-equilibrating aspects of the process of course in 
no sense means to imply that no fundamental changes are ever in- 
troduced by revolutionary movements. But it does mean that these 
movements are subject to a dynamic of developmental process which 
involves certain fairly precisely definable exigencies. It very clearly 
means that no revolutionary movement can reconstruct society ac- 
cording to the values formulated in its ideology without restriction. 

Just as a revolutionary movement can and does result in the 

^' Perhaps the best available general statement of this point is to be found in 
Pareto's The Mind and Society. 



[ 530 ] The Processes of Change of Social Systems 

introduction of permanent change, so also in its residue it often 
leaves certain unresolved strains v^^hich may be the starting points 
for further dynamic processes. One of these is concerned with the 
tensions involved in maintaining the ideology intact, including its 
Utopian elements, and yet making the indispensable concessions to 
the exigencies of operating as a society. As noted in Chapter VIII, 
in this respect a transcendental system of religious beliefs has an 
advantage over a secular ideology in that it can project the Ausgleich 
of discrepancies into the transcental sphere while for the secular 
ideology the future is the only recourse. Without this resource the 
really radically Utopian ideologies may well have to give way to 
pressure after a struggle. Early Christianity had a firm belief in the 
eschatological Second Coming and the realistic Day of Judgment. 
This belief survived through a long series of postponements, the 
last major one being that to the millennial year. Since then, except 
for a few splinter sects, the belief has disappeared from Christianity. 
It seems probable that the final state of "communism" will suffer 
a similar fate, and very likely much more rapidly. 

The central facts about the Soviet Union which are relevant to 
this process have already been cited at various points, particularly 
in Chapter V, and need only to be briefly recapitulated. The aban- 
donment of the immediate abolition of coercion came very early, 
indeed, the semi-military organization of the party and its discipline 
was carried over more or less intact into the new regime. But in 
the early part of the Revolution there was certainly a widespread 
expectation that men now at last were "free" and could quite lit- 
erally do what they pleased. Perhaps the most crucial step came after 
the attempt on Lenin's life, which became the occasion for the in- 
stitution of the Terror as a deliberate policy which has never been 
relaxed since. It may perhaps be held that the tension between the 
drastic evaluative repudiation of coercion in the ideal state and the 
drastic way in which the regime has employed it for its own ends 
is in certain ways the deepest source of long-run tension in Russian 
Communism. Its importance is easily overlooked in the short nln 
view, especially by persons inclined to a certain popular type of 
"debunking" cynicism to the effect that what men profess to believe 
is not important, it is only their "interests" which determine their 



Some Processes of Social Change [531] 

action. This view can definitely be shown to be unsound in the 
hght of sociological theory and empirical evidence. 

The revival of fundamental institutions, which in the ideology 
have been declared to be "bourgeois prejudices," is in some respects 
the most striking single feature of Soviet development. This proc- 
ess culminated in the mid 1930's, that is, close to twenty years after 
the original revolution. The most conspicuous cases are the family, 
differential rewards in the occupational system, the new system of 
stratification, and the revival of a system of law.^'^ It will be noted 
that private enterprise in the economy has not been mentioned 
among these. The N.E.P. phase came considerably earlier than 
the other revivals and was liquidated before these were well under 
way. But we have consistently argued that this aspect of the or- 
ganization of the instrumental complex is not a fundamental in- 
stitution in the same sense that coercive governmental authority, 
the family, differential rewards and stratification are. The revival of 
formalism in education, especially the use of disciplines and sanc- 
tions, is another phenomenon which deserves important emphasis. 

This process should be regarded as involving a combination of 
the first two general trends mentioned above, the need for adaptive 
structures in the light of fundamental functional requirements of 
the social system, and the re-emergence of conformity needs as- 
sociated with the old society as such. It may be suggested that the 
peculiarly rigid authoritarianism of the Soviet regime involves a 
good deal of the latter, and is not merely a matter of the exigencies 
of survival in a world which both internally and externally is 
troubled. Very obviously the fusion of the Soviet Regime with 
Russian nationalism and many things associated with this is a very 
conspicuous phenomenon. To take one small detail, the conspicuous 
role of the military and the tendency to extension of the military 
pattern of visible symbolization of rank, would seem to be very 
much an old regime trait which could not be readily derived from 
the exigencies of implementing revolutionary communism in any 
complex society. 

The case of religion is a complex one. Though certainly im- 
portant concessions to traditional religion have been made, these do 

^'^ a. Harold J. Berman, Justice in Russia. 



[ 532- ] ^^^^ Processes of Change of Social Systems 

not apparently constitute invasions of the revolutionary program 
in the same sense or to the same degree as the others. The com- 
promise has been greatly facilitated by the traditional Russian pat- 
tern of state control of the church and there seems to be general 
agreement that the Orthodox Church in Russia does not as an or- 
ganization have any greater degree of independence than other 
organizations. 

It is obvious that this is a sphere in which there are very drastic 
inherent limits to concession. The regime in the nature of the case 
cannot simply abandon its adherence to the Marxist ideology, how- 
ever much the latter may be bent and twisted. The whole historic 
relation of Marxism and Christianity is such that it is impossible 
for the regime to say that "religion is the pillar of the Soviet State," 
as has actually officially been said of the family. What can be done 
is only to "concede" a certain place to traditional religion. That this 
concession has proved necessary is, however, a fact of the first impor- 
tance. It is not impossible that this might prove to be a very impor- 
tant focus for the organization of opposition. 

It is very clear that such a society as that of Soviet Russia is shot 
through with exceedingly severe internal tensions. Indeed, it is 
highly probable that both the external expansionism which is of 
course legitimated by the ideology, and the drastic pace of internal 
industrialization are, in an important part, expressions of these ten- 
sions. Letting things "settle down" in either of these respects might 
become highly dangerous to the stability of the regime simply be- 
cause emergency does produce a kind of integration, and probably 
a state of continuing emergency is less threatening than its relaxa- 
tion would be. 

TTie longer run prospect is, of course, obscure. It is altogether 
possible that some internal fissure in the unity of the regime might 
develop, particularly but by no means exclusively over the problem 
of succession to Stalin. If the regime itself does not fall apart it is 
certain that a very complex process of adjustment will have to occur 
in the next generation or two in the relation between the ideology 
and the realities of the social system. This particular sociologist's pre 
diction is that "communism" will not be realized and that the in- 
creasing realization that there is no prospect of its realization will 
force far-reaching modifications in the ideology. Indeed, it is difficult 



Some Processes of Social Change [ 533 ] 

to see how once the phase of dynamic expansionism, internally and 
externally— and no matter how far it extends it cannot last for- 
ever—is over, the belief system can hold up. Again, let us note, 
the Christian recourse of projection of the reconciliation of discrep- 
ancies into the transcendental world is closed. 

This problem is connected with another. Industrialization itself, 
by its very success, probably generates another order of very impor- 
tant strains. We may put this in formal terms by saying that indus- 
trialization shifts the emphasis from the universalistic-ascriptive to 
the universalistic-achievement pattern. As we have seen this implies 
a kind of "individualism" which it will be exceedingly difficult to 
reconcile with the present character of the regime. It may be ex- 
pected that the problems implicit in this tension will become acute 
particularly in connection with the status of the "intelligentsia." But 
greater freedom for the intelligentsia must include freedom to 
criticize the official version of the ideology. The intrinsic vulner- 
ability of the official ideology is, however, so great, that in turn it is 
difficult to see how this freedom can be granted. What the outcome 
of this dilemma is likely to be will have to be left for future analysis 
—or the event— to decide. 

The illustrative material presented in the latter part of this 
chapter has deliberately been confined to the analysis of processes 
of change on the largest scale in highly complex societies. In gen- 
eral the problem of the status of theoretical analysis of change in 
partial social systems is not a source of difficulty. We have stated 
before, and repeat, that so far as we have sound knowledge of the 
interdependence of variables, this knowledge is applicable to the 
understanding of processes of change as well as of process within 
equilibrated systems. The difference is not a theoretical difference 
at all, but depends on the empirical problems which are at issue, and 
the scientific resources available to solve them. These resources are 
obviously classifiable as (i) prior available knowledge of empirical 
fact, (2) theoretical resources for organizing description, stating 
problems and hypotheses, and analyzing implications and, finally, 
(3) techniques of empirical research for ascertaining the relevant 
facts where they are not already available. 

It is processes of change in social systems as a whole, that is, of 
societies, which are problematical. The above treatment has been 



[ 534 ] ^^^ Processes of Change of Social Systems 
designed to illustrate two things. First, it brings home the fact that, 
as was stated at the beginning of the chapter, we do not in the 
present state of knowledge possess a general theory of the processes 
of change in societies as a whole. Therefore what we have been able 
to outline is not an "explanation" of such processes in a complete 
sense, but only a partial explanation in terms of certain elements. 
But, secondly, we hope we have been able to show that the theory 
of social systems in its present state is by no means devoid of rele- 
vance to the analysis of such processes of change, processes which 
pose precisely the most diflBcult empirical problems we have in our 
field. We very definitely have something to say about these problems. 
We can distinguish elements in them which we know to be of 
strategic importance, and we are by no means completely in the dark 
about many quite specific propositions about many of these elements. 
For example, whether or not it is possible completely to abolish 
coercive power from a society, or to do without any inequality in 
social stratification in an industrial society, is not simply a matter of 
opinion, in which the social scientist who takes the position stated 
here is merely "stating one view." The question of what elements 
in an ideology are Utopian is, with a certain margin of error, a 
scientifically answerable question, and with it the question of the 
probable consequences of attempting to institutionalize such values 
literally in a large-scale society. 

Above all, the treatment of the society deliberately and syste- 
matically as a social system, taking care to consider every problem 
indicated by the conceptual scheme as being germane to the func- 
tioning of a complete social system, constitutes an extremely power- 
ful instrument of analysis in this connection as in so many others. 
It permits us to mobilize and apply, in the proper place and order, 
the empirical and theoretical knowledge we possess. But just as im- 
portant, it forces us to recognize the gaps in our knowledge, to locate 
the unsolved problems, and to attempt to state accurately just what 
these problems are, and what we need to know in order to solve 
them. Thus, while we repeat we do not have a complete theory of 
the processes of change in social systems, we do have a canon of 
approach to the problems of constructing such a theory. When such 
a theory is available the millennium for social science will have ar- 
rived. This will not come in our time and most probably never. But 



Some Processes of Social Change [ 535 1 

progress toward it is much more likely to be assured and rapid if we 
know what we want and need. We submit that, without conceiving 
the problems in terms of the social system as a conceptual scheme, it 
is not possible to know what you want and thus even to measure 
progress toward the goal of attaining such a theory. 

Perhaps one final word may be permitted. It has persistently 
been alleged that the "structural-functional" approach to the prob- 
lems of theory in the sociological field suffers from a "static" bias. It 
has been held that the problems of change were outside its purview 
and since, the argument runs, these are obviously the really im- 
portant problems, such a theory only succeeds in cutting itself off 
from genuine empirical relevance. Perhaps the first major example 
of large-scale processes of change introduced above, that of the 
processes of change arising from the institutionalization of science 
and technology, will serve to convince the reader that the author is 
aware of the fact that we live in what is sometimes called a "dy- 
namic" society. Perhaps, even, it is not too much to hope that this 
chapter as a whole will convince him that there is a certain falsity 
in the dilemma between "static" and "dynamic" emphases. If theory 
is good theory, whichever type of problem it tackles most directly, 
there is no reason whatever to believe that it will not be equally 
applicable to the problems of change and to those of process within 
a stabilized system. 



YTl 

J. \.JLx CONCLUSION: THE 
PLACE OF SOCIOLOGICAL THEORY AMONG 
THE ANALYTICAL SCIENCES OF ACTION 



THE substantive task of the present volume has been 
accomplished as far as it will be until the preparation of a re- 
vised edition is undertaken. It remains only to point up a very few 
main considerations which are relevant to the interpretation of what 
has been attempted, and hence of the relative success which the 
attempt has achieved, and then to discuss briefly the problem of 
classification of the sciences of action. 

First a few final words may be said about what order of theo- 
retical task has in fact been undertaken. The volume is unequiv- 
ocally meant as an essay in systematic theory. It is not an attempt 
to formulate a theory of any particular concrete phenomenon, but 
is the attempt to present a logically articulated conceptual scheme. 
The title of the book, The Social System, is meant to emphasize this 
systematic reference. Social systems are empirical systems, but it is 
by virtue of their relevance to an articulated conceptual scheme 
that such empirical systems are classed together and made subject 
to a uniform analytical procedure within an explicitly defined frame 
of reference. Furthermore, the status of the book as an essay in 
theory construction justifies the two facts that, first, it has not at- 
tempted systematic codification of available empirical knowledge 
and, second, it has not tried to present a critical evaluation of the 
literature of theory itself in the field. 

The book is thus an essay in systematic theory but the suggestion 

536 



Social Systems and the General Theory of Action [ 537 ] 

is quite explicitly repudiated that it attempts in one sense to present 
a system of theory, since it has been consistently maintained that in 
the present state of knowledge, such a system cannot be formulated. 
Put a litde differently, it is a theory of systems rather than a system 
of theory. It attempts to represent the best attainable in the present 
state of knowledge with respect to the theoretical analysis of a care- 
fully defined class of empirical systems. It is fully recognized that 
this theory is fragmentary and incomplete. But at the same time, the 
concept of system as a guiding conceptual scheme is of the first im- 
portance as an organizing principle and a guide to research. It may 
thus be said that the concept of a theory of systems is the most 
strategic tool for working toward the attainment of a system of 
theory. The general character of this particular theory of systems 
has been quite sufficiently discussed so that further elucidation is 
unnecessary. The general relations between structural categories, 
the general and special imperatives of social systems, the paradigm 
of motivational process and the "growing points" of research rela- 
tive to these elements of theory have been repeatedly stated. 

§ THE PLACE OF SOCIAL SYSTEMS IN THE 
GENERAL THEORY OF ACTION 

IT HAS further been made quite clear that the theory of 
social systems is, in the sense of the present work, an integral part 
of the larger conceptual scheme which we have called the theory of 
action. As such, it is one of the three main differentiated sub-systems 
of the larger conceptual scheme, the other two being the theory of 
personality and the theory of culture. 

The interdependence of the three has constituted a major theme 
of the whole present analysis. This has been fully and systematically 
set forth in Values, Motives and Systems of Action as well, and need 
not be recapitulated in detail here. It should, however, be quite 
clear to the reader that without a fundamental clarification of the 
relation of social systems to these other branches of the theory of 
action, the level of clarity in the analysis of social systems which has 
been attained in the present work would not have been possible. 

By this is meant a clarification going well beyond what is now 
current in even the best literature of the subject. In this connection 
the experience of the author in connection with the development of 



[ 538 ] Conclusion 

the present volume, which was cited in the preface, may appropri- 
ately be recalled. A draft of about three-fourths of what had been 
planned had already been written when, in connection with the 
work going on in the general theory of action in collaboration with 
Professors Shils, Iblman and others in the fall of 1949, certain 
fundamental new insights concerning the relations between cul- 
tural and motivational elements in action generally developed. The 
work which was done in following up these insights, the results of 
which are documented in Values, Motives and Systems of Action, 
was not primarily and directly concerned with the theory of the 
social system as such, but with the general frame of reference of 
action. Theoretical developments from these starting points touched 
the fields of personality and of culture just as much as they did that 
of the social system. Yet the implications of that work for the theory 
of the social system were so far-reaching that, when work on the 
present book was resumed, it became necessary to start entirely 
anew, and it turned out that only a small proportion of the old 
manuscript, most of it consisting of illustrative material, could be 
made use of without complete re-writing. In other words, work on 
the general frame of reference of action necessitated a radical re- 
organization of thinking about the theory of the social system. 
Nothing could illustrate more vividly the fact that the theory of 
the social system is not a wholly independent conceptual scheme. 

It will hence be clear to the reader why the implications of this 
situation have had to be so consistently followed through in the 
present work. We cannot speak of the structure of the social system 
in theoretical terms at all without speaking of the institutionaliza- 
tion of cultural patterns, notably of course patterns of value-orienta- 
tion. If we are to do so sensibly we, of course, must know whereof 
we speak with respect to what the patterns which are institution- 
alized in fact are, in some sense also how they can be classified and 
otherwise analyzed. Similarly we have consistently maintained that 
the motivational processes of the social system are always processes 
within the personalities of the component individual actors. If the 
implications of such a statement are to be carried through it is 
obvious that we must know quite definitely what we are talking 
about when we speak of a personality system and its motivational 



Social Systems and the General Theory of Action [ 539 ] 

processes. We cannot rely on common-sense levels of insight for 
this purpose; the problems become definitely technical. 

It is fundamentally because, for the theory of the social system, 
the solution of these problems goes back to the general frame of 
reference of action that the anchorage of the present book in that 
general frame of reference is of such fundamental importance, and 
that important developments on the general level have proved to 
have such profound repercussions on the subject-matter of this 
volume. 

If the ultimate unity of the theory of action as a conceptual 
scheme has been strongly emphasized by these theoretical develop- 
ments, it is perhaps almost equally important that the mutual inde- 
'pendence of personality, culture and social systems as sub-systems 
of action has been strongly confirmed. The insight of what is here 
considered the best tradition of sociological theory, that as a con- 
ceptual scheme it cannot legitimately be "reduced" in either direc- 
tion is thus justified, and its grounds immensely clarified. On the 
one hand, the treatment of social systems only as "resultants" of the 
functioning of personalities in the sense common to writers with a 
"psychological" point of view, is clearly inadequate most funda- 
mentally because it ignores the organization of action about the 
exigencies of social systems as systems.^ On the other hand, to treat 
social systems as only "embodiments" of patterns of culture, as a 
certain trend of thought common among anthropologists has tended 
to do,^ is equally unacceptable to the theory of the social system. 

The mere assertion of the theoretical independence of the social 
system in both these directions has served an important function in 
the development of social science in that it has enabled sociologists 
to focus their attention on problems which would not have had 
justice done to them either in terms of psychology or of cultural 
anthropology. But, even in the thought of Durkheim, whose insight 
was probably the deepest in this respect, many aspects of the theo- 

^ Though perhaps generally now considered to be out of date, the book of 
Floyd H. AUport, Institutional Behavior, is one of the most vivid illustrations in 
the literature of what, in these terms, is the wrong way of conceiving the rela- 
tions between the psychological and the sociological levels of the analysis of action. 

^ This trend is commonly associated in particular with the name of Ruth 
Benedict. 



[ 540 ] Conclusion 

retical relationships involved in the combination of this aspect of 
independence with the equally important interdependence of these 
three system concepts, remained unclarified. The present work and 
that on which it rests in the more general theory of action may be 
said to have gone considerably farther in the clarification of these 
relationships. We are now in a position not merely to assert that a 
combination of independence and interdependence must be recog- 
nized, but to state on a certain level precisely in what this consists. 
We know just what we mean by the institutionalization of patterns 
of culture, and by the sense in which the structure of the social sys- 
tem is and is not an embodiment of a set of such patterns. We know 
certain of the most fundamental elements of personality as a system 
of action and its interrelations with the social system. We know that 
they both go back to the fundamental processes of interaction be- 
tween actors, that in this one sense personality is just as much a 
"social" phenomenon as is the social system. We know certain 
fundamental relations between the institutionalization and the in- 
ternalization of culture. Above all, perhaps, we know that the funda- 
mental common sector of personalities and social systems consists in 
the value-patterns which define role-expectations. The motivational 
structures thus organized are units hoth of personality as a system 
and of the social system in which the actor participates; they are 
need-dispositions of the personality and they are role-expectations of 
the social system. This is the key to the "transformation formula" 
between the two systems of personality and social system. It is 
maintained that, in spite of the many brilliant insights bearing this 
relationsiiip, especially in the works of Durkheim and of Freud, in 
terms which are both precise and highly generalized this set of rela- 
tionships has never been so clearly understood before. This funda- 
mental relationship between need-dispositions of the personality, 
role-expectations of the social system and internalized-institution- 
alized value-patterns of the culture, is the fundamental nodal point 
of the organization of systems of action. It is the point at which both 
the interdependence and the independence from each other of per- 
sonality, social system and culture focus. If the nature of this organi- 
zation is not clearly understood and formulated with theoretical 
precision, confusion on this fundamental subject will inevitably 
spread in all three directions and poison the whole theory of action. 



The Theory of Action and the Natural Sciences [ 541 ] 

It is a new level of clarity about this fundamental phenomenon, 
which more than any other factor has made the present level of 
analytical refinement of the theory of the social system possible. 

§ THE THEORY OF ACTION AND THE 
NATURAL SCIENCES 

THE clarification of the general theory of action and of the 
place of the theory of the social system in it, which has just been dis- 
cussed, makes it possible to say something relatively systematic 
about the field of action generally.^ 

We may start with the general relation between action and 
"nature." It does not need to be emphasized that human action is in 
the most various ways profoundly influenced by the physical, chemi- 
cal and biological properties both of the environment and of the 
organism itself. The question is that of the theoretical relevance and 
adequacy of the conceptual schemes of what, in this sense, are the 
"natural sciences" for full analysis of the phenomena of action. 
There is ample evidence of the inadequacy or inconvenience or both 
of these conceptual schemes for this purpose and thus of the inde- 
pendent justification of the action frame of reference. 

The relevance of the action frame of reference is anchored in 
three fundamental considerations. The first is that the concern of 
the sciences of action is with the relations on a certain level of the 
concrete entities, which in their biological relevance are called 
organisms, to their environments. The conceptual scheme is, that is, 
wholly and fundamentally relational. The individual "actor" is a 
name for the same concrete entity as the organism, but seen as a 
unit in this relational context. 

However, only a certain aspect of the concrete relations of the 
organism-actor to the environment is abstracted as being of interest 
to the theory of action; this is the aspect we call "action" or "be- 
havior." There is, obviously, as of central concern to the biological 
sciences, a continual physico-chemical interchange between organ- 
ism and environment, with reference, for example, to heat, and to 
the chemical interchange involved in food-intake and elimination 

' The following discussion may be considered to be a revision of the scheme 
presented in Chapter XIX of The Structure of Social Action. It will be evident 
that it constitutes a revision rather than a drastic repudiation of that scheme. 



[ r 12 ] Conclusion 

of waste products and in respiration. This, however, is not action, or 
behavior, however much it may be empirically de-pendent on action. 
Action involves not a biochemical conceptual scheme but an "orien- 
tational" scheme as this conception has been developed here and 
elsewhere. Its units are conceived in terms of a specifically relational 
frame of reference which is peculiar to organisms as units, and not 
one which is common to organisms and all other physico-chemical 
systems. In this sense behavior is a phenomenon of higher-order 
organization in the world of nature than is the "functioning" of 
oraanisms. Or, put somewhat differendy, the physico-chemical inter- 
change of organism and environment is change over the boundaries 
of the organism as itself a system, the internal processes and equilib- 
rium of which are of primary interest to the scientist. Physiology, 
as the most fundamental biological sub-science, is, we may suggest, 
essentially the science focused on the boundary-maintaining prop- 
erties of the organism as a physico-chemical system. 

But for the theory of action the organism is not a system, hut a 
unit point of reference. The focus of interest for the theory of action 
is not in the internal equilibrating processes of the organism as a 
system, but in the equilibrating processes involved in its relations 
to an environment or situation in which other organisms are of 
crucial significance. It is this relational system which is the system 
of action, not the organism as a system. It is particularly important 
here to avoid an insidious version of the fallacy of misplaced con- 
creteness which has been particularly common among psychologists. 
This is the conception that "the organism" is a concrete ontologically 
real entity and that somehow its internal physico-chemical processes, 
and their interchange with the environment are the "real thing" 
whereas behavior is a kind of resultant or epiphenomenon. It is 
exceedingly difficult for persons who think in this way to become 
aware that biological theory is abstract in exactly the same sense as 
any other scientific theory. Therefore, the organism in this sense is 
no more an ontological reality than is the famous particle of New- 
tonian physics. Pari passu the organism, as the boundary-maintain- 
ing physico-chemical system, is in absolutely no sense more or less 
real than the system of action. Both stand on fundamentally the 
same footing. Both are systems conceived in terms of a conceptual 
scheme. Both are subject to empirical verification in the same senses. 



The Theory of Action and the Natural Sciences [ 543 ] 

Underlying much of the psychological bias referred to above within 
the theory of action has been this biological bias, the tendency to 
think that only the internal system of the organism is somehow 
"real" while its relational system is not. 

A system of action, then, is a system of the relations of organisms 
in interdependence with each other and with non-social objects in 
the environment or situation. It is in order to keep this system dis- 
tinct from the organism as a physico-chemical system that we prefer, 
instead of referring to the "behavior of the organism," to speak of 
the "action of the actor," and instead of using the term environment, 
to speak of the "situation of action." We do not wish to quarrel 
about words, but we do submit that use of the biological termi- 
nology is frequently associated with genuine confusion of the 
frames of reference. 

The second fundamental feature of systems of action is that as 
relational systems, they are boundary-maintaining systems. We have 
given ample justification for this statement earlier in this work and 
elsewhere. It is this property of systems of action which states the 
analytical independence of the frame of reference of action from 
that of biological theory. If this were not the case, there would be 
no point in complicating matters by using this additional frame of 
reference for the analysis of concrete organisms as behaving entities. 
The lack of empirical success of attempts to "reduce" most action 
phenomena to biological terms is well known and need not be fur- 
ther discussed here. Suffice it to say that this statement that systems 
of action are boundary-maintaining systems has the same justifica- 
tion that any fundamental methodological assumption about a scien- 
tific conceptual scheme has. It is not as such an empirical generaliza- 
tion, but is logically prior to all empirical generalizations which are 
stated in terms of the theory of action. 

Finally, the third fundamental consideration touches the much 
discussed "subjective point of view," namely, the study of action 
"from the point of view of the actor." Contrary to the view held by 
the author in the Structure of Social Action it now appears that this 
postulate is not essential to the frame of reference of action in its 
most elementary form. It is, however, necessarily involved at the 
levels of elaboration of systems of action at which culture, that is 
shared symbolic patterns, becomes involved. It is, that is, a conse- 



[ 544 ] Conclusion 

quence of the fact that action comes to be oriented in terms of sym- 
bols which also serve to communicate with other actors. 

Another way of looking at the postulate is to consider the im- 
plications of the fact that scientific investigation is itself a process of 
action. Precisely, in terms of our present conceptual scheme, if the 
object of investigation is a physical object— which includes organ- 
isms—there is no process of social interaction between ego and the 
object. The object, that is, does not react to ego's action in terms 
analyzable in terms of the theory of action. But if the object is a 
social object, the process of investigation is itself a process of social 
interaction, and must be understood in the appropriate terms. Such 
interaction, however, in terms of the present conceptual scheme 
clearly involves communication. It is not possible in these terms to 
interpret alter's behavior in terms of the action frame of reference 
without communicating with him, without "understanding his mo- 
tives" in the full sense of the theory of action as we have developed 
such a conception. This is essentially what is meant by the subjec- 
tive reference or the subjective point of view of the theory of action.^ 

It is, of course, possible to remain a behavioristic purist and avoid 
this subjective reference, but only in one of two ways. The first is 
to repudiate the action frame of reference altogether and attempt 
to maintain a biological frame of reference. The other is to use the 
action frame of reference, but to keep the elaboration of the theory 
of action to pre-symbolic, that is pre-cultural levels.^ The issue of 

* It might well be argued that social scientists often do not interact with 
their subjects, but only objective courses of behavior or their results are studied. 
For the historian or archaeologist, indeed, since the subjects are generally dead, 
direct interaction is impossible. But this is not a valid objection. Inscriptions, his- 
torical documents and artifacts are clearly interpreted in terms of what they were 
supposed to have "meant" to the authors and users. The question asked is of the 
order of "if he were available to be interviewed about this what would he 
probably tell me?" Since he is not available for interview, the scientist resorts 
to the next best, the reconstruction from the available data of what he probably 
would say. The case of statistical and other data about "objective" behavior is 
not fundamentally different. The frame of reference in which such data are 
placed and interpreted is in general that of action which includes implicit if ♦not 
explicit reference to what the actors in question "meant by it" when they did 
what the observations record as having happened. 

' This is essentially what Professor Skinner does (Skinner, B. F. The Be- 
havior of Organisms^ and is also perhaps the major trend in the thinking of Hull 
and his more rigid disciples. There is no possible objection to this if all that is 
sought is the explanation of animal behavior — and the corresponding components 



The Classification of the Sciences of Action [ 545 ] 

"behaviorism" then really boils down to that of whether it is pos- 
sible to handle the more differentiated levels of the frame of refer- 
ence of action with the precision and care which the scientist at- 
tempts to attain. As in other branches of science "the proof of the 
pudding is in the eating." 

§ THE CLASSIFICATION OF THE 
SCIENCES OF ACTION 

WE MAY now turn to the problem of the internal division 
of labor between the sciences of action. We shall consider only those 
which have a claim to the status of analytical sciences in the sense 
that, whatever their specialization of interests in relation to classes of 
empirical phenomena, their primary claim to independent status as 
sciences rests on their concern with and responsibility for a rela- 
tively independent and distinctive conceptual scheme. Such a con- 
ceptual scheme need not be a closed system, but we will set up as 
a criterion that it must not simply be an "application" of a more gen- 
eralized scheme. 

In these terms the theory of action clearly differentiates most 
broadly into the theory of personality as a system, the theory of 
social systems and the theory of culture. There are, however, certain 
problems concerning the implications of this differentiation which 
need to be taken up. 

The theory of personality as a system seems to coincide, with 
one exception which will be taken up presently, with the field of 
psychology as a discipline. Perhaps, it would be better to say it coin- 
cides with what psychology from our point of view ought to be, 
and it seems on the whole is tending toward. There are two primary 
strictures on the suggestion that this formula is descriptive of the 
present focus of psychology. The first is the persistence of the tend- 
ency to regard psychology as essentially a biological science. The 

of human behavior — on levels where symbolism and culture are not involved. 
Indeed careful attention to the phenomena on this level can make very important 
contributions. The position becomes objectionable only when it is elevated into 
the dogma that the introduction of the symbolic-cultural levels, and with them 
the "subjective reference," is "unscientific," and should properly condemn those 
who venture into these, admittedly difficult, fields to the category of the "tender- 
minded" with the implication that their findings are almost certainly their own 
"wish fulfillments." 



[ 5^6 ] Conclusion 

problem tliis raises can, it would seem, be satisfactorily handled by 
analogy with the physical sciences. There is, of course, no question 
whatever of the overwhelmingly great importance of the interde- 
pendence between the organism as a biological system and the per- 
sonality as a system of action. But for the reasons we have just 
reviewed, this interdependence does not justify treating personality 
as simply an "extension" of the organism. The fruitful analogy is 
that with the status of bio-chemistry relative to the biological sci- 
ences. There is obviously room for specialization in the field of 
"psycho-biology," and in fact much of it of the most fruitful kind 
exists both in "physiological psychology" and in the field of "psycho- 
somatic" medicine. But we must insist that the legitimacy, promise 
and importance of this field does not justify treating the theory of 
personality as a branch of biological science, or putting the center of 
gravity of the theoretical interests of psychology into the biological 
sciences. This is a problem which the members of the psychological 
profession must ultimately face more squarely than they have 
hitherto done. 

The second stricture consists simply in the fact that genuinely 
systematic treatment of personality as a system on the action level or 
any other for that matter, has not as yet been common among even 
the most eminent theorists in the field. The situation is parallel to 
that in the social system field, where Pareto stands almost alone in 
his clear and explicit conception of the social system. Even Freud, 
though it may be said that the conception of personality as a system 
was definitely emergent from his work, did not use it as a definite 
guiding conception, and he never fully disentangled the action 
aspects of personality from the biological. Furthermore, adequate 
treatment of personality as a system has had to await clarification of 
its relations to the social system and to culture. We may hope for 
rapid advance in this direction from psychologists, but what may be 
called bio-psychological eclecticism remains more typical of psy- 
chologists who are not either bchaviorists or biologists than does 
systematic personality theory. 

The exception referred to above, to the appropriateness of the 
definition ol psychological theory as the theory of personality as a 
system, concerns the problem of where the study of certain funda- 
mentals of action process which underlie all organization of action 



The Classification of the Sciences of Action [ 547 ] 

in systems belongs, the field that is of what is sometimes called 
"behavior psychology," which includes the field of "simple learn- 
ing." The present view is that this belongs more appropriately in 
psychology than in any other of the theoretical sciences of action. 
This is essentially because the processes in question are prior to and 
underlie the organization of action in more complex systems, either 
personality or social. This is precisely the kind of thing which can 
be most fruitfully studied on pre-symbolic levels. Usually this im- 
plies that the experimental situation is one in which social inter- 
action and its variability are not crucial— as is obviously true of most 
animal learning study, though such studies of animal imitation as 
those of Miller and Dollard raise other questions. But even on this 
level variability on both the social system levels and the cultural 
level are not likely to be problematical. The focus of interest is in the 
underlying action process itself. 

As an analytical discipline, then, we would here define psychol- 
ogy as the science concerned with the elementary processes of action 
and their organization in personalities as systems. The status of social 
psychology raises special problems which can best be taken up after 
the problem of the theory of the social system has been discussed. 

The theory of the social system is, as we have seen, in a certain 
fundamental sense, directly parallel to that of personality, though 
the relation of personality to the organism means that the relations 
of the two systems are only partly symmetrical. It would, therefore, 
seem logical that there should be an analytical science of social sys- 
tems which was correlative with psychology as that of personality 
systems. This is in a broad sense an acceptable view, but there are 
complications touching the problems of the status of economics and 
political science which we must take up. 

The advances in the theory of the social system which have been 
documented in the present work make it possible to clarify further 
a view of the proper status of sociological theory with which the 
author has been concerned for a number of years. It was first tenta- 
tively stated in the final chapter of the Structure of Social Action, 
and a further revision of it was stated in the paper on The Position 
of Sociological Theory QEssays, Chapter I). The focus of this view 
has been on the importance of institutions and institutionalization 
as the primary concern of sociology as a science. In the earlier ver- 



[ 5^8 ] Conclusion 

sion also the property of "common value-integration" was strongly 

emphasized. 

If a sphere for sociological theory as a distinctive conceptual 
scheme is to be delineated, it must be either the theory of the social 
system as a whole, or some special aspect of the theory of the social 
system rather than the whole of it. First, we may suggest that the 
former formula might or might not be interpreted to include a 
"theory of culture." The problem of the status of such a theory will 
be taken up presently. Let it be said here only that the treatment of 
the involvement of culture in the social system is not in this sense a 
"theory of culture" any more than that of the involvement of per- 
sonality and motivational process has to be psychology in the sense 
just stated. 

The choice between the broader and the narrower views of the 
scope of sociological theory just stated does not involve this question, 
but turns essentially on that of the status of economic theory. The 
broader view would treat economic theory as "applied sociology" 
while the narrower would not. The narrower is the view taken here. 
It is consistent with the view that the central concern of sociological 
theory is with the phenomena of institutionalization. 

It has been brought out in Chapter IV above that within the 
institutionalized framework of a social system where the instrumen- 
tal division of labor was sufficiently elaborated, there could be a 
peculiar quantification of control of facilities through the processes 
of exchange, by means of what was called "purchasing power." This 
peculiar quantification is an emergent phenomenon appearing at 
certain levels of differentiation of social systems, and coming to be 
of high significance only within a relatively limited, though very 
important, class of social systems. It is the processes of equilibration 
of a system of such exchange-oriented actions which constitute the 
focus of economic theory as a conceptual scheme. 

As a theory of process, economic theory depends on the relevance 
of the processes of decision-making to the determination of prices 
and quantities in the system of exchange. Hence within an economy 
where freedom for decision to operate is sufficiently broad this deci- 
sion-making process is at least one primary process by which the 
allocation of resources, i.e., in our terms of facilities, comes about. 



The Classification of the Sciences of Action [ 549 ] 

This economic process may be the resultant of large numbers of 
discrete decisions by participants in the market. But it may also be 
a centralized decision process carried out by a government planning 
body. The functional significance of the economic process for the 
social system in either case is a matter of its relevance to the alloca- 
tion of facilities. 

The comhination of study of the functional significance of the 
process and its analysis in terms of a given conceptual scheme, how- 
ever, depends on its analysis in terms of the famous "postulate of 
economic rationality." This can only be interpreted to mean that the 
science of economics has little explanatory relevance to the processes 
of allocation of resources in a "traditionalistic" economy where only 
"drift" leads to alteration of the allocation system. At most it can 
serve only a "criterion" function by measuring the actual allocation 
against a standard of what in some sense would be an "economically 
rational allocation." 

The postulate of rationality, however, occupies a somewhat curi- 
ous status in the theory of action. It is a clear implication of the 
theory of action on both the personality and the social system levels, 
that "rational action" is a type which presupposes a certain mode 
of the organization of all the elements of action. It is something 
which is possible within the limits imposed by value-orientation pat- 
terns and by the situation, and by a certain mode of integration of 
motivational elements. On the personality level, that is, rational 
action is a type which exists within certain limits of the organization 
of personality. On the social system level, correspondingly, there is 
scope for rational adjustments within certain limits imposed by the 
institutionalized role-system. 

Three levels of the organization of rational action in action sys- 
tems may be distinguished. The first of these, the most elementary, 
is that involving the mobilization of resources for the attainment of 
a single given goal, by an individual actor or a collectivity. This is 
essentially what, in the Structure of Social Action was called a 
"technology," the analysis of the pattemings of action relative to 
such a single given goal. Technology always involves two aspects or 
sets of factors, those pertaining to the conditions of success, and 
those concerning the "cost," which is ultimately the sacrifice of 



[ 550 ] Conclusion 

alternative goals involved in the expenditure of resources for the one 
in question. "Efficiency" is the measure of the effectiveness of a 
technological process relative to its cost. 

The second level of organization introduces considerations of 
"economy," which consists in the process of the allocation of re- 
sources relative to a plurality of alternative goals. Here cost is not a 
constant but a variable in that there is explicit consideration not 
merely of the minimization of expenditure compatible with effec- 
tiveness, but of allocation of resources between alternative goals. 
This is what the decision-making process does with the facilities of 
the social system. 

The third level of organization of rational action is concerned 
not with economy but with the maximization of power in the politi- 
cal sense. Here the orientation is to the maximization of total com- 
mand of facilities in the social system held by one actor, individual 
or collective, relative to others. There is hence, as we pointed out in 
Chapter IV, no inherent limitation of scope, but anything, espe- 
cially in the sphere of relational possessions, which can have sig- 
nificance as a facility, may become involved in the political power 
system. 

Technology and economy on the basis of the individual per- 
sonality can be said to constitute psychological problem areas, 
whereas the relational character of political power makes it impos- 
sible to consider it wholly from a psychological point of view. On the 
social system level, on the other hand, technology can be the analysis 
of the goal-orientation of a collectivity as an organization, which 
involves its role structure, and hence involves problems of institu- 
tionalization, whereas economy involves the interrelations of a plu- 
rality of actors individual and/or collective. This perspective, how- 
ever, involves a specific institutionalized limitation of scope. 

Hence we may say that the implications of the postulate of 
rationality are within certain limits psychological, that is, they rest 
in the theory of personality, but that economics as a social science is 
concerned with the phenomena of rational decision-making and the 
consequences of these decisions within an institutionalized system 
of exchange relationships. This is, within the theory of action, such 
a highly distinctive complex that the claim of economic theory to 
autonomy with respect to it seems quite justified. 

The case of political science is a wholly different one. Variant 



The Classification of the Sciences of Action [ 551 ] 

definitions of its scope are current within the profession itself. Here 
we are concerned only with the claim that it should be organized 
about an analytical theoretical scheme of a scope and character 
parallel to that of economic theory. The only current formula for 
this claim is that it should be treated as the theory of power. In this 
connection one fact will strike the reader immediately, namely, that 
in technical elaboration as a conceptual scheme, there is no such 
thing as a theory of power which is remotely comparable with eco- 
nomic theory. We believe that the above analysis (Chapter IV) has 
given the fundamental reason for this fact, namely, chat power in 
the political sense is inherently diffuse as contrasted with the spec- 
ificity of economic power. This means that a theory of political 
power must in the nature of the case take into account as variahles, 
most of the variables of the social system. 

In view of this fact it is in fact appropriate to treat political sci- 
ence as the discipline concerned with political power and its use and 
control, but because of the diffuseness of political power this makes 
it a synthetic science in the social system field, not one built about 
a distinctive analytical conceptual scheme, that is, a strictly limited 
set of variables. The common designation as the field of "govern- 
ment" comes relatively close to this conception. 

In the light of these considerations we may come back to the 
question of the scope of sociological theory. Institutionalization of 
cultural patterns means, as we have often emphasized, in the inte- 
grated sense internalization of the same patterns in the personality. 
Psychologically an internalized pattern is no longer an object of the 
situation. It is not possible to treat it as an instrumental means or 
condition. There is a specific mode of cathectic integration of the 
actor's need-dispositions with an internalized pattern. This fact has 
a fundamental methodological significance. It means that the orien- 
tation of "instrumental rationality" cannot be the attitude defining 
the actor's orientation to internalized patterns. 

We derive, then, a most significant complex of relationships. The 
value-integration of the social system is defined by the system of pat- 
terns of value-orientation which have become institutionalized to 
constitute the definitions of its constituent role-expectation patterns. 
The institutionalization of these patterns in turn means that typi- 
cally they have become internalized in the personality systems of the 
actors in the social system and this fact in turn means that their 



[ ^^2 ] Conclusion 

relevance to the determination of behavior cannot be primarily 
tlirough the "mechanisms" of instrumental rationality but must be 
through what are sometimes called the non- and irrational mech- 
anisms of die functioning of personality. 

This is the fundamental reason why die sociologist cannot follow 
the lead of economics or indeed of the whole of utilitarian theory in 
his fundamental account of the motivational forces in institutional 
behavior, and why the concepts of modem "dynamic psychology" 
have come to be of such critical importance to him. This again is 
why a sociological theory which can get beyond structural descrip- 
tion and the classifications of "formal sociology" must be adequately 
integrated with the theory of personality precisely in the modem 
psychological sense. 

Sociological theory, dien, is for us that aspect of the theory of 
social systems which is concerned with the 'phenomena of the insti- 
tutionalization of patterns of value-orientation in the social system, 
with die conditions of that institutionalization, and of changes in 
the pattems, with conditions of conformity with and deviance from 
a set of such pattems and with motivational processes in so far as 
they are involved in all of these. As motivational processes these 
cannot be the processes of rational action in the economic sense, but 
involve the processes of value-acquisition through identification and 
of deviance and social control as these have been analyzed above. 
Since we have only indicated where economics and political science 
fit in, the present volume can, in these terms, be regarded rather 
strictly as a contribution to sociological theory. 

It is hoped that it will be entirely clear to the reader that this 
view does not constitute the "reduction" of sociological theory to 
psychological terms, but the extension of the structural aspect of that 
theory to an explicit statement of its concern with motivational 
process within the context of the functioning of the social system 
as a system. The processes are, as has been repeatedly stated, exactly 
the same concrete processes which are involved in the functioning 
of personalities as systems. But their context of theoretical relevance 
is that of the social system as a system and not of the personality 
as a system. 

Now we are in a position to say something about social psychol- 
ogy as a discipline. We would interpret its place as that of an inter- 
stitial mediating field between sociology and psychology in a sense 



The Classification of the Sciences of Action [ 553 ] 

directly analogous to that of biochemistry or of psychobiology or 
physiological psychology. We could say, then, that the social psy- 
chologist is not directly concerned with the analysis of the structure 
of social systems, but with motivational processes and personalities 
in their specific relations to and interdependence with the structure 
of social systems, notably, that is, their bearing on the explanation of 
socially structured and "mass" phenomena. 

It follows, however, that social psychology as a theoretical dis- 
cipline should not have the same order of independent theoretical 
significance as does either psychological theory or sociological theory. 
Above all there can be no such thing as good social psychology with- 
out explicit and systematic reference to the sociological aspects of 
the theory of social systems. Without that it becomes merely a cover 
for a "psychological bias" in the interpretation of social phenomena. 
The only alternative to this view is to hold that since all action is 
"process of the mind" or "behavior" there is no place for a distinct 
theory of the social system at all. The unacceptability of such a posi- 
tion is, in the light of the whole above discussion, abundantly clear. 

Finally, we may say a word about the implications of the rela- 
tions between culture and social systems for the classification of the 
sciences of action. There is, in our opinion, an important place for 
a "theory of culture" as part of the theory of action, which is quite 
definitely not sociological theory in the sense in which this has just 
been defined. This is what, according to the present trend, anthro- 
pological theory is tending to become. According to this view cul- 
ture, as an empirical phenomenon, is not more independent of per- 
sonalities and social systems than are social systems of personalities. 
As part of the theory of action, then, the theory of culture must be 
the theory concerned not only with the properties of culture as such 
but with the interdependence of patterns of culture with the other 
components of systems of action. It is, of course, concerned with the 
structure of systems of culture patterns, with the different types of 
such systems and their classification. But it is also concerned with 
their involvement in social systems and personalities, and with the 
implications of this involvement for their maintenance as "living" 
cultures in action systems, and for their tendencies of change. The 
focus, however, is always on the culture pattern system as such, and 
neither on the social system in which it is involved, nor on the per- 
sonalities as systems. 



[ 554 ] Conclusion 

Only by some such definition of its scope can anthropology be- 
come an analytical empirical science which is independent both of 
sociology and of psychology. This view gives it a scope which pardy 
justifies the breadth of the term Anthropology, because of the in- 
volvement of culture both in personalities and in social systems. The 
alternative is to take the name literally and make it the "science of 
man." As a dieoretical science this is scarcely to be seriously con- 
sidered, for surely physical anthropology as human biology is not 
theoretically a distinctive science. And surely the anthropologist is 
not going to try to absorb all of humanly significant biology, includ- 
ing all the medical sciences, all of psychology and all of sociology, 
to say nothing of history, economics and political science. It might 
be possible to make it a synthetic empirical science of man, drawing 
on these many theoretical sciences, but not itself an independent 
theoretical science. But as an alternative to this the above offers a 
definition of the possible theoretical scope of anthropology which is 
compatible with those of the other sciences of action which have 
been advanced here. Furthermore it is clear that such a theoretical 
science is needed in order to complete the roster of the theoretical 
sciences of the field of action. The place of culture is of such funda- 
mental importance that we cannot afford to have it omitted. 

One other point needs to be made. Anthropological theory de- 
fined in this way should be clearly distinguished from what in Ger- 
many have been called the Geisteswissenchaften, or are sometimes 
called the "formal" disciplines. These deal with analysis of the con- 
tent of cultural pattern systems for its own sake without regard to 
their involvement in systems of action. Thus, logic or mathematics, 
the methodology of scientific theory, or the analysis of art forms fall 
in this category. Clearly the anthropological theorist must lean on 
these disciplines just as the psychologist must lean on the biologist. 
But anthropological theory as here conceived clearly belongs to the 
sciences of action, not to these formal disciplines. 

The above has been a highly schematic classification of the theo- 
retical sciences of action. Naturally it is not expected that the actual 
fields of empirical interest and research activity of persons belong- 
ing to the various disciplines will follow such a scheme with neat 
precision. Indeed this would be altogether incompatible with the 
nature of a vital growing scientific tradition. But this fact does not 



The Classification of the Sciences of Action [ 555 ] 

in the least diminish the importance of clarity about these funda- 
mental points of reference around which the theoretical content of 
the sciences of action is organized. The disappearance of the rele- 
vance of the major distinctions of such a scheme will mean that 
theory itself has evolved to an altogether new level. 

Also we have confined our attention to the sciences which are 
primarily organized about a distinctive theoretical scheme on an 
analytical level. This clearly precludes the inclusion of history as 
standing on the same level. In so far as history is a social science and 
not one of the humanities, it clearly is not organized about any one 
of these distinctive schemes unless it be that of the social system as 
a whole. It seems better to conceive history as a synthetic empirical 
science which is concerned vdth the mobilization of all the theo- 
retical knowledge which is relevant in the explanation of processes 
in social systems and in cultural change in the past. There are, 
besides political science, according to the view of it as stated above, 
several others of these synthetic disciplines dealing mainly with con- 
temporary phenomena such as population studies, "regional studies" 
—if it be a discipline at all— or "international relations." 

We have now reached the end of our long analysis of the com- 
plexities of the social system. In conclusion, it may be appropriate to 
quote part of the closing paragraph of the Structure of Social Action 
written fourteen years ago in 1937. 

"It is not, therefore, possible to concur in the prevailing pessi- 
mistic judgment of the social sciences, particularly sociology. . . . 
Notable progress on both empirical and theoretical levels has been 
made in the short space of a generation. We have sound theoretical 
foundations on which to build." 

This statement seems to have been amply justified by the event. 
Further empirical progress has certainly been made in the inter- 
vening years with many students contributing to it. Similarly on the 
theoretical side, which has been our concern in the present book. 
The Structure of Social Action proved, as it was hoped that it would 
be, only a beginning. If the theory of the social system had not 
advanced notably since it was written, the present book would not 
have been possible. By the same token, the present effort is only a 
link in a much longer chain. We can have full confidence that many 
further links will be forged, and soon. 



I 



NDEX 



IN THE Preface and at various points throughout this 
book it has been noted that many of the background concepts 
important to the book are more fully discussed in the monograph 
of Parsons and Shils' Values, Motives and Systems of Action in 
Toward a General Theory of Action (Parsons and Shils, editors, 
Harvard University Press, 195 1). For the convenience of the reader 
who wishes to follow up some of the problems involved in the 
definition and use of these concepts this note is inserted. 

In the nature of the present work, only limited attention could 
be given to many of the psychological concepts most relevant to it. 
Fuller discussion of these will be found above all in Chapter II of 
the monograph, "Personality as a System of Action," and in briefer 
form, in the "General Statement," Part I, Chapter I of the volume. 
The strategic concept need-disposition will be found defined and 
analyzed in both these places, and its relation to other motivational 
concepts like "drive" discussed. In the same chapter the reader will 
find a considerably fuller discussion of the mechanisms of person- 
ality, with an attempt at their systematic classification, than has 
been possible here. Further, the concept O'ptimization of gratification 
is defined and elucidated in that chapter. 

Also, the very central concepts of interaction, the "paradigm" of 
interaction, and the related concept of double contingency are dis- 
cussed at several places in the other volume, notably in a separate 
section of the "General Statement" and in a section near the end 
of Chapter I of the monograph. The application of this analysis to 

556 



Index [ 557 ] 

the theory of personahty is discussed particularly in the sections of 
Chapter II on "The Articulation of Personality and Social Systems" 
and "Need-Dispositions and Role-Expectations." 

The reader who may be concerned about the use of the concept 
system, on both the theoretical and the empirical levels, will find a 
discussion of the meaning of systems of theory in the Introduction 
to the monograph (not the Preface to the volume) and one of the 
nature of empirical systems, and the classification of types of them, 
as the last section of Chapter I of the monograph. 

Finally, the "pattern variable" scheme, its derivation from the 
frame of reference of action, and the way in which it is involved in 
personalities as well as in social systems, is more fully discussed 
in Chapter I of the monograph than in the present volume. The 
attention of the reader is particularly invited to the section "The 
Interrelations of the Pattern Variables" where the concept of sym- 
tnetrical asymmetry is discussed. 



ABERLE, David F., 2611. 

Acceptance vs. commitment, 55-57, 332 

Achievement- Ascription 

and allocation of personnel, 1 1 7- 1 1 9 
and belief systems, 343, 381, 382- 

383 

and categorization, 138 

and child socialization, 218, 226, 
237, 24off. 

definition of, 63-65 

and deviance, 258, 260, 262, 268, 
284, 290 

in differentiation of social objects, 
88-96 

in expressive symbol systems, 421- 
427 

and functional imperatives, 170-177 

and kinship, 1 54f . 

in medical practice, 434, 438, 454 

vs. other pattern variables, 101-112 

social-system reference of, i o6ff . 

and technological change, 533 

See also Pattern variables; Univer- 
salisric and Particularistic Achieve- 
ment and Ascription patterns 
Action, definition of, 4-5, 543 



Action frame of reference 
and natural sciences, 541-545 
and outside variables, 488-490 
place of social systems in, 3-22, 537- 
541 

Action-interests, definition of, 46-51, 
57-58 
See also Cognitive, Adjustive and 
Integrative action-interests 

Action-orientarions 

definition and types of, 46-51, 58 
and pattern-variable scheme, 59ff. 
and relational institutions, 69-88 
See also Instrumental, Expressive 
and Moral action-orientations 

Activity-passivity, 8 
definition of, 257n. 
and deviant social structures, 283- 

297 
and directions of deviance, 256-257 
and social control, 323-325 
and socialization, 226 

Actors 

as objects of orientation, 138-140 
as units of social systems, 24-26 



[558] 



Index 



Adaptive structures 

definition of, 168-169 

in major types of social structure, 
184-199 passim 

in medical profession, 469-471 

and social change, 510-533 j>assim 

See also Strain 
Adequacy, 247, 271, 425 

definition of, 261-262 
Adjustive action-interests 

definition of, 47 

in pattern-variable scheme, 6off. 
Adjustment, mechanisms of, 371, 396, 
491 

definition of, 203-204 

and deviance, 282 

and social control, 206 

and socialization, 220, 233-234 
Administrative roles, see Executive 

roles, Leadership roles 
Adult socialization, 236-248 -passim 
Affectivity-Neutrality 

and belief systems, 334, 343, 346 

and child socialization, 216, 219, 
221, 223, 225-226, 232-233, 237 

definition of, 59-61 

and deviance, 262-265, 267-269 

and entertainment, 512 

and expressive symbols, 389-394, 
395,416-427 

and functional imperatives, i74ff. 

and instrumental complex, 158 

and instrumental vs. expressive ac- 
tions, 81, 84-88 

in medical practice, 434, 435, 438, 
458-462 

motivational reference of, 105-106 

vs. other pattern variables, 1 03-1 12 

and structural imperatives, 177-180 

and types of attachment, 129-132 

in universalistic achievement pat- 
tern, 189-190 

and vested interests, 492 

See also Pattern variables. Value- 
orientation patterns 
Age, as ascriptive criterion, 8990, 1 1 7, 

170 
Aggressiveness, 259, 324 
Anenative need-dispositions 

definition of, 254 



and expressive symbols, 405-407 

primary vs. secondary, 233-235 

See also Conformity-Alienation 
Allocation, 1 14-132, 175-176 

classification of types of, 136, 145- 
148 

definition of, 11 4- 1 1 5 

of expressive symbols, 414-427 

of facilities, 71-73 

of personnel, 114-119 

of rewards, 79, 127-132, 414-427 

vs. socialization, 207 

and stratification, 1 58-161 
Allport, Floyd, 539n. 
Allport, Gordon, xi 
Ambivalence, 157, 208 

and genesis of deviance, 253-256 
American Medical Association, 445n. 
Animism, 377 
Anomie, 33, 141, 303 

definition of, 39 
Anonymity, 309 
Anthropology 

scope of, 553-554 

vs. sociology, 181-182 
Anthropomorphism, 377-378 
Anxiety, as reaction to strain, 299, 300 
Applied philosophy, 364-367 
Applied science, 345-348 
Appointive allocation, 118, 134 
Appreciative standards, 97, 128 

definition of, 13 

in expressive symbolism, 384-394 

vs. moral value-orientations, yy 

in pattern variable scheme, 62fF. 
Approval, 186, 192, 320 

and deviance, 261, 263-265 

and expressive symbolism, 391-394, 
422-426 

pattern-variable components of, 108, 
109-110 

and reward system, 130-132, 422-426 

and socialization, 213, 223 
Artisan role, 88 
Artist role, 385, 399, 408-414 
Asceticism, 376 

Ascription, see Achievement-Ascrip- 
tion, Quahty-complexes 
Ascriptive allocation, 117 
Associations, definition of, 100 



Ind 






[559] 



Attachment, types of, 77, 236 

and child socialization, 213, 216, 

218 
classification of, 129-132 
and deviance, 263-265, 268 
and expressive symbols, 389-394 
and reward system, 417-420 
See also Love, Approval, Esteem 

Attitudes 

pattern- variable types of, 108 
as possessions, i28fiF., 4i5ff. 
as sanctions, 252, 272-277 

Ausgleich, 164, 37^-374, 382, 53° 

Authoritarianism, I9iff., 197, 199, 358- 
359, 365, 366n., 531 
definition of, 194 

Authority, 136 

and physician role, 442, 465 
See also Leadership roles. Execu- 
tive roles 

Avoidance conditioning, 2i2n. 

BALES, Robert Freed, xi, 40 5n. 
Barnard, Chester L, 317 
Basic personality structure, 208 

definition of, 226-235 

and situational role-specification, 236- 

243 
Behaviorism, 544-545 
Being, problem of, 359-361 
Belief systems, 55-57 

classification of, 148-149, 326-332 

definition of, 46-48 

empirical, 332-359 

vs. expressive symbol systems, 349, 

375-376, 398,413-414 
non-empirical, 359-379 
and social change, 499-500, 515-519 
vs. value-orientations, 35, 350-351, 

379-383 
See also Science, Philosophy, Ide- 
ologies, Religious beliefs 
Benedict, Ruth, 490, 539n. 
Berman, Harold J., 53 in. 
Biological determinism, 29n., 488-489 
Biological organisms 

place of in action theory, 28, 32-33, 

80, 541-545 
and quahty-complexes, 89 
Biological position, 90, 170, 171, 195 



Biology, 487 

vs. psychology, 545-547 

and theory of action, 541-545 
Bodies, access to, and physician role, 

451-452,457-458 
Bohemianism, 284-285, 289, 410 
Boundary-maintaining systems 

biological organisms as, 542-543 

definition of, 36, 482-483 

and deviance, 251 

and social chance, 482-483 
Bourricaud, Francois, xi 
Brinton, Crane, I57n. 
Buddhism, 362flF. 
Bureaucracy, 290-291, 509, 512 
Business class, 319 



CALVINISM, 190, 374-375 
Capitahsm, 179-180, 319, 509, 513-515 

See also Profit motive 
Categorization, 170 
definition of, 138 
Cathectic-evaluative learning mechan- 
isms, 209-2 1 1 
Cathectic orientations, 32 

and behef systems, 327-332, 379-383 
as components of action-orientations, 

46-51 
definition of, 7 
vs. expressive action, 75 
and expressive symbols, 386-394 
in genesis of deviance, 251-253, 265- 

266, 268, 272 
in pattern-variable scheme, 62fiF. 
and relational institutions, 76-77 
and rewards, 127, 128-129 
and sick role, 438 
and social control, 322-323 
Catholic Church, 56, 179-180, 
191, 317, 34on., 372, 373, 
413, 517, 526 
Character formation, see Basic 

sonahty structure 
Charisma, 142, 296, 402-403, 5o2n., 

520-525 
Child-training practices, 2i5n. 
China, 96, in, 163, 178-179, 195-198, 

414,418,432, 523 
Christian Science, 35, 433 



190- 
407, 

per- 



[560] 



Index 



Christianity, 165, 296, 316, 341, 360, 
363, 364, 374, 375, 378, 520, 
521, 523, 526, 527, 530 
Church and state, 175, 179-180 
Class, 188, 229 

definition of, 172 

and functional imperatives, 172-177 

See also Stratification 
Class conflict, 513-515 
Classificatory ascription, 89-94, 191 
Clerg\Tnan role, 444, 445 
Clusterings, see Empirical clusterings 
Coercion, see Force 
Cognitive action-interests, definition of, 

47 
Cognitive distortion, 383 

and deviance, 256, 266-267, 278-279 
and ideologies, 328, 356-359 
Cognitive learning mechanisms, 209- 

211 
Cognitive orientations 

and belief systems, 327-3322., 379- 

383 

as components of action-orientations, 
46-51 

definition of, 7 

and expressive symbols, 398 
Cognitive standards, 97 

definition of, 1 3 

in pattern-variable scheme, 62ff. 
Cohen, A. K., 26n. 

Collectivism, 190- 191, 192, 195-196, 
197-198, 354 

definition of, 194 
Collectivities 

and achievement-ascription, 93-95 

as actors, 138, 142-143, 144-145 

allocation of, i i7n. 

definition of, 41, 97-98 

and expressive symbols, 394-399 

and ideologies, 349-3 5ofF. 

vs. institutions, 39-40 

as integrative foci, 135-136 

loyalties to, 77-78 

social systems as, loi 

societies as, 174-175 

and solidarity, 96-101 

See also Self-Collectivity orientation, 
Subcultxires 
Commitment vs. acceptance, 55-57, 332 



Communicarion 

and belief systems, 327-328 

as functional prerequisite, 33-35 

and generalization, 1 1 
Communism, 521, 524, 528 

as deviant, 294-295 

See also Marxism, Soviet Union 
Communities, 229 

definition of, 91 

and functional imperatives, i72ff. 

in major types of social structure, 
187, 196, 198 
Compatibility, see Structural impera- 
tives 
Competence 

in occupational roles, 158-159 

in physician role, 434-436, 447-449, 
454-456 

in scientist role, 340-341, 347 

and sick role, 441-442 

and technological change, 508-509 
Competitive allocation, 118-119, 134 
Compulsive acquiescence, 257fiF. 
Compulsive alienation, definition of, 
254-255 

See Conformity- Alienation 
Compulsive avoidance of responsibility, 

323 
Compulsive conformity, 271, 280, 285- 
286, 289, 290 
definition of, 254-255 
See also Conformity-Alienation 
Compulsive enforcement, 259, 261, 

286, 287, 324 
Compulsive independence, 259, 260, 

265, 276 
Compulsive performance, 257ff., 271, 

286 
Compulsive responsibility, 323 
Conant, James B., 335n. 
Conformative need-dispositions, defini- 
tion of, 254 
Conformity 

Merton definition of, 257-258 
social-system meaning of, 249-251 
Conformity-Alienation 

and basic personality, 233-235 
and bias in sanctions, 272-277 
and deviant social structures, 283- 
297 



Inde: 



[561] 



and directions of deviance, 256-267, 
271-272 

and functional prerequisites, 32 

and revolutionary movements, 520- 
525, 527-529, 531 

and role conflict, 282 

and social control, iogS., 321-325 
Conservatism, 191, I92n., 518 
Conspicuous consumption, 245 
Constantine, 528 
Consumer role, 93-94, 246 
Contemplation, 375-376 
Contract, 72 
Cooperation, 72-73 
Cosmology, see Being, problem of 
Counter-ideologies, 355 
Criminal role, 255, 284, 286-287, 288- 

2.89, 309-313, 315 
Cultural determinism, 1 5 
Cultural institutions 

classification of, 137, 140-141, 148- 
149 

definition of, 52-57 
Cultural objects, 89 

definition of, 4 

and expressive symbols, 389, 418- 
422 

and ideologies, 353-354 

as possessions, 1 20-1 21 
Cultural systems 

definition of, 5, 10- 11 

and functional prerequisites, 33-36 

internalization of, 34 

vs. personality and social systems, 
9-10, 14-19, 239n., 539-541 

vs. personality systems, 327 

and scope of anthropology, 553-554 

vs. social systems, 86-87, 304"-, 3^6- 
332ff. 

See also Belief systems. Expressive 
symbol systems. Value-orientations 
Cultural tradition 

and deviance, 296-297 

and growth of science, 340-345 

and medical profession, 429-433 
Culture 

definition of, i5ff., 327 

and social change, 487, 490, 498-501 
"Culture and personality," 14-15, 239n. 



Culture configurations 

and science, 336-337, 340-345 
and social change, 488, 490, 493 

Culture patterns, types of, 46-51, 57 

Cushing, Harvey, 448n. 

DAVIS, A. K., 26n. 

Death, 304, 371, 430, 444-445 
and value-integration, 163-164 

Defense, mechanisms of, 491 
definition of, 203-204 
and deviance, 252, 255, 282 
and social control, 206 
and socialization, 220, 233-234 

Defensiveness, as reaction to strain, 
299, 300 

Delinquent gangs, 286-287, 288-289, 

291, 293, 355 
Demareth, N. J., 289n., 3o6n. 
Dependency, 155, 262, 285, 289 

definition of, 215 
Devereux, E. C, Jr., 307n. 
Deviance 

and bias in sanctions, 272-277 

definition of, 206, 250-251 

direction of, 256-267 

and functional prerequisites, 27, 29- 
30, 35 

and ideologies, 355-358 

legitimations of, 291-297, 355-358 

and "reality factors," 277-278 

and role conflict, 280-283 

and sick role, 438, 440, 476-477 

and social change, 5 1 2-5 1 3 

and social control, 297-321 

social structure of, 283-297 

source of, 251-256 

and type of value pattern, 267-269 

and vagueness of expectations, 269- 
272 

and vagueness of sanctions, 278-280 

vs. variance, 231-235 
Dickson, William J., 5o7n. 
Difi^erentiation, see Role-expectations, 
Roles, Social Systems, diff'erentia- 
tion of 
Diff'useness, see Specificity-Diffuseness 
Discrimination, 209, 2 10-2 11 
Disintegration, 27 
Displacement, 266, 405-406 



[562] 



Index 



Disposal, yoff. 

and artist role, 408-409 

definition of, 70 
Division of labor, see Instrumental 

complex 
Dogma vs. mythology, 398 
DoUard, John, 547 
Dominance, 259, 262-263, 2.87, 300, 

324 
Double contingency, 10, 36ff., 48, 94 
Drives, primary, 391 
Duikheim, Emile, xi, 43, 132, 310, 

367, 368-369, 386n., 395, 396, 

397, 466n., 497, 507n., 539, 54o 
Dynamics of social systems, 42-43, 133, 

166-167, 201-207, 493-494, 535 
See also Social change 



ECOLOGICAL systems 

vs. collectivities, 1 00-101 

definition of, 93-94 

and functional imperatives, I74ff. 
Economics, 42-43, 7off. 

and "approval," 131 

and power, 123-125 

scope of, 74-75, 124-125, 548-550 
Education, 56-57, 186-187, 305> 3^7 

and growth of science, 341-343 

and revolution, 528 

and socialization, 236-237, 239-242 
Ego-integrative action orientations 

definition of, 50 

and regulative institutions, 54 

vs. social-integrative orientations, 



51, 



Empirical beliefs, 332-359 
definition of, 328-332 
See also Ideologies, Science 

Empirical clusterings, 1 51-167 

Empirical generalization, and theory of 
social change, 487-490, 501-503 

Empirical knowledge, envelopment of, 

33^-334 
See also Science 
English royalty, 407 
Enlightenment, 296 
Entertainment, 131, 189, 512 
Enviroimient, and social change, 488- 
490, 493 
See also Situation 



Epistemology, see Knowledge, problem 

of 
Equilibrium 

and deviance, 250, 272-277 

and motivational mechanisms, 205- 

207 
and social change, 481-483, 491-492, 

519-520 
and social control, 297-298 
static vs. moving, 36n., 481, 491, 
492, 520 
Erotic activities, 316 

and expressive sj^mbolism, 388, 389- 

391, 393,417-420 
and kinship structures, 1 54flF. 
and physician role, 457-458 
and regvdative institutions, 54 
and reward system, 1 30- 1 3 1 
and socialization, 216, 217-218, 221- 
225, 238 
Error, 359 
Esteem, 186, 192 

and deviance, 261, 263-265 

and expressive symbolism, 391-394, 

426-427 
pattern-variable components of, 108, 

109-110 
and reward system, 130-132, 426- 

427 
and socialization, 213, 223 
Ethnic groups, 172-177, 188, 229 

definition of, 172 
Etiquette, 268 

Evaluative action-interests, see Integra- 
tive action-interests 
Evaluative behefs, definition of, 330- 

33i 

See also Ideologies, Religious beliefs 
Evaluative motivational orientations 

and belief systems, 327-332, 379-383 

as components of action-orientations, 
46-51 

definition of, 7 

and institutional integration, 37flF. 

vs. moral action-orientations, 55-57 

and religion, 368 
Evaluative symbolism, 385, 392, 395, 

396-397, 402-403, 417, 516 
Evans-Pritchard, E. E., 31 in. 
Evasion, 259, 261, 289, 324 
Evil, problem of, 163-164, 371-374 



Ind 



ex 



[563] 



Exchange, yofF., i22ff., 184 
and profit motive, 243-248 
See also, Allocation, Instrumental 
complex 
Executive role, 88, 184, 316-317, 318, 
400-404, 412 
See also Leadership roles 
Existential beliefs, definition of, 328- 

329 

See also Science, Philosophy 
Expectations, 32 

definition of, 5 

See also Role-expectations 
Expressive action-orientations, 97, 100 

definition of, 49 

and expressive symbolism, 384-394 

vs. instrumental orientations, 79-88, 
127, 385, 401-403, 409-410 

in pattern-variable scheme, 59-6off. 

and regulative institutions, 54 

and relational institutions, 75-79 

and reward system, 127-132 
Expressive symbol systems 

and artist role, 408-414 

vs. belief systems, 349, 375-376, 398, 
413-414 

and child socialization, 213, 218 

classification of, 149 

and collectivities, 394-399 

derivation of, 46-48 

and deviance, 263 

genesis of, 384-394 

institutionalization of, 393-394 

and medical practice, 444-445, 451- 

454 
and power, i23n., 420, 425 
and profit motive, 244-245 
and relational institutions, 76-78 
and reward system, 127-132, 414-427 
and role differentiation, 399-407 
and science, 342 
and social change, 500-501 
and technological change, 5 1 1-5 1 5 



FAQLITIES 

allocation of, 119-127, 175-176 
and political power, 161- 162 
as possessions, 71-73 
and profit motive, 245 
vs. rewards, 119 



and stratification, 157-161 
and technological change, 508 

Family, see Kinship structures. Paren- 
tal roles 

Fantasy, as reaction to strain, 253n., 
299. 300. 512, 

Father-figures, 406-407, 462n. 

Father role, 221-225 

Feminine role, 221-225, 232, 510 

Feudalism, 179-180, 196-197 

Firth, Raymond, 333n. 

Fixations, 217-218 

Force 

and economic power, 1 24 

and political power, 126, 161-163 

and revol^ition, 528 

and social control, 277, 311, 312 

and territorial location, 91, 161-163 

Fox, Ren6e, xi 

Free-floating affect, 266, 406 

Freedom, 296 

French Canada, 517 

French Revolution, i57n., 514 

Freud, Sigmund, 222, 388, 540, 546 

Friendliness, 418 

Friendship, 174, 189 

Frustration, 219, 221, 252ff. 

Functional alternatives, 1 67 

Functional imperatives, 167-177 

Functional prerequisites 

of empirical societies, 167-177 
vs. functional imperatives, 484 
and health, 429-433 
of social systems, 26-36, 115 

Functions 

definition of, 20-22 

vs. goals, 82 

manifest vs. latent, 30, 476-477 

Fundamentalism, 292, 516-517 

Fusions [of pattern variables], 87-88, 
158 

GALILEO, 34on. 

Gambling, 306-308 

Geer, Mrs. Norman F., xii 

Gemeinschaft, definition of, 100 

Generalization, ii, 209, 210-211, 218, 

233,422 
Geographical determinism, 29n. 
Germany, 111, 517 

revolutionary change in, 523-525 



[564] 



Index 



Germany — ^Continued') 

and universalistic ascription pattern, 
191-194 
Goal-orientation, 43 

and activity-passivity, 258 
and belief systems, 330 
place of in action frame of refer- 
ence, 8 
See also Instrumental action-orien- 
tations 
Goals 

non-empirical, 190-191, 375 
relativity of, 82 
situationally generalized, 240 
in universalistic-achievement pattern, 
184 
Granet, Marcel, 414 
Gratification -Deprivation, 220, 331, 

352, 387, 393 
and afiFectivity-neutrality, 59-60 
and institutional integration, 36-45 
and social change, 496-498 
ultimate structuring of, 9 
See also AfFectivity-Neutrality 
Greece, 174, 362, 363, 411, 432 

HEALTH, as functional prerequisite, 

429-433 
Hedonism, 384, 497, 512 
Henderson, L. J., vii, 428n., 467n. 
Hinduism, 175, 362ff. 
History, scope of, 555 
Hider, 524 
Hobbes, Thomas, 121 
Hobbesian problem of order, 36, 43, 

71, 1 1 8-1 19 
Hoboism, 284-285, 289 
Hostility, as reaction to strain, 253, 

299, 300 
Hull, Clark L., 544n. 
Humanism, and growth of science, 

341-343 

IDEAS, see Belief systems 
Identification 

and basic personality, 228, 23off. 

definition of, 211 

and situational role-specification, 236, 
237, 240-242 

and socialization, 213-226 



Ideologies, 267 

definition of, 331, 349-35° 

institutionalization of, 348-359 

vs. philosophy, 364-367 

vs. religious beliefs, 350, 530, 531- 
532 

and science, 339, 353-354, 517-519 

and social change, 517-519, 522-523, 
524, 525-530 
Ignorance 

and physician role, 447-449 

place of in behef systems, 359 
Illness 

definition of, 431 

motivated, 430-431, 437-438, 449- 
450, 476-477 

See also Sick role 
Imitation 

definition of, 211 

and socialization, 212, 216 
Incorrigibility, 259, 260, 261, 324 
Indefiniteness 

and legitimation of deviance, 292 

and role conflict, 280 

as source of deviance, 269-272 

See also Uncertainty 
India, 172, 175, 362, 363 
Individualism, 134, 183-184, 187, 190- 
191, 297, 3o8n., 354 

definition of, 194 
Industrial societies, 174, 178, 1 82-191 

See also Instrumental complex, Tech- 
nological change 
Informal controls, in medicine, 469- 

471 
Inhibition 

definition of, 210 
and deviance, 252, 268 
and socialization, 212, 216, 225 
Inkeles, Alex, 1 56n. 
Institutional integration, theorem of, 
36-45, 52, 159, 416, 473, 481 
and social control, 301-302 
Institutionalization, dilemma of, 165- 

166 
Institutions 

definition of, 39 

integrative function of, 36-45, 133 
and motivational adequacy, 3 1 
points of reference for differentia- 
tion of, 45-51 



Index 



[565] 



and religious beliefs, 371-379 

and solidarity of collectivities, 98-99 

types of, 51-58 

See also Relational, Regulative and 
Cultural institutions 
Institutions, secondary 

and expressive symbols, 406-407 

and social control, 305-308 
Instruction, mechanism of, 212 
Instrumental action-orientations, 97, 
100 

and artist role, 385, 409-410 

definition of, 49 

vs. expressive orientations, 79-88, 
127, 334, 385, 401-403. 409-410 

and goal-direction, 8 

in pattern-variable scheme, 59-6off. 

and regulative institutions, 53-54 

and relational institutions, 69-75 
Instrumental complex, i84£f., 268 

as empirical clustering, 1 57-161 

and physician role, 434-436, 473-475 

and profit motive, 243-248 

and relational rewards, 418 

and science, 333, 338-340, 346-348 

and technological change, 506-510 
Insulation mechanisms, 309 
Integration 

and adaptive structures, 167-169 

definition of, 36n. 

and deviance, 251 

diagram of, 136 

major foci of, 27, 132-136 

of political power, 1 27 

and problem of evil, 163-165 

role of ideologies in, 3 5 off. 

and self-collectivity-orientation, 96- 

lOI 

Integrative action-interests, definition 

of, 47-48 
Integrative foci of action systems, 27 
Integrative structures, classification of, 

137, 149-150 
Intellectual role, 366-367 
Interaction 

and belief systems, 327-332 
components of, 3-22, 24-26 
institutional integration of, 37-45 
and motivational mechanisms, 204- 

207 
and origins of deviance, 251-256 



and relational possessions, 414-417 

and symbolic acts, 386-394 

and trend to rationality, 352 
Internalization 

of culture patterns, 36-45 

of expressive symbols, 387 

of value-orientations, see Value-ac- 
quisition 
Interpretation problems, see Uncer- 
tainty 
Investigation, definition of, 329-330 
Ireland, 517 
Isolating mechanisms, 309 

JAPAN, 402 

Jehovah's Witnesses, 288 

Jesus, 528 

Jews, I72n., 289-290 

Justice, 296 

KANT, Immanuel, 360 
Kardiner, Abram, 228, 239n., 304n. 
Katz, Seymour, xii 

Kinship structures, 84, 85, 87, 90, 

ii6f., 281, 390, 406, 407, 417, 

419 

as empirical clusterings, 153-157 

in empirical societies, 180-200 'passim 

and functional imperatives, 169-177 

vs. occupational structures, 158, 160- 

161, 168, 177-178, 186-187, 193 

and socialization, 220, 225, 227-228, 

229 
and technological change, 510 
Kitt, Alice, 292n. 

Kluckhohn, Clyde, xi, 31 in., 33 in. 
Kluckhohn, Florence Rockwood, xi, 

i99n., 23in., 235n., 382n. 
Knowledge, see Belief systems, Em- 
pirical knowledge 
Knowledge, problem of, 359-360, 362- 

363 
Kroeber, A. L., 304n., 336-337, 345, 
469n., 488 

LABOR role, 184 

Language, as functional prerequisite, 

33-34 
Laski, Harold J., 365n. 
Lasswell, Harold D., 355n. 
Latency, of collectivity orientations, 99 



[566] 



Laws vs. mechanisms, 201-207, 485- 
486 

Lazarsfeld, Paul F., 29211., 514"- 

Leadership roles, 135-136, 141, 190, 
287 
definition of, 100 
expressive, 400-406, 412, 524 

Learning 

mechanisms of, 203-204, 227, 236 
and symbolic systems, 16-17 

Legal profession, 269 

Legitimacy, claims to 
and criminal role, 310 
and deviance, 291-297 
of revolutionary movements, 522-523 
role of ideologies in, 348-359 
and sick role, 312, 436-439 

Lenin, V. L, 159, 528, 530 

Levy, Marion J., Jr., 26n. 

Levy-Bruhl, Lucien, 328n. 

Liberalism, 358-359> 365-366 

Linton, Ralph, 64 

Lister, Joseph, 433 

Love 

conditional, 221 

and deviance, 261, 263-265, 268 

and expressive symbolism, 389-391, 

393 

pattern- variable components of, 108, 
1 09-1 10 

and reward system, 130-132 

romantic, 85, 87, 197, 266, 390-391 

and socialization, 213 

universal, 85, 88 
Loyalty, 83, 97-98, 418 

definition of, 77-78 

as a possession, 128-129 
Lutheranism, 372, 517 



MAGIC 

definition of, 375 

and empirical knowledge, 333-334 
and medical practice, 432, 466-469 
and social control, 304, 307, 311, 
314 
Malinowski, Bronislaw, 304n., 328n., 

329n., 397, 468, 469n. 
Marriage, 77, 173, 189, 238, 242, 390 
See also Erotic activities, Kinship 
structures 



Index 

Martin, Rev. John V., xi 
Marx, Karl, 528 

Marxism, 156-157, 159-160, 163, 165- 
166, 188-189, 366n., 370, 374, 
413-414, 514, 532. 
Masculine role, 221-225, 269 
Mass psychology, 357 
Massey, Miriam, xi 
Mayo, Elton, 426n. 
Meaning, problem of, 164-165, 295 
definitions of, 330-331, 360-361 
and religion, 367-368 
Mechanisms 

definition of, 6, 201-202 

and functional prerequisites, 115 

vs. laws, 485-486 

place of, in structural-functional 

analysis, 22 
psychological vs. social system, 201- 

207 
of socialization, 31-32 
Medical practice, 428-479 

See also Physician role. Sick role 
Medicine, and universities, 347-348 
Merton, Robert K., viii, xi, 30, 257- 
258, z86, 290, 292n., 303, 324, 
335n., 341, 344n., 5i4n. 
Miller, Neal, 547 
Mobility, 197 
Money, 124, 244ff., 424ff. 
Moore, Harrington, Jr., i6on. 
Moral action-orientations, 41-42 
definition of, 50-51 
vs. evaluative orientations, 55-57 
and relational institutions, 79-88 
and solidarity of collectivities, 96- 

loi 
See also Pattern variables. Value- 
orientations 
Moral value-orientation modes, defini- 
tion of, 13-14 
Morale, 294 
Morality, 57, 135, 263 
Mother role, 221-225, 241-242, 434, 

447 
Motivation 

mechanisms of, see Mechanisms 
psychological vs. sociological, 201- 
207 
Motivational orientations, 136, 157 
as functional prerequisites, 29-33 



Indi 



integration of with value-orienta- 
tions, 36-45 
modes of, 7, 57 
vs. value-orientations, 12-15 
See also Cognitive, Cattectic and 
Evaluative orientations 
Motivational process, and social change, 

486 
Murdock, G. P., i54n., i7on., 17 in., 

181 
Murray, Henry A., xi 
Mythology vs. dogma, 398 

NATIONALISM, 187-188 

Natural sciences, and theory of action, 

541-545 
Nazism, 193, 521 

Need-dispositions, 7, 32, 37, 38, 44, 

yy, 82, 128, 157, 186, 238, 239, 

247, 272, 278, 384, 386, 397, 

491, 492, 497 

and genesis of deviance, 2$2S., 260, 

320-321 
pattern- variable components of, 109- 

IIO 

in socialization, 216, 220, 225 
See also Alienative, Conformative 
need-dispositions 
Negroes, lyin., 281-282 
Neurosis, 227, 241, 255, 461-462, 479 
Neutrality, affective, see AfFectivity- 

Neutrality 
Non-empirical beliefs, 359-379 
definition of, 328-332 
See also Rehgious beliefs. Philosophy 
Non-literate societies, 176, 311, 314, 
328, 329n., 369, 432 
empirical knowledge in, 332-334 
Normative orientations, definition of, 
11-12 
See Evaluative orientations, Value- 
orientations 
Norms, focus on, vs. social-object focus, 

see Person-Pattern focus 
Northrop, F. S. C, 501 

OBJECT world 

definition of, 4 

differentiation of, 1 36 
Occupational roles, 474-475 

and deviance, 272, 281 



ex [ 567 ] 

vs. kinship structures, 158, 160-161, 
168, 177-178, 186-187, 193, 281 

learning of, 235, 237-238, 239-242 

in major types of social structure, 
i84ff., 192-193 

and stratification, 1 57-161 

and technological change, 506-507, 
509, 510 
Oedipus conflict, 223 
Ontology, 542 
Opportunity, 30 

Order, motivational problem of, 30-33 
Organizations, 100 

definition of, 72 

formal, 279 

and medical practice, 435-436 

and profit motive, 247 

and social control, 318 

and technological change, 507-508, 
509 
Orientation role-types 

classification of, 143-145 

definition of, 138-140 
Orientations, directionality of, 496-498 
Osier, Sir William, 448 

PARADIGMS vs. theory, 485-486 
Parental roles, 221-225, 390, 453, 479, 

503-504 
Pareto, Vilfredo, vii, xi, 33in., 451, 

466, 495n., 529n., 546 
Particularism, see Universahsm-Particu- 

larism 
Particularistic achievement pattern 

definition of, 102-104, m 

in empirical societies, 195-198 
Particularistic ascription pattern 

competence in, 454n. 

definition of, 102-104, m 

in empirical societies, 198-199 
Partisanship, 317 
Passivity, see Activity-Passivity 
Pasteur, Louis, 433, 455 
Patient role, 439-447, 473-479 
Pattern-consistency 

and belief systems, 379-383 

and ideologies, 350-351 

and religious beliefs, 378 

and social change, 499 

in symbohc systems, 15-16, 17 
Pattern responsibility, 322-325 



[568] 



Index 



Pattern variables 

definition of, 46-51, 58-67 

diagrams of interrelations among, 

loi-i 12 
See also Value-orientation patterns 
and under Achievement-Ascrip- 
tion, Affectivity-Neutrality, Self- 
Collectivity-orientation,Specificity- 
DifFuseness, Universalism-Particu- 
larism 
Pediatrician role, 447 
Perfectionism, 259, 260, 261, 280, 286, 

289, 290-291, 324 
Performance-capacities, 92, 142, 143 
Performances (vs. qualities), 88, 9496 

See also Achievement- Ascription 
Permissiveness 

and "basic personality," 234-235 
in child socialization, 220, 221 
and deviance, 270 
and social change, 512-513 
in social control, 300-301, 304, 305- 
308, 310, 313, 314, 317-318, 321- 

325 
as social-integrative focus, 132-133 
Person-Pattern focus 
definition of, 257n. 
and deviant social structures, 288- 

290 
and directions of deviance, 256-267 
and regression, 234 
and social control paradigm, 322-325 
Personality systems 

and ascriptive criteria, 89, 91-92 

vs. cultural and social systems, 9-10, 

14-19, 239n., 539-541 
vs. cultural systems, 34, 327 
and functional prerequisites, 28-33 
vs. role structure, 44-45 
and scope of psychology, 545-547 
vs. social systems, 26, 50-51, 52-53, 

80, 81, 201-207, 2,28-235, 249- 

250, 265-266 
Personality traits, 92-93 
Personnel, allocation of, 114!?., 117- 

"9. 133-134 
Philosophy 

definition of, 331 
institutionalization of, 359-367 
vs. religion, 362-364, 367 



Physical objects 

and belief systems, 380 

definition of, 4 

and expressive symbols, 388-389, 

390, 418-422 
and functional prerequisites, 4 
and ideologies, 353 
as possessions, 119 

Physician role, 428-479 

institutionalization of, 434-436 
and profit motive, 471-473 
situational factors in, 447-454 
and social control, 303, 313-315 

Plasticity, 32, 155, 227, 239 
definition of, 215 

Plato, 378 

Political office, 316-317, 318, 319 

Political power, 126-127, 131- 132. 

Political science, scope of, 74-75, 126- 
127 

Population theory, and social change, 
489-490 

Positivism, 361, 374, 516 

Possessions, 140, 185-186 
allocation of, 1 19-132 
classification of, 145-148 
expressive definition of, 78-79 
instrumental definition of, 71-73 
relational, 415!?. 
See also Facilities, Rewards 

Power, 30, 75 
definition of, 121 
economic vs. political, 121- 127 
and expressive symbolism, 420, 425 
and functional imperatives, 174-176 
in particularistic ascription pattern, 

198 
and religion, 165-167, 179-180 
and revolution, 523, 524-525 
and technological change, 508-509 
and territoriality, 1 61-163 
theory of, and political science, 550- 

551 
Pragmatism, 108 
Preferred patterns, 235 
Prejudice, 266, 289-290, 513 
Prestige 

allocation of, 30 

definition of, 132 

and stratification, 160-161 
Preventive mechanisms, zggS. 



Ind 

Priorities, institutionalized, 302-303 

Privacy, and medical practice, 453 

Process, definition of, 201 

Producer role, 246 

Professional roles, 343, 348, 394, 434, 

463 
See also Scientist role, Physician role, 
Teacher role 
Profit motive 

and physician role, 435, 471-473 
and regulative institutions, 53-54 
and socialization, 243-248 
Projection, 266, 382, 460 

and expressive symbols, 398, 400, 
405-407, 419, 421-422, 425-426 
Propaganda, 4 1 2-4 1 3 
Property, see Possessions 
Prostitution, 85, 316 
Protestantism, 341, 517 
Pseudo-science, 340-341, 359, 516 
in medical practice, 432-433, 466- 
469, 476 
Psychoanalysis, 233, 243n., 276, 4o6n., 

452-453, 462n. 
Psychological determinism, 15, 31, 542- 

543 
Psychology, 18 
scope of, 545-547 
vs. sociology, 45, 277, 552 
See also Personality systems 
Psychosomatic illness, 255 

See also Sick role 
Psychotherapy 

and expressive symbols, 400 
and mechanisms of social control, 
2.99, 301, 313-314, 318, 319, 32.1- 
32.5 
and physician role, 452-453, 460- 

462, 465, 476, 478-479 
vs. socialization, 221-222 
Punishment, see Reward-punishment 
mechanisms 



QUALITY-complexes, 88-94, 1 1 2 
See also Achievement- Ascription 



RADICALISM, 191, 293, 315, 355- 

356,518 
Rational action, 549-550 






[569] 



Rationality, trend to, 352 
Rationalization, 266-267 
Rationalization (sociological), 499-500, 

501, 505-520 
Reaction- formations, 255, 262, 316 
Reality-testing, 236, 328 
Rebelliousness, 257ff., 280, 284, 285, 

286-288 
Receptiveness, definition of, 75-76, 79 
Receptiveness-responsiveness 

and deviance, 261, 263-265 

pattern- variable components of, 108, 
1 09- 1 I o 

and reward system, 130-132 

and socialization, 213, 218 
Reciprocities, denial of, 300-301, 314, 

316-317, 32.1-3^5 
Recreation, see Entertainment 
Reducibility, 6, 26, 80, 539, 543, 552 
Reference groups, xgin. 
Regression, 226, 232-233, 267 
Regulative institutions 

and allocation, 1 14-132 

classification of, 137, 145-148 

definition of, 51-55, 133 

and integration, 132-136 

vs. relational institutions, 93-94 
Reification, 376-378 
Reinforcement-extinction, 209-210 
Rejection, and social control, 322-325 
Relational ascription, 89-96, 195 
Relational institutions 

classification of, 137-140, 142-145 

definition of, 5 1 flF. 

and pattern-variable scheme, 57-58 

vs. regulative institutions, 54-55, 93- 

94 

and systems of roles, 69-88 
Religion 

and deviance, 288, 292, 294, 295, 
296 

and expressive symbols, 385, 395, 
402, 403, 41 1 

and power, 165-167 

and profit motive, 244 

vs. "religious beliefs," 370 

and social control, 304, 3o8n., 315, 
316 

in universalistic achievement pat- 
tern, 188-189 

and value-integration, 163-167 



[570] 



Index 



Religious beliefs 

definition of, 331, 361, 367-368 

and ideologies, 350, 530, 531-53^ 

institutionalization of, 367-379 

vs. philosophy, 362-364, 367 

vs. "religion," 370 

and science, 339, 341, 34^, 516-517 

and social change, 516-517 
Religious toleration, 54, 308 
Remuneration, 7off., 424 

and artist role, 408-409 

definition of, 70 

and physician role, 464 
Representative roles, 135, 245, 401 

definition of, 100 
Repression, 405-406, 444 

and compulsive motivation, 253-256, 
265-266 
Residential location, 91, i7iff. 
Response, definition of, 75-76, 79 

See also Receptiveness-responsiveness 
Responsibility, 95, 242, 272, 319 

definition of, 41-42 

and occupational roles, 1 59 

and physician role, 447-449 

political, 190 

and self -collectivity-orientation, 97fiF. 

and sick role, 437, 440 

See also Pattern responsibility 
Revolutionary movements, i92n., 294 

adaptive transformations of, 525-533 

and social change, 520-525 
Reward-punishment mechanisms 

definition of, 212 

in social control, 320 

in socialization, 215-217, 218, 234 
Rewards 

allocation of, 127-132, 175-176 

definition of, 78-79, 127 

and expressive symbolism, 414-427 

vs. facilities, 119 

manipulation of, and social control, 
301, 306, 314, 322-325 

and political power, 161- 162 

and profit motive, Z44S. 

relational, 128-133, 223, 301, 

515 

and stratification, 1 57-1 61 
in universalistic achievement 
tern, 185-186 



513- 



pat- 



Ritual, 268 

definition of, 375 

and expressive symbols, 395-396 

and social control, 306, 310 

Roethlisberger, F. J., 5o7n. 

Role-conflict, 280-283 

Role-differentiation, 114 

and expressive symbol systems, 399- 

407 
and functional imperatives, 167-177 
points of reference for, 45-51 
in regulative context, 1 14-1 32 
in relational context, 69-88 

Role-expectations 
definition of, 38-40 
indefinite, and deviance, 269-272 
internalization of conflicting, 282 
pattern- variable types of, 103-104 

Role-expectations, complementary 
and belief systems, 327-328 
and deviance, 249-251, 255-257, 260 

Role-expectations, differentiation of 
by objects of orientation, 88-96 
by orientational content, 69-88 
and solidarity of collectivities, 96- 

lOI 

Role-expectations, learning of 
and "basic personality," 226-235 
in child socialization, 205-226 
by situational specification, 236-248 

Roles 

"alternative," 235, 237-238, 239 
definition of, 25-26, 39-40 
definition of by pattern variables, 

, 58-67 
See also Role-expectations, Social 
structure, Occupational roles and 
under specific roles 

Roman Empire, 523 

Roosevelt, Franklin D., 413 

Rules, conflict of, 271-272 

Ruling class, 319, 509 

"SAFETY-VALVE" patterns, 270, 305- 

308 
St. Paul, 526, 528 
Salesman role, 1 84 
Sanctions, 82, 93, 132 

bias in, and deviance, 272-277 

definition of, 38-40 



Index 



[571] 



formal vs. informal, 134-135 
manipulation of, and social control, 

301, 306, 314, 322-325 
vagueness of, and deviance, 278-280 
Scapegoating, 188, 194, 290, 312, 404- 

406, 513 
Scarcity, and roles, 1 1 6ff . 
Science 

definition of, 331, 335-336 
and development of empirical knowl- 
edge, 332.-334 
and ideologies, 339, 353354, 517- 

519 
institutionalization of, 335-348 
and medical practice, 432-433, 455 
vs. philosophy, 360 
reification of, 376-377 
vs. religion, 339, 341, 342, 516 517 
and social change, 491-492, 494-495, 
505-520 
Scientist role, 335-348 

vs. artist role, 410 
Secondary gain 

in deviant behavior, 276-277, 293- 

294 
through sick role, 437-438 
Security (psychological), 40, 43, 426, 
465, 511 
definition of, 218-219 
and deviance, 261-262, 299 
and expressive symbols, 403-404 
and socialization, 219-220, 221, 247 
Seducibility, 322-325 
Segregations [of pattern variables], 87- 

88, 158 
Self-Collectivity-orientation 

in classification of role types, 143- 

145 
definition of, 60-61 
and deviance, 286-291 
integrative function of, 96-101, 107, 

132-136 
and kinship, 1 54 
in major types of social structure, 

183-199 j)assim 
in medical practice, 434, 435-436, 

438-439, 445n., 46in., 463465, 

471-473 
and profit motive, 245-246 
and scientist role, 343-345, 347 



and social control, 299, 314, 316-319 

and socialization, 237 

See also Collectivities 
Self-discipline, 59-60 

See Affectivity-Neutrality 
Self-respect, 40 
Seniority, 185 
Sensitivity, 33, 40, 155 

definition of, 215 
Sentiments, definition of, 41-42 
Sex, as ascriptive criterion, 89-90, 117, 
170 

See also Erotic activities 
Sex roles, 155, 193 

learning of, 221-225, 231-232, 233 
Sheldon, Richard, xi 
Sherwood, Robert, 413 
Shils, Edward, ix, xd, 538 
Shryock, Richard H., 445n. 
Sick role, 285, 287-288, 289, 291, 428- 

479 

institutionalization of, 436-439 

vs. patient role, 476 

situational factors in, 439-447 

and social control, 3 1 2-3 1 5 
Signs vs. s)Tnbols, 5, 10 
Situation 

definition of, 543 

differentiation of, 4 
Situational role-specification 

definition of, 236-243 

and profit motive, 243-248 

and social control, 270, 274 
Skill, see Competence 
Skinner, B. P., 544n. 
Smith, Adam, 70 
Social change 

directions of, 496-503 

examples of, 503-533 

nature of, 490-496 

repercussions of, 494-496fF. 

role of ideas in, 364 

and socialization mechanisms, 243, 
492, 503-504, 510, 529 

sources of, 493-494 

status of theoretical analysis of, 481- 
490, 533-535 
Social control, mechanisms of, 31-32, 
207, 234, 239, 264, 277, 283 

classification of, 297-321 



[57^] 



Social control — ^Continued') 
definition of, 206, 250-251 
institutional basis of, 134-135 
in medical practice, 454-465, 477- 

479 
and social change, 512-513 
underlying paradigm of, 321-325 

Social Darwinism, 489 

Social-integrative action-orientations, 50- 

51 
Social objects 

actors as, 138-140 
and belief systems, 380-382 
categorization of, 142-143 
definition of, 4 
differentiation of, 88-96 
and expressive symbols, 387-388 
focus on vs. pattern focus, see Per- 
son-Pattern focus 
and ideologies, 353-354 
as pattern variable focus, 63-66 
Social psychology, 18, 553 
Social sciences 

and ideologies, 354, 358-359 
and philosophy, 365-367 
and social change, 518-519 
Social structure 

classification of, 137-150 
and compatibility, 177-180 
definitions of, 20-21, 36-37, 114 
of deviant tendencies, 283-297 
empirical differentiation of, 151-200 
and functional imperatives, 167-177 
limits to variability of, 152, 167-180 
of medical profession, 433-439 
vs. personality structure, 44-45 
principal types of, 180-200 
See also Institutions, Roles, Social 
systems 
Social systems 

as collectivities, loi 
vs. cultural systems, 6, 9-10, 14-19, 
33-36, 239n., 304n., 326-3325., 
539-541 
definition of, 3-22, 24 
functional prerequisites of, 26-36 
paradigm for analysis of, 1 36 
vs. personality systems, 6, 9-10, 14- 
19, 218-33, 50-51, 52-53. 8of., 201- 
207, 228-235, 249-250, 265-266, 
539-541 



Index 

place of, in action theory, 537-541 
and scope of sociology, 547-552 
units of, 24-26 

Social systems, differentiation of 
classification of , 137-150 
functional foci for, 1 13-136 

Social systems, malintegration of 
and cognitive distortion, 356-359 
and deviance, 281-283, 298 

Social systems, partial, 98, 101 
as collectivities, 133 
definition of, 1 9 
and power, 162 
vs. total systems, 113 

Socialism, and profit motive, 245, 247 

Socialization, 116, 154 

and basic personality, 226-235 
of the child, 207-226 
definition of, 205, 207-208 
and equilibrium, 481-482, 483 
mechanisms of, 205, 207ff., 236- 

243 
See also Reward-punishment, Value- 
acquisition 
by situational role specification, 236- 

248 
and social change, 492, 503-504, 510, 

529 
and social control, 298 
Societies 

definition of, 1 9 

functional imperatives of, 167-177 
structural imperatives of, 177-180 
Sociology 

vs. anthropology, 1 81-182 

See also Social systems vs. cultuial 

systems 
vs. psychology, 45, 277, 552 
scope of, 547-552 

See also Social systems vs. personality 
systems 
Solidarity, 83 

definition of, 77, 97-98 

and expressive symbolism, 395-396, 

397,415 
and self-collectivity-orientation, 96- 

lOI 

Solomon, Richard, 2i2n. 
Sorokin, P., 490 
Soviet Union, 165-166, 3660. 
art in, 412 



Index 



[573] 



family in, 156-157 

modification of Utopian patterns in, 

530-533 
nationalism in, 187-188 
stratification in, 159-160, 161, 515 
and universalistic ascription pattern, 

193 
Spanish America, iii, 198-199 
Specialization, 176 
Specificity-Diffuseness 

and belief systems, 334, 343 

definition of, 65-66 

and deviance, 263-265, 268 

and entertairmient, 512 

and expressive symbols, 389-394, 
416-427 

and functional imperatives, i7ifiF. 

and instrumental complex, 158 

and instrumental vs. expressive ac- 
tions, 81-83, 84-88 

and kinship, 154 

in major types of social structure, 
189-190, 192 

and medical practice, 434, 435, 438, 
456-462 

motivational reference of, 105-106 

with other pattern variables, 1 02-1 12 

and political science, 551 

and social control, 316-317 

and socialization, 216-217, 219, 226, 
232-233, 237, 240, 241 

and structural imperatives, 177-180 

and types of attachment, 129-132 
Spectator role, 87, 512 
Spengler, Oswald, 487 
Stalin, J. v., 528, 532 
State 

and church, 175, 179-180 

and power, 162 
Status-role 

definition of, 25-26 

as focus of institutional integration, 

36-45 
See Roles, Role-expectations 
Statuses vs. collectivity memberships, 

93 
StoufFer, Samuel, xi, 23 5n., 5i4n. 
Strain 

and deviance, 252, 253-256 
in expressive symbol systems, 404- 
407, 424 



in major types of social structure, 

180-199 fassim 
in physician role, 447-454, 466-469 
reaction to, and social control, 298- 

325 
in sick role, 442-445 
and social change, 485, 491, 493, 
496, 504, 505, 508, 510-535 
fassim 
See also Deviance, sources of; Role 
conflict; Adaptive structures 
Stratification 

definition of, 132 

and expressive symbolism, 420-422, 

426-427 
and instrumental complex, 1 57-161 
and technological change, 509, 515, 

534 
in universalistic achievement pat- 
tern, 188 
Structural-functional analysis 
definition of, 19-22 
vs. dynamic analysis, 202-203 
in theory of social change, 483-486, 
533-535 
Structural imperatives 

of empirical societies, 177-180 
and social change, 483-484, 495- 
496 
Structure, see Social structure 
Style of life, 132, 188, 244-245, 511 
Style symbolism, 395, 420-422, 426, 

427 
Subcultures 

claims to legitimacy of, 293-297 
and deviance, 286-291 
and expressive symbols, 411-412 
and ideologies, 349-350, 355*356 
and social change, 521-522 
and social control, 305-306, 315 
Subjective point of view, 543-545 
Submission, 259, 262-263, 265, 287, 

3^0, 324 
Substitution 

definition of, 210 
and deviance, 252, 260 
and socialization, 212, 216, 236 
Subsystems, social 

organization of components into, 68- 

112 
problem focus of, 74 



[574] 



Success, 1 86, 237, 247, 423-427 

Suicide, 497 

Superego, 40, 206 

Supernatural, 368-370, 371, 375-376, 

397 

definition of, 368-370 
Supplication, 375 
Support 

in child socialization, 220 

in social control, 299-301, 310, 313, 
315, 321-32.5 
Surgeon role, 466-469 
Sutton, Francis X., xi, 26n. 
Symbolic acts, 387-394, 416 
Symbolism, intermediate, 376-378, 516 
Symbols, definition of, 5, lo-ii 

See also Expressive symbols 
Symmetrical asymmetry, 502 

TACT, 308-309 

Taste, standards of, 263, 421-422 
Teacher role, 240-242, 391-394 
Technical role, 87 
Technological change, 505-520 
Technology, definition of, 54S)-55o 
Tenure, 185 
Territorial location, 195 

definition of, 90-91 

and functional imperatives, 170-176 

and power system, 1 61-163, ^74- 
176 
Theory 

vs. paradigms, 485-486 

systematic, 536-537 
Time, 195 

and ascriptive criteria, 91-92 

and deviance, 251, 254n. 

as possession, 120 

and social control, 302 
Tolman, Edward, xi, 7, 538 
Traditionalism, 363, 365, 500, 520, 
524, 549 

and ideologies, 358-359 

in major types of social structure, 
183, 190-191, 198, 199 
Transference, 315, 400, 453, 460 
Trobrianders, 304, 329n. 



UNCERTAINTY 
in physician role, 449-450, 466-469 



Index 

and social control, 304 

See also Indefiniteness 
Unit act, 7 

place of in action frame of refer- 
ence, 8n. 

as unit of social systems, 24-26 
Units of social systems, 24-26 
U niversalism-Particularism 

and achievement criteria, 95 

and behef systems, 334, 343, 381 

definition of, 61-63 

and deviance, 258, 268-269, 272, 
281-282, 290, 296 

and expressive symbols, 417, 418, 
422 

and functional imperatives, 171S. 

and instrumental complex, 158 

and instrmnental vs. expressive ac- 
tion,. 83-88 

and kinship, 154 

and love attachments, 130 

and medical practice, 434, 438, 454- 
456 

vs. other pattern variables, 101-112 

and power, 122 

and quahty complexes, 89 

and rewards, 129 

and social change, 500, 508, 533 

and social control, 316-317 

social system reference of, io6flF. 

and socialization, 219, 225, 226, 
232, 237, 240, 241 

and structural imperatives, 177-180 

See also Particularistic and Univer- 
salistic Achievement and Ascrip 
tion patterns 
Universalistic achievement pattern 

definition of, 102-104, 107-108, iii- 
112 

and deviance, 265 

in empirical societies, 1 82-1 91 

and ideologies, 356 

and religion, 3o8n. 

reward system under, 1 31-132 
Universalistic ascription pattern 

definition of, 102-104, 108, iii 

in empirical societies, 1 91-194 
Universities, and scientist role, 342- 

343, 347-348 
Utopian patterns, 166-167, 315, 534 

claims to legitimacy of, 295-297 



Ind 



and expressive symbols, 403-404 

and ideologies, 357-358 

practical transformations of, 526- 

527, 530 
and religious beliefs, 374, 379 

VALUE, definition of, 12 
Value-acquisition, 34, 36-45, 52-53, 
211 
in basic personality structure, 226- 

235 
in child socialization, 213-226 
definition of, 213-215, 263-264 
and deviance, 249-251, 251-252, 

267-269 
Value-orientation modes 
definition of, 12, 57 
vs. motivational orientations, 12-14, 

36-45 
Value-orientation patterns 

vs. cognitive beliefs, 35, 350-351 
derivation of, 46-48 
in empirical societies, 180-200 
vs. functional imperatives, 167-169 
internalization of, 34, 36-45, 52-53 
See also Value-acquisition 
legitimation of by ideologies, 35 iff. 
vs. other cultural components, 55- 

57, 498-499 
in social change, 484-485, 498-499 



ex [ 575 ] 

See also Pattern variables, Person- 
Pattern focus 

Value-orientation, social, major types 
of, 101-112, 180-200 

Variant personality types, 231-235 

Variant value patterns, 169, 186 

Veblen, Thorsten, 245 

Vested interests, and social change, 
49i-493» 504, 506-507, 513, 516, 
520, 524 

Vicious circle [of deviance], 272-277, 
300, 319-320, 358, 465 

WARDWELL, Walter, 433n. 

Warner, W. Lloyd, 31 in. 

Weber, Max, xi, 4n., loon., iii, 132, 
135, i5on., 330, 368, 370, 374, 
378, 402, 500, 502, 5i8n., 525n. 

Welch, William, 506 

White, Leslie, 490 

White lies, 308-309 

White supremacy, 281-282 

Wilson, Logan, 343n. 

Wilson, Robert N., xi 

Withdrawal, 31, 2572., 284-285, 287- 
288, 289, 324 

Wynne, Lyman, xi 

YELLE, Weymouth, xi 

Youth culture, 305-306, 391, 406-407 



ntjj r^«rtAUMV.i\0 



A Ser/es of Paperbound Books in the Social and Natural Sciences, Philosophy, and the Humanities 

These books, chosen for their intellectual importance and editorial excellence, are 
printed on good quality book paper, from the large and readable type of the cloth- 
bound edition, and are Smyth-sewn for enduring use. Free Press Paperbacks conform 
in every significant way to the high editorial and production standards maintained in 
the higher-priced, case-bound books published by The Free Press of Glencoe. 



Andrews, W'ayne 
■-'Aron, Raymond 

Bettelheim, Bruno 

Cohen, Morris Raphael 

Coser, Lewis 

Durkheim, Emile 
•■Durkheim, Emile 

Edel, Abraham 

Eisenstadt, S. N. 
•^Evans-Pritchard, E. E. 

Friedmann, Georges 

Friedmann, Georges 

Geertz, Clifford 

Goode, William J. 

Gouldner, Alvin W. 

Hayek, F. A. 

Henry, Andrew F., and 
James F. Short, Jr. 

Janowitz, Morris 

Katz, Elihu, and 
Paul F. Lazarsfeld 
' Lerner, David, and 
Lucille W. Pevsner 

Ma.ximofr, G. P. 

Meyerson, Nhirtin, and 
Edward C. Banfield 

Neumann, Franz 

Park, Robert Ezra 
uParsons, Talcott 

Parsons, Talcott 

Radcliffe-Brown, A. R. 

Reiss, Ira L. 

Riesman, David 

Rosenberg, Bernard, and 
David Manning White 
'-- Simmel, Georg 
^'^immcl, Georg 
L^orokin, Pitirim A. 

Wagner, Philip 

•AVeber, Max 



Architecture, Ambition, and Americans 90067 

German Sociology 90105 

Truants Fro7n Life 90345 

Reason and Nature 90609 

The Functions of Social Conflict 90681 

The Division of Labor in Society 90785 

The Rules of Sociological Method 90850 

Ethical Judgment 90890 

From Generation to Generation 90938 

Social Anthropology and Other Essays 90987 

The Anatomy of Work 91082 

Industrial Society 91090 

The Religion of Java 91146 

Religion Among the Primitives 91242 

Patterns of Industrial Bureaucracy 91274 

The Counter-Revolution of Science 91436 

Suicide and Homicide 91442 

The Professional Soldier 91618 

Personal Influence 91715 

The Passing of Traditional Society 91859 

The Political Philosphy of Bakutnn 90121 

Politics, Planning and the Public Interest 92123 

The Democratic and the Authoritarian State 92291 

Race and Culture 92379 

Essays in Sociological Theory 92403 

The Social System 92419 

The Andairuin Islanders 92558 

Premarital Sexual Standards in America 92620 
Individualism Reconsidered: unabridged edition 92650 

Mass Culture: The Popular Arts in America 92708 

Conflict AND The Web of Group Affiliations 92884 

The Sociology of Georg Simmel 92892 

Social and Cultural Mobility 93028 

The Human Use of the Earth 93357 
The Theory of Social and Economic Organization 93493 



Many of these books are available in their original cloth bindings. 
A complete catalogue of all Free Press titles will be sent on request 



UNIVERSnr OF CP • LOS ANGELES 

3 1158 00150 6053 



Sociology $2.95 



Talcott Parsons 
The Social System 



Professor Parsons writes in the Preface to this book that it is his 
intention "to bring together, in systematic and generahzed form, the main 
outhnes of a conceptual scheme for the analysis of the structure and 
processes of social systems. In the nature of the case, within the frame of 
reference of action, such a conceptual scheme must focus on the delinea- 
tion of the system of institutionalized roles and the motivational processes 
organized about them. 

"Because of this focus and the very elementary treatment of processes 
of economic exchange and of the organization of political power, the book 
should be regarded as a statement of general sociological theory, since 
this is here interpreted to be that part of the theory of the social system 
which is centered on the phenomena of the institutionalization of patterns 
of value-orientation in roles." 



THE FREE PRESS OF GLENCOE 

A DIVISION OF THE MACMILLAN COMPANY 

60 Fifth Avenue, New York, N.Y. 10011 

92419 

Cover deiign/Ellen Raskin 



